{u'Barbara de Angelis': [u'Love is a force more formidable than any other. It is invisible - it cannot be seen or measured, yet it is powerful enough to transform you in a moment, and offer you more joy than any material possession could.', u"The real act of marriage takes place in the heart, not in the ballroom or church or synagogue. It's a choice you make - not just on your wedding day, but over and over again - and that choice is reflected in the way you treat your husband or wife.", u'You never lose by loving. You always lose by holding back.', u'The more connections you and your lover make, not just between your bodies, but between your minds, your hearts, and your souls, the more you will strengthen the fabric of your relationship, and the more real moments you will experience together.', u'We need to find the courage to say NO to the things and people that are not serving us if we want to rediscover ourselves and live our lives with authenticity.', u'No matter what age you are, or what your circumstances might be, you are special, and you still have something unique to offer. Your life, because of who you are, has meaning.', u"Love's greatest gift is its ability to make everything it touches sacred.", u'No one is in control of your happiness but you; therefore, you have the power to change anything about yourself or your life that you want to change.', u'Women need real moments of solitude and self-reflection to balance out how much of ourselves we give away.', u'In order to experience everyday spirituality, we need to remember that we are spiritual beings spending some time in a human body.', u"A man's brain has a more difficult time shifting from thinking to feeling than a women's brain does.", u"Marriage is not a noun; it's a verb. It isn't something you get. It's something you do. It's the way you love your partner every day.", u"If you aren't good at loving yourself, you will have a difficult time loving anyone, since you'll resent the time and energy you give another person that you aren't even giving to yourself.", u"Men aren't the way they are because they want to drive women crazy; they've been trained to be that way for thousands of years. And that training makes it very difficult for men to be intimate.", u'The more anger towards the past you carry in your heart, the less capable you are of loving in the present.', u'When you make a commitment to a relationship, you invest your attention and energy in it more profoundly because you now experience ownership of that relationship.', u'Difficult times always create opportunities for you to experience more love in your life.', u'Love and kindness are never wasted. They always make a difference. They bless the one who receives them, and they bless you, the giver.', u'Men are just as sensitive, and in some ways more sensitive, than women are.', u'The moment in between what you once were, and who you are now becoming, is where the dance of life really takes place.', u'What allows us, as human beings, to psychologically survive life on earth, with all of its pain, drama, and challenges, is a sense of purpose and meaning.', u'I just want to get a Ph.D. in love.', u'Love is a choice you make from moment to moment.', u'Only when your consciousness is totally focused on the moment you are in can you receive whatever gift, lesson, or delight that moment has to offer.'], u'Samuel Johnson': [u'Of the blessings set before you make your choice, and be content.', u'A wise man will make haste to forgive, because he knows the true value of time, and will not suffer it to pass away in unnecessary pain.', u'The true measure of a man is how he treats someone who can do him absolutely no good.', u'No man will be a sailor who has contrivance enough to get himself into a jail; for being in a ship is being in a jail, with the chance of being drowned... a man in a jail has more room, better food, and commonly better company.', u'If your determination is fixed, I do not counsel you to despair. Few things are impossible to diligence and skill. Great works are performed not by strength, but perseverance.', u'Kindness is in our power, even when fondness is not.', u'Integrity without knowledge is weak and useless, and knowledge without integrity is dangerous and dreadful.', u'Revenge is an act of passion; vengeance of justice. Injuries are revenged; crimes are avenged.', u'The use of travelling is to regulate imagination by reality, and instead of thinking how things may be, to see them as they are.', u'Bachelors have consciences, married men have wives.', u'No man but a blockhead ever wrote except for money.', u'When a man is tired of London, he is tired of life; for there is in London all that life can afford.', u'A man is in general better pleased when he has a good dinner upon his table, than when his wife talks Greek.', u'It is better to suffer wrong than to do it, and happier to be sometimes cheated than not to trust.', u'You find no man, at all intellectual, who is willing to leave London. No, Sir, when a man is tired of London, he is tired of life; for there is in London all that life can afford.', u'Your manuscript is both good and original; but the part that is good is not original, and the part that is original is not good.', u"Courage is the greatest of all virtues, because if you haven't courage, you may not have an opportunity to use any of the others.", u'There are minds so impatient of inferiority that their gratitude is a species of revenge, and they return benefits, not because recompense is a pleasure, but because obligation is a pain.', u'Almost all absurdity of conduct arises from the imitation of those who we cannot resemble.', u'By seeing London, I have seen as much of life as the world can show.', u'Nothing will ever be attempted if all possible objections must first be overcome.', u'The return of my birthday, if I remember it, fills me with thoughts which it seems to be the general care of humanity to escape.', u'Man alone is born crying, lives complaining, and dies disappointed.', u'Resolve not to be poor: whatever you have, spend less. Poverty is a great enemy to human happiness; it certainly destroys liberty, and it makes some virtues impracticable, and others extremely difficult.', u'Patriotism is the last refuge of the scoundrel.'], u'Amelia Barr': [u'It is only in sorrow bad weather masters us; in joy we face the storm and defy it.', u'All changes are more or less tinged with melancholy, for what we are leaving behind is part of ourselves.', u'It is always the simple that produces the marvelous.', u'It is little men know of women; their smiles and their tears alike are seldom what they seem.', u'That is the great mistake about the affections. It is not the rise and fall of empires, the birth and death of kings, or the marching of armies that move them most. When they answer from their depths, it is to the domestic joys and tragedies of life.', u'The fate of love is that it always seems too little or too much.', u'The great difference between voyages rests not with the ships, but with the people you meet on them.', u'The inevitable has always found me ready and hopeful.', u"But the lover's power is the poet's power. He can make love from all the common strings with which this world is strung.", u'But what do we know of the heart nearest to our own? What do we know of our own heart?', u'Events that are predestined require but little management. They manage themselves. They slip into place while we sleep, and suddenly we are aware that the thing we fear to attempt, is already accomplished.', u'Old age is the verdict of life.', u'There is no corner too quiet, or too far away, for a woman to make sorrow in it.', u'This world is run with far too tight a rein for luck to interfere. Fortune sells her wares; she never gives them. In some form or other, we pay for her favors; or we go empty away.', u'Whatever the scientists may say, if we take the supernatural out of life, we leave only the unnatural.', u'When men make themselves into brutes it is just to treat them like brutes.'], u'Chuck Palahniuk': [u"People don't want their lives fixed. Nobody wants their problems solved. Their dramas. Their distractions. Their stories resolved. Their messed cleaned up. Because what would they have left? Just the big scary unknown.", u'All God does is watch us and kill us when we get boring. We must never, ever be boring.', u"I wanted to write about the moment when your addictions no longer hide the truth from you. When your whole life breaks down. That's the moment when you have to somehow choose what your life is going to be about.", u"If you don't know what you want, you end up with a lot you don't.", u'If death meant just leaving the stage long enough to change costume and come back as a new character, would you slow down? Or speed up?', u'The only way to find true happiness is to risk being completely cut open.', u"We all die. The goal isn't to live forever, the goal is to create something that will.", u'Our Generation has had no Great war, no Great Depression. Our war is spiritual. Our depression is our lives.', u'People used what they called a telephone because they hated being close together and they were scared of being alone.', u"Sometimes you do something, and you get screwed. Sometimes it's the things you don't do, and you get screwed.", u'We are not special. We are not crap or trash, either. We just are. We just are, and what happens just happens.', u'Did perpetual happiness in the Garden of Eden maybe get so boring that eating the apple was justified?', u'Every woman is just a different kind of problem.', u"Find out what you're afraid of and go live there.", u"More and more, it feels like I'm doing a really bad impersonation of myself.", u'You have a choice. Live or die. Every breath is a choice. Every minute is a choice. To be or not to be.', u"Find joy in everything you choose to do. Every job, relationship, home... it's your responsibility to love it, or change it.", u'I really love idiot, enlightened characters - these characters who fail to engage with the drama of their immediate circumstances; they fail to be reactive and enrolled by drama as it happens around them.', u'I used to work in a funeral home to feel good about myself, just the fact that I was breathing.', u'Masochism is a valuable job skill.', u'When did the future switch from being a promise to a threat?', u"I just don't want to die without a few scars.", u'Sticking feathers up your butt does not make you a chicken.', u'A minute of perfection was worth the effort. A moment was the most you could ever expect from perfection.', u'People have to really suffer before they can risk doing what they love.'], u'Blaise Pascal': [u'Belief is a wise wager. Granted that faith cannot be proved, what harm will come to you if you gamble on its truth and it proves false? If you gain, you gain all; if you lose, you lose nothing. Wager, then, without hesitation, that He exists.', u'There is a God shaped vacuum in the heart of every man which cannot be filled by any created thing, but only by God, the Creator, made known through Jesus.', u'The heart has its reasons of which reason knows nothing.', u"Do you wish people to think well of you? Don't speak well of yourself.", u'Thus so wretched is man that he would weary even without any cause for weariness... and so frivolous is he that, though full of a thousand reasons for weariness, the least thing, such as playing billiards or hitting a ball, is sufficient enough to amuse him.', u'Human beings must be known to be loved; but Divine beings must be loved to be known.', u'Men never do evil so completely and cheerfully as when they do it from religious conviction.', u'If you gain, you gain all. If you lose, you lose nothing. Wager then, without hesitation, that He exists.', u'Jesus is the God whom we can approach without pride and before whom we can humble ourselves without despair.', u'Can anything be stupider than that a man has the right to kill me because he lives on the other side of a river and his ruler has a quarrel with mine, though I have not quarrelled with him?', u'When we are in love we seem to ourselves quite different from what we were before.', u"All men's miseries derive from not being able to sit in a quiet room alone.", u'Atheism shows strength of mind, but only to a certain degree.', u'Justice without force is powerless; force without justice is tyrannical.', u"In faith there is enough light for those who want to believe and enough shadows to blind those who don't.", u'Small minds are concerned with the extraordinary, great minds with the ordinary.', u'The present letter is a very long one, simply because I had no leisure to make it shorter.', u'Faith indeed tells what the senses do not tell, but not the contrary of what they see. It is above them and not contrary to them.', u'I have made this letter longer than usual, only because I have not had the time to make it shorter.', u"All human evil comes from a single cause, man's inability to sit still in a room.", u"Man's greatness lies in his power of thought.", u'There are only two kinds of men: the righteous who think they are sinners and the sinners who think they are righteous.', u'Time heals griefs and quarrels, for we change and are no longer the same persons. Neither the offender nor the offended are any more themselves.', u'All of our reasoning ends in surrender to feeling.', u"He that takes truth for his guide, and duty for his end, may safely trust to God's providence to lead him aright."], u'Emily Dickinson': [u'Hope is the thing with feathers that perches in the soul - and sings the tunes without the words - and never stops at all.', u'Beauty is not caused. It is.', u'Dogs are better than human beings because they know but do not tell.', u'If I read a book and it makes my whole body so cold no fire can ever warm me, I know that is poetry.', u"They might not need me; but they might. I'll let my head be just in sight; a smile as small as mine might be precisely their necessity.", u'A word is dead when it is said, some say. I say it just begins to live that day.', u'My friends are my estate.', u'Because I could not stop for death, He kindly stopped for me; The carriage held but just ourselves and immortality.', u'Morning without you is a dwindled dawn.', u'Saying nothing... sometimes says the most.', u'If I feel physically as if the top of my head were taken off, I know that is poetry.', u'I do not like the man who squanders life for fame; give me the man who living makes a name.', u'A wounded deer leaps the highest.', u'Find ecstasy in life; the mere sense of living is joy enough.', u'The soul should always stand ajar, ready to welcome the ecstatic experience.', u'I dwell in possibility.', u'If I can stop one heart from breaking, I shall not live in vain.', u'Not knowing when the dawn will come I open every door.', u'Behavior is what a man does, not what he thinks, feels, or believes.', u'To live is so startling it leaves little time for anything else.', u'Love is anterior to life, posterior to death, initial of creation, and the exponent of breath.', u"I'm nobody, who are you?", u'For love is immortality.', u'There is no Frigate like a book to take us lands away nor any coursers like a page of prancing Poetry.', u'Dying is a wild night and a new road.'], u'Muhammad Ali': [u"Friendship... is not something you learn in school. But if you haven't learned the meaning of friendship, you really haven't learned anything.", u"I hated every minute of training, but I said, 'Don't quit. Suffer now and live the rest of your life as a champion.'", u'I am the greatest, I said that even before I knew I was.', u"I'm so fast that last night I turned off the light switch in my hotel room and was in bed before the room was dark.", u"It's the repetition of affirmations that leads to belief. And once that belief becomes a deep conviction, things begin to happen.", u'A man who views the world the same at fifty as he did at twenty has wasted thirty years of his life.', u"I know where I'm going and I know the truth, and I don't have to be what you want me to be. I'm free to be what I want.", u'He who is not courageous enough to take risks will accomplish nothing in life.', u"I never thought of losing, but now that it' s happened, the only thing is to do it right. That's my obligation to all the people who believe in me. We all have to take defeats in life.", u"If you even dream of beating me you'd better wake up and apologize.", u"Life is a gamble. You can get hurt, but people die in plane crashes, lose their arms and legs in car accidents; people die every day. Same with fighters: some die, some get hurt, some go on. You just don't let yourself believe it will happen to you.", u"At home I am a nice guy: but I don't want the world to know. Humble people, I've found, don't get very far.", u'Only a man who knows what it is like to be defeated can reach down to the bottom of his soul and come up with the extra ounce of power it takes to win when the match is even.', u'Service to others is the rent you pay for your room here on earth.', u'I believe in the religion of Islam. I believe in Allah and peace.', u'The fight is won or lost far away from witnesses - behind the lines, in the gym, and out there on the road, long before I dance under those lights.', u'Float like a butterfly, sting like a bee.', u"It's lack of faith that makes people afraid of meeting challenges, and I believed in myself.", u'Age is whatever you think it is. You are as old as you think you are.', u"Hating people because of their color is wrong. And it doesn't matter which color does the hating. It's just plain wrong.", u"A rooster crows only when it sees the light. Put him in the dark and he'll never crow. I have seen the light and I'm crowing.", u'Rivers, ponds, lakes and streams - they all have different names, but they all contain water. Just as religions do - they all contain truths.', u'The man who has no imagination has no wings.', u"It isn't the mountains ahead to climb that wear you out; it's the pebble in your shoe.", u"It's just a job. Grass grows, birds fly, waves pound the sand. I beat people up."], u'Jim Rohn': [u'Happiness is not something you postpone for the future; it is something you design for the present.', u"If you don't design your own life plan, chances are you'll fall into someone else's plan. And guess what they have planned for you? Not much.", u'Either you run the day or the day runs you.', u'Discipline is the bridge between goals and accomplishment.', u'Formal education will make you a living; self-education will make you a fortune.', u'Learning is the beginning of wealth. Learning is the beginning of health. Learning is the beginning of spirituality. Searching and learning is where the miracle process all begins.', u"Take care of your body. It's the only place you have to live.", u'A good objective of leadership is to help those who are doing poorly to do well and to help those who are doing well to do even better.', u"Let others lead small lives, but not you. Let others argue over small things, but not you. Let others cry over small hurts, but not you. Let others leave their future in someone else's hands, but not you.", u'The worst thing one can do is not to try, to be aware of what one wants and not give in to it, to spend years in silent hurt wondering if something could have materialized - never knowing.', u'We must all suffer one of two things: the pain of discipline or the pain of regret or disappointment.', u"Don't wish it were easier, wish you were better.", u'Time is more value than money. You can get more money, but you cannot get more time.', u"Character isn't something you were born with and can't change, like your fingerprints. It's something you weren't born with and must take responsibility for forming.", u'Affirmation without discipline is the beginning of delusion.', u"If someone is going down the wrong road, he doesn't need motivation to speed him up. What he needs is education to turn him around.", u'The more you know the less you need to say.', u'You must take personal responsibility. You cannot change the circumstances, the seasons, or the wind, but you can change yourself. That is something you have charge of.', u"If you don't like how things are, change it! You're not a tree.", u"Asking is the beginning of receiving. Make sure you don't go to the ocean with a teaspoon. At least take a bucket so the kids won't laugh at you.", u"It doesn't matter which side of the fence you get off on sometimes. What matters most is getting off. You cannot make progress without making decisions.", u'Effective communication is 20% what you know and 80% how you feel about what you know.', u'Take advantage of every opportunity to practice your communication skills so that when important occasions arise, you will have the gift, the style, the sharpness, the clarity, and the emotions to affect other people.', u"Maturity is the ability to reap without apology and not complain when things don't go well.", u'If you are not willing to risk the unusual, you will have to settle for the ordinary.'], u'Plato': [u'One of the penalties for refusing to participate in politics is that you end up being governed by your inferiors.', u'At the touch of love everyone becomes a poet.', u'Music is a moral law. It gives soul to the universe, wings to the mind, flight to the imagination, and charm and gaiety to life and to everything.', u'You can discover more about a person in an hour of play than in a year of conversation.', u'Good people do not need laws to tell them to act responsibly, while bad people will find a way around the laws.', u'We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light.', u'Wise men speak because they have something to say; Fools because they have to say something.', u'Dictatorship naturally arises out of democracy, and the most aggravated form of tyranny and slavery out of the most extreme liberty.', u'A hero is born among a hundred, a wise man is found among a thousand, but an accomplished one might not be found even among a hundred thousand men.', u'Every heart sings a song, incomplete, until another heart whispers back. Those who wish to sing always find a song. At the touch of a lover, everyone becomes a poet.', u'Love is a serious mental disease.', u'All the gold which is under or upon the earth is not enough to give in exchange for virtue.', u'And what, Socrates, is the food of the soul? Surely, I said, knowledge is the food of the soul.', u'He was a wise man who invented beer.', u'A good decision is based on knowledge and not on numbers.', u'All men are by nature equal, made all of the same earth by one Workman; and however we deceive ourselves, as dear unto God is the poor peasant as the mighty prince.', u'Any man may easily do harm, but not every man can do good to another.', u'There will be no end to the troubles of states, or of humanity itself, till philosophers become kings in this world, or till those we now call kings and rulers really and truly become philosophers, and political power and philosophy thus come into the same hands.', u'For a man to conquer himself is the first and noblest of all victories.', u'Ignorance, the root and stem of all evil.', u'Democracy... is a charming form of government, full of variety and disorder; and dispensing a sort of equality to equals and unequals alike.', u'Thinking: the talking of the soul with itself.', u'Apply yourself both now and in the next life. Without effort, you cannot be prosperous. Though the land be good, You cannot have an abundant crop without cultivation.', u'Music is the movement of sound to reach the soul for the education of its virtue.', u'Good actions give strength to ourselves and inspire good actions in others.'], u'Eminem': [u"The truth is you don't know what is going to happen tomorrow. Life is a crazy ride, and nothing is guaranteed.", u"I say what I want to say and do what I want to do. There's no in between. People will either love you for it or hate you for it.", u"Dealing with backstabbers, there was one thing I learned. They're only powerful when you got your back turned.", u"I am who I am and I say what I think. I'm not putting a face on for the record.", u"I am whatever you say I am; if I wasn't, then why would you say I am.", u"Say there's a white kid who lives in a nice home, goes to an all-white school, and is pretty much having everything handed to him on a platter - for him to pick up a rap tape is incredible to me, because what that's saying is that he's living a fantasy life of rebellion.", u"I don't hate women - they just sometimes make me mad.", u"I'm stupid, I'm ugly, I'm dumb, I smell. Did I mention I'm stupid?", u"It sometimes feels like a strange movie, you know, it's all so weird that sometimes I wonder if it is really happening.", u'I need drama in my life to keep making music.', u"Somewhere deep down there's a decent man in me, he just can't be found.", u'A lot of truth is said in jest.', u"To the people I forgot, you weren't on my mind for some reason and you probably don't deserve any thanks anyway.", u"Yeah, I did see where the people dissing me were coming from. But, it's like, anything that happened in the past between black and white, I can't really speak on it, because I wasn't there. I don't feel like me being born the color I am makes me any less of a person.", u"I might talk about killing people, but that doesn't mean I do it.", u"I always wished for this, but it's almost turning into more of a nightmare than a dream.", u'Anybody with a sense of humor is going to put on my album and laugh from beginning to end.', u"Personally, I just think rap music is the best thing out there, period. If you look at my deck in my car radio, you're always going to find a hip-hop tape; that's all I buy, that's all I live, that's all I listen to, that's all I love.", u"It'd be stupid for me to sit here and say that there aren't kids who look up to me, but my responsibility is not to them. I'm not a baby sitter.", u'My father? I never knew him. Never even seen a picture of him.', u"When you're a little kid, you don't see color, and the fact that my friends were black never crossed my mind. It never became an issue until I was a teenager and started trying to rap.", u"These times are so hard, and they're getting even harder.", u'Sometimes I feel like rap music is almost the key to stopping racism.', u"If there's not drama and negativity in my life, all my songs will be really wack and boring or something.", u"My thing is this; if I'm sick enough to think it, then I'm sick enough to say it."], u'Nelson Mandela': [u'Education is the most powerful weapon which you can use to change the world.', u'A good head and a good heart are always a formidable combination.', u'I learned that courage was not the absence of fear, but the triumph over it. The brave man is not he who does not feel afraid, but he who conquers that fear.', u'It is better to lead from behind and to put others in front, especially when you celebrate victory when nice things occur. You take the front line when there is danger. Then people will appreciate your leadership.', u"For to be free is not merely to cast off one's chains, but to live in a way that respects and enhances the freedom of others.", u'If you talk to a man in a language he understands, that goes to his head. If you talk to him in his language, that goes to his heart.', u'It always seems impossible until its done.', u'There is no passion to be found playing small - in settling for a life that is less than the one you are capable of living.', u'After climbing a great hill, one only finds that there are many more hills to climb.', u'If you want to make peace with your enemy, you have to work with your enemy. Then he becomes your partner.', u'There is no easy walk to freedom anywhere, and many of us will have to pass through the valley of the shadow of death again and again before we reach the mountaintop of our desires.', u'Never, never and never again shall it be that this beautiful land will again experience the oppression of one by another.', u"Does anybody really think that they didn't get what they had because they didn't have the talent or the strength or the endurance or the commitment?", u'In my country we go to prison first and then become President.', u"There can be no keener revelation of a society's soul than the way in which it treats its children.", u'I detest racialism, because I regard it as a barbaric thing, whether it comes from a black man or a white man.', u"If the United States of America or Britain is having elections, they don't ask for observers from Africa or from Asia. But when we have elections, they want observers.", u'If there are dreams about a beautiful South Africa, there are also roads that lead to their goal. Two of these roads could be named Goodness and Forgiveness.', u'We must use time wisely and forever realize that the time is always ripe to do right.', u'Let there be work, bread, water and salt for all.', u"Money won't create success, the freedom to make it will.", u'I dream of an Africa which is in peace with itself.', u'I dream of the realization of the unity of Africa, whereby its leaders combine in their efforts to solve the problems of this continent. I dream of our vast deserts, of our forests, of all our great wildernesses.', u'Let freedom reign. The sun never set on so glorious a human achievement.', u'Communists have always played an active role in the fight by colonial countries for their freedom, because the short-term objects of Communism would always correspond with the long-term objects of freedom movements.'], u'Zig Ziglar': [u'If God would have wanted us to live in a permissive society He would have given us Ten Suggestions and not Ten Commandments.', u"People often say that motivation doesn't last. Well, neither does bathing - that's why we recommend it daily.", u'Many marriages would be better if the husband and the wife clearly understood that they are on the same side.', u"If you treat your wife like a thoroughbred, you'll never end up with a nag.", u"If you go looking for a friend, you're going to find they're very scarce. If you go out to be a friend, you'll find them everywhere.", u"I believe that being successful means having a balance of success stories across the many areas of your life. You can't truly be considered successful in your business life if your home life is in shambles.", u'It was character that got us out of bed, commitment that moved us into action, and discipline that enabled us to follow through.', u'The foundation stones for a balanced success are honesty, character, integrity, faith, love and loyalty.', u'You can have everything in life you want, if you will just help other people get what they want.', u'Money isn\'t the most important thing in life, but it\'s reasonably close to oxygen on the "gotta have it" scale.', u'You were born to win, but to be a winner, you must plan to win, prepare to win, and expect to win.', u'Positive thinking will let you do everything better than negative thinking will.', u'Building a better you is the first step to building a better America.', u'Every choice you make has an end result.', u'If you can dream it, then you can achieve it. You will get all you want in life if you help enough other people get what they want.', u'Your attitude, not your aptitude, will determine your altitude.', u"If you learn from defeat, you haven't really lost.", u'Expect the best. Prepare for the worst. Capitalize on what comes.', u'Sometimes adversity is what you need to face in order to become successful.', u'If you want to reach a goal, you must "see the reaching" in your own mind before you actually arrive at your goal.', u"It's not what you've got, it's what you use that makes a difference.", u"Money won't make you happy... but everybody wants to find out for themselves.", u'You can make positive deposits in your own economy every day by reading and listening to powerful, positive, life-changing content and by associating with encouraging and hope-building people.', u"People don't buy for logical reasons. They buy for emotional reasons.", u'A goal properly set is halfway reached.'], u'Max Muller': [u'A flower cannot blossom without sunshine, and man cannot live without love.', u'Childhood has its secrets and its mysteries; but who can tell or who can explain them!', u'The spring of love becomes hidden and soon filled up.', u'I believe I can even yet remember when I saw the stars for the first time.', u'Whoever knows it also knows that in love there is no More and no Less; but that he who loves can only love with the whole heart, and with the whole soul; with all his strength and with all his will.', u'While the river of life glides along smoothly, it remains the same river; only the landscape on either bank seems to change.', u"Would not the child's heart break in despair when the first cold storm of the world sweeps over it, if the warm sunlight of love from the eyes of mother and father did not shine upon him like the soft reflection of divine light and love?", u'I was so astonished that another had penetrated so deeply into the secrets of my soul, and that he knew what I did not know myself, that when I recovered from it he had already been long upon the street.', u'The first pages of memory are like the old family Bible. The first leaves are wholly faded and somewhat soiled with handling. But, when we turn further, and come to the chapters where Adam and Eve were banished from Paradise, then, all begins to grow clear and legible.', u'And then when all around grows dark, when we feel utterly alone, when all men right and left pass us by and know us not, a forgotten feeling rises in the breast.', u'Every life has its years in which one progresses as on a tedious and dusty street of poplars, without caring to know where he is.', u'How mankind defers from day to day the best it can do, and the most beautiful things it can enjoy, without thinking that every day may be the last one, and that lost time is lost eternity!', u'I spend my happiest hours in reading Vedantic books. They are to me like the light of the morning, like the pure air of the mountains - so simple, so true, if once understood.', u'I was shortly again at the castle, and the Princess gave me her hand to kiss and then brought her children, the young princes and princesses, and we played together, as if we had known each other for years.', u'Is it sin, which makes the worm a chrysalis, and the chrysalis a butterfly, and the butterfly dust?', u'It smote me to the heart that I had found no one in all the world who loved me more than all others.', u'Not far from our house, and opposite the old church with the golden cross, stood a large building, even larger than the church, and having many towers.', u'Of these years nought remains in memory but the sad feeling that we have advanced and only grown older.', u'Soon the child learns that there are strangers, and ceases to be a child.', u'That is the returning to God which in reality is never concluded on earth but yet leaves behind in the soul a divine home sickness, which never again ceases.', u'Thus one memory follows another until the waves dash together over our heads, and a deep sigh swells the breast, which warns us that we have forgotten to breathe in the midst of these pure thoughts.', u'What is emitted from the divine, though it be only like the reflection from the fire, still has the divine reality in itself, and one might almost ask what were the fire without glow, the sun without light, or the Creator without the creature?', u'Yes, now I understood for the first time that my soul was not so poor and empty as it had seemed to me, and that it had been only the sun that was lacking to open all its germs, and buds to the light.'], u'Peter Drucker': [u'Effective leadership is not about making speeches or being liked; leadership is defined by results not attributes.', u'Management is doing things right; leadership is doing the right things.', u'The best way to predict the future is to create it.', u"Business, that's easily defined - it's other people's money.", u'Efficiency is doing things right; effectiveness is doing the right things.', u'No institution can possibly survive if it needs geniuses or supermen to manage it. It must be organized in such a way as to be able to get along under a leadership composed of average human beings.', u"The most important thing in communication is hearing what isn't said.", u"Most discussions of decision making assume that only senior executives make decisions or that only senior executives' decisions matter. This is a dangerous mistake.", u'Most of what we call management consists of making it difficult for people to get their work done.', u'The aim of marketing is to know and understand the customer so well the product or service fits him and sells itself.', u'We now accept the fact that learning is a lifelong process of keeping abreast of change. And the most pressing task is to teach people how to learn.', u'Checking the results of a decision against its expectations shows executives what their strengths are, where they need to improve, and where they lack knowledge or information.', u'Innovation is the specific instrument of entrepreneurship. The act that endows resources with a new capacity to create wealth.', u'Knowledge has to be improved, challenged, and increased constantly, or it vanishes.', u"People who don't take risks generally make about two big mistakes a year. People who do take risks generally make about two big mistakes a year.", u'A manager is responsible for the application and performance of knowledge.', u'Trying to predict the future is like trying to drive down a country road at night with no lights while looking out the back window.', u'Executives owe it to the organization and to their fellow workers not to tolerate nonperforming individuals in important jobs.', u"Few companies that installed computers to reduce the employment of clerks have realized their expectations... They now need more, and more expensive clerks even though they call them 'operators' or 'programmers.'", u'Teaching is the only major occupation of man for which we have not yet developed tools that make an average person capable of competence and performance. In teaching we rely on the "naturals," the ones who somehow know how to teach.', u'Plans are only good intentions unless they immediately degenerate into hard work.', u"Management by objective works - if you know the objectives. Ninety percent of the time you don't.", u'Never mind your happiness; do your duty.', u'Rank does not confer privilege or give power. It imposes responsibility.', u'The entrepreneur always searches for change, responds to it, and exploits it as an opportunity.'], u'Johann Wolfgang von Goethe': [u'Character develops itself in the stream of life.', u'None are more hopelessly enslaved than those who falsely believe they are free.', u'Dream no small dreams for they have no power to move the hearts of men.', u'I love those who yearn for the impossible.', u'Every day we should hear at least one little song, read one good poem, see one exquisite picture, and, if possible, speak a few sensible words.', u'All intelligent thoughts have already been thought; what is necessary is only to try to think them again.', u'As soon as you trust yourself, you will know how to live.', u'Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Willing is not enough; we must do.', u'Love does not dominate; it cultivates.', u'Beauty is a manifestation of secret natural laws, which otherwise would have been hidden from us forever.', u'Divide and rule, the politician cries; unite and lead, is watchword of the wise.', u'The soul that sees beauty may sometimes walk alone.', u'Do not give in too much to feelings. A overly sensitive heart is an unhappy possession on this shaky earth.', u'Behavior is the mirror in which everyone shows their image.', u'I call architecture frozen music.', u'What is important in life is life, and not the result of life.', u'Ignorant men raise questions that wise men answered a thousand years ago.', u'Trust yourself, then you will know how to live.', u'If I love you, what business is it of yours?', u'Thinking is more interesting than knowing, but less interesting than looking.', u"A man's manners are a mirror in which he shows his portrait.", u"Thinking is easy, acting is difficult, and to put one's thoughts into action is the most difficult thing in the world.", u'This is the highest wisdom that I own; freedom and life are earned by those alone who conquer them each day anew.', u"Love and desire are the spirit's wings to great deeds.", u'A person hears only what they understand.'], u'Augustus Hare': [u'Thought is the wind, knowledge the sail, and mankind the vessel.', u'The intellect of the wise is like glass; it admits the light of heaven and reflects it.', u'What hypocrites we seem to be whenever we talk of ourselves! Our words sound so humble, while our hearts are so proud.', u'The power of faith will often shine forth the most when the character is naturally weak.', u'A man prone to suspect evil is mostly looking in his neighbor for what he sees in himself.', u'As to the pure all things are pure, even so to the impure all things are impure.', u'Love, it has been said, flows downward. The love of parents for their children has always been far more powerful than that of children for their parents; and who among the sons of men ever loved God with a thousandth part of the love which God has manifested to us?', u'The virtue of paganism was strength; the virtue of Christianity is obedience.', u'A mother should give her children a superabundance of enthusiasm; that after they have lost all they are sure to lose on mixing with the world, enough may still remain to prompt fated support them through great actions.', u'A statesman, we are told, should follow public opinion. Doubtless, as a coachman follows his horses; having firm hold on the reins and guiding them.', u'Crimes sometimes shock us too much; vices almost always too little.', u'Examples would indeed be excellent things were not people so modest that none will set, and so vain that none will follow them.', u'Happy the boy whose mother is tired of talking nonsense to him before he is old enough to know the sense of it.', u'It is a proof of our natural bias to evil, that gain is slower and harder than loss in all things good; but in all things bad getting is quicker and easier than getting rid of.', u'It is well for us that we are born babies in intellect. Could we understand half what mothers say and do to their infants, we should be filled with a conceit of our own importance, which would render us insupportable through life.', u'It is with flowers as with moral qualities; the bright are sometimes poisonous; but, I believe, never the sweet.', u'Many are ambitious of saying grand things, that is, of being grandiloquent.', u'Nothing good bursts forth all at once. The lightning may dart out of a black cloud; but the day sends his bright heralds before him, to prepare the world for his coming.', u'Nothing is farther than earth from heaven; nothing is nearer than heaven to earth.', u'Only when the voice of duty is silent, or when it has already spoken, may we allowably think of the consequences of a particular action.', u'Since the generality of persons act from impulse, much more than from principle, men are neither so good nor so bad as we are apt to think them.', u'Some people carry their hearts in their heads; very many carry their heads in their hearts. The difficulty is to keep them apart, yet both actively working together.', u'There is no being eloquent for atheism. In that exhausted receiver the mind cannot use its wings, - the clearest proof that it is out of its element.', u'To Adam Paradise was home. To the good among his descendants home is paradise.', u'What a person praises is perhaps a surer standard, even than what he condemns, of his own character, information and abilities.'], u'Lucille Ball': [u"I'd rather regret the things I've done than regret the things I haven't done.", u'Love yourself first and everything else falls into line. You really have to love yourself to get anything done in this world.', u'Once in his life, every man is entitled to fall madly in love with a gorgeous redhead.', u"I'm happy that I have brought laughter because I have been shown by many the value of it in so many lives, in so many ways.", u"One of the things I learned the hard way was that it doesn' t pay to get discouraged. Keeping busy and making optimism a way of life can restore your faith in yourself.", u'I have an everyday religion that works for me. Love yourself first, and everything else falls into line.', u'The secret of staying young is to live honestly, eat slowly, and lie about your age.', u"I'm not funny. What I am is brave.", u'If you want something done, ask a busy person to do it. The more things you do, the more you can do.', u'In life, all good things come hard, but wisdom is the hardest to come by.', u"It's a helluva start, being able to recognize what makes you happy.", u"Luck? I don't know anything about luck. I've never banked on it and I'm afraid of people who do. Luck to me is something else: Hard work - and realizing what is opportunity and what isn't.", u'Ability is of little account without opportunity.', u'The more things you do, the more you can do.', u"Use a make-up table with everything close at hand and don't rush; otherwise you'll look like a patchwork quilt.", u"How I Love Lucy was born? We decided that instead of divorce lawyers profiting from our mistakes, we'd profit from them.", u'I think knowing what you cannot do is more important than knowing what you can.', u'You see much more of your children once they leave home.', u'I hate failure and that divorce was a Number One failure in my eyes. It was the worst period of my life. Neither Desi nor I have been the same since, physically or mentally.', u'I regret the passing of the studio system. I was very appreciative of it because I had no talent.', u"Women's Lib? Oh, I'm afraid it doesn't interest me one bit. I've been so liberated it hurts.", u'I am a real ham. I love an audience. I work better with an audience. I am dead, in fact, without one.', u"I will never do another TV series. It couldn't top I Love Lucy, and I'd be foolish to try. In this business, you have to know when to get off.", u"I'm sometimes scared of everything that has happened to us. We didn't think Desilu Productions would grow so big. We merely wanted to be together and have two children."], u'Sun Tzu': [u'Can you imagine what I would do if I could do all I can?', u'If you know the enemy and know yourself you need not fear the results of a hundred battles.', u"Be extremely subtle, even to the point of formlessness. Be extremely mysterious, even to the point of soundlessness. Thereby you can be the director of the opponent's fate.", u'The supreme art of war is to subdue the enemy without fighting.', u'All men can see these tactics whereby I conquer, but what none can see is the strategy out of which victory is evolved.', u'For to win one hundred victories in one hundred battles is not the acme of skill. To subdue the enemy without fighting is the acme of skill.', u'The opportunity to secure ourselves against defeat lies in our own hands, but the opportunity of defeating the enemy is provided by the enemy himself.', u'He who knows when he can fight and when he cannot, will be victorious.', u'All war is deception.', u'Know thy self, know thy enemy. A thousand battles, a thousand victories.', u'You have to believe in yourself.', u'Opportunities multiply as they are seized.', u"Supreme excellence consists in breaking the enemy's resistance without fighting.", u'Know your enemy and know yourself and you can fight a hundred battles without disaster.', u'Confront them with annihilation, and they will then survive; plunge them into a deadly situation, and they will then live. When people fall into danger, they are then able to strive for victory.', u'Invincibility lies in the defence; the possibility of victory in the attack.', u'He who is prudent and lies in wait for an enemy who is not, will be victorious.', u'Victorious warriors win first and then go to war, while defeated warriors go to war first and then seek to win.', u'It is essential to seek out enemy agents who have come to conduct espionage against you and to bribe them to serve you. Give them instructions and care for them. Thus doubled agents are recruited and used.', u'If you are far from the enemy, make him believe you are near.', u"In the practical art of war, the best thing of all is to take the enemy's country whole and intact; to shatter and destroy it is not so good.", u'Pretend inferiority and encourage his arrogance.', u'The general who wins the battle makes many calculations in his temple before the battle is fought. The general who loses makes but few calculations beforehand.', u'Regard your soldiers as your children, and they will follow you into the deepest valleys; look on them as your own beloved sons, and they will stand by you even unto death.', u"To fight and conquer in all our battles is not supreme excellence; supreme excellence consists in breaking the enemy's resistance without fighting."], u'Mencius': [u'Friendship is one mind in two bodies.', u'Friends are the siblings God never gave us.', u'Sincerity is the way to heaven.', u'He who attends to his greater self becomes a great man, and he who attends to his smaller self becomes a small man.', u'Every duty is a charge, but the charge of oneself is the root of all others.', u'Evil exists to glorify the good. Evil is negative good. It is a relative term. Evil can be transmuted into good. What is evil to one at one time, becomes good at another time to somebody else.', u"The great man is he who does not lose his child's-heart.", u'We live, not as we wish to, but as we can.', u'If the king loves music, there is little wrong in the land.', u'Let not a man do what his sense of right bids him not to do, nor desire what it forbids him to desire. This is sufficient. The skillful artist will not alter his measures for the sake of a stupid workman.', u'Mankind fears an evil man but heaven does not.', u'Truth uttered before its time is always dangerous.', u'It is not difficult to govern. All one has to do is not to offend the noble families.', u'Kindly words do not enter so deeply into men as a reputation for kindness.', u'Let men decide firmly what they will not do, and they will be free to do vigorously what they ought to do.', u'There is no greater delight than to be conscious of sincerity on self-examination.'], u'Dalai Lama': [u'Be kind whenever possible. It is always possible.', u'Happiness is not something ready made. It comes from your own actions.', u'This is my simple religion. There is no need for temples; no need for complicated philosophy. Our own brain, our own heart is our temple; the philosophy is kindness.', u'All major religious traditions carry basically the same message, that is love, compassion and forgiveness the important thing is they should be part of our daily lives.', u'Old friends pass away, new friends appear. It is just like the days. An old day passes, a new day arrives. The important thing is to make it meaningful: a meaningful friend - or a meaningful day.', u'It is very important to generate a good attitude, a good heart, as much as possible. From this, happiness in both the short term and the long term for both yourself and others will come.', u"Our prime purpose in this life is to help others. And if you can't help them, at least don't hurt them.", u'I find hope in the darkest of days, and focus in the brightest. I do not judge the universe.', u'Love and compassion are necessities, not luxuries. Without them humanity cannot survive.', u'My religion is very simple. My religion is kindness.', u'There is no need for temples, no need for complicated philosophies. My brain and my heart are my temples; my philosophy is kindness.', u'If you can, help others; if you cannot do that, at least do not harm them.', u'Sleep is the best meditation.', u'Sometimes one creates a dynamic impression by saying something, and sometimes one creates as significant an impression by remaining silent.', u"In the practice of tolerance, one's enemy is the best teacher.", u'If you want others to be happy, practice compassion. If you want to be happy, practice compassion.', u'The purpose of our lives is to be happy.', u'It is necessary to help others, not only in our prayers, but in our daily lives. If we find we cannot help others, the least we can do is to desist from harming them.', u'We can never obtain peace in the outer world until we make peace with ourselves.', u"When you are discontent, you always want more, more, more. Your desire can never be satisfied. But when you practice contentment, you can say to yourself, 'Oh yes - I already have everything that I really need.'", u'Today, more than ever before, life must be characterized by a sense of Universal responsibility, not only nation to nation and human to human, but also human to other forms of life.', u'Where ignorance is our master, there is no possibility of real peace.', u'If you have a particular faith or religion, that is good. But you can survive without it.', u"Whether one believes in a religion or not, and whether one believes in rebirth or not, there isn't anyone who doesn't appreciate kindness and compassion.", u'We can live without religion and meditation, but we cannot survive without human affection.'], u'Hubert H. Humphrey': [u'It was once said that the moral test of government is how that government treats those who are in the dawn of life, the children; those who are in the twilight of life, the elderly; and those who are in the shadows of life, the sick, the needy and the handicapped.', u'Compassion is not weakness, and concern for the unfortunate is not socialism.', u'The greatest gift of life is friendship, and I have received it.', u'The greatest healing therapy is friendship and love.', u'The essence of statesmanship is not a rigid adherence to the past, but a prudent and probing concern for the future.', u'Never give in and never give up.', u'Behind every successful man is a proud wife and a surprised mother-in-law.', u'Freedom is hammered out on the anvil of discussion, dissent, and debate.', u'In real life, unlike in Shakespeare, the sweetness of the rose depends upon the name it bears. Things are not only what they are. They are, in very important respects, what they seem to be.', u'To err is human. To blame someone else is politics.', u'We are in danger of making our cities places where business goes on but where life, in its real sense, is lost.', u'Anyone who thinks that the vice-president can take a position independent of the president of his administration simply has no knowledge of politics or government. You are his choice in a political marriage, and he expects your absolute loyalty.', u'Behind every successful man stands a surprised mother-in-law.', u'The impersonal hand of government can never replace the helping hand of a neighbor.', u'If there is dissatisfaction with the status quo, good. If there is ferment, so much the better. If there is restlessness, I am pleased. Then let there be ideas, and hard thought, and hard work. If man feels small, let man make himself bigger.', u"It is not what they take away from you that counts. It's what you do with what you have left.", u'Never give up on anybody.', u'The right to be heard does not automatically include the right to be taken seriously.', u'To be realistic today is to be visionary. To be realistic is to be starry-eyed.', u'A politician never forgets the precarious nature of elective life. We have never established a practice of tenure in public office.', u'American public opinion is like an ocean, it cannot be stirred by a teaspoon.', u'Each child is an adventure into a better life - an opportunity to change the old pattern and make it new.', u"Leadership in today's world requires far more than a large stock of gunboats and a hard fist at the conference table.", u'Propaganda, to be effective, must be believed. To be believed, it must be credible. To be credible, it must be true.', u'Asia is rich in people, rich in culture and rich in resources. It is also rich in trouble.'], u'Woody Allen': [u"I am not afraid of death, I just don't want to be there when it happens.", u'I am thankful for laughter, except when milk comes out of my nose.', u"The talent for being happy is appreciating and liking what you have, instead of what you don't have.", u'If you want to make God laugh, tell him about your plans.', u'Sex without love is a meaningless experience, but as far as meaningless experiences go its pretty damn good.', u'Eighty percent of success is showing up.', u"I believe there is something out there watching us. Unfortunately, it's the government.", u'I took a speed-reading course and read War and Peace in twenty minutes. It involves Russia.', u'Bisexuality immediately doubles your chances for a date on Saturday night.', u"Life is full of misery, loneliness, and suffering - and it's all over much too soon.", u"Basically my wife was immature. I'd be at home in the bath and she'd come in and sink my boats.", u"If you're not failing every now and again, it's a sign you're not doing anything very innovative.", u"I want to tell you a terrific story about oral contraception. I asked this girl to sleep with me and she said 'No.'", u'I had a terrible education. I attended a school for emotionally disturbed teachers.', u'There are worse things in life than death. Have you ever spent an evening with an insurance salesman?', u"Some guy hit my fender, and I told him, 'Be fruitful and multiply,' but not in those words.", u'My one regret in life is that I am not someone else.', u"In my house I'm the boss, my wife is just the decision maker.", u'Organized crime in America takes in over forty billion dollars a year and spends very little on office supplies.', u"As the poet said, 'Only God can make a tree,' probably because it's so hard to figure out how to get the bark on.", u"I don't want to achieve immortality through my work. I want to achieve it through not dying.", u'Money is better than poverty, if only for financial reasons.', u'I failed to make the chess team because of my height.', u'Marriage is the death of hope.', u"I'm not afraid to die, I just don't want to be there when it happens."], u'Carl Jung': [u'Even a happy life cannot be without a measure of darkness, and the word happy would lose its meaning if it were not balanced by sadness. It is far better take things as they come along with patience and equanimity.', u'If there is anything that we wish to change in the child, we should first examine it and see whether it is not something that could better be changed in ourselves.', u'The shoe that fits one person pinches another; there is no recipe for living that suits all cases.', u'Your vision will become clear only when you can look into your own heart. Who looks outside, dreams; who looks inside, awakes.', u'Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to an understanding of ourselves.', u'The meeting of two personalities is like the contact of two chemical substances: if there is any reaction, both are transformed.', u'One looks back with appreciation to the brilliant teachers, but with gratitude to those who touched our human feelings. The curriculum is so much necessary raw material, but warmth is the vital element for the growing plant and for the soul of the child.', u'Who looks outside, dreams; who looks inside, awakes.', u'Knowing your own darkness is the best method for dealing with the darknesses of other people.', u'Children are educated by what the grown-up is and not by his talk.', u'As far as we can discern, the sole purpose of human existence is to kindle a light in the darkness of mere being.', u'Every form of addiction is bad, no matter whether the narcotic be alcohol or morphine or idealism.', u'A particularly beautiful woman is a source of terror. As a rule, a beautiful woman is a terrible disappointment.', u'We cannot change anything until we accept it. Condemnation does not liberate, it oppresses.', u'Show me a sane man and I will cure him for you.', u'The man who promises everything is sure to fulfil nothing, and everyone who promises too much is in danger of using evil means in order to carry out his promises, and is already on the road to perdition.', u'The healthy man does not torture others - generally it is the tortured who turn into torturers.', u'There is no coming to consciousness without pain.', u'Great talents are the most lovely and often the most dangerous fruits on the tree of humanity. They hang upon the most slender twigs that are easily snapped off.', u'Through pride we are ever deceiving ourselves. But deep down below the surface of the average conscience a still, small voice says to us, something is out of tune.', u'It all depends on how we look at things, and not how they are in themselves.', u'In all chaos there is a cosmos, in all disorder a secret order.', u'A man who has not passed through the inferno of his passions has never overcome them.', u'All the works of man have their origin in creative fantasy. What right have we then to depreciate imagination.', u'The creation of something new is not accomplished by the intellect but by the play instinct acting from inner necessity. The creative mind plays with the objects it loves.'], u'Albert Einstein': [u'Insanity: doing the same thing over and over again and expecting different results.', u'A person who never made a mistake never tried anything new.', u'Any intelligent fool can make things bigger and more complex... It takes a touch of genius - and a lot of courage to move in the opposite direction.', u"The world is a dangerous place to live; not because of the people who are evil, but because of the people who don't do anything about it.", u'Any man who can drive safely while kissing a pretty girl is simply not giving the kiss the attention it deserves.', u'A question that sometimes drives me hazy: am I or are the others crazy?', u"When you are courting a nice girl an hour seems like a second. When you sit on a red-hot cinder a second seems like an hour. That's relativity.", u"Only two things are infinite, the universe and human stupidity, and I'm not sure about the former.", u'Learn from yesterday, live for today, hope for tomorrow. The important thing is not to stop questioning.', u'A man should look for what is, and not for what he thinks should be.', u'The difference between stupidity and genius is that genius has its limits.', u"Anyone who doesn't take truth seriously in small matters cannot be trusted in large ones either.", u'Gravitation is not responsible for people falling in love.', u'We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we used when we created them.', u'Before God we are all equally wise - and equally foolish.', u"If you can't explain it simply, you don't understand it well enough.", u'Great spirits have always encountered violent opposition from mediocre minds.', u'All religions, arts and sciences are branches of the same tree.', u'Imagination is more important than knowledge.', u"It's not that I'm so smart, it's just that I stay with problems longer.", u'Education is what remains after one has forgotten what one has learned in school.', u'The true sign of intelligence is not knowledge but imagination.', u'Anyone who has never made a mistake has never tried anything new.', u'No problem can be solved from the same level of consciousness that created it.', u'Any man who reads too much and uses his own brain too little falls into lazy habits of thinking.'], u'Robert E. Lee': [u'Get correct views of life, and learn to see the world in its true light. It will enable you to live pleasantly, to do good, and, when summoned away, to leave without regret.', u'It is well that war is so terrible. We should grow too fond of it.', u'I cannot trust a man to control others who cannot control himself.', u'I have been up to see the Congress and they do not seem to be able to do anything except to eat peanuts and chew tobacco, while my army is starving.', u'In all my perplexities and distresses, the Bible has never failed to give me light and strength.', u'I tremble for my country when I hear of confidence expressed in me. I know too well my weakness, that our only hope is in God.', u'Do your duty in all things. You cannot do more, you should never wish to do less.', u'Duty is the most sublime word in our language. Do your duty in all things. You cannot do more. You should never wish to do less.', u'I think it better to do right, even if we suffer in so doing, than to incur the reproach of our consciences and posterity.', u'Never do a wrong thing to make a friend or to keep one.', u'It is good that war is so horrible, or we might grow to like it.', u'The trite saying that honesty is the best policy has met with the just criticism that honesty is not policy. The real honest man is honest from conviction of what is right, not from policy.', u'We failed, but in the good providence of God apparent failure often proves a blessing.', u'I like whiskey. I always did, and that is why I never drink it.', u'This war is not about slavery.', u'Duty, then is the sublimest word in our language. Do your duty in all things. You cannot do more; you should never wish to do less.', u'We must expect reverses, even defeats. They are sent to teach us wisdom and prudence, to call forth greater energies, and to prevent our falling into greater disasters.', u'The education of a man is never completed until he dies.', u'The war... was an unnecessary condition of affairs, and might have been avoided if forebearance and wisdom had been practiced on both sides.', u'What a cruel thing war is... to fill our hearts with hatred instead of love for our neighbors.', u'A true man of honor feels humbled himself when he cannot help humbling others.', u'My chief concern is to try to be an humble, earnest Christian.', u'Let the tent be struck.', u'Whiskey - I like it, I always did, and that is the reason I never use it.', u'Obedience to lawful authority is the foundation of manly character.'], u'Mitch Hedberg': [u'My fake plants died because I did not pretend to water them.', u"I'm sick of following my dreams. I'm just going to ask them where they're goin', and hook up with them later.", u'A waffle is like a pancake with a syrup trap.', u'An escalator can never break: it can only become stairs. You should never see an Escalator Temporarily Out Of Order sign, just Escalator Temporarily Stairs. Sorry for the convenience.', u"I had a stick of CareFree gum, but it didn't work. I felt pretty good while I was blowing that bubble, but as soon as the gum lost its flavor, I was back to pondering my mortality.", u"I wish my name was Brian because maybe sometimes people would misspell my name and call me Brain. That's like a free compliment and you don't even gotta be smart to notice it.", u"I want to get a vending machine, with fun sized candy bars, and the glass in front is a magnifying glass. You'll be mad, but it will be too late.", u'I was at this casino minding my own business, and this guy came up to me and said, "You\'re gonna have to move, you\'re blocking a fire exit." As though if there was a fire, I wasn\'t gonna run. If you\'re flammible and have legs, you are never blocking a fire exit.', u"I like refried beans. That's why I wanna try fried beans, because maybe they're just as good and we're just wasting time. You don't have to fry them again after all.", u"I don't have a girlfriend. But I do know a woman who'd be mad at me for saying that.", u'I recently took up ice sculpting. Last night I made an ice cube. This morning I made 12, I was prolific.', u'Is a hippopotamus a hippopotamus, or just a really cool Opotamus?', u"You know when they have a fishing show on TV? They catch the fish and then let it go. They don't want to eat the fish, they just want to make it late for something.", u'Wearing a turtleneck is like being strangled by a really weak guy, all day. Wearing a backpack and a turtleneck is like a weak midget trying to bring you down.', u'I would imagine that if you could understand Morse code, a tap dancer would drive you crazy.', u'A severed foot is the ultimate stocking stuffer.', u"My belt holds my pants up, but the belt loops hold my belt up. I don't really know what's happening down there. Who is the real hero?", u'I drank some boiling water because I wanted to whistle.', u"I wear a necklace, cause I wanna know when I'm upside down.", u"I like Kit-Kat, unless I'm with four or more people.", u'I used to do drugs. I still do drugs. But I used to, too.', u"I know a lot about cars, man. I can look at any car's headlights and tell you exactly which way it's coming.", u"Rice is great if you're really hungry and want to eat two thousand of something.", u"Every book is a children's book if the kid can read!", u"I wanted to buy a candle holder, but the store didn't have one. So I got a cake."], u'Pope John Paul II': [u'As the family goes, so goes the nation and so goes the whole world in which we live.', u'Have no fear of moving into the unknown. Simply step out fearlessly knowing that I am with you, therefore no harm can befall you; all is very, very well. Do this in complete faith and confidence.', u'The great danger for family life, in the midst of any society whose idols are pleasure, comfort and independence, lies in the fact that people close their hearts and become selfish.', u'The future starts today, not tomorrow.', u"Stupidity is also a gift of God, but one mustn't misuse it.", u'To maintain a joyful family requires much from both the parents and the children. Each member of the family has to become, in a special way, the servant of the others.', u'Marriage is an act of will that signifies and involves a mutual gift, which unites the spouses and binds them to their eventual souls, with whom they make up a sole family - a domestic church.', u'When freedom does not have a purpose, when it does not wish to know anything about the rule of law engraved in the hearts of men and women, when it does not listen to the voice of conscience, it turns against humanity and society.', u'Freedom consists not in doing what we like, but in having the right to do what we ought.', u'An excuse is worse and more terrible than a lie, for an excuse is a lie guarded.', u'Do not abandon yourselves to despair. We are the Easter people and hallelujah is our song.', u'The historical experience of socialist countries has sadly demonstrated that collectivism does not do away with alienation but rather increases it, adding to it a lack of basic necessities and economic inefficiency.', u'Science can purify religion from error and superstition. Religion can purify science from idolatry and false absolutes.', u'Social justice cannot be attained by violence. Violence kills what it intends to create.', u'Pervading nationalism imposes its dominion on man today in many different forms and with an aggressiveness that spares no one. The challenge that is already with us is the temptation to accept as true freedom what in reality is only a new form of slavery.', u'Young people are threatened... by the evil use of advertising techniques that stimulate the natural inclination to avoid hard work by promising the immediate satisfaction of every desire.', u'I have a sweet tooth for song and music. This is my Polish sin.', u'You will reciprocally promise love, loyalty and matrimonial honesty. We only want for you this day that these words constitute the principle of your entire life and that with the help of divine grace you will observe these solemn vows that today, before God, you formulate.', u'I kiss the soil as if I placed a kiss on the hands of a mother, for the homeland is our earthly mother. I consider it my duty to be with my compatriots in this sublime and difficult moment.', u'Humanity should question itself, once more, about the absurd and always unfair phenomenon of war, on whose stage of death and pain only remain standing the negotiating table that could and should have prevented it.', u'Radical changes in world politics leave America with a heightened responsibility to be, for the world, an example of a genuinely free, democratic, just and humane society.', u'Love is never defeated, and I could add, the history of Ireland proves it.', u'What we talked about will have to remain a secret between him and me. I spoke to him as a brother whom I have pardoned and who has my complete trust.', u'You are priests, not social or political leaders. Let us not be under the illusion that we are serving the Gospel through an exaggerated interest in the wide field of temporal problems.', u"The vow of celibacy is a matter of keeping one's word to Christ and the Church. a duty and a proof of the priest's inner maturity; it is the expression of his personal dignity."], u'Theodore Roosevelt': [u"Believe you can and you're halfway there.", u'Far better is it to dare mighty things, to win glorious triumphs, even though checkered by failure... than to rank with those poor spirits who neither enjoy nor suffer much, because they live in a gray twilight that knows not victory nor defeat.', u'Do what you can, with what you have, where you are.', u'A vote is like a rifle; its usefulness depends upon the character of the user.', u'A thorough knowledge of the Bible is worth more than a college education.', u'In any moment of decision, the best thing you can do is the right thing, the next best thing is the wrong thing, and the worst thing you can do is nothing.', u'The things that will destroy America are prosperity-at-any-price, peace-at-any-price, safety-first instead of duty-first, the love of soft living, and the get-rich-quick theory of life.', u'Nobody cares how much you know, until they know how much you care.', u'I care not what others think of what I do, but I care very much about what I think of what I do! That is character!', u"If you could kick the person in the pants responsible for most of your trouble, you wouldn't sit for a month.", u'Far and away the best prize that life has to offer is the chance to work hard at work worth doing.', u'Every immigrant who comes here should be required within five years to learn English or leave the country.', u'A man who is good enough to shed his blood for the country is good enough to be given a square deal afterwards.', u'Behind the ostensible government sits enthroned an invisible government owing no allegiance and acknowledging no responsibility to the people.', u'Speak softly and carry a big stick; you will go far.', u'Keep your eyes on the stars, and your feet on the ground.', u'The most important single ingredient in the formula of success is knowing how to get along with people.', u'A man who has never gone to school may steal from a freight car; but if he has a university education, he may steal the whole railroad.', u"No man is above the law and no man is below it: nor do we ask any man's permission when we ask him to obey it.", u'A typical vice of American politics is the avoidance of saying anything real on real issues.', u'When they call the roll in the Senate, the Senators do not know whether to answer "Present" or "Not guilty."', u'It is hard to fail, but it is worse never to have tried to succeed.', u'With self-discipline most anything is possible.', u'Great thoughts speak only to the thoughtful mind, but great actions speak to all mankind.', u"Don't hit at all if it is honorably possible to avoid hitting; but never hit soft."], u'Heraclitus': [u'Big results require big ambitions.', u'The sun is new each day.', u'There is nothing permanent except change.', u"No man ever steps in the same river twice, for it's not the same river and he's not the same man.", u'Good character is not formed in a week or a month. It is created little by little, day by day. Protracted and patient effort is needed to develop good character.', u'If you do not expect the unexpected you will not find it, for it is not to be reached by search or trail.', u'Justice will overtake fabricators of lies and false witnesses.', u'To do the same thing over and over again is not only boredom: it is to be controlled by rather than to control what you do.', u"A man's character is his fate.", u'Eyes and ears are poor witnesses to people if they have uncultured souls.', u'Man is most nearly himself when he achieves the seriousness of a child at play.', u"It is hard to contend against one's heart's desire; for whatever it wishes to have it buys at the cost of soul.", u'Much learning does not teach understanding.', u'Deliberate violence is more to be quenched than a fire.', u'Even sleepers are workers and collaborators in what goes on in the Universe.', u'You cannot step into the same river twice.', u"A man's character is his guardian divinity.", u'Change alone is unchanging.', u'Character is destiny.', u'Men who wish to know about the world must learn about it in its particular details.', u'Our envy always lasts longer than the happiness of those we envy.', u'The way up and the way down are one and the same.', u'You could not step twice into the same rivers; for other waters are ever flowing on to you.', u'Couples are wholes and not wholes, what agrees disagrees, the concordant is discordant. From all things one and from one all things.', u'Bigotry is the sacred disease.'], u'Margaret Thatcher': [u"Being powerful is like being a lady. If you have to tell people you are, you aren't.", u'Disciplining yourself to do what you know is right and important, although difficult, is the highroad to pride, self-esteem, and personal satisfaction.', u'I always cheer up immensely if an attack is particularly wounding because I think, well, if they attack one personally, it means they have not a single political argument left.', u'If you want something said, ask a man; if you want something done, ask a woman.', u'What is success? I think it is a mixture of having a flair for the thing that you are doing; knowing that it is not enough, that you have got to have hard work and a certain sense of purpose.', u"Power is like being a lady... if you have to tell people you are, you aren't.", u'Democratic nations must try to find ways to starve the terrorist and the hijacker of the oxygen of publicity on which they depend.', u'If you just set out to be liked, you would be prepared to compromise on anything at any time, and you would achieve nothing.', u'I am extraordinarily patient, provided I get my own way in the end.', u'Europe was created by history. America was created by philosophy.', u'Any woman who understands the problems of running a home will be nearer to understanding the problems of running a country.', u'I do not know anyone who has got to the top without hard work. That is the recipe. It will not always get you to the top, but should get you pretty near.', u'To me, consensus seems to be the process of abandoning all beliefs, principles, values and policies. So it is something in which no one believes and to which no one objects.', u'I usually make up my mind about a man in ten seconds, and I very rarely change it.', u"To wear your heart on your sleeve isn't a very good plan; you should wear it inside, where it functions best.", u'There can be no liberty unless there is economic liberty.', u'To cure the British disease with socialism was like trying to cure leukaemia with leeches.', u"I love argument, I love debate. I don't expect anyone just to sit there and agree with me, that's not their job.", u'A world without nuclear weapons would be less stable and more dangerous for all of us.', u'If you set out to be liked, you would be prepared to compromise on anything at any time, and you would achieve nothing.', u'There is no such thing as society: there are individual men and women, and there are families.', u'I seem to smell the stench of appeasement in the air.', u'You may have to fight a battle more than once to win it.', u"I just owe almost everything to my father and it's passionately interesting for me that the things that I learned in a small town, in a very modest home, are just the things that I believe have won the election.", u"I've got a woman's ability to stick to a job and get on with it when everyone else walks off and leaves it."], u'Ernest Holmes': [u'Life is a mirror and will reflect back to the thinker what he thinks into it.', u'Teach and practice, practice and teach - that is all we have; that is all we are good for; that is all we ever ought to do.', u'God gives some more than others because some accept more than others.', u'When prayer removes distrust and doubt and enters the field of mental certainty, it becomes faith; and the universe is built on faith.', u'I do not believe that God has imposed suffering upon anyone to punish them or to teach them a lesson.', u'We can no more do without spirituality than we can do without food, shelter, or clothing.', u'Borrowing knowledge of reality from all sources, taking the best from every study, Science of Mind brings together the highest enlightenment of the ages.', u'The road to freedom lies not through mysteries or occult performances, but through the intelligent use of natural forces and laws.', u'The universal Mind contains all knowledge. It is the potential ultimate of all things. To it, all things are possible.', u'But even in the Christian religion, much of its real meaning is hidden by words that are misleading and symbols that but few understand.', u'In principle the great religions of the world do not differ as much as they appear to.', u'The universe must exist for the self-expression of God and the delight of God.', u'Prayer is a thought, a belief, a feeling, arising within the mind of the one praying.', u'To believe in a just law of cause and effect, carrying with it a punishment or a reward, is to believe in righteousness.', u'Each one of us is an outlet to God and an inlet to God.', u'The intellect is a cold thing and a merely intellectual idea will never stimulate thought in the same manner that a spiritual idea does.', u'There was a time when a man was so convinced that the world was round that he was determined to prove it.'], u'Barry Goldwater': [u'Extremism in the defense of liberty is no vice. And moderation in the pursuit of justice is no virtue.', u'Equality, rightly understood as our founding fathers understood it, leads to liberty and to the emancipation of creative differences; wrongly understood, as it has been so tragically in our time, it leads first to conformity and then to despotism.', u"You don't need to be straight to fight and die for your country. You just need to shoot straight.", u'I would remind you that extremism in the defense of liberty is no vice! And let me remind you also that moderation in the pursuit of justice is no virtue.', u'If everybody in this town connected with politics had to leave town because of chasing women and drinking, you would have no government.', u'Where is the politician who has not promised to fight to the death for lower taxes- and who has not proceeded to vote for the very spending projects that make tax cuts impossible?', u'The income tax created more criminals than any other single act of government.', u"You don't have to be straight to be in the military; you just have to be able to shoot straight.", u'Nixon was the most dishonest individual I have ever met in my life. He lied to his wife, his family, his friends, his colleagues in the Congress, lifetime members of his own political party, the American people and the world.', u"I won't say that the papers misquote me, but I sometimes wonder where Christianity would be today if some of those reporters had been Matthew, Mark, Luke and John.", u'Hubert Humphrey talks so fast that listening to him is like trying to read Playboy magazine with your wife turning the pages.', u'I think every good Christian ought to kick Falwell right in the ass.', u"You've got to forget about this civilian. Whenever you drop bombs, you're going to hit civilians.", u"I think any man in business would be foolish to fool around with his secretary. If it's somebody else's secretary, fine.", u'American business has just forgotten the importance of selling.', u'I could have ended the war in a month. I could have made North Vietnam look like a mud puddle.', u'I will offer a choice, not an echo.', u"I wouldn't trust Nixon from here to that phone.", u"If you don't mind smelling like peanut butter for two or three days, peanut butter is darn good shaving cream.", u"It's a great country, where anybody can grow up to be president... except me.", u'The only summit meeting that can succeed is the one that does not take place.', u"To disagree, one doesn't have to be disagreeable.", u"When I'm not a politician, I'll be dead."], u'Charles Caleb Colton': [u'Friendship often ends in love; but love in friendship - never.', u'Imitation is the sincerest form of flattery.', u'Books, like friends, should be few and well chosen. Like friends, too, we should return to them again and again for, like true friends, they will never fail us - never cease to instruct - never cloy.', u'Silence is foolish if we are wise, but wise if we are foolish.', u'Much may be done in those little shreds and patches of time which every day produces, and which most men throw away.', u'Those that are the loudest in their threats are the weakest in their actions.', u'True friendship is like sound health; the value of it is seldom known until it is lost.', u'Nothing more completely baffles one who is full of trick and duplicity, than straightforward and simple integrity in another.', u'It is better to meet danger than to wait for it. He that is on a lee shore, and foresees a hurricane, stands out to sea and encounters a storm to avoid a shipwreck.', u"Corruption is like a ball of snow, once it's set a rolling it must increase.", u'If you cannot inspire a woman with love of you, fill her above the brim with love of herself; all that runs over will be yours.', u'Men are born with two eyes, but with one tongue, in order that they should see twice as much as they say.', u'We hate some persons because we do not know them; and will not know them because we hate them.', u'Ladies of Fashion starve their happiness to feed their vanity, and their love to feed their pride.', u'Next to acquiring good friends, the best acquisition is that of good books.', u'Many books require no thought from those who read them, and for a very simple reason; they made no such demand upon those who wrote them.', u'Marriage is a feast where the grace is sometimes better than the dinner.', u'Suicide sometimes proceeds from cowardice, but not always; for cowardice sometimes prevents it; since as many live because they are afraid to die, as die because they are afraid to live.', u'There is this difference between happiness and wisdom: he that thinks himself the happiest man, really is so; but he that thinks himself the wisest, is generally the greatest fool.', u'Liberty will not descend to a people; a people must raise themselves to liberty; it is a blessing that must be earned before it can be enjoyed.', u"Life isn't like a book. Life isn't logical or sensible or orderly. Life is a mess most of the time. And theology must be lived in the midst of that mess.", u'None are so fond of secrets as those who do not mean to keep them.', u'Nothing so completely baffles one who is full of trick and duplicity himself, than straightforward and simple integrity in another.', u'Patience is the support of weakness; impatience the ruin of strength.', u'There are two way of establishing a reputation, one to be praised by honest people and the other to be accused by rogues. It is best, however, to secure the first one, because it will always be accompanied by the latter.'], u'Matthew Henry': [u'After a storm comes a calm.', u"Eve was not taken out of Adam's head to top him, neither out of his feet to be trampled on by him, but out of his side to be equal with him, under his arm to be protected by him, and near his heart to be loved by him.", u'None so deaf as those that will not hear. None so blind as those that will not see.', u'Extraordinary afflictions are not always the punishment of extraordinary sins, but sometimes the trial of extraordinary graces.', u'Whatever we have of this world in our hands, our care must be to keep it out of our hearts, lest it come between us and Christ.', u'He whose head is in heaven need not fear to put his feet into the grave.', u'Better late than never.', u'It is common for those that are farthest from God, to boast themselves most of their being near to the Church.', u'It is not talking but walking that will bring us to heaven.', u'Saying and doing are two things.', u'Goodness makes greatness truly valuable, and greatness make goodness much more serviceable.', u'It is not fit the public trusts should be lodged in the hands of any, till they are first proved and found fit for the business they are to be entrusted with.', u'No attribute of God is more dreadful to sinners than His holiness.', u'He rolls it under his tongue as a sweet morsel.', u"Here is bread, which strengthens man's heart, and therefore is called the staff of Life.", u'It is good for us to keep some account of our prayers, that we may not unsay them in our practice.', u'It is good news, worthy of all acceptation; and yet not too good to be true.', u'Many a dangerous temptation comes to us in gay, fine colours, that are but skin-deep.', u'Men of polite learning and a liberal education.', u'Not lost, but gone before.', u'Sanctified afflictions are spiritual promotions.', u'Shallows where a lamb could wade and depths where an elephant would drown.', u'So great was the extremity of his pain and anguish, that he did not only sigh but roar.', u'The better day, the worse deed.', u'The Scriptures were written, not to make us astronomers, but to make us saints.'], u'William Blake': [u'To see the world in a grain of sand, and to see heaven in a wild flower, hold infinity in the palm of your hands, and eternity in an hour.', u'If the doors of perception were cleansed everything would appear to man as it is, infinite.', u'I must create a system or be enslaved by another mans; I will not reason and compare: my business is to create.', u'I was angry with my friend: I told my wrath, my wrath did end. I was angry with my foe: I told it not, my wrath did grow.', u"He who binds to himself a joy Does the winged life destroy; But he who kisses the joy as it flies Lives in eternity's sun rise.", u'It is easier to forgive an enemy than to forgive a friend.', u'Think in the morning. Act in the noon. Eat in the evening. Sleep in the night.', u"A truth that's told with bad intent beats all the lies you can invent.", u'If a thing loves, it is infinite.', u'The road of excess leads to the palace of wisdom.', u'The tree which moves some to tears of joy is in the eyes of others only a green thing that stands in the way. Some see nature all ridicule and deformity... and some scarce see nature at all. But to the eyes of the man of imagination, nature is imagination itself.', u'The bird a nest, the spider a web, man friendship.', u"Do what you will, this world's a fiction and is made up of contradiction.", u"If the Sun and Moon should ever doubt, they'd immediately go out.", u'Fun I love, but too much fun is of all things the most loathsome. Mirth is better than fun, and happiness is better than mirth.', u'You cannot have Liberty in this world without what you call Moral Virtue, and you cannot have Moral Virtue without the slavery of that half of the human race who hate what you call Moral Virtue.', u'A fool sees not the same tree that a wise man sees.', u'No bird soars too high if he soars with his own wings.', u'Always be ready to speak your mind, and a base man will avoid you.', u'As a man is, so he sees. As the eye is formed, such are its powers.', u'Better murder an infant in its cradle than nurse an unacted desire.', u'Both read the Bible day and night, but thou read black where I read white.', u'Poetry fettered, fetters the human race. Nations are destroyed or flourish in proportion as their poetry, painting, and music are destroyed or flourish.', u"Can I see another's woe, and not be in sorrow too? Can I see another's grief, and not seek for kind relief?", u'Art can never exist without naked beauty displayed.'], u'Friedrich Nietzsche': [u'That which does not kill us makes us stronger.', u'He who has a why to live can bear almost any how.', u'Without music, life would be a mistake.', u'It is not a lack of love, but a lack of friendship that makes unhappy marriages.', u'A pair of powerful spectacles has sometimes sufficed to cure a person in love.', u'The individual has always had to struggle to keep from being overwhelmed by the tribe. If you try it, you will be lonely often, and sometimes frightened. But no price is too high to pay for the privilege of owning yourself.', u'Whoever fights monsters should see to it that in the process he does not become a monster. And if you gaze long enough into an abyss, the abyss will gaze back into you.', u'Ah, women. They make the highs higher and the lows more frequent.', u'A casual stroll through the lunatic asylum shows that faith does not prove anything.', u'When you look into an abyss, the abyss also looks into you.', u'To live is to suffer, to survive is to find some meaning in the suffering.', u'All things are subject to interpretation whichever interpretation prevails at a given time is a function of power and not truth.', u'The true man wants two things: danger and play. For that reason he wants woman, as the most dangerous plaything.', u'After coming into contact with a religious man I always feel I must wash my hands.', u'And we should consider every day lost on which we have not danced at least once. And we should call every truth false which was not accompanied by at least one laugh.', u'All truly great thoughts are conceived by walking.', u"Anyone who has declared someone else to be an idiot, a bad apple, is annoyed when it turns out in the end that he isn't.", u'The surest way to corrupt a youth is to instruct him to hold in higher esteem those who think alike than those who think differently.', u'Faith: not wanting to know what is true.', u'He who would learn to fly one day must first learn to stand and walk and run and climb and dance; one cannot fly into flying.', u'The man of knowledge must be able not only to love his enemies but also to hate his friends.', u'You have your way. I have my way. As for the right way, the correct way, and the only way, it does not exist.', u'A woman may very well form a friendship with a man, but for this to endure, it must be assisted by a little physical antipathy.', u'The essence of all beautiful art, all great art, is gratitude.', u'Hope in reality is the worst of all evils because it prolongs the torments of man.'], u'Elizabeth Taylor': [u"I have a woman's body and a child's emotions.", u'It is strange that the years teach us patience; that the shorter our time, the greater our capacity for waiting.', u"The problem with people who have no vices is that generally you can be pretty sure they're going to have some pretty annoying virtues.", u"When people say, 'She's got everything', I've got one answer - I haven't had tomorrow.", u"I feel very adventurous. There are so many doors to be opened, and I'm not afraid to look behind them.", u"I'm a survivor - a living example of what people can go through and survive.", u"I adore wearing gems, but not because they are mine. You can't possess radiance, you can only admire it.", u'Big girls need big diamonds.', u'Some of my best leading men have been dogs and horses.', u"I've been through it all, baby, I'm mother courage.", u"My mother says I didn't open my eyes for eight days after I was born, but when I did, the first thing I saw was an engagement ring. I was hooked.", u'I am a very committed wife. And I should be committed too - for being married so many times.', u"I think I'm finally growing up - and about time.", u"You find out who your real friends are when you're involved in a scandal.", u"I don't think President Bush is doing anything at all about Aids. In fact, I'm not sure he even knows how to spell Aids.", u"I've always admitted that I'm ruled by my passions.", u'I suppose when they reach a certain age some men are afraid to grow up. It seems the older the men get, the younger their new wives get.', u'So much to do, so little done, such things to be.', u"If someone's dumb enough to offer me a million dollars to make a picture, I'm certainly not dumb enough to turn it down.", u"I've only slept with men I've been married to. How many women can make that claim?", u"I don't pretend to be an ordinary housewife.", u"It's not the having, it's the getting.", u'Everything makes me nervous - except making films.', u'I sweat real sweat and I shake real shakes.', u'People who know me well, call me Elizabeth. I dislike Liz.'], u'Albert Ellis': [u'The best years of your life are the ones in which you decide your problems are your own. You do not blame them on your mother, the ecology, or the president. You realize that you control your own destiny.', u'There are three musts that hold us back: I must do well. You must treat me well. And the world must be easy.', u"Acceptance is not love. You love a person because he or she has lovable traits, but you accept everybody just because they're alive and human.", u"By not caring too much about what people think, I'm able to think for myself and propagate ideas which are very often unpopular. And I succeed.", u'I think the future of psychotherapy and psychology is in the school system. We need to teach every child how to rarely seriously disturb himself or herself and how to overcome disturbance when it occurs.', u'The art of love is largely the art of persistence.', u"You largely constructed your depression. It wasn't given to you. Therefore, you can deconstruct it.", u"I think it's unfair, but they have the right as fallible, screwed-up humans to be unfair; that's the human condition.", u"People could rationally decide that prolonged relationships take up too much time and effort and that they'd much rather do other kinds of things. But most people are afraid of rejection.", u"People don't just get upset. They contribute to their upsetness.", u'People got insights into what was bothering them, but they hardly did a damn thing to change.', u"Self-esteem is the greatest sickness known to man or woman because it's conditional.", u"We teach people that they upset themselves. We can't change the past, so we change how people are thinking, feeling and behaving today.", u"I had a great many sex and love cases where people were absolutely devastated when somebody with whom they were compulsively in love didn't love them back. They were killing themselves with anxiety and depression.", u"I'm very happy. I like my work and the various aspects of it-going around the world, teaching the gospel according to St. Albert.", u"If something is irrational, that means it won't work. It's usually unrealistic.", u"As a result of my philosophy, I wasn't even upset about Hitler. I was willing to go to war to knock him off, but I didn't hate him. I hated what he was doing.", u'I get people to truly accept themselves unconditionally, whether or not their therapist or anyone loves them.', u"I wrote several articles criticizing psychoanalysis, but the analysts weren't listening to my objections. So I finally quit after practicing it for six years.", u'In the old days we used to get more referrals, because people had insurance that paid for therapy. Now they belong to HMOs, and we can only be affiliated with a few HMOs.', u"Most people would have given up when faced with all the criticism I've received over the years.", u"There's no evidence whatsoever that men are more rational than women. Both sexes seem to be equally irrational.", u'For that again, is what all manner of religion essentially is: childish dependency.', u'Freud had a gene for inefficiency, and I think I have a gene for efficiency.', u'I had used eclectic therapy and behavior therapy on myself at the age of 19 to get over my fear of public speaking and of approaching young women in public.'], u'Marianne Williamson': [u'Our deepest fear is not that we are inadequate. Our deepest fear is that we are powerful beyond measure. It is our Light, not our Darkness, that most frightens us.', u'Forgiveness is not always easy. At times, it feels more painful than the wound we suffered, to forgive the one that inflicted it. And yet, there is no peace without forgiveness.', u'In every community, there is work to be done. In every nation, there are wounds to heal. In every heart, there is the power to do it.', u'Dear God, Please send to me the spirit of Your peace. Then send, dear Lord, the spirit of peace from me to all the world. Amen.', u"Maturity includes the recognition that no one is going to see anything in us that we don't see in ourselves. Stop waiting for a producer. Produce yourself.", u'As we let our light shine, we unconsciously give other people permission to do the same. As we are liberated from our own fear, our presence actually liberates others.', u"We can always choose to perceive things differently. You can focus on what's wrong in your life, or you can focus on what's right.", u'The practice of forgiveness is our most important contribution to the healing of the world.', u'Joy is what happens to us when we allow ourselves to recognize how good things really are.', u'May we not succumb to thoughts of violence and revenge today, but rather to thoughts of mercy and compassion. We are to love our enemies that they might be returned to their right minds.', u"As we become purer channels for God's light, we develop an appetite for the sweetness that is possible in this world. A miracle worker is not geared toward fighting the world that is, but toward creating the world that could be.", u'When an idea reaches critical mass there is no stopping the shift its presence will induce.', u'Our past is a story existing only in our minds. Look, analyze, understand, and forgive. Then, as quickly as possible, chuck it.', u'Personal transformation can and does have global effects. As we go, so goes the world, for the world is us. The revolution that will save the world is ultimately a personal one.', u"You are a child of God. Your playing small does not serve the world. There is nothing enlightened about shrinking so that other people won't feel insecure about you. We were born to manifest the glory of God that is within us.", u"Some men know that a light touch of the tongue, running from a woman's toes to her ears, lingering in the softest way possible in various places in between, given often enough and sincerely enough, would add immeasurably to world peace.", u'Love is what we were born with. Fear is what we learned here.', u'The only work that will ultimately bring any good to any of us is the work of contributing to the healing of the world.', u'Fill you mind with the meaningless stimuli of a world preoccupied with meaningless things, and it will not be easy to feel peace in your heart.', u'If I choose to bless another person, I will always end up feeling more blessed.', u'In our natural state, we are glorious beings. In the world of illusion, we are lost and imprisoned, slaves to our appetites and our will to false power.', u'Miracles occur naturally as expressions of love. The real miracle is the love that inspires them. In this sense everything that comes from love is a miracle.', u'Nothing liberates our greatness like the desire to help, the desire to serve.', u'Enlightenment is the key to everything, and it is the key to intimacy, because it is the goal of true authenticity.', u'I deepen my experience of God through prayer, meditation, and forgiveness.'], u'Mike Tyson': [u"Everyone has a plan 'till they get punched in the mouth.", u'I want to rip out his heart and feed it to Lennox Lewis. I want to kill people. I want to rip their stomachs out and eat their children.', u"I don't react to a tragic happening any more. I took so many bad things as a kid and some people think I don't care about anything. It's just too hard for me to get emotional. I can't cry no more.", u"I'm a dreamer. I have to dream and reach for the stars, and if I miss a star then I grab a handful of clouds.", u"God lets everything happen for a reason. It's all a learning process, and you have to go from one level to another.", u"I could feel his muscle tissues collapse under my force. It's ludicrous these mortals even attempt to enter my realm.", u'When I fight someone, I want to break his will. I want to take his manhood. I want to rip out his heart and show it to him.', u'As long as we persevere and endure, we can get anything we want.', u"I don't try to intimidate anybody before a fight. That's nonsense. I intimidate people by hitting them.", u"Everybody's got plans... until they get hit.", u'When Jesus comes back, these crazy, greedy, capitalistic men are gonna kill him again.', u'I intend to fight and I want to win. But my priorities are basically to be a good Brother and a strong one, and to try to be a good father one day.', u"Another thing that freaks me out is time. Time is like a book. You have a beginning, a middle and an end. It's just a cycle.", u"I don't understand why people would want to get rid of pigeons. They don't bother no one.", u"I'm in trouble because I'm normal and slightly arrogant. A lot of people don't like themselves and I happen to be totally in love with myself.", u'If Jesus was here, do you think Jesus would show me any love? Do you think Jesus would love me?', u"You can't stay married in a situation where you are afraid to go to sleep in case your wife might cut your throat.", u"I ain't the same person I was when I bit that guy's ear off.", u"I'm a Muslim, but I think Jesus would have a drink with me. He would be cool. He would talk to me.", u'I try to catch them right on the tip of his nose, because I try to punch the bone into the brain.', u'I just want to be humble at all times.', u"I'm not Mother Teresa, but I'm not Charles Manson, either.", u'I feel like sometimes that I was not meant for this society.', u"I just want to do what I do best, and that's fight. I love it.", u"Anyone with a grain of sense would know that if I punched my wife I would rip her head off. It's all lies. I have never laid a finger on her."], u'Isaac Asimov': [u'People who think they know everything are a great annoyance to those of us who do.', u"Creationists make it sound as though a 'theory' is something you dreamt up after being drunk all night.", u'The saddest aspect of life right now is that science gathers knowledge faster than society gathers wisdom.', u'Individual science fiction stories may seem as trivial as ever to the blinder critics and philosophers of today - but the core of science fiction, its essence has become crucial to our salvation if we are to be saved at all.', u"Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome.", u"The most exciting phrase to hear in science, the one that heralds new discoveries, is not 'Eureka!' but 'That's funny...'", u'Violence is the last refuge of the incompetent.', u'I do not fear computers. I fear the lack of them.', u"And above all things, never think that you're not good enough yourself. A man should never think that. My belief is that in life people will take you at your own reckoning.", u'Humanity has the stars in its future, and that future is too important to be lost under the burden of juvenile folly and ignorant superstition.', u"I don't believe in an afterlife, so I don't have to spend my whole life fearing hell, or fearing heaven even more. For whatever the tortures of hell, I think the boredom of heaven would be even worse.", u"It takes more than capital to swing business. You've got to have the A. I. D. degree to get by - Advertising, Initiative, and Dynamics.", u'If knowledge can create problems, it is not through ignorance that we can solve them.', u'Self-education is, I firmly believe, the only kind of education there is.', u'I am not a speed reader. I am a speed understander.', u"All sorts of computer errors are now turning up. You'd be surprised to know the number of doctors who claim they are treating pregnant men.", u'No sensible decision can be made any longer without taking into account not only the world as it is, but the world as it will be.', u'When I read about the way in which library funds are being cut and cut, I can only think that American society has found one more way to destroy itself.', u'Part of the inhumanity of the computer is that, once it is competently programmed and working smoothly, it is completely honest.', u'To insult someone we call him "bestial." For deliberate cruelty and nature, "human" might be the greater insult.', u"Never let your sense of morals get in the way of doing what's right.", u'To surrender to ignorance and call it God has always been premature, and it remains premature today.', u'A subtle thought that is in error may yet give rise to fruitful inquiry that can establish truths of great value.', u"Dalton's records, carefully preserved for a century, were destroyed during the World War II bombing of Manchester. It is not only the living who are killed in war.", u'It is change, continuing change, inevitable change, that is the dominant factor in society today. No sensible decision can be made any longer without taking into account not only the world as it is, but the world as it will be.'], u'Winston Churchill': [u'Socialism is a philosophy of failure, the creed of ignorance, and the gospel of envy, its inherent virtue is the equal sharing of misery.', u"You have enemies? Good. That means you've stood up for something, sometime in your life.", u"If you're going through hell, keep going.", u'The empires of the future are the empires of the mind.', u'I may be drunk, Miss, but in the morning I will be sober and you will still be ugly.', u'Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts.', u'A pessimist sees the difficulty in every opportunity; an optimist sees the opportunity in every difficulty.', u'A lie gets halfway around the world before the truth has a chance to get its pants on.', u'Courage is what it takes to stand up and speak; courage is also what it takes to sit down and listen.', u'Continuous effort - not strength or intelligence - is the key to unlocking our potential.', u'Never, never, never give up.', u'All the great things are simple, and many can be expressed in a single word: freedom, justice, honor, duty, mercy, hope.', u'Now this is not the end. It is not even the beginning of the end. But it is, perhaps, the end of the beginning.', u"A fanatic is one who can't change his mind and won't change the subject.", u'Attitude is a little thing that makes a big difference.', u'A man does what he must - in spite of personal consequences, in spite of obstacles and dangers and pressures - and that is the basis of all human morality.', u"If you have an important point to make, don't try to be subtle or clever. Use a pile driver. Hit the point once. Then come back and hit it again. Then hit it a third time - a tremendous whack.", u'Success consists of going from failure to failure without loss of enthusiasm.', u'The best argument against democracy is a five-minute conversation with the average voter.', u'Criticism may not be agreeable, but it is necessary. It fulfils the same function as pain in the human body. It calls attention to an unhealthy state of things.', u'The truth is incontrovertible. Malice may attack it, ignorance may deride it, but in the end, there it is.', u'An appeaser is one who feeds a crocodile, hoping it will eat him last.', u'Some people regard private enterprise as a predatory tiger to be shot. Others look on it as a cow they can milk. Not enough people see it as a healthy horse, pulling a sturdy wagon.', u'Ending a sentence with a preposition is something up with which I will not put.', u'A joke is a very serious thing.'], u'Agatha Christie': [u'An archaeologist is the best husband a woman can have. The older she gets the more interested he is in her.', u'The secret of getting ahead is getting started.', u'Very few of us are what we seem.', u'Dogs are wise. They crawl away into a quiet corner and lick their wounds and do not rejoin the world until they are whole once more.', u'I have sometimes been wildly, despairingly, acutely miserable, racked with sorrow, but through it all I still know quite certainly that just to be alive is a grand thing.', u'I like living. I have sometimes been wildly, despairingly, acutely miserable, racked with sorrow, but through it all I still know quite certainly that just to be alive is a grand thing.', u"Evil is not something superhuman, it's something less than human.", u'One of the luckiest things that can happen to you in life is, I think, to have a happy childhood.', u'I married an archaeologist because the older I grow, the more he appreciates me.', u"Any woman can fool a man if she wants to and if he's in love with her.", u"If one sticks too rigidly to one's principles, one would hardly see anybody.", u"One doesn't recognize the really important moments in one's life until it's too late.", u"Good advice is always certain to be ignored, but that's no reason not to give it.", u"The happy people are failures because they are on such good terms with themselves they don't give a damn.", u'The popular idea that a child forgets easily is not an accurate one. Many people go right through life in the grip of an idea which has been impressed on them in very tender years.', u"There's too much tendency to attribute to God the evils that man does of his own free will.", u'Too much mercy... often resulted in further crimes which were fatal to innocent victims who need not have been victims if justice had been put first and mercy second.', u'Crime is terribly revealing. Try and vary your methods as you will, your tastes, your habits, your attitude of mind, and your soul is revealed by your actions.', u"Every murderer is probably somebody's old friend.", u'It is ridiculous to set a detective story in New York City. New York City is itself a detective story.', u"The best time to plan a book is while you're doing the dishes.", u'There is nothing more thrilling in this world, I think, than having a child that is yours, and yet is mysteriously a stranger.', u'These little grey cells. It is up to them.', u'Everything that has existed, lingers in the Eternity.', u"I don't think necessity is the mother of invention. Invention, in my opinion, arises directly from idleness, possibly also from laziness - to save oneself trouble."], u'Charlie Sheen': [u"As kids we're not taught how to deal with success; we're taught how to deal with failure. If at first you don't succeed, try, try again. If at first you succeed, then what?", u"I think my passion is misinterpreted as anger sometimes. And I don't think people are ready for the message that I'm delivering, and delivering with a sense of violent love.", u"I just don't want to live like I used to. And at some point, I'm going to put a gag order on myself in terms of talking about the past. I've got to slam the door and deal with the present and the future.", u"Slash sat me down at his house and said, You've got to clean up your act. You know you've gone too far when Slash is saying, Look, you've got to get into rehab.", u"Here's the good news. If I realize that I'm insane, then I'm okay with it. I'm not dangerous insane.", u"Dad almost died of a heart attack in the middle of making Apocalypse Now, the biggest movie of his life. It doesn't make you want to jump into that business.", u"I don't have time for their judgement and their stupidity and you know they lay down with their ugly wives in front of their ugly children and look at their loser lives and then they look at me and they say, 'I can't process it' well, no, you never will stop trying, just sit back and enjoy the show. You know?", u"I'm different. I have a different constitution, I have a different brain, I have a different heart. I got tiger blood, man. Dying's for fools, dying's for amateurs.", u"You have the right to kill me, but you don't have the right to judge me. That's life. There's nobility in that. There's focus. It's genuine. It's crystal and it's pure and it's available to everybody, so just shut your traps and put down your McDonalds, your vaccines, your Us Weekly, your TMZ and the rest of it.", u"The only thing I'm addicted to is winning. This bootleg cult, arrogantly referred to as Alcoholics Anonymous, reports a 5 percent success rate. My success rate is 100 percent.", u"I'm sorry, man, but I've got magic. I've got poetry in my fingertips. Most of the time - and this includes naps - I'm an F-18, bro. And I will destroy you in the air. I will deploy my ordinance to the ground.", u"I am on a drug. It's called Charlie Sheen.", u'I have a different constitution. I have a different brain; I have a different heart; I got tiger blood, man.', u"I saw 28 Days. I don't remember rehab being like a day camp or being that funny. Rehab is a dumping ground. It's a big landfill.", u'Boom, crush. Night, losers. Winning, duh.', u"From my big beautiful warlock brain, welcome to 'Sheen's Korner' ... You're either in my corner, or you're with the trolls.", u"I'm dealing with fools and trolls and soft targets. It's just strafing runs in my underwear before my first cup of coffee. I don't have time for these clowns.", u'You either love or you hate. You live in the middle, you get nothing.', u"When friends asked me, Can we help? I'd say, Not unless you can alter time, speed up the harvest or teleport me off this rock. I used that line from Star Wars.", u"But you can't focus on things that matter if all you've been is asleep for forty years. Funny how sleep rhymes with sheep. You know.", u"You can't process me with a normal brain.", u'Uncertainty is a sign of humility, and humility is just the ability or the willingness to learn.', u"I'm bi-winning. I win here, I win there.", u"Duh! So, we're asking you now, what are some of your favorite lines that this warlock brain produced?", u'I have defeated this earthworm with my words. Imagine what I would have done with my fire breathing fists.'], u'Ingrid Bergman': [u'A kiss is a lovely trick designed by nature to stop speech when words become superfluous.', u'Be yourself. The world worships the original.', u"I have no regrets. I wouldn't have lived my life the way I did if I was going to worry about what people were going to say.", u"Cancer victims who don't accept their fate, who don't learn to live with it, will only destroy what little time they have left.", u"I remember one day sitting at the pool and suddenly the tears were streaming down my cheeks. Why was I so unhappy? I had success. I had security. But it wasn't enough. I was exploding inside.", u"I was the shyest human ever invented, but I had a lion inside me that wouldn't shut up!", u'Happiness is good health and a bad memory.', u"I have grown up alone. I've taken care of myself. I worked, earned money and was independent at 18.", u"I don't think anyone has the right to intrude in your life, but they do. I would like people to separate the actress and the woman.", u'I do not know how to kiss, or I would kiss you. Where do the noses go?', u'There are advantages to being a star though - you can always get a table in a full restaurant.', u'Time is shortening. But every day that I challenge this cancer and survive is a victory for me.', u"I can do everything with ease on the stage, whereas in real life I feel too big and clumsy. So I didn't choose acting. It chose me.", u'I made so many films which were more important, but the only one people ever want to talk about is that one with Bogart.', u"If you took acting away from me, I'd stop breathing.", u"It is not whether you really cry. It's whether the audience thinks you are crying.", u"Never again! I can see no reason for marriage - ever at all. I've had it. Three times is enough.", u'Until 45 I can play a woman in love. After 55 I can play grandmothers. But between those ten years, it is difficult for an actress.'], u'Michael Jackson': [u'If you enter this world knowing you are loved and you leave this world knowing the same, then everything that happens in between can be dealt with.', u"Because parents have power over children. They feel they have to do what their parents say. But the love of money is the root of all evil. And this is a sweet child. And to see him turn like this, this isn't him. This is not him.", u'But I will never stop helping and loving people the way Jesus said to.', u"It's a complete lie, why do people buy these papers? It's not the truth I'm here to say. You know, don't judge a person, do not pass judgement, unless you have talked to them one on one. I don't care what the story is, do not judge them because it is a lie.", u'Let us dream of tomorrow where we can truly love from the soul, and know love as the ultimate truth at the heart of all creation.', u"I'm happy to be alive, I'm happy to be who I am.", u"Why can't you share your bed? The most loving thing to do is to share your bed with someone. It's very charming. It's very sweet. It's what the whole world should do.", u"And I remember going to the record studio and there was a park across the street and I'd see all the children playing and I would cry because it would make me sad that I would have to work instead.", u"I'm never pleased with anything, I'm a perfectionist, it's part of who I am.", u'Children show me in their playful smiles the divine in everyone. This simple goodness shines straight from their hearts and only asks to be lived.', u"Yeah, Wacko Jacko, where did that come from? Some English tabloid. I have a heart and I have feelings. I feel that when you do that to me. It's not nice.", u"Yes, and I had pimples so badly it used to make me so shy. I used not to look at myself. I'd hide my face in the dark, I wouldn't want to look in the mirror and my father teased me and I just hated it and I cried everyday.", u"Because I think every child star suffers through this period because you're not the cute and charming child that you were. You start to grow, and they want to keep you little forever.", u"I love my family very much. I wish I could see them a little more often than I do. But we understand because we're a show business family and we all work.", u'The greatest education in the world is watching the masters at work.', u'The meaning of life is contained in every single expression of life. It is present in the infinity of forms and phenomena that exist in all of creation.', u"People write negatives things, cause they feel that's what sells. Good news to them, doesn't sell.", u"You know, let's put it this way, if all the people in Hollywood who have had plastic surgery, if they went on vacation, there wouldn't be a person left in town.", u'I just wish I could understand my father.', u'They did it to try and belittle me, to try and to take away my pride. But I went through the whole system with them. And at the end, I - I wanted the public to know that I was okay, even though I was hurting.', u'Everyone who knows me will know the truth, which is that my children come first in my life and that I would never harm any child.', u"I'm a black American, I am proud of my race. I am proud of who I am. I have a lot of pride and dignity.", u"I'm just like anyone. I cut and I bleed. And I embarass easily.", u"Because I wanted to have a place that I could create everything that I that I never had as a child. So, you see rides. You see animals. There's a movie theater.", u'Before I would hurt a child, I would slit my wrists.'], u'Michael Jordan': [u"I've missed more than 9000 shots in my career. I've lost almost 300 games. 26 times, I've been trusted to take the game winning shot and missed. I've failed over and over and over again in my life. And that is why I succeed.", u"I've failed over and over and over again in my life and that is why I succeed.", u"If you're trying to achieve, there will be roadblocks. I've had them; everybody has had them. But obstacles don't have to stop you. If you run into a wall, don't turn around and give up. Figure out how to climb it, go through it, or work around it.", u'My attitude is that if you push me towards something that you think is a weakness, then I will turn that perceived weakness into a strength.', u"I can accept failure, everyone fails at something. But I can't accept not trying.", u'If you accept the expectations of others, especially negative ones, then you never will change the outcome.', u"Obstacles don't have to stop you. If you run into a wall, don't turn around and give up. Figure out how to climb it, go through it, or work around it.", u'Some people want it to happen, some wish it would happen, others make it happen.', u"To be successful you have to be selfish, or else you never achieve. And once you get to your highest level, then you have to be unselfish. Stay reachable. Stay in touch. Don't isolate.", u'Talent wins games, but teamwork and intelligence wins championships.', u'Always turn a negative situation into a positive situation.', u"As athletes, we're used to reacting quickly. Here, it's 'come, stop, come, stop.' There's a lot of downtime. That's the toughest part of the day.", u'I play to win, whether during practice or a real game. And I will not let anything get in the way of me and my competitive enthusiasm to win.', u'Just play. Have fun. Enjoy the game.', u"My heroes are and were my parents. I can't see having anyone else as my heroes.", u"I'm not out there sweating for three hours every day just to find out what it feels like to sweat.", u"Even when I'm old and grey, I won't be able to play it, but I'll still love the game.", u'The game is my wife. It demands loyalty and responsibility, and it gives me back fulfillment and peace.', u"I've always believed that if you put in the work, the results will come.", u'I never looked at the consequences of missing a big shot... when you think about the consequences you always think of a negative result.', u"I've never been afraid to fail.", u'You have to expect things of yourself before you can do them.', u"I realize that I'm black, but I like to be viewed as a person, and this is everybody's wish.", u"My body could stand the crutches but my mind couldn't stand the sideline.", u"The game of basketball has been everything to me. My place of refuge, place I've always gone where I needed comfort and peace. It's been the site of intense pain and the most intense feelings of joy and satisfaction. It's a relationship that has evolved over time, given me the greatest respect and love for the game."], u'Vladimir Lenin': [u'The way to crush the bourgeoisie is to grind them between the millstones of taxation and inflation.', u'The goal of socialism is communism.', u'A lie told often enough becomes the truth.', u'One man with a gun can control 100 without one.', u'When one makes a Revolution, one cannot mark time; one must always go forward - or go back. He who now talks about the "freedom of the press" goes backward, and halts our headlong course towards Socialism.', u'Give me four years to teach the children and the seed I have sown will never be uprooted.', u'Give us the child for 8 years and it will be a Bolshevik forever.', u'Politics begin where the masses are, not where there are thousands, but where there are millions, that is where serious politics begin.', u'There are no morals in politics; there is only expedience. A scoundrel may be of use to us just because he is a scoundrel.', u'The press should be not only a collective propagandist and a collective agitator, but also a collective organizer of the masses.', u'The best way to destroy the capitalist system is to debauch the currency.', u'Freedom in capitalist society always remains about the same as it was in ancient Greek republics: Freedom for slave owners.', u'Any cook should be able to run the country.', u'A revolution is impossible without a revolutionary situation; furthermore, not every revolutionary situation leads to revolution.', u'Can a nation be free if it oppresses other nations? It cannot.', u'If it were necessary to give the briefest possible definition of imperialism, we should have to say that imperialism is the monopoly stage of capitalism.', u'To rely upon conviction, devotion, and other excellent spiritual qualities; that is not to be taken seriously in politics.', u'When there is state there can be no freedom, but when there is freedom there will be no state.', u'Fascism is capitalism in decay.', u'Our program necessarily includes the propaganda of atheism.', u'If Socialism can only be realized when the intellectual development of all the people permits it, then we shall not see Socialism for at least five hundred years.', u'No amount of political freedom will satisfy the hungry masses.', u'The oppressed are allowed once every few years to decide which particular representatives of the oppressing class are to represent and repress them in parliament.', u'Crime is a product of social excess.', u'Democracy is indispensable to socialism.'], u'Carter G. Woodson': [u'If the Negro in the ghetto must eternally be fed by the hand that pushes him into the ghetto, he will never become strong enough to get out of the ghetto.', u'If a race has no history, if it has no worthwhile tradition, it becomes a negligible factor in the thought of the world, and it stands in danger of being exterminated.', u"When you control a man's thinking you do not have to worry about his actions.", u'If Liberia has failed, then, it is no evidence of the failure of the Negro in government. It is merely evidence of the failure of slavery.', u'The large majority of the Negroes who have put on the finishing touches of our best colleges are all but worthless in the development of their people.', u'As another has well said, to handicap a student by teaching him that his black face is a curse and that his struggle to change his condition is hopeless is the worst sort of lynching.', u'In our so-called democracy we are accustomed to give the majority what they want rather than educate them to understand what is best for them.', u'This assumption of Negro leadership in the ghetto, then, must not be confined to matters of religion, education, and social uplift; it must deal with such fundamental forces in life as make these things possible.', u'In fact, the confidence of the people is worth more than money.', u'In the long run, there is not much discrimination against superior talent.', u'Let us banish fear.', u'Negroes who have been so long inconvenienced and denied opportunities for development are naturally afraid of anything that sounds like discrimination.', u'The strongest bank in the United States will last only so long as the people will have sufficient confidence in it to keep their money there.', u"The thought of' the inferiority of the Negro is drilled into him in almost every class he enters and in almost every book he studies.", u'They still have some money, and they have needs to supply. They must begin immediately to pool their earnings and organize industries to participate in supplying social and economic demands.', u'This crusade is much more important than the anti- lynching movement, because there would be no lynching if it did not start in the schoolroom.', u'Those who have no record of what their forebears have accomplished lose the inspiration which comes from the teaching of biography and history.', u'And thus goes segregation which is the most far-reaching development in the history of the Negro since the enslavement of the race.', u'Even schools for Negroes, then, are places where they must be convinced of their inferiority.', u'I am a radical.', u'I am not afraid of being sued by white businessmen. In fact, I should welcome such a law suit.', u'I am ready to act, if I can find brave men to help me.', u'If the Negroes are to remain forever removed from the producing atmosphere, and the present discrimination continues, there will be nothing left for them to do.', u'If the white man wants to hold on to it, let him do so; but the Negro, so far as he is able, should develop and carry out a program of his own.', u'Negro banks, as a rule, have failed because the people, taught that their own pioneers in business cannot function in this sphere, withdrew their deposits.'], u'Thomas Paine': [u'Government, even in its best state, is but a necessary evil; in its worst state, an intolerable one.', u'If there must be trouble, let it be in my day, that my child may have peace.', u"I love the man that can smile in trouble, that can gather strength from distress, and grow brave by reflection. 'Tis the business of little minds to shrink, but he whose heart is firm, and whose conscience approves his conduct, will pursue his principles unto death.", u'All national institutions of churches, whether Jewish, Christian or Turkish, appear to me no other than human inventions, set up to terrify and enslave mankind, and monopolize power and profit.', u'Arms discourage and keep the invader and plunderer in awe, and preserve order in the world as well as property... Horrid mischief would ensue were the law-abiding deprived of the use of them.', u'The harder the conflict, the more glorious the triumph.', u'The World is my country, all mankind are my brethren, and to do good is my religion.', u'A long habit of not thinking a thing wrong gives it a superficial appearance of being right.', u'Reason obeys itself; and ignorance submits to whatever is dictated to it.', u'Character is much easier kept than recovered.', u'He that would make his own liberty secure, must guard even his enemy from oppression; for if he violates this duty, he establishes a precedent that will reach to himself.', u'Belief in a cruel God makes a cruel man.', u'What we obtain too cheap, we esteem too lightly; it is dearness only that gives everything its value.', u'I prefer peace. But if trouble must come, let it come in my time, so that my children can live in peace.', u'The real man smiles in trouble, gathers strength from distress, and grows brave by reflection.', u'Those who want to reap the benefits of this great nation must bear the fatigue of supporting it.', u'We have it in our power to begin the world over again.', u'I believe in the equality of man; and I believe that religious duties consist in doing justice, loving mercy, and endeavoring to make our fellow-creatures happy.', u'Any system of religion that has anything in it that shocks the mind of a child, cannot be true.', u'Reputation is what men and women think of us; character is what God and angels know of us.', u'A thing moderately good is not so good as it ought to be. Moderation in temper is always a virtue; but moderation in principle is always a vice.', u'Those who expect to reap the blessings of freedom must, like men, undergo the fatigue of supporting it.', u'An army of principles can penetrate where an army of soldiers cannot.', u'The instant formal government is abolished, society begins to act. A general association takes place, and common interest produces common security.', u'Society in every state is a blessing, but government, even in its best stage, is but a necessary evil; in its worst state an intolerable one.'], u'Saint Augustine': [u'Faith is to believe what you do not see; the reward of this faith is to see what you believe.', u'Men go abroad to wonder at the heights of mountains, at the huge waves of the sea, at the long courses of the rivers, at the vast compass of the ocean, at the circular motions of the stars, and they pass by themselves without wondering.', u'What does love look like? It has the hands to help others. It has the feet to hasten to the poor and needy. It has eyes to see misery and want. It has the ears to hear the sighs and sorrows of men. That is what love looks like.', u'Love is the beauty of the soul.', u'Forgiveness is the remission of sins. For it is by this that what has been lost, and was found, is saved from being lost again.', u'Pray as though everything depended on God. Work as though everything depended on you.', u"If you believe what you like in the gospels, and reject what you don't like, it is not the gospel you believe, but yourself.", u'The World is a book, and those who do not travel read only a page.', u'It was pride that changed angels into devils; it is humility that makes men as angels.', u'Do you wish to be great? Then begin by being. Do you desire to construct a vast and lofty fabric? Think first about the foundations of humility. The higher your structure is to be, the deeper must be its foundation.', u'Give me chastity and continence, but not yet.', u'Do you wish to rise? Begin by descending. You plan a tower that will pierce the clouds? Lay first the foundation of humility.', u'O Lord, help me to be pure, but not yet.', u"If two friends ask you to judge a dispute, don't accept, because you will lose one friend; on the other hand, if two strangers come with the same request, accept because you will gain one friend.", u'Patience is the companion of wisdom.', u'I have read in Plato and Cicero sayings that are wise and very beautiful; but I have never read in either of them: Come unto me all ye that labor and are heavy laden.', u'Since love grows within you, so beauty grows. For love is the beauty of the soul.', u'What I needed most was to love and to be loved, eager to be caught. Happily I wrapped those painful bonds around me; and sure enough, I would be lashed with the red-hot pokers or jealousy, by suspicions and fear, by burst of anger and quarrels.', u'Find out how much God has given you and from it take what you need; the remainder is needed by others.', u'Humility is the foundation of all the other virtues hence, in the soul in which this virtue does not exist there cannot be any other virtue except in mere appearance.', u'Complete abstinence is easier than perfect moderation.', u'O Holy Spirit, descend plentifully into my heart. Enlighten the dark corners of this neglected dwelling and scatter there Thy cheerful beams.', u'God had one son on earth without sin, but never one without suffering.', u'What then is time? If no one asks me, I know what it is. If I wish to explain it to him who asks, I do not know.', u'In the absence of justice, what is sovereignty but organized robbery?'], u'Franklin D. Roosevelt': [u'Nobody will ever deprive the American people of the right to vote except the American people themselves and the only way they could do this is by not voting.', u'The test of our progress is not whether we add more to the abundance of those who have much it is whether we provide enough for those who have little.', u'Democracy cannot succeed unless those who express their choice are prepared to choose wisely. The real safeguard of democracy, therefore, is education.', u'Let us never forget that government is ourselves and not an alien power over us. The ultimate rulers of our democracy are not a President and senators and congressmen and government officials, but the voters of this country.', u'A conservative is a man with two perfectly good legs who, however, has never learned how to walk forward.', u'True individual freedom cannot exist without economic security and independence. People who are hungry and out of a job are the stuff of which dictatorships are made.', u'In politics, nothing happens by accident. If it happens, you can bet it was planned that way.', u'A nation that destroys its soils destroys itself. Forests are the lungs of our land, purifying the air and giving fresh strength to our people.', u'Confidence... thrives on honesty, on honor, on the sacredness of obligations, on faithful protection and on unselfish performance. Without them it cannot live.', u'When you get to the end of your rope, tie a knot and hang on.', u"Don't forget what I discovered that over ninety percent of all national deficits from 1921 to 1939 were caused by payments for past, present, and future wars.", u'If civilization is to survive, we must cultivate the science of human relationships - the ability of all peoples, of all kinds, to live together, in the same world at peace.', u'Here is my principle: Taxes shall be levied according to ability to pay. That is the only American principle.', u'It is common sense to take a method and try it. If it fails, admit it frankly and try another. But above all, try something.', u'But while they prate of economic laws, men and women are starving. We must lay hold of the fact that economic laws are not made by nature. They are made by human beings.', u'Competition has been shown to be useful up to a certain point and no further, but cooperation, which is the thing we must strive for today, begins where competition leaves off.', u'Men are not prisoners of fate, but only prisoners of their own minds.', u'In our personal ambitions we are individualists. But in our seeking for economic and political progress as a nation, we all go up or else all go down as one people.', u'I am neither bitter nor cynical but I do wish there was less immaturity in political thinking.', u'Happiness lies in the joy of achievement and the thrill of creative effort.', u'I ask you to judge me by the enemies I have made.', u'I do not look upon these United States as a finished product. We are still in the making.', u'If you treat people right they will treat you right... ninety percent of the time.', u"One thing is sure. We have to do something. We have to do the best we know how at the moment... If it doesn't turn out right, we can modify it as we go along.", u'The school is the last expenditure upon which America should be willing to economize.'], u'Oliver Wendell Holmes': [u'But friendship is the breathing rose, with sweets in every fold.', u'Where we love is home - home that our feet may leave, but not our hearts.', u'The mind, once expanded to the dimensions of larger ideas, never returns to its original size.', u'The young man knows the rules, but the old man knows the exceptions.', u'Love is the master key that opens the gates of happiness.', u'The great thing in the world is not so much where we stand, as in what direction we are moving.', u"Don't flatter yourself that friendship authorizes you to say disagreeable things to your intimates. The nearer you come into relation with a person, the more necessary do tact and courtesy become.", u'Many people die with their music still in them. Why is this so? Too often it is because they are always getting ready to live. Before they know it, time runs out.', u'Without wearing any mask we are conscious of, we have a special face for each friend.', u"One's mind, once stretched by a new idea, never regains its original dimensions.", u'A few can touch the magic string, and noisy fame is proud to win them: Alas for those that never sing, but die with all their music in them!', u'Insanity is often the logic of an accurate mind overtasked.', u'If there is any principle of the Constitution that more imperatively calls for attachment than any other it is the principle of free thought, not free thought for those who agree with us but freedom for the thought that we hate.', u'Truth is tough. It will not break, like a bubble, at a touch; nay, you may kick it about all day like a football, and it will be round and full at evening.', u'Beware how you take away hope from another human being.', u'Old age is fifteen years older than I am.', u'We do not quit playing because we grow old, we grow old because we quit playing.', u'A man may fulfill the object of his existence by asking a question he cannot answer, and attempting a task he cannot achieve.', u'Men do not quit playing because they grow old; they grow old because they quit playing.', u'The sound of a kiss is not so loud as that of a cannon, but its echo lasts a great deal longer.', u'This is a court of law, young man, not a court of justice.', u'Pretty much all the honest truth-telling there is in the world is done by children.', u'Speak clearly, if you speak at all; carve every word before you let it fall.', u'Between two groups of people who want to make inconsistent kinds of worlds, I see no remedy but force.', u'Controversy equalizes fools and wise men - and the fools know it.'], u'Laurence J. Peter': [u"You can always tell a real friend: when you've made a fool of yourself he doesn't feel you've done a permanent job.", u"If two wrongs don't make a right, try three.", u"A man doesn't know what he knows until he knows what he doesn't know.", u"An economist is an expert who will know tomorrow why the things he predicted yesterday didn't happen today.", u'Lead, follow, or get out of the way.', u'Originality is the fine art of remembering what you hear but forgetting where you heard it.', u"Speak when you are angry - and you'll make the best speech you'll ever regret.", u'If a cluttered desk is the sign of a cluttered mind, what is the significance of a clean desk?', u'Competence, like truth, beauty, and contact lenses, is in the eye of the beholder.', u'Work is accomplished by those employees who have not yet reached their level of incompetence.', u'America is a land of taxation that was founded to avoid taxation.', u'A pessimist is a man who looks both ways when he crosses the street.', u"America is a country that doesn't know where it is going but is determined to set a speed record getting there.", u'Early to bed, early to rise, work like hell, and advertise.', u'Television has changed the American child from an irresistable force to an immovable object.', u'An intelligence test sometimes shows a man how smart he would have been not to have taken it.', u'Bureaucracy defends the status quo long past the time when the quo has lost its status.', u'Every girl should use what Mother Nature gave her before Father Time takes it away.', u'Nobody can be perfect unless he admits his faults, but if he has faults how can he be perfect?', u'There are two kinds of egotists: Those who admit it, and the rest of us.', u'When in doubt or danger, run in circles, scream and shout.', u'A censor is an expert in cutting remarks. A censor is a man who knows more than he thinks you ought to.', u"Don't believe in miracles - depend on them.", u"Going to church doesn't make you any more a Christian than going to the garage makes you a car.", u'Against logic there is no armor like ignorance.'], u'Henry David Thoreau': [u'Go confidently in the direction of your dreams. Live the life you have imagined.', u'I went to the woods because I wished to live deliberately, to front only the essential facts of life, and see if I could not learn what it had to teach, and not, when I came to die, discover that I had not lived.', u'If a man does not keep pace with his companions, perhaps it is because he hears a different drummer. Let him step to the music which he hears, however measured or far away.', u'Every creature is better alive than dead, men and moose and pine trees, and he who understands it aright will rather preserve its life than destroy it.', u'As a single footstep will not make a path on the earth, so a single thought will not make a pathway in the mind. To make a deep physical path, we walk again and again. To make a deep mental path, we must think over and over the kind of thoughts we wish to dominate our lives.', u'If one advances confidently in the direction of his dreams, and endeavors to live the life which he has imagined, he will meet with success unexpected in common hours.', u'Be true to your work, your word, and your friend.', u"It's not what you look at that matters, it's what you see.", u'What lies behind us and what lies ahead of us are tiny matters compared to what lives within us.', u'The price of anything is the amount of life you exchange for it.', u'The language of friendship is not words but meanings.', u'What you get by achieving your goals is not as important as what you become by achieving your goals.', u'If you have built castles in the air, your work need not be lost; that is where they should be. Now put the foundations under them.', u'Things do not change; we change.', u'A truly good book teaches me better than to read it. I must soon lay it down, and commence living on its hint. What I began by reading, I must finish by acting.', u'All endeavor calls for the ability to tramp the last mile, shape the last plan, endure the last hours toil. The fight to the finish spirit is the one... characteristic we must posses if we are to face the future as finishers.', u'Dreams are the touchstones of our character.', u'Rather than love, than money, than fame, give me truth.', u'There are a thousand hacking at the branches of evil to one who is striking at the root.', u'Aim above morality. Be not simply good, be good for something.', u'I have learned, that if one advances confidently in the direction of his dreams, and endeavors to live the life he has imagined, he will meet with a success unexpected in common hours.', u'The most I can do for my friend is simply be his friend.', u'As you simplify your life, the laws of the universe will be simpler; solitude will not be solitude, poverty will not be poverty, nor weakness weakness.', u'Do not hire a man who does your work for money, but him who does it for love of it.', u'A man is rich in proportion to the number of things he can afford to let alone.'], u'Thomas Sowell': [u'It takes considerable knowledge just to realize the extent of your own ignorance.', u'If you have always believed that everyone should play by the same rules and be judged by the same standards, that would have gotten you labeled a radical 60 years ago, a liberal 30 years ago and a racist today.', u'It is amazing that people who think we cannot afford to pay for doctors, hospitals, and medication somehow think that we can afford to pay for doctors, hospitals, medication and a government bureaucracy to administer it.', u'Elections should be held on April 16th- the day after we pay our income taxes. That is one of the few things that might discourage politicians from being big spenders.', u'It is hard to imagine a more stupid or more dangerous way of making decisions than by putting those decisions in the hands of people who pay no price for being wrong.', u'One of the common failings among honorable people is a failure to appreciate how thoroughly dishonorable some other people can be, and how dangerous it is to trust them.', u'Socialism in general has a record of failure so blatant that only an intellectual could ignore or evade it.', u"What is ominous is the ease with which some people go from saying that they don't like something to saying that the government should forbid it. When you go down that road, don't expect freedom to survive very long.", u"Liberals seem to assume that, if you don't believe in their particular political solutions, then you don't really care about the people that they claim to want to help.", u'Much of the social history of the Western world, over the past three decades, has been a history of replacing what worked with what sounded good.', u'The next time some academics tell you how important diversity is, ask how many Republicans there are in their sociology department.', u'The first lesson of economics is scarcity: there is never enough of anything to fully satisfy all those who want it. The first lesson of politics is to disregard the first lesson of economics.', u'Capitalism knows only one color: that color is green; all else is necessarily subservient to it, hence, race, gender and ethnicity cannot be considered within it.', u'People who enjoy meetings should not be in charge of anything.', u'The real goal should be reduced government spending, rather than balanced budgets achieved by ever rising tax rates to cover ever rising spending.', u'Freedom has cost too much blood and agony to be relinquished at the cheap price of rhetoric.', u'In liberal logic, if life is unfair then the answer is to turn more tax money over to politicians, to spend in ways that will increase their chances of getting reelected.', u"The problem isn't that Johnny can't read. The problem isn't even that Johnny can't think. The problem is that Johnny doesn't know what thinking is; he confuses it with feeling.", u'The most fundamental fact about the ideas of the political left is that they do not work. Therefore we should not be surprised to find the left concentrated in institutions where ideas do not have to work in order to survive.', u'Talkers are usually more articulate than doers, since talk is their specialty.', u'The big divide in this country is not between Democrats and Republicans, or women and men, but between talkers and doers.', u'Actually lowering the cost of insurance would be accomplished by such things as making it harder for lawyers to win frivolous lawsuits against insurance companies.', u'Both free speech rights and property rights belong legally to individuals, but their real function is social, to benefit vast numbers of people who do not themselves exercise these rights.', u'Each new generation born is in effect an invasion of civilization by little barbarians, who must be civilized before it is too late.', u'If people in the media cannot decide whether they are in the business of reporting news or manufacturing propaganda, it is all the more important that the public understand that difference, and choose their news sources accordingly.'], u'Bill Cosby': [u"A word to the wise ain't necessary - it's the stupid ones that need the advice.", u'In order to succeed, your desire for success should be greater than your fear of failure.', u"I don't know the key to success, but the key to failure is trying to please everybody.", u'Always end the name of your child with a vowel, so that when you yell the name will carry.', u"People can be more forgiving than you can imagine. But you have to forgive yourself. Let go of what's bitter and move on.", u'Through humor, you can soften some of the worst blows that life delivers. And once you find laughter, no matter how painful your situation might be, you can survive it.', u"Women don't want to hear what you think. Women want to hear what they think - in a deeper voice.", u'You can turn painful situations around through laughter. If you can find humor in anything, even poverty, you can survive it.', u'Human beings are the only creatures on earth that allow their children to come back home.', u"Sex education may be a good idea in the schools, but I don't believe the kids should be given homework.", u'Every closed eye is not sleeping, and every open eye is not seeing.', u'Like everyone else who makes the mistake of getting older, I begin each day with coffee and obituaries.', u"You know the only people who are always sure about the proper way to raise children? Those who've never had any.", u'There is hope for the future because God has a sense of humor and we are funny to God.', u'Fatherhood is pretending the present you love most is soap-on-a-rope.', u'Decide that you want it more than you are afraid of it.', u"No matter how calmly you try to referee, parenting will eventually produce bizarre behavior, and I'm not talking about the kids. Their behavior is always normal.", u"Even though your kids will consistently do the exact opposite of what you're telling them to do, you have to keep loving them just as much.", u"A new father quickly learns that his child invariably comes to the bathroom at precisely the times when he's in there, as if he needed company. The only way for this father to be certain of bathroom privacy is to shave at the gas station.", u'Let us now set forth one of the fundamental truths about marriage: the wife is in charge.', u"Nothing I've ever done has given me more joys and rewards than being a father to my children.", u'Having a child is surely the most beautifully irrational act that two people in love can commit.', u'I am proud to be an American. Because an American can eat anything on the face of this earth as long as he has two pieces of bread.', u"Parents are not interested in justice, they're interested in peace and quiet.", u'If the new American father feels bewildered and even defeated, let him take comfort from the fact that whatever he does in any fathering situation has a fifty percent chance of being right.'], u'Lou Holtz': [u"A bird doesn't sing because it has an answer, it sings because it has a song.", u'Life is ten percent what happens to you and ninety percent how you respond to it.', u'Motivation is simple. You eliminate those who are not motivated.', u"If you burn your neighbors house down, it doesn't make your house look any better.", u"If you're bored with life - you don't get up every morning with a burning desire to do things - you don't have enough goals.", u'Do right. Do your best. Treat others as you want to be treated.', u"It's not the load that breaks you down, it's the way you carry it.", u"If what you did yesterday seems big, you haven't done anything today.", u"I can't believe that God put us on this earth to be ordinary.", u'I never learn anything talking. I only learn things when I ask questions.', u'When all is said and done, more is said than done.', u"You're never as good as everyone tells you when you win, and you're never as bad as they say when you lose.", u'How you respond to the challenge in the second half will determine what you become after the game, whether you are a winner or a loser.', u"The problem with having a sense of humor is often that people you use it on aren't in a very good mood.", u'No one has ever drowned in sweat.', u'I think everyone should experience defeat at least once during their career. You learn a lot from it.', u"Show me someone who has done something worthwhile, and I'll show you someone who has overcome adversity.", u"You'll never get ahead of anyone as long as you try to get even with him.", u"Don't tell your problems to people: eighty percent don't care; and the other twenty percent are glad you have them.", u"Don't be a spectator, don't let life pass you by.", u"On this team, we're all united in a common goal: to keep my job.", u"Ability is what you're capable of doing. Motivation determines what you do. Attitude determines how well you do it.", u"I think that we have opportunities all around us - sometimes we just don't recognize them.", u'The man who complains about the way the ball bounces is likely the one who dropped it.', u"A lifetime contract for a coach means if you're ahead in the third quarter and moving the ball, they can't fire you."], u'Lao Tzu': [u'Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage.', u"Life is a series of natural and spontaneous changes. Don't resist them - that only creates sorrow. Let reality be reality. Let things flow naturally forward in whatever way they like.", u'Health is the greatest possession. Contentment is the greatest treasure. Confidence is the greatest friend. Non-being is the greatest joy.', u'Be content with what you have; rejoice in the way things are. When you realize there is nothing lacking, the whole world belongs to you.', u'Anticipate the difficult by managing the easy.', u'Kindness in words creates confidence. Kindness in thinking creates profoundness. Kindness in giving creates love.', u"In dwelling, live close to the ground. In thinking, keep to the simple. In conflict, be fair and generous. In governing, don't try to control. In work, do what you enjoy. In family life, be completely present.", u'If you do not change direction, you may end up where you are heading.', u'A leader is best when people barely know he exists, when his work is done, his aim fulfilled, they will say: we did it ourselves.', u'At the center of your being you have the answer; you know who you are and you know what you want.', u'Silence is a source of great strength.', u'Truthful words are not beautiful; beautiful words are not truthful. Good words are not persuasive; persuasive words are not good.', u'Do the difficult things while they are easy and do the great things while they are small. A journey of a thousand miles must begin with a single step.', u'A good traveler has no fixed plans, and is not intent on arriving.', u'He who knows, does not speak. He who speaks, does not know.', u'Knowing others is wisdom, knowing yourself is Enlightenment.', u'I have just three things to teach: simplicity, patience, compassion. These three are your greatest treasures.', u'By letting it go it all gets done. The world is won by those who let it go. But when you try and try. The world is beyond the winning.', u'Treat those who are good with goodness, and also treat those who are not good with goodness. Thus goodness is attained. Be honest to those who are honest, and be also honest to those who are not honest. Thus honesty is attained.', u'He who does not trust enough, Will not be trusted.', u'Mastering others is strength. Mastering yourself is true power.', u"When you are content to be simply yourself and don't compare or compete, everybody will respect you.", u'Music in the soul can be heard by the universe.', u'If you realize that all things change, there is nothing you will try to hold on to. If you are not afraid of dying, there is nothing you cannot achieve.', u'To the mind that is still, the whole universe surrenders.'], u'William Butler Yeats': [u"Think where man's glory most begins and ends, and say my glory was I had such friends.", u'Education is not the filling of a pail, but the lighting of a fire.', u'But I, being poor, have only my dreams; I have spread my dreams under your feet; Tread softly because you tread on my dreams.', u'Happiness is neither virtue nor pleasure nor this thing nor that but simply growth, We are happy when we are growing.', u'Do not wait to strike till the iron is hot; but make it hot by striking.', u'Being Irish, he had an abiding sense of tragedy, which sustained him through temporary periods of joy.', u'In dreams begins responsibility.', u'Come Fairies, take me out of this dull world, for I would ride with you upon the wind and dance upon the mountains like a flame!', u'The best lack all conviction, while the worst are full of passionate intensity.', u'All empty souls tend toward extreme opinions.', u'Tread softly because you tread on my dreams.', u'Every conquering temptation represents a new fund of moral energy. Every trial endured and weathered in the right spirit makes a soul nobler and stronger than it was before.', u'Think like a wise man but communicate in the language of the people.', u'Once you attempt legislation upon religious grounds, you open the way for every kind of intolerance and religious persecution.', u"Out of Ireland have we come, great hatred, little room, maimed us at the start. I carry from my mother's womb a fanatic heart.", u"You that would judge me, do not judge alone this book or that, come to this hallowed place where my friends' portraits hang and look thereon; Ireland's history in their lineaments trace; think where man's glory most begins and ends and say my glory was I had such friends.", u"I heard the old, old, men say 'all that's beautiful drifts away, like the waters.'", u'People who lean on logic and philosophy and rational exposition end by starving the best part of the mind.', u'Too long a sacrifice can make a stone of the heart. O when may it suffice?', u'When you are old and gray and full of sleep, and nodding by the fire, take down this book and slowly read, and dream of the soft look your eyes had once, and of their shadows deep.', u'An aged man is but a paltry thing, a tattered coat upon a stick, unless soul clap its hands and sing, and louder sing for every tatter in its mortal dress.', u"Come away, O human child: To the waters and the wild with a fairy, hand in hand, For the world's more full of weeping than you can understand.", u'This melancholy London - I sometimes imagine that the souls of the lost are compelled to walk through its streets perpetually. One feels them passing like a whiff of air.', u"One should not lose one's temper unless one is certain of getting more and more angry to the end.", u'How far away the stars seem, and how far is our first kiss, and ah, how old my heart.'], u'W. C. Fields': [u"If at first you don't succeed, try, try again. Then quit. There's no point in being a damn fool about it.", u'I cook with wine, sometimes I even add it to the food.', u'Start every day off with a smile and get it over with.', u"No doubt exists that all women are crazy; it's only a question of degree.", u"A woman drove me to drink and I didn't even have the decency to thank her.", u'The best cure for insomnia is to get a lot of sleep.', u'I never drink water because of the disgusting things that fish do in it.', u'Hell, I never vote for anybody, I always vote against.', u'I am free of all prejudices. I hate every one equally.', u'I like children - fried.', u"You can't trust water: Even a straight stick turns crooked in it.", u"Never try to impress a woman, because if you do she'll expect you to keep up the standard for the rest of your life.", u'Sleep - the most beautiful experience in life - except drink.', u"If you can't dazzle them with brilliance, baffle them with bull.", u'A rich man is nothing but a poor man with money.', u'Always carry a flagon of whiskey in case of snakebite and furthermore always carry a small snake.', u'Once, during Prohibition, I was forced to live for days on nothing but food and water.', u"Ah, the patter of little feet around the house. There's nothing like having a midget for a butler.", u"It ain't what they call you, it's what you answer to.", u"Don't worry about your heart, it will last you as long as you live.", u'When we have lost everything, including hope, life becomes a disgrace, and death a duty.', u"I never drink water. I'm afraid it will become habit-forming.", u"It's morally wrong to allow a sucker to keep his money.", u'There comes a time in the affairs of man when he must take the bull by the tail and face the situation.', u"Women are like elephants. I like to look at 'em, but I wouldn't want to own one."], u'Jim Morrison': [u"Friends can help each other. A true friend is someone who lets you have total freedom to be yourself - and especially to feel. Or, not feel. Whatever you happen to be feeling at the moment is fine with them. That's what real love amounts to - letting a person be what he really is.", u'Expose yourself to your deepest fear; after that, fear has no power, and the fear of freedom shrinks and vanishes. You are free.', u'A friend is someone who gives you total freedom to be yourself.', u"People fear death even more than pain. It's strange that they fear death. Life hurts a lot more than death. At the point of death, the pain is over. Yeah, I guess it is a friend.", u'I see myself as an intelligent, sensitive human, with the soul of a clown which forces me to blow it at the most important moments.', u'The most important kind of freedom is to be what you really are. You trade in your reality for a role. You give up your ability to feel, and in exchange, put on a mask.', u"Actually I don't remember being born, it must have happened during one of my black outs.", u'Some of the worst mistakes of my life have been haircuts.', u"Sex is full of lies. The body tries to tell the truth. But, it's usually too battered with rules to be heard, and bound with pretenses so it can hardly move. We cripple ourselves with lies.", u'We fear violence less than our own feelings. Personal, private, solitary pain is more terrifying than what anyone else can inflict.', u"It's like gambling somehow. You go out for a night of drinking and you don't know where your going to end up the next day. It could work out good or it could be disastrous. It's like the throw of the dice.", u'Death makes angels of us all and gives us wings where we had shoulders smooth as ravens claws.', u'There are things known and things unknown and in between are the doors.', u'Whoever controls the media, controls the mind.', u'I like people who shake other people up and make them feel uncomfortable.', u"Blake said that the body was the soul's prison unless the five senses are fully developed and open. He considered the senses the 'windows of the soul.' When sex involves all the senses intensely, it can be like a mystical experence.", u"I like any reaction I can get with my music. Just anything to get people to think. I mean if you can get a whole room full of drunk, stoned people to actually wake up and think, you're doing something.", u"Listen, real poetry doesn't say anything; it just ticks off the possibilities. Opens all doors. You can walk through anyone that suits you.", u'I believe in a long, prolonged, derangement of the senses in order to obtain the unknown.', u'I think of myself as an intelligent, sensitive human being with the soul of a clown which always forces me to blow it at the most important moments.', u'I am interested in anything about revolt, disorder, chaos-especially activity that seems to have no meaning. It seems to me to be the road toward freedom... Rather than starting inside, I start outside and reach the mental through the physical.', u'Love cannot save you from your own fate.', u'Each generation wants new symbols, new people, new names. They want to divorce themselves from their predecessors.', u"Where's your will to be weird?", u'Drugs are a bet with your mind.'], u'Edward Hopper': [u'If you could say it in words there would be no reason to paint.', u'More of me comes out when I improvise.', u'Great art is the outward expression of an inner life in the artist, and this inner life will result in his personal vision of the world.', u'I believe that the great painters with their intellect as master have attempted to force this unwilling medium of paint and canvas into a record of their emotions.', u'No amount of skillful invention can replace the essential element of imagination.', u'After all, we are not French and never can be, and any attempt to be so is to deny our inheritance and to try to impose upon ourselves a character that can be nothing but a veneer upon the surface.', u'If the technical innovations of the Impressionists led merely to a more accurate representation of nature, it was perhaps of not much value in enlarging their powers of expression.', u"In general it can be said that a nation's art is greatest when it most reflects the character of its people.", u'What I wanted to do was to paint sunlight on the side of a house.', u'I find in working always the disturbing intrusion of elements not a part of my most interested vision, and the inevitable obliteration and replacement of this vision by the work itself as it proceeds.', u'I find linseed oil and white lead the most satisfactory mediums.', u'I have tried to present my sensations in what is the most congenial and impressive form possible to me.', u'I think that zinc white has a property of scaling and cracking.', u'I trust Winsor and Newton and I paint directly upon it.', u"I use a retouching varnish which is made in France, Libert, and that's all the varnish I use.", u'If I had the energy, I would have done it all over the county.', u"If the picture needs varnishing later, I allow a restorer to do that, if there's any restoring necessary.", u'In its most limited sense, modern, art would seem to concern itself only with the technical innovations of the period.', u"It's to paint directly on the canvas without any funny business, as it were, and I use almost pure turpentine to start with, adding oil as I go along until the medium becomes pure oil. I use as little oil as I can possibly help, and that's my method.", u'Maybe I am not very human - what I wanted to do was to paint sunlight on the side of a house.', u'My aim in painting has always been the most exact transcription possible of my most intimate impression of nature.', u"Painting will have to deal more fully and less obliquely with life and nature's phenomena before it can again become great.", u"The only real influence I've ever had was myself.", u'The question of the value of nationality in art is perhaps unsolvable.', u'The trend in some of the contemporary movements in art, but by no means all, seems to deny this ideal and to me appears to lead to a purely decorative conception of painting.'], u'Henry A. Kissinger': [u'There cannot be a crisis next week. My schedule is already full.', u'Accept everything about yourself - I mean everything, You are you and that is the beginning and the end - no apologies, no regrets.', u'Power is the great aphrodisiac.', u'Ninety percent of the politicians give the other ten percent a bad reputation.', u'The security of Israel is a moral imperative for all free peoples.', u"I don't see why we need to stand by and watch a country go communist due to the irresponsibility of its people. The issues are much too important for the Chilean voters to be left to decide for themselves.", u'A leader does not deserve the name unless he is willing occasionally to stand alone.', u'The task of the leader is to get his people from where they are to where they have not been.', u"No one will ever win the battle of the sexes; there's too much fraternizing with the enemy.", u"You can't make war in the Middle East without Egypt and you can't make peace without Syria.", u'Even a paranoid can have enemies.', u'Moderation is a virtue only in those who are thought to have an alternative.', u"If it's going to come out eventually, better have it come out immediately.", u"If you don't know where you are going, every road will get you nowhere.", u"The nice thing about being a celebrity is that, if you bore people, they think it's their fault.", u'Diplomacy: the art of restraining power.', u'If eighty percent of your sales come from twenty percent of all of your items, just carry those twenty percent.', u'In crises the most daring course is often safest.', u'No country can act wisely simultaneously in every part of the globe at every moment of time.', u'The absence of alternatives clears the mind marvelously.', u'While we should never give up our principles, we must also realize that we cannot maintain our principles unless we survive.', u'Any fact that needs to be disclosed should be put out now or as quickly as possible, because otherwise the bleeding will not end.', u'Each success only buys an admission ticket to a more difficult problem.', u'For other nations, utopia is a blessed past never to be recovered; for Americans it is just beyond the horizon.', u'No foreign policy - no matter how ingenious - has any chance of success if it is born in the minds of a few and carried in the hearts of none.'], u'Isaac Bashevis Singer': [u"Kindness, I've discovered, is everything in life.", u'Doubt is part of all religion. All the religious thinkers were doubters.', u'People often say that humans have always eaten animals, as if this is a justification for continuing the practice. According to this logic, we should not try to prevent people from murdering other people, since this has also been done since the earliest of times.', u'When you betray somebody else, you also betray yourself.', u'I did not become a vegetarian for my health, I did it for the health of the chickens.', u'Every creator painfully experiences the chasm between his inner vision and its ultimate expression.', u"Sometimes love is stronger than a man's convictions.", u'I am thankful, of course, for the prize and thankful to God for each story, each idea, each word, each day.', u"Life is God's novel. Let him write it.", u'Our knowledge is a little island in a great ocean of nonknowledge.', u'A good writer is basically a story teller, not a scholar or a redeemer of mankind.', u'For those who are willing to make an effort, great miracles and wonderful treasures are in store.', u'We know what a person thinks not when he tells us what he thinks, but by his actions.', u'A story to me means a plot where there is some surprise. Because that is how life is - full of surprises.', u'If you keep saying things are going to be bad, you have a good chance of being a prophet.', u'The greatness of art is not to find what is common but what is unique.', u'The very essence of literature is the war between emotion and intellect, between life and death. When literature becomes too intellectual - when it begins to ignore the passions, the emotions - it becomes sterile, silly, and actually without substance.', u'What nature delivers to us is never stale. Because what nature creates has eternity in it.', u'If Moses had been paid newspaper rates for the Ten Commandments, he might have written the Two Thousand Commandments.', u'If you keep on saying things are going to be bad, you have a good chance of being a prophet.', u"Originality is not seen in single words or even in sentences. Originality is the sum total of a man's thinking or his writing.", u'The analysis of character is the highest human entertainment.', u"The New England conscience doesn't keep you from doing what you shouldn't - it just keeps you from enjoying it.", u'The second half of the twentieth century is a complete flop.', u"The waste basket is the writer's best friend."], u'George Washington Carver': [u'How far you go in life depends on your being tender with the young, compassionate with the aged, sympathetic with the striving and tolerant of the weak and strong. Because someday in your life you will have been all of these.', u'Education is the key to unlock the golden door of freedom.', u'When you do the common things in life in an uncommon way, you will command the attention of the world.', u'I love to think of nature as an unlimited broadcasting station, through which God speaks to us every hour, if we will only tune in.', u'Fear of something is at the root of hate for others, and hate within will eventually destroy the hater.', u'Ninety-nine percent of the failures come from people who have the habit of making excuses.', u'When you can do the common things of life in an uncommon way, you will command the attention of the world.', u'No individual has any right to come into the world and go out of it without leaving behind him distinct and legitimate reasons for having passed through it.', u'Nothing is more beautiful than the loveliness of the woods before sunrise.', u'I wanted to know the name of every stone and flower and insect and bird and beast. I wanted to know where it got its color, where it got its life - but there was no one to tell me.', u'Where there is no vision, there is no hope.', u'Our creator is the same and never changes despite the names given Him by people here and in all parts of the world. Even if we gave Him no name at all, He would still be there, within us, waiting to give us good on this earth.', u'If you love it enough, anything will talk with you.', u"There is no short cut to achievement. Life requires thorough preparation - veneer isn't worth anything.", u'When our thoughts - which bring actions - are filled with hate against anyone, Negro or white, we are in a living hell. That is as real as hell will ever be.', u'Since new developments are the products of a creative mind, we must therefore stimulate and encourage that type of mind in every way possible.', u'Reading about nature is fine, but if a person walks in the woods and listens carefully, he can learn more than what is in books, for they speak with the voice of God.', u'Learn to do common things uncommonly well; we must always keep in mind that anything that helps fill the dinner pail is valuable.'], u'Desmond Tutu': [u'When the missionaries came to Africa they had the Bible and we had the land. They said "Let us pray." We closed our eyes. When we opened them we had the Bible and they had the land.', u'If you are neutral in situations of injustice, you have chosen the side of the oppressor. If an elephant has its foot on the tail of a mouse and you say that you are neutral, the mouse will not appreciate your neutrality.', u'Do your little bit of good where you are; its those little bits of good put together that overwhelm the world.', u"You don't choose your family. They are God's gift to you, as you are to them.", u"Without forgiveness, there's no future.", u'I am not interested in picking up crumbs of compassion thrown from the table of someone who considers himself my master. I want the full menu of rights.', u'We may be surprised at the people we find in heaven. God has a soft spot for sinners. His standards are quite low.', u'Children are a wonderful gift. They have an extraordinary capacity to see into the heart of things and to expose sham and humbug for what they are.', u'My humanity is bound up in yours, for we can only be human together.', u'A person is a person because he recognizes others as persons.', u'In my country of South Africa, we struggled for years against the evil system of apartheid that divided human beings, children of the same God, by racial classification and then denied many of them fundamental human rights.', u'Racism, xenophobia and unfair discrimination have spawned slavery, when human beings have bought and sold and owned and branded fellow human beings as if they were so many beasts of burden.', u'I have been to the Occupied Palestinian Territory, and I have witnessed the racially segregated roads and housing that reminded me so much of the conditions we experienced in South Africa under the racist system of Apartheid.', u"If you want peace, you don't talk to your friends. You talk to your enemies.", u'What is black empowerment when it seems to benefit not the vast majority but an elite that tends to be recycled?', u'Your ordinary acts of love and hope point to the extraordinary promise that every human life is of inestimable value.', u'As human beings we have the most extraordinary capacity for evil. We can perpetrate some of the most horrendous atrocities.', u'Be nice to the whites, they need you to rediscover their humanity.', u'But God can only smile because only God can know what is coming next.', u'Forgiveness says you are given another chance to make a new beginning.', u'I am a leader by default, only because nature does not allow a vacuum.', u"I wish I could shut up, but I can't, and I won't.", u'It is our moral obligation to give every child the very best education possible.', u'The God who existed before any religion counts on you to make the oneness of the human family known and celebrated.', u'We would like to see you departing peacefully.'], u'Soren Kierkegaard': [u'Life has its own hidden forces which you can only discover by living.', u'Life can only be understood backwards; but it must be lived forwards.', u'Prayer does not change God, but it changes him who prays.', u'Our life always expresses the result of our dominant thoughts.', u'Life is not a problem to be solved, but a reality to be experienced.', u"People understand me so poorly that they don't even understand my complaint about them not understanding me.", u'What is a poet? An unhappy person who conceals profound anguish in his heart but whose lips are so formed that as sighs and cries pass over them they sound like beautiful music.', u'A man who as a physical being is always turned toward the outside, thinking that his happiness lies outside him, finally turns inward and discovers that the source is within him.', u'How absurd men are! They never use the liberties they have, they demand those they do not have. They have freedom of thought, they demand freedom of speech.', u'Boredom is the root of all evil - the despairing refusal to be oneself.', u'God creates out of nothing. Wonderful you say. Yes, to be sure, but he does what is still more wonderful: he makes saints out of sinners.', u'I see it all perfectly; there are two possible situations - one can either do this or that. My honest opinion and my friendly advice is this: do it or do not do it - you will regret both.', u'The highest and most beautiful things in life are not to be heard about, nor read about, nor seen but, if one will, are to be lived.', u'Face the facts of being what you are, for that is what changes what you are.', u'People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use.', u"Don't forget to love yourself.", u'Once you label me you negate me.', u'Since boredom advances and boredom is the root of all evil, no wonder, then, that the world goes backwards, that evil spreads. This can be traced back to the very beginning of the world. The gods were bored; therefore they created human beings.', u'Anxiety is the dizziness of freedom.', u"Listen to the cry of a woman in labor at the hour of giving birth - look at the dying man's struggle at his last extremity, and then tell me whether something that begins and ends thus could be intended for enjoyment.", u'Faith is the highest passion in a human being. Many in every generation may not come that far, but none comes further.', u"To dare is to lose one's footing momentarily. Not to dare is to lose oneself.", u'It is so hard to believe because it is so hard to obey.', u'The tyrant dies and his rule is over, the martyr dies and his rule begins.', u'If I am capable of grasping God objectively, I do not believe, but precisely because I cannot do this I must believe.'], u'Johnny Depp': [u'There are four questions of value in life... What is sacred? Of what is the spirit made? What is worth living for, and what is worth dying for? The answer to each is the same. Only love.', u"Me, I'm dishonest, and you can always trust a dishonest man to be dishonest. Honestly, it's the honest ones you have to watch out for.", u"If there's any message to my work, it is ultimately that it's OK to be different, that it's good to be different, that we should question ourselves before we pass judgment on someone who looks different, behaves different, talks different, is a different color.", u"France, and the whole of Europe have a great culture and an amazing history. Most important thing though is that people there know how to live! In America they've forgotten all about it. I'm afraid that the American culture is a disaster.", u'I pretty much try to stay in a constant state of confusion just because of the expression it leaves on my face.', u"When kids hit one year old, it's like hanging out with a miniature drunk. You have to hold onto them. They bump into things. They laugh and cry. They urinate. They vomit.", u'As a teenager I was so insecure. I was the type of guy that never fitted in because he never dared to choose. I was convinced I had absolutely no talent at all. For nothing. And that thought took away all my ambition too.', u"Am I a romantic? I've seen 'Wuthering Heights' ten times. I'm a romantic.", u'I am doing things that are true to me. The only thing I have a problem with is being labeled.', u"I think the thing to do is enjoy the ride while you're on it.", u"I like the challenge of trying different things and wondering whether it's going to work or whether I'm going to fall flat on my face.", u"People say I make strange choices, but they're not strange for me. My sickness is that I'm fascinated by human behavior, by what's underneath the surface, by the worlds inside people.", u"I don't pretend to be captain weird. I just do what I do.", u'The only creatures that are evolved enough to convey pure love are dogs and infants.', u"If you catch me saying 'I am a serious actor,' I beg you to slap me.", u"You use your money to buy privacy because during most of your life you aren't allowed to be normal.", u"I think everybody's nuts.", u"I'm an old-fashioned guy... I want to be an old man with a beer belly sitting on a porch, looking at a lake or something.", u"I was ecstatic they re-named 'French Fries' as 'Freedom Fries'. Grown men and women in positions of power in the U.S. government showing themselves as idiots.", u"It's all kinds of these profound things crashing on you when your child arrives into the world. It's like you've met your reason to live.", u"Life's pretty good, and why wouldn't it be? I'm a pirate, after all.", u"Anything I've done up till May 27th 1999 was kind of an illusion, existing without living. My daughter, the birth of my daughter, gave me life.", u"I'm shy, paranoid, whatever word you want to use. I hate fame. I've done everything I can to avoid it.", u"The beauty, the poetry of the fear in their eyes. I didn't mind going to jail for, what, five, six hours? It was absolutely worth it.", u'The quality of life is so different in France. There is the possibility of living a simple life. I would never contemplate raising my daughter in LA. I would never raise any child there.'], u'Oprah Winfrey': [u'Lots of people want to ride with you in the limo, but what you want is someone who will take the bus with you when the limo breaks down.', u"Be thankful for what you have; you'll end up having more. If you concentrate on what you don't have, you will never, ever have enough.", u'Surround yourself with only people who are going to lift you higher.', u'The more you praise and celebrate your life, the more there is in life to celebrate.', u"I am a woman in process. I'm just trying like everybody else. I try to take every conflict, every experience, and learn from it. Life is never dull.", u"It isn't until you come to a spiritual understanding of who you are - not necessarily a religious feeling, but deep down, the spirit within - that you can begin to take control.", u'Breathe. Let go. And remind yourself that this very moment is the only one you know you have for sure.', u'Do the one thing you think you cannot do. Fail at it. Try again. Do better the second time. The only people who never tumble are those who never mount the high wire. This is your moment. Own it.', u'Where there is no struggle, there is no strength.', u'Passion is energy. Feel the power that comes from focusing on what excites you.', u'Turn your wounds into wisdom.', u"As you become more clear about who you really are, you'll be better able to decide what is best for you - the first time around.", u"I don't think of myself as a poor deprived ghetto girl who made good. I think of myself as somebody who from an early age knew I was responsible for myself, and I had to make good.", u"Real integrity is doing the right thing, knowing that nobody's going to know whether you did it or not.", u'The greatest discovery of all time is that a person can change his future by merely changing his attitude.', u'Think like a queen. A queen is not afraid to fail. Failure is another steppingstone to greatness.', u"She is the mother I never had, she is the sister everybody would want. She is the friend that everybody deserves. I don't know a better person.", u'I believe that every single event in life happens in an opportunity to choose love over fear.', u'The struggle of my life created empathy - I could relate to pain, being abandoned, having people not love me.', u"What material success does is provide you with the ability to concentrate on other things that really matter. And that is being able to make a difference, not only in your own life, but in other people's lives.", u"I don't believe in failure. It is not failure if you enjoyed the process.", u'Biology is the least of what makes someone a mother.', u"I don't think you ever stop giving. I really don't. I think it's an on-going process. And it's not just about being able to write a check. It's being able to touch somebody's life.", u'I have a lot of things to prove to myself. One is that I can live my life fearlessly.', u'The biggest adventure you can take is to live the life of your dreams.'], u'Yogi Berra': [u"A nickel ain't worth a dime anymore.", u'Baseball is ninety percent mental and the other half is physical.', u'In theory there is no difference between theory and practice. In practice there is.', u"It ain't over till it's over.", u"It's like deja-vu, all over again.", u"Always go to other people's funerals, otherwise they won't come to yours.", u"You better cut the pizza in four pieces because I'm not hungry enough to eat six.", u"Half the lies they tell about me aren't true.", u'I never said most of the things I said.', u"If the world was perfect, it wouldn't be.", u'You can observe a lot by just watching.', u'Little League baseball is a very good thing because it keeps the parents off the streets.', u'If you come to a fork in the road, take it.', u"If you don't know where you are going, you might wind up someplace else.", u"I'm not going to buy my kids an encyclopedia. Let them walk to school like I did.", u"Nobody goes there anymore. It's too crowded.", u"You've got to be very careful if you don't know where you are going, because you might not get there.", u'When you arrive at a fork in the road, take it.', u'I just want to thank everyone who made this day necessary.', u"I wish I had an answer to that because I'm tired of answering that question.", u"I never blame myself when I'm not hitting. I just blame the bat and if it keeps up, I change bats. After all, if I know it isn't my fault that I'm not hitting, how can I get mad at myself?", u'I think Little League is wonderful. It keeps the kids out of the house.', u"The future ain't what it used to be.", u"If you ask me anything I don't know, I'm not going to answer.", u'It gets late early out there.'], u'James Allen': [u'A man sooner or later discovers that he is the master-gardener of his soul, the director of his life.', u'A man has to learn that he cannot command things, but that he can command himself; that he cannot coerce the wills of others, but that he can mold and master his own will: and things serve him who serves Truth; people seek guidance of him who is master of himself.', u'The greatest achievement was at first and for a time a dream. The oak sleeps in the acorn, the bird waits in the egg, and in the highest vision of the soul a waking angel stirs. Dreams are the seedlings of realities.', u'He who would accomplish little must sacrifice little; he who would achieve much must sacrifice much; he who would attain highly must sacrifice greatly.', u'Man is made or unmade by himself. By the right choice he ascends. As a being of power, intelligence, and love, and the lord of his own thoughts, he holds the key to every situation.', u'A man is not rightly conditioned until he is a happy, healthy, and prosperous being; and happiness, health, and prosperity are the result of a harmonious adjustment of the inner with the outer of the man with his surroundings.', u'The law of harvest is to reap more than you sow. Sow an act, and you reap a habit. Sow a habit and you reap a character. Sow a character and you reap a destiny.', u'In all human affairs there are efforts, and there are results, and the strength of the effort is the measure of the result.', u'Above all be of single aim; have a legitimate and useful purpose, and devote yourself unreservedly to it.', u'Dream lofty dreams, and as you dream, so you shall become. Your vision is the promise of what you shall one day be; your ideal is the prophecy of what you shall at last unveil.', u'Men are anxious to improve their circumstances, but are unwilling to improve themselves; they therefore remain bound.', u'To begin to think with purpose, is to enter the ranks of those strong ones who only recognize failure as one of the pathways to attainment.', u'Circumstances do not make the man, they reveal him.', u'If you real desire is to be good, there is no need to wait for the money before you do it; you can do it now, this very moment, and just where you are.', u'Good thoughts bear good fruit, bad thoughts bear bad fruit.', u'All that you accomplish or fail to accomplish with your life is the direct result of your thoughts.', u'Our life is what our thoughts make it. A man will find that as he alters his thoughts toward things and other people, things and other people will alter towards him.', u'A man is literally what he thinks.', u'Let there be nothing within thee that is not very beautiful and very gentle, and there will be nothing without thee that is not beautiful and softened by the spell of thy presence.', u'The very fact that you are a complainer, shows that you deserve your lot.', u'You are today where your thoughts have brought you; you will be tomorrow where your thoughts take you.', u'The man who cannot endure to have his errors and shortcomings brought to the surface and made known, but tries to hide them, is unfit to walk the highway of truth.', u'The more intense the nature of a man, the more readily will he find meditation, and the more successfully will he practice it.', u'The more tranquil a man becomes, the greater is his success, his influence, his power for good. Calmness of mind is one of the beautiful jewels of wisdom.', u'They who have conquered doubt and fear have conquered failure.'], u'E. O. Wilson': [u"The essence of humanity's spiritual dilemma is that we evolved genetically to accept one truth and discovered another. Is there a way to erase the dilemma, to resolve the contradictions between the transcendentalist and the empiricist world views?", u'You are capable of more than you know. Choose a goal that seems right for you and strive to be the best, however hard the path. Aim high. Behave honorably. Prepare to be alone at times, and to endure failure. Persist! The world needs all you can give.', u'If all mankind were to disappear, the world would regenerate back to the rich state of equilibrium that existed ten thousand years ago. If insects were to vanish, the environment would collapse into chaos.', u'If those committed to the quest fail, they will be forgiven. When lost, they will find another way. The moral imperative of humanism is the endeavor alone, whether successful or not, provided the effort is honorable and failure memorable.', u'We are drowning in information, while starving for wisdom. The world henceforth will be run by synthesizers, people able to put together the right information at the right time, think critically about it, and make important choices wisely.', u'Destroying rainforest for economic gain is like burning a Renaissance painting to cook a meal.', u'Blind faith, no matter how passionately expressed, will not suffice. Science for its part will test relentlessly every assumption about the human condition.', u'Nature holds the key to our aesthetic, intellectual, cognitive and even spiritual satisfaction.', u'By any reasonable measure of achievement, the faith of the Enlightenment thinkers in science was justified.', u'Every major religion today is a winner in the Darwinian struggle waged among cultures, and none ever flourished by tolerating its rivals.', u'The one process now going on that will take millions of years to correct is the loss of genetic and species diversity by the destruction of natural habitats. This is the folly our descendants are least likely to forgive us.', u'We should preserve every scrap of biodiversity as priceless while we learn to use it and come to understand what it means to humanity.', u'Perhaps the time has come to cease calling it the "environmentalist" view, as though it were a lobbying effort outside the mainstream of human activity, and to start calling it the real-world view.', u'Without a trace of irony I can say I have been blessed with brilliant enemies. I owe them a great debt, because they redoubled my energies and drove me in new directions.', u'Political ideology can corrupt the mind, and science.', u'When you have seen one ant, one bird, one tree, you have not seen them all.', u'A very Faustian choice is upon us: whether to accept our corrosive and risky behavior as the unavoidable price of population and economic growth, or to take stock of ourselves and search for a new environmental ethic.', u'Even as empiricism is winning the mind, transcendentalism continues to win the heart.', u"It's like having astronomy without knowing where the stars are.", u"It's obvious that the key problem facing humanity in the coming century is how to bring a better quality of life - for 8 billion or more people - without wrecking the environment entirely in the attempt.", u'Sometimes a concept is baffling not because it is profound but because it is wrong.', u'Theology made no provision for evolution. The biblical authors had missed the most important revelation of all! Could it be that they were not really privy to the thoughts of God?', u'There is no better high than discovery.', u'All three of the Abrahamic religions were born and nurtured in arid, disturbed environments.', u'America in particular imposes an horrendous burden on the world. We have this wonderful standard of living but it comes at enormous cost.'], u'William Cowper': [u'God moves in a mysterious way, His wonders to perform. He plants his footsteps in the sea, and rides upon the storm.', u'Glory, built on selfish principles, is shame and guilt.', u"Variety's the very spice of life, That gives it all its flavor.", u'O solitude, where are the charms That sages have seen in thy face? Better dwell in the midst of alarms, Than reign in this horrible place.', u'Absence from whom we love is worse than death, and frustrates hope severer than despair.', u'Knowledge is proud that it knows so much; wisdom is humble that it knows no more.', u'No man can be a patriot on an empty stomach.', u'Absence of proof is not proof of absence.', u'Existence is a strange bargain. Life owes us little; we owe it everything. The only true happiness comes from squandering ourselves for a purpose.', u'Satan trembles when he sees the weakest saint upon their knees.', u'Where men of judgment creep and feel their way, The positive pronounce without dismay.', u'Who loves a garden loves a greenhouse too.', u'A self-made man? Yes, and one who worships his creator.', u'Meditation here may think down hours to moments. Here the heart may give a useful lesson to the head and learning wiser grow without his books.', u'A fool must now and then be right, by chance.', u'Absence of occupation is not rest; A mind quite vacant is a mind distressed.', u'An epigram is but a feeble thing - With straw in tail, stuck there by way of sting.', u'Ceremony leads her bigots forth, prepared to fight for shadows of no worth. While truths, on which eternal things depend, can hardly find a single friend.', u'God made the country, and man made the town.', u'How much a dunce that has been sent to roam, excels a dunce that has been kept at home.', u'It chills my blood to hear the blest Supreme Rudely appealed to on each trifling theme.', u'Man may dismiss compassion from his heart, but God never will.', u'Nature is a good name for an effect whose cause is God.', u'No one was ever scolded out of their sins.', u'No wild enthusiast could rest, till half the world like him was possessed.'], u'Andy Rooney': [u'Most of us end up with no more than five or six people who remember us. Teachers have thousands of people who remember them for the rest of their lives.', u"Computers make it easier to do a lot of things, but most of the things they make it easier to do don't need to be done.", u"I don't like food that's too carefully arranged; it makes me think that the chef is spending too much time arranging and not enough time cooking. If I wanted a picture I'd buy a painting.", u'Death is a distant rumor to the young.', u"The 50-50-90 rule: Anytime you have a 50-50 chance of getting something right, there's a 90% probability you'll get it wrong.", u'The average dog is a nicer person than the average person.', u'Happiness depends more on how life strikes you than on what happens.', u'People will generally accept facts as truth only if the facts agree with what they already believe.', u'Elephants and grandchildren never forget.', u'If dogs could talk it would take a lot of the fun out of owning one.', u'If you smile when no one else is around, you really mean it.', u'The closing of a door can bring blessed privacy and comfort - the opening, terror. Conversely, the closing of a door can be a sad and final thing - the opening a wonderfully joyous moment.', u"I didn't get old on purpose, it just happened. If you're lucky, it could happen to you.", u'All men are not created equal but should be treated as though they were under the law.', u"Obscenities... I think a lot of dumb people do it because they can't think of what they want to say and they're frustrated. A lot of smart people do it to pretend they aren't very smart - want to be just one of the boys.", u"Vegetarian - that's an old Indian word meaning lousy hunter.", u"It's paradoxical, that the idea of living a long life appeals to everyone, but the idea of getting old doesn't appeal to anyone.", u'Computers may save time but they sure waste a lot of paper. About 98 percent of everything printed out by a computer is garbage that no one ever reads.', u"Don't rule out working with your hands. It does not preclude using your head.", u"I don't think the government is out to get me or help someone else get me but it wouldn't surprise me if they were out to sell me something or help someone else sell me something. I mean, why else would the Census Bureau want to know my telephone number?", u"The federal government has sponsored research that has produced a tomato that is perfect in every respect, except that you can't eat it. We should make every effort to make sure this disease, often referred to as 'progress', doesn't spread.", u"We're all proud of making little mistakes. It gives us the feeling we don't make any big ones.", u'I just wish we knew a little less about his urethra and a little more about his arms sales to Iran.', u'Anyone who watches golf on television would enjoy watching the grass grow on the greens.', u"Figure skating is an unlikely Olympic event but its good television. It's sort of a combination of gymnastics and ballet. A little sexy too which doesn't hurt."], u'Coco Chanel': [u'A girl should be two things: classy and fabulous.', u'Fashion is not something that exists in dresses only. Fashion is in the sky, in the street, fashion has to do with ideas, the way we live, what is happening.', u'In order to be irreplaceable one must always be different.', u'As long as you know men are like children, you know everything!', u"A women who doesn't wear perfume has no future.", u'Fashion fades, only style remains the same.', u"Don't spend time beating on a wall, hoping to transform it into a door.", u'Women have always been the strong ones of the world. The men are always seeking from women a little pillow to put their heads down on. They are always longing for the mother who held them as infants.', u"I am not young but I feel young. The day I feel old, I will go to bed and stay there. J'aime la vie! I feel that to live is a wonderful thing.", u'Elegance is not the prerogative of those who have just escaped from adolescence, but of those who have already taken possession of their future.', u"Success is often achieved by those who don't know that failure is inevitable.", u'The most courageous act is still to think for yourself. Aloud.', u'Nature gives you the face you have at twenty; it is up to you to merit the face you have at fifty.', u"I don't know why women want any of the things men have when one the things that women have is men.", u'Elegance does not consist in putting on a new dress.', u'A woman has the age she deserves.', u'Women must tell men always that they are the strong ones. They are the big, the strong, the wonderful. In truth, women are the strong ones. It is just my opinion, I am not a professor.', u'Fashion is always of the time in which you live. It is not something standing alone. But the grand problem, the most important problem, is to rejeuvenate women. To make women look young. Then their outlook changes. They feel more joyous.', u'As soon as you set foot on a yacht you belong to some man, not to yourself, and you die of boredom.', u'Fashion is architecture: it is a matter of proportions.', u'There are people who have money and people who are rich.', u'Hard times arouse an instinctive desire for authenticity.', u'Jump out the window if you are the object of passion. Flee it if you feel it. Passion goes, boredom remains.', u'Fashion is made to become unfashionable.', u'There is no time for cut-and-dried monotony. There is time for work. And time for love. That leaves no other time!'], u'Eleanor Roosevelt': [u'The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams.', u'Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people.', u'With the new day comes new strength and new thoughts.', u'We gain strength, and courage, and confidence by each experience in which we really stop to look fear in the face... we must do that which we think we cannot.', u'No one can make you feel inferior without your consent.', u"Do what you feel in your heart to be right- for you'll be criticized anyway. You'll be damned if you do, and damned if you don't.", u"A woman is like a tea bag - you can't tell how strong she is until you put her in hot water.", u"You gain strength, courage, and confidence by every experience in which you really stop to look fear in the face. You are able to say to yourself, 'I lived through this horror. I can take the next thing that comes along.'", u'I once had a rose named after me and I was very flattered. But I was not pleased to read the description in the catalogue: no good in a bed, but fine up against a wall.', u'You must do the things you think you cannot do.', u'Freedom makes a huge requirement of every human being. With freedom comes responsibility. For the person who is unwilling to grow up, the person who does not want to carry is own weight, this is a frightening prospect.', u'In the long run, we shape our lives, and we shape ourselves. The process never ends until we die. And the choices we make are ultimately our own responsibility.', u"I think, at a child's birth, if a mother could ask a fairy godmother to endow it with the most useful gift, that gift should be curiosity.", u"You can never really live anyone else's life, not even your child's. The influence you exert is through your own life, and what you've become yourself.", u"Women are like teabags. We don't know our true strength until we are in hot water!", u'You have to accept whatever comes and the only important thing is that you meet it with courage and with the best that you have to give.', u"One's philosophy is not best expressed in words; it is expressed in the choices one makes... and the choices we make are ultimately our responsibility.", u'We are afraid to care too much, for fear that the other person does not care at all.', u"It isn't enough to talk about peace. One must believe in it. And it isn't enough to believe in it. One must work at it.", u'Probably the happiest period in life most frequently is in middle age, when the eager passions of youth are cooled, and the infirmities of age not yet begun; as we see that the shadows, which are at morning and evening so large, almost entirely disappear at midday.', u'Friendship with ones self is all important, because without it one cannot be friends with anyone else in the world.', u'Anyone who knows history, particularly the history of Europe, will, I think, recognize that the domination of education or of government by any one particular religious faith is never a happy arrangement for the people.', u'Happiness is not a goal; it is a by-product.', u'I believe that anyone can conquer fear by doing the things he fears to do, provided he keeps doing them until he gets a record of successful experience behind him.', u'A little simplification would be the first step toward rational living, I think.'], u'George Canning': [u'I can prove anything by statistics except the truth.', u'Indecision and delays are the parents of failure.', u'A steady patriot of the world alone, The friend of every country but his own.', u'But of all plagues, good Heaven, thy wrath can send, Save me, oh, save me, from the candid friend!', u"Here's to the pilot that weathered the storm.", u'I called the New World into existence, to redress the balance of the Old.', u'In matters of commerce the fault of the Dutch Is offering too little and asking too much. The French are with equal advantage content, So we clap on Dutch bottoms just twenty per cent.'], u'Christian Nestell Bovee': [u'False friends are like our shadow, keeping close to us while we walk in the sunshine, but leaving us the instant we cross into the shade.', u'Our first and last love is self-love.', u'No man is happy without a delusion of some kind. Delusions are as necessary to our happiness as realities.', u'Music is the fourth great material want, first food, then clothes, then shelter, then music.', u'A failure establishes only this, that our determination to succeed was not strong enough.', u'There is great beauty in going through life without anxiety or fear. Half our fears are baseless, and the other half discreditable.', u'Courage enlarges, cowardice diminishes resources. In desperate straits the fears of the timid aggravate the dangers that imperil the brave.', u'Heaven lent you a soul, Earth will lend a grave.', u'It is the passion that is in a kiss that gives to it its sweetness; it is the affection in a kiss that sanctifies it.', u'When all else is lost, the future still remains.', u'A sound discretion is not so much indicated by never making a mistake as by never repeating it.', u'Doubt whom you will, but never yourself.', u"Next to being witty, the best thing is being able to quote another's wit.", u'The grandest of all laws is the law of progressive development. Under it, in the wide sweep of things, men grow wiser as they grow older, and societies better.', u'Example has more followers than reason. We unconsciously imitate what pleases us, and approximate to the characters we most admire.', u'Fame - a few words upon a tombstone, and the truth of those not to be depended on.', u'Good men have the fewest fears. He has but one great fear who fears to do wrong; he has a thousand who has overcome it.', u'Tearless grief bleeds inwardly.', u'The small courtesies sweeten life; the greater ennoble it.', u'As threshing separates the wheat from the chaff, so does affliction purify virtue.', u"Earth took her shining station as a star, In Heaven's dark hall, high up the crowd of worlds.", u'Enthusiasm is the inspiration of everything great. Without it no man is to be feared, and with it none despised.', u'Genius makes its observations in short-hand; talent writes them out at length.', u'In ambition, as in love, the successful can afford to be indulgent toward their rivals. The prize our own, it is graceful to recognize the merit that vainly aspired to it.', u'In politics, merit is rewarded by the possessor being raised, like a target, to a position to be fired at.'], u'Leo Buscaglia': [u'A single rose can be my garden... a single friend, my world.', u'Love is life. And if you miss love, you miss life.', u"The fact that I can plant a seed and it becomes a flower, share a bit of knowledge and it becomes another's, smile at someone and receive a smile in return, are to me continual spiritual exercises.", u'Too often we underestimate the power of a touch, a smile, a kind word, a listening ear, an honest compliment, or the smallest act of caring, all of which have the potential to turn a life around.', u"Love is always bestowed as a gift - freely, willingly and without expectation. We don't love to be loved; we love to love.", u"I believe that you control your destiny, that you can be what you want to be. You can also stop and say, No, I won't do it, I won't behave his way anymore. I'm lonely and I need people around me, maybe I have to change my methods of behaving and then you do it.", u'Only the weak are cruel. Gentleness can only be expected from the strong.', u"I have a very strong feeling that the opposite of love is not hate - it's apathy. It's not giving a damn.", u"Don't brood. Get on with living and loving. You don't have forever.", u"The easiest thing to be in the world is you. The most difficult thing to be is what other people want you to be. Don't let them put you in that position.", u"Your talent is God's gift to you. What you do with it is your gift back to God.", u'Death is a challenge. It tells us not to waste time... It tells us to tell each other right now that we love each other.', u"What love we've given, we'll have forever. What love we fail to give, will be lost for all eternity.", u'I still get wildly enthusiastic about little things... I play with leaves. I skip down the street and run against the wind.', u'It is paradoxical that many educators and parents still differentiate between a time for learning and a time for play without seeing the vital connection between them.', u'Worry never robs tomorrow of its sorrow, it only saps today of its joy.', u'Change is the end result of all true learning.', u'Never idealize others. They will never live up to your expectations.', u'Love is always open arms. If you close your arms about love you will find that you are left holding only yourself.', u"If I don't have wisdom, I can teach you only ignorance.", u"Love always creates, it never destroys. In this lie's man's only promise.", u'Life lived for tomorrow will always be just a day away from being realized.', u"I've always thought that people need to feel good about themselves and I see my role as offering support to them, to provide some light along the way.", u"Don't smother each other. No one can grow in the shade.", u'We all need each other.'], u'Charles M. Schulz': [u"I think I've discovered the secret of life - you just hang around until you get used to it.", u"All you need is love. But a little chocolate now and then doesn't hurt.", u"Don't worry about the world coming to an end today. It is already tomorrow in Australia.", u"I have a new philosophy. I'm only going to dread one day at a time.", u'Life is like a ten speed bicycle. Most of us have gears we never use.', u"Jogging is very beneficial. It's good for your legs and your feet. It's also very good for the ground. If makes it feel needed.", u"My life has no purpose, no direction, no aim, no meaning, and yet I'm happy. I can't figure it out. What am I doing right?", u'Life is like an ice-cream cone, you have to lick it one day at a time.', u'If I were given the opportunity to present a gift to the next generation, it would be the ability for each individual to learn to laugh at himself.', u'A whole stack of memories never equal one little hope.', u'Decorate your home. It gives the illusion that your life is more interesting than it really is.', u"I love mankind; it's people I can't stand.", u'Big sisters are the crab grass in the lawn of life.', u"Sometimes I lie awake at night, and ask, 'Where have I gone wrong?' Then a voice says to me, 'This is going to take more than one night.'", u'Sometimes I lie awake at night and ask why me? Then a voice answers nothing personal, your name just happened to come up.', u'Try not to have a good time... this is supposed to be educational.', u"No problem is so formidable that you can't walk away from it.", u"You're a good man, Charlie Brown.", u"It doesn't matter what you believe just so long as you're sincere.", u'No problem is too big to run away from.', u'Nothing takes the taste out of peanut butter quite like unrequited love.', u"That's the secret to life... replace one worry with another.", u"The way I see it, it doesn't matter what you believe just so you're sincere.", u"Yesterday I was a dog. Today I'm a dog. Tomorrow I'll probably still be a dog. Sigh! There's so little hope for advancement.", u'Aunt Marion was right... Never marry a musician, and never answer the door.'], u'Franz Kafka': [u'By believing passionately in something that still does not exist, we create it. The nonexistent is whatever we have not sufficiently desired.', u'You do not need to leave your room. Remain sitting at your table and listen. Do not even listen, simply wait, be quiet still and solitary. The world will freely offer itself to you to be unmasked, it has no choice, it will roll in ecstasy at your feet.', u'My peers, lately, have found companionship through means of intoxication - it makes them sociable. I, however, cannot force myself to use drugs to cheat on my loneliness - it is all that I have - and when the drugs and alcohol dissipate, will be all that my peers have as well.', u'Every revolution evaporates and leaves behind only the slime of a new bureaucracy.', u'Anyone who keeps the ability to see beauty never grows old.', u'A first sign of the beginning of understanding is the wish to die.', u'From a certain point onward there is no longer any turning back. That is the point that must be reached.', u'So long as you have food in your mouth, you have solved all questions for the time being.', u'You can hold yourself back from the sufferings of the world, that is something you are free to do and it accords with your nature, but perhaps this very holding back is the one suffering you could avoid.', u'Believing in progress does not mean believing that any progress has yet been made.', u'Youth is happy because it has the ability to see beauty. Anyone who keeps the ability to see beauty never grows old.', u'Atlas was permitted the opinion that he was at liberty, if he wished, to drop the Earth and creep away; but this opinion was all that he was permitted.', u'A man of action forced into a state of thought is unhappy until he can get out of it.', u'I do not read advertisements. I would spend all of my time wanting things.', u'Always first draw fresh breath after outbursts of vanity and complacency.', u"Don Quixote's misfortune is not his imagination, but Sancho Panza.", u'It is often safer to be in chains than to be free.', u'A book should serve as the ax for the frozen sea within us.', u'A stair not worn hollow by footsteps is, regarded from its own point of view, only a boring something made of wood.', u'God gives the nuts, but he does not crack them.', u'It is not necessary that you leave the house. Remain at your table and listen. Do not even listen, only wait. Do not even wait, be wholly still and alone. The world will present itself to you for its unmasking, it can do no other, in ecstasy it will writhe at your feet.', u'Productivity is being able to do things that you were never able to do before.', u'Sensual love deceives one as to the nature of heavenly love; it could not do so alone, but since it unconsciously has the element of heavenly love within it, it can do so.', u'The thornbush is the old obstacle in the road. It must catch fire if you want to go further.', u'A book must be the ax for the frozen sea within us.'], u'George S. Patton': [u"If everyone is thinking alike, then somebody isn't thinking.", u'No bastard ever won a war by dying for his country. He won it by making the other poor dumb bastard die for his country.', u'It is foolish and wrong to mourn the men who died. Rather we should thank God that such men lived.', u'A good plan violently executed now is better than a perfect plan executed next week.', u'Battle is the most magnificent competition in which a human being can indulge. It brings out all that is best; it removes all that is base. All men are afraid in battle. The coward is the one who lets his fear overcome his sense of duty. Duty is the essence of manhood.', u"I don't measure a man's success by how high he climbs but how high he bounces when he hits bottom.", u'The object of war is not to die for your country but to make the other bastard die for his.', u'We herd sheep, we drive cattle, we lead people. Lead me, follow me, or get out of my way.', u'Better to fight for something than live for nothing.', u'Accept the challenges so that you can feel the exhilaration of victory.', u"If you tell people where to go, but not how to get there, you'll be amazed at the results.", u'Wars may be fought with weapons, but they are won by men. It is the spirit of men who follow and of the man who leads that gains the victory.', u"Don't tell people how to do things, tell them what to do and let them surprise you with their results.", u'Never tell people how to do things. Tell them what to do and they will surprise you with their ingenuity.', u'You need to overcome the tug of people against you as you reach for high goals.', u'The test of success is not what you do when you are on top. Success is how high you bounce when you hit bottom.', u'A pint of sweat, saves a gallon of blood.', u"The time to take counsel of your fears is before you make an important battle decision. That's the time to listen to every fear you can imagine! When you have collected all the facts and fears and made your decision, turn off all your fears and go ahead!", u'Courage is fear holding on a minute longer.', u'If we take the generally accepted definition of bravery as a quality which knows no fear, I have never seen a brave man. All men are frightened. The more intelligent they are, the more they are frightened.', u'Always do everything you ask of those you command.', u"Americans play to win at all times. I wouldn't give a hoot and hell for a man who lost and laughed. That's why Americans have never lost nor ever lose a war.", u'Success is how high you bounce when you hit bottom.', u'Prepare for the unknown by studying how others in the past have coped with the unforeseeable and the unpredictable.', u'Americans love to fight. All real Americans love the sting of battle.'], u'Groucho Marx': [u"I, not events, have the power to make me happy or unhappy today. I can choose which it shall be. Yesterday is dead, tomorrow hasn't arrived yet. I have just one day, today, and I'm going to be happy in it.", u'A child of five would understand this. Send someone to fetch a child of five.', u"I never forget a face, but in your case I'll be glad to make an exception.", u"I don't care to belong to a club that accepts people like me as members.", u'Politics is the art of looking for trouble, finding it everywhere, diagnosing it incorrectly and applying the wrong remedies.', u'I refuse to join any club that would have me as a member.', u"Outside of a dog, a book is a man's best friend. Inside of a dog it's too dark to read.", u'Anyone who says he can see through women is missing a lot.', u'All people are born alike - except Republicans and Democrats.', u'A black cat crossing your path signifies that the animal is going somewhere.', u"I'm not feeling very well - I need a doctor immediately. Ring the nearest golf course.", u"Well, Art is Art, isn't it? Still, on the other hand, water is water. And east is east and west is west and if you take cranberries and stew them like applesauce they taste much more like prunes than rhubarb does. Now you tell me what you know.", u'Behind every successful man is a woman, behind her is his wife.', u'I find television very educating. Every time somebody turns on the set, I go into the other room and read a book.', u"Those are my principles, and if you don't like them... well, I have others.", u'Marriage is a wonderful institution, but who wants to live in an institution?', u"She got her looks from her father. He's a plastic surgeon.", u"The secret of life is honesty and fair dealing. If you can fake that, you've got it made.", u'I intend to live forever, or die trying.', u'Alimony is like buying hay for a dead horse.', u"One morning I shot an elephant in my pajamas. How he got into my pajamas I'll never know.", u"I read in the newspapers they are going to have 30 minutes of intellectual stuff on television every Monday from 7:30 to 8. to educate America. They couldn't educate America if they started at 6:30.", u"A man's only as old as the woman he feels.", u'I was married by a judge. I should have asked for a jury.', u'Man does not control his own fate. The women in his life do that for him.'], u'Andy Warhol': [u'Fantasy love is much better than reality love. Never doing it is very exciting. The most exciting attractions are between two opposites that never meet.', u'Being good in business is the most fascinating kind of art. Making money is art and working is art and good business is the best art.', u"An artist is somebody who produces things that people don't need to have.", u'Everyone will be famous for 15 minutes.', u"Don't pay any attention to what they write about you. Just measure it in inches.", u'They always say time changes things, but you actually have to change them yourself.', u"I'm afraid that if you look at a thing long enough, it loses all of its meaning.", u'Making money is art and working is art and good business is the best art.', u'I suppose I have a really loose interpretation of "work," because I think that just being alive is so much work at something you don\'t always want to do. The machinery is always going. Even when you sleep.', u'I have Social Disease. I have to go out every night. If I stay home one night I start spreading rumors to my dogs.', u"Dying is the most embarrassing thing that can ever happen to you, because someone's got to take care of all your details.", u"Employees make the best dates. You don't have to pick them up and they're always tax-deductible.", u'I had a lot of dates but I decided to stay home and dye my eyebrows.', u'I think having land and not ruining it is the most beautiful art that anybody could ever want to own.', u'Before I was shot, I always thought that I was more half-there than all-there - I always suspected that I was watching TV instead of living life. Right when I was being shot and ever since, I knew that I was watching television.', u'Being born is like being kidnapped. And then sold into slavery.', u'I never think that people die. They just go to department stores.', u"I'd asked around 10 or 15 people for suggestions. Finally one lady friend asked the right question, 'Well, what do you love most?' That's how I started painting money.", u"Isn't life a series of images that change as they repeat themselves?", u'Sex is more exciting on the screen and between the pages than between the sheets.', u'I like boring things.', u"I love Los Angeles. I love Hollywood. They're beautiful. Everybody's plastic, but I love plastic. I want to be plastic.", u'I am a deeply superficial person.', u'When I got my first television set, I stopped caring so much about having close relationships.', u"During the 1960s, I think, people forgot what emotions were supposed to be. And I don't think they've ever remembered."], u'Tennessee Williams': [u"The only thing worse than a liar is a liar that's also a hypocrite!", u'We are all sentenced to solitary confinement inside our own skins, for life.', u'I have found it easier to identify with the characters who verge upon hysteria, who were frightened of life, who were desperate to reach out to another person. But these seemingly fragile people are the strong people really.', u'We all live in a house on fire, no fire department to call; no way out, just the upstairs window to look out of while the fire burns the house down with us trapped, locked in it.', u'For time is the longest distance between two places.', u'When so many are lonely as seem to be lonely, it would be inexcusably selfish to be lonely alone.', u'Life is all memory, except for the one present moment that goes by you so quickly you hardly catch it going.', u"Success is blocked by concentrating on it and planning for it... Success is shy - it won't come out while you're watching.", u'A high station in life is earned by the gallantry with which appalling experiences are survived with grace.', u'All cruel people describe themselves as paragons of frankness.', u"Don't look forward to the day you stop suffering, because when it comes you'll know you're dead.", u'We have to distrust each other. It is our only defense against betrayal.', u"Life is an unanswered question, but let's still believe in the dignity and importance of the question.", u'Hell is yourself and the only redemption is when a person puts himself aside to feel deeply for another person.', u"I can't stand a naked light bulb, any more than I can a rude remark or a vulgar action.", u'Enthusiasm is the most important thing in life.', u"What is straight? A line can be straight, or a street, but the human heart, oh, no, it's curved like a road through mountains.", u"Mendacity is a system that we live in. Liquor is one way out an death's the other.", u'All good art is an indiscretion.', u'All of us are guinea pigs in the laboratory of God. Humanity is just a work in progress.', u'In memory everything seems to happen to music.', u'Life is partly what we make it, and partly what it is made by the friends we choose.', u"The strongest influences in my life and my work are always whomever I love. Whomever I love and am with most of the time, or whomever I remember most vividly. I think that's true of everyone, don't you?", u"If I am no longer disturbed myself, I will deal less with disturbed people, but I don't regret having concerned myself with them because I think most of us are disturbed.", u'If the writing is honest it cannot be separated from the man who wrote it.'], u'Judy Garland': [u'For it was not into my ear you whispered, but into my heart. It was not my lips you kissed, but my soul.', u'I can live without money, but I cannot live without love.', u'Always be a first-rate version of yourself, instead of a second-rate version of somebody else.', u'In the silence of night I have often wished for just a few words of love from one man, rather than the applause of thousands of people.', u"I've always taken 'The Wizard of Oz' very seriously, you know. I believe in the idea of the rainbow. And I've spent my entire life trying to get over it.", u"'Twas not my lips you kissed but my soul.", u'We cast away priceless time in dreams, born of imagination, fed upon illusion, and put to death by reality.', u'You are never so alone as when you are ill on stage. The most nightmarish feeling in the world is suddenly to feel like throwing up in front of four thousand people.', u"If I'm such a legend, then why am I so lonely? Let me tell you, legends are all very well if you've got somebody around who loves you.", u"It's lonely and cold on the top... lonely and cold.", u'Behind every cloud is another cloud.', u"How strange when an illusion dies. It's as though you've lost a child.", u'If I am a legend, then why am I so lonely?', u'If you have to be in a soap opera try not to get the worst role.', u'There have been times when I have deliberately tried to take my life... I think I must have been crying for some attention.', u"I try to bring the audience's own drama - tears and laughter they know about - to them.", u"I think there's something peculiar about me that I haven't died. It doesn't make sense but I refuse to die.", u'I was born at the age of twelve on an MGM lot.', u"I'm the original take-orders girl.", u"I've never looked through a keyhole without finding someone was looking back.", u"I've seen the ticket, and I still can't believe it. When I see the money, I hope I don't hit the floor."], u'Kobe Bryant': [u"I'll do whatever it takes to win games, whether it's sitting on a bench waving a towel, handing a cup of water to a teammate, or hitting the game-winning shot.", u'Everyting negative - pressure, challenges - is all an opportunity for me to rise.', u"I don't want to be the next Michael Jordan, I only want to be Kobe Bryant.", u"These young guys are playing checkers. I'm out there playing chess.", u"My parents are my backbone. Still are. They're the only group that will support you if you score zero or you score 40.", u"There's been a lot of talk of me being a one-man show but that's simply not the case. We win games when I score 40 points and we've won when I score 10.", u"I'm chasing perfection.", u'Everyone looks at your watch and it represents who you are, your values and your personal style.', u"I've played with IVs before, during and after games. I've played with a broken hand, a sprained ankle, a torn shoulder, a fractured tooth, a severed lip, and a knee the size of a softball. I don't miss 15 games because of a toe injury that everybody knows wasn't that serious in the first place.", u"I'm not the most patient of people.", u'I draw from the crowd a lot.', u'If I panic, everyone else panics.', u"It's different from being 21 and you think there's endless amount of opportunities. At 33, the ending is much, much closer.", u"The Black Mamba collection of watches is me: It is my alter ego, so to speak. As I mentioned before, it is sharp, cutting edge and sleek which are characteristics I try to apply when I'm out there on the basketball court.", u"We all know what flopping is when we see it. The stuff that you see is where guys aren't really getting hit at all and are just flailing around like a fish out of water."], u'Carl Sagan': [u'Somewhere, something incredible is waiting to be known.', u'It is far better to grasp the universe as it really is than to persist in delusion, however satisfying and reassuring.', u'For small creatures such as we the vastness is bearable only through love.', u'For me, it is far better to grasp the Universe as it really is than to persist in delusion, however satisfying and reassuring.', u'Imagination will often carry us to worlds that never were. But without it we go nowhere.', u'We have also arranged things so that almost no one understands science and technology. This is a prescription for disaster. We might get away with it for a while, but sooner or later this combustible mixture of ignorance and power is going to blow up in our faces.', u'If you wish to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first invent the universe.', u'We live in a society exquisitely dependent on science and technology, in which hardly anyone knows anything about science and technology.', u'But the fact that some geniuses were laughed at does not imply that all who are laughed at are geniuses. They laughed at Columbus, they laughed at Fulton, they laughed at the Wright Brothers. But they also laughed at Bozo the Clown.', u'Who are we? We find that we live on an insignificant planet of a humdrum star lost in a galaxy tucked away in some forgotten corner of a universe in which there are far more galaxies than people.', u'A celibate clergy is an especially good idea, because it tends to suppress any hereditary propensity toward fanaticism.', u'Our species needs, and deserves, a citizenry with minds wide awake and a basic understanding of how the world works.', u'The brain is like a muscle. When it is in use we feel very good. Understanding is joyous.', u'Personally, I would be delighted if there were a life after death, especially if it permitted me to continue to learn about this world and others, if it gave me a chance to discover how history turns out.', u'Science is a way of thinking much more than it is a body of knowledge.', u'All of the books in the world contain no more information than is broadcast as video in a single large American city in a single year. Not all bits have equal value.', u'I am often amazed at how much more capability and enthusiasm for science there is among elementary school youngsters than among college students.', u'The universe is not required to be in perfect harmony with human ambition.', u'Skeptical scrutiny is the means, in both science and religion, by which deep thoughts can be winnowed from deep nonsense.', u'The universe seems neither benign nor hostile, merely indifferent.', u'If we long to believe that the stars rise and set for us, that we are the reason there is a Universe, does science do us a disservice in deflating our conceits?', u"When you make the finding yourself - even if you're the last person on Earth to see the light - you'll never forget it.", u'I can find in my undergraduate classes, bright students who do not know that the stars rise and set at night, or even that the Sun is a star.', u"We've arranged a civilization in which most crucial elements profoundly depend on science and technology."], u'Booker T. Washington': [u'Success is to be measured not so much by the position that one has reached in life as by the obstacles which he has overcome.', u'If you want to lift yourself up, lift up someone else.', u'I have learned that success is to be measured not so much by the position that one has reached in life as by the obstacles which he has had to overcome while trying to succeed.', u'Associate yourself with people of good quality, for it is better to be alone than in bad company.', u'I shall allow no man to belittle my soul by making me hate him.', u'Nothing ever comes to one, that is worth having, except as a result of hard work.', u"You can't hold a man down without staying down with him.", u"There are two ways of exerting one's strength: one is pushing down, the other is pulling up.", u'Excellence is to do a common thing in an uncommon way.', u'No race can prosper till it learns that there is as much dignity in tilling a field as in writing a poem.', u'One man cannot hold another man down in the ditch without remaining down in the ditch with him.', u'At the bottom of education, at the bottom of politics, even at the bottom of religion, there must be for our race economic independence.', u'Few things can help an individual more than to place responsibility on him, and to let him know that you trust him.', u'No greater injury can be done to any youth than to let him feel that because he belongs to this or that race he will be advanced in life regardless of his own merits or efforts.', u'The individual who can do something that the world wants done will, in the end, make his way regardless of his race.', u'Dignify and glorify common labor. It is at the bottom of life that we must begin, not at the top.', u'Character is power.', u'Character, not circumstances, makes the man.', u"If you can't read, it's going to be hard to realize dreams.", u'To hold a man down, you have to stay down with him.', u'Success in life is founded upon attention to the small things rather than to the large things; to the every day things nearest to us rather than to the things that are remote and uncommon.', u'No man, who continues to add something to the material, intellectual and moral well-being of the place in which he lives, is left long without proper reward.', u'We do not want the men of another color for our brothers-in-law, but we do want them for our brothers.', u'There is no power on earth that can neutralize the influence of a high, simple and useful life.', u"We don't just borrow words; on occasion, English has pursued other languages down alleyways to beat them unconscious and rifle their pockets for new vocabulary."], u'Deepak Chopra': [u'In the midst of movement and chaos, keep stillness inside of you.', u'There are no extra pieces in the universe. Everyone is here because he or she has a place to fill, and every piece must fit itself into the big jigsaw puzzle.', u'The way you think, the way you behave, the way you eat, can influence your life by 30 to 50 years.', u'If you and I are having a single thought of violence or hatred against anyone in the world at this moment, we are contributing to the wounding of the world.', u'To think is to practice brain chemistry.', u'The less you open your heart to others, the more your heart suffers.', u'You and I are essentially infinite choice-makers. In every moment of our existence, we are in that field of all possibilities where we have access to an infinity of choices.', u'Our most important task is to transform our consciousness so that violence is no longer an option for us in our personal lives, that understanding that a world of peace is possible only if we relate to each other as peaceful beings, one individual at a time.', u'We are not victims of aging, sickness and death. These are part of scenery, not the seer, who is immune to any form of change. This seer is the spirit, the expression of eternal being.', u'Happiness is a continuation of happenings which are not resisted.', u'Nothing is more important than reconnecting with your bliss. Nothing is as rich. Nothing is more real.', u'Our thinking and our behaviour are always in anticipation of a response. It is therefore fear-based.', u"Always go with your passions. Never ask yourself if it's realistic or not.", u'You can free yourself from aging by reinterpreting your body and by grasping the link between belief and biology.', u'But the real secret to lifelong good health is actually the opposite: Let your body take care of you.', u'Enlightened leadership is spiritual if we understand spirituality not as some kind of religious dogma or ideology but as the domain of awareness where we experience values like truth, goodness, beauty, love and compassion, and also intuition, creativity, insight and focused attention.', u'Every person is a God in embryo. Its only desire is to be born.', u'Research has shown that the best way to be happy is to make each day happy.', u"You can't make positive choices for the rest of your life without an environment that makes those choices easy, natural, and enjoyable.", u"The intention to live as long as possible isn't one of the mind's best intentions, because quantity isn't the same as quality.", u'Life gives you plenty of time to do whatever you want to do if you stay in the present moment.', u'The physical world, including our bodies, is a response of the observer. We create our bodies as we create the experience of our world.', u'A risk-free life is far from being a healthy life.', u"All of us are living with dogmas that we accept as truths. When one of these is overturned, there's an initial gasp, soon followed by a rush of exhilaration.", u'I teach people that no matter what the situation is, no matter how chaotic, no matter how much drama is around you, you can heal by your presence if you just stay within your center.'], u'George Burns': [u'I honestly think it is better to be a failure at something you love than to be a success at something you hate.', u'Happiness is having a large, loving, caring, close-knit family in another city.', u"Everything that goes up must come down. But there comes a time when not everything that's down can come up.", u"You can't help getting older, but you don't have to get old.", u"Don't stay in bed, unless you can make money in bed.", u"Acting is all about honesty. If you can fake that, you've got it made.", u'When I was a boy the Dead Sea was only sick.', u'First you forget names, then you forget faces. Next you forget to pull your zipper up and finally, you forget to pull it down.', u'Happiness? A good cigar, a good meal, a good cigar and a good woman - or a bad woman; it depends on how much happiness you can handle.', u'Too bad all the people who know how to run this country are busy running taxicabs or cutting hair.', u'Sex at age 90 is like trying to shoot pool with a rope.', u"You know you're getting old when you stoop to tie your shoelaces and wonder what else you could do while you're down there.", u"If you ask what is the single most important key to longevity, I would have to say it is avoiding worry, stress and tension. And if you didn't ask me, I'd still have to say it.", u"I look to the future because that's where I'm going to spend the rest of my life.", u"Look to the future, because that is where you'll spend the rest of your life.", u"If you live to be one hundred, you've got it made. Very few people die past that age.", u"The most important thing in acting is honesty. If you can fake that, you've got it made.", u"I'd rather be a failure at something I love than a success at something I hate.", u"It takes only one drink to get me drunk. The trouble is, I can't remember if it's the thirteenth or the fourteenth.", u'Be quick to learn and wise to know.', u"You've got to be honest; if you can fake that, you've got it made.", u'I spent a year in that town, one Sunday.', u'I can remember when the air was clean and sex was dirty.', u'Too bad that all the people who know how to run the country are busy driving taxicabs and cutting hair.', u"Nice to be here? At my age it's nice to be anywhere."], u'William Shakespeare': [u'A fool thinks himself to be wise, but a wise man knows himself to be a fool.', u'Be not afraid of greatness: some are born great, some achieve greatness, and some have greatness thrust upon them.', u'Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none.', u"All the world's a stage, and all the men and women merely players: they have their exits and their entrances; and one man in his time plays many parts, his acts being seven ages.", u'Expectation is the root of all heartache.', u'The wheel is come full circle.', u'To thine own self be true, and it must follow, as the night the day, thou canst not then be false to any man.', u"Life's but a walking shadow, a poor player, that struts and frets his hour upon the stage, and then is heard no more; it is a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing.", u'If you prick us do we not bleed? If you tickle us do we not laugh? If you poison us do we not die? And if you wrong us shall we not revenge?', u'It is not in the stars to hold our destiny but in ourselves.', u'As soon go kindle fire with snow, as seek to quench the fire of love with words.', u'If music be the food of love, play on.', u'Absence from those we love is self from self - a deadly banishment.', u'God has given you one face, and you make yourself another.', u'Hell is empty and all the devils are here.', u'Ignorance is the curse of God; knowledge is the wing wherewith we fly to heaven.', u'Better a witty fool than a foolish wit.', u'And this, our life, exempt from public haunt, finds tongues in trees, books in the running brooks, sermons in stones, and good in everything.', u'Better three hours too soon than a minute too late.', u'A peace is of the nature of a conquest; for then both parties nobly are subdued, and neither party loser.', u'Cowards die many times before their deaths; the valiant never taste of death but once.', u'When a father gives to his son, both laugh; when a son gives to his father, both cry.', u'The evil that men do lives after them; the good is oft interred with their bones.', u"But O, how bitter a thing it is to look into happiness through another man's eyes.", u'There is a tide in the affairs of men, Which taken at the flood, leads on to fortune. Omitted, all the voyage of their life is bound in shallows and in miseries. On such a full sea are we now afloat. And we must take the current when it serves, or lose our ventures.'], u'Rainer Maria Rilke': [u"A person isn't who they are during the last conversation you had with them - they're who they've been throughout your whole relationship.", u'Once the realization is accepted that even between the closest human beings infinite distances continue, a wonderful living side by side can grow, if they succeed in loving the distance between them which makes it possible for each to see the other whole against the sky.', u'Perhaps all the dragons of our lives are princesses who are only waiting to see us once beautiful and brave.', u'Love consists in this, that two solitudes protect and touch and greet each other.', u'For one human being to love another; that is perhaps the most difficult of all our tasks, the ultimate, the last test and proof, the work for which all other work is but preparation.', u'Live your questions now, and perhaps even without knowing it, you will live along some distant day into your answers.', u'Believe that with your feelings and your work you are taking part in the greatest; the more strongly you cultivate this belief, the more will reality and the world go forth from it.', u"Surely all art is the result of one's having been in danger, of having gone through an experience all the way to the end, where no one can go any further.", u'I hold this to be the highest task for a bond between two people: that each protects the solitude of the other.', u'All emotions are pure which gather you and lift you up; that emotion is impure which seizes only one side of your being and so distorts you.', u'This is the miracle that happens every time to those who really love: the more they give, the more they possess.', u'Perhaps everything terrible is in its deepest being something helpless that wants help from us.', u'The only journey is the one within.', u'Everything is blooming most recklessly; if it were voices instead of colors, there would be an unbelievable shrieking into the heart of the night.', u'If your daily life seems poor, do not blame it; blame yourself that you are not poet enough to call forth its riches; for the Creator, there is no poverty.', u'No great art has ever been made without the artist having known danger.', u'I want to be with those who know secret things or else alone.', u'The purpose of life is to be defeated by greater and greater things.', u'Love is like the measles. The older you get it, the worse the attack.', u'I have never been aware before how many faces there are. There are quantities of human beings, but there are many more faces, for each person has several.', u'Let life happen to you. Believe me: life is in the right, always.', u'There are quantities of human faces, but there are many more faces, for each person has several.', u'The deepest experience of the creator is feminine, for it is experience of receiving and bearing.', u"He reproduced himself with so much humble objectivity, with the unquestioning, matter of fact interest of a dog who sees himself in a mirror and thinks: there's another dog.", u'All the soarings of my mind begin in my blood.'], u'Frank Zappa': [u"You can't be a real country unless you have a beer and an airline. It helps if you have some kind of a football team, or some nuclear weapons, but at the very least you need a beer.", u'Some scientists claim that hydrogen, because it is so plentiful, is the basic building block of the universe. I dispute that. I say there is more stupidity than hydrogen, and that is the basic building block of the universe.', u'There is more stupidity than hydrogen in the universe, and it has a longer shelf life.', u'If you want to get laid, go to college. If you want an education, go to the library.', u"Most rock journalism is people who can't write, interviewing people who can't talk, for people who can't read.", u'Music, in performance, is a type of sculpture. The air in the performance is sculpted into something.', u'Art is making something out of nothing and selling it.', u"It isn't necessary to imagine the world ending in fire or ice. There are two other possibilities: one is paperwork, and the other is nostalgia.", u'A composer is a guy who goes around forcing his will on unsuspecting air molecules, often with the assistance of unsuspecting musicians.', u"One of my favorite philosophical tenets is that people will agree with you only if they already agree with you. You do not change people's minds.", u"The computer can't tell you the emotional story. It can give you the exact mathematical design, but what's missing is the eyebrows.", u"You can't always write a chord ugly enough to say what you want to say, so sometimes you have to rely on a giraffe filled with whipped cream.", u'The United States is a nation of laws: badly written and randomly enforced.', u"There are more love songs than anything else. If songs could make you do something we'd all love one another.", u'Without music to decorate it, time is just a bunch of boring production deadlines or dates by which bills must be paid.', u"Communism doesn't work because people like to own stuff.", u'Politics is the entertainment branch of industry.', u'All the good music has already been written by people with wigs and stuff.', u"Most people wouldn't know music if it came up and bit them on the ass.", u'Everybody believes in something and everybody, by virtue of the fact that they believe in something, uses that something to support their own existence.', u'Without deviation progress is not possible.', u'I never set out to be weird. It was always other people who called me weird.', u"I searched for years I found no love. I'm sure that love will never be a product of plasticity.", u'No change in musical style will survive unless it is accompanied by a change in clothing style. Rock is to dress up to.', u'Music is always a commentary on society.'], u'Paul Cezanne': [u"Genius is the ability to renew one's emotions in daily experience.", u'For an Impressionist to paint from nature is not to paint the subject, but to realize sensations.', u'When I judge art, I take my painting and put it next to a God made object like a tree or flower. If it clashes, it is not art.', u'If isolation tempers the strong, it is the stumbling-block of the uncertain.', u"Painting from nature is not copying the object; it is realizing one's sensations.", u'The awareness of our own strength makes us modest.', u'A work of art which did not begin in emotion is not art.', u'I allow no one to touch me.', u"Painting is damned difficult - you always think you've got it, but you haven't.", u"A thousand painters ought to be killed yearly. Say what you like: I'm every inch a painter.", u'The most seductive thing about art is the personality of the artist himself.', u'We live in a rainbow of chaos.', u'Art is a harmony parallel with nature.', u'The truth is in nature, and I shall prove it.', u"The world doesn't understand me and I don't understand the world, that's why I've withdrawn from it.", u"An art which isn't based on feeling isn't an art at all.", u"Don't be an art critic. Paint. There lies salvation.", u"Here, on the river's verge, I could be busy for months without changing my place, simply leaning a little more to right or left.", u"I've come to the conclusion that it's not really possible to help others.", u'My nervous system is enfeebled, only work in oils can sustain me.', u"Tell me, do you think I'm going mad? I sometimes wonder, you know.", u'There are two things in the painter, the eye and the mind; each of them should aid the other.', u"Two sittings a day of my models and I'm totally exhausted.", u'With an apple I will astonish Paris.', u'A puny body weakens the soul.'], u'Swami Vivekananda': [u'We are what our thoughts have made us; so take care about what you think. Words are secondary. Thoughts live; they travel far.', u'Take up one idea. Make that one idea your life - think of it, dream of it, live on that idea. Let the brain, muscles, nerves, every part of your body, be full of that idea, and just leave every other idea alone. This is the way to success.', u'All the powers in the universe are already ours. It is we who have put our hands before our eyes and cry that it is dark.', u'You cannot believe in God until you believe in yourself.', u'All differences in this world are of degree, and not of kind, because oneness is the secret of everything.', u'If money help a man to do good to others, it is of some value; but if not, it is simply a mass of evil, and the sooner it is got rid of, the better.', u'Never think there is anything impossible for the soul. It is the greatest heresy to think so. If there is sin, this is the only sin; to say that you are weak, or others are weak.', u'You have to grow from the inside out. None can teach you, none can make you spiritual. There is no other teacher but your own soul.', u'Our duty is to encourage every one in his struggle to live up to his own highest idea, and strive at the same time to make the ideal as near as possible to the Truth.', u'The moment I have realized God sitting in the temple of every human body, the moment I stand in reverence before every human being and see God in him - that moment I am free from bondage, everything that binds vanishes, and I am free.', u'The more we come out and do good to others, the more our hearts will be purified, and God will be in them.', u'Condemn none: if you can stretch out a helping hand, do so. If you cannot, fold your hands, bless your brothers, and let them go their own way.', u'The world is the great gymnasium where we come to make ourselves strong.', u'Truth can be stated in a thousand different ways, yet each one can be true.', u'If faith in ourselves had been more extensively taught and practiced, I am sure a very large portion of the evils and miseries that we have would have vanished.', u'Where can we go to find God if we cannot see Him in our own hearts and in every living being.', u'As different streams having different sources all mingle their waters in the sea, so different tendencies, various though they appear, crooked or straight, all lead to God.', u'The Vedanta recognizes no sin it only recognizes error. And the greatest error, says the Vedanta is to say that you are weak, that you are a sinner, a miserable creature, and that you have no power and you cannot do this and that.', u'God is to be worshipped as the one beloved, dearer than everything in this and next life.', u'When an idea exclusively occupies the mind, it is transformed into an actual physical or mental state.', u'In one word, this ideal is that you are divine.', u'External nature is only internal nature writ large.', u'That man has reached immortality who is disturbed by nothing material.', u'The will is not free - it is a phenomenon bound by cause and effect - but there is something behind the will which is free.'], u'Robert W. Service': [u"It isn't the mountain ahead that wears you out; it's the grain of sand in your shoe.", u'Be sure your wisest words are those you do not say.', u'A promise made is a debt unpaid.', u"No man can be a failure if he thinks he's a success; If he thinks he is a winner, then he is.", u"The only society I like is rough and tough, and the tougher the better. There's where you get down to bedrock and meet human people.", u"I have some friends, some honest friends, and honest friends are few; My pipe of briar, my open fire, A book that's not too new.", u"I have an intense dislike for artificial society. In France, one could lead a free life - to do what one wanted to do without interference or criticism from one's neighbors.", u'Avoid extremes: be moderate In saving and in spending; An equable and easy gait Will win an easy ending.', u'His life, though none too long, Was never dull: Of woman, wine and song Bill had his full.', u'I remember little of the Yukon or what I wrote there.', u"It's the steady, quiet, plodding ones who win in the lifelong race.", u"Write verse, not poetry. The public wants verse. If you have a talent for poetry, then don't by any means mother it, but try your hand at verse."], u'Wayne Dyer': [u"Be miserable. Or motivate yourself. Whatever has to be done, it's always your choice.", u'How people treat you is their karma; how you react is yours.', u'When you judge another, you do not define them, you define yourself.', u'Love is the ability and willingness to allow those that you care for to be what they choose for themselves without any insistence that they satisfy you.', u'If you change the way you look at things, the things you look at change.', u'A mind at peace, a mind centered and not focused on harming others, is stronger than any physical force in the universe.', u"You cannot be lonely if you like the person you're alone with.", u"It makes no sense to worry about things you have no control over because there's nothing you can do about them, and why worry about things you do control? The activity of worrying keeps you immobilized.", u'Begin to see yourself as a soul with a body rather than a body with a soul.', u"The highest form of ignorance is when you reject something you don't know anything about.", u'Stop acting as if life is a rehearsal. Live this day as if it were your last. The past is over and gone. The future is not guaranteed.', u'Doing what you love is the cornerstone of having abundance in your life.', u'Anything you really want, you can attain, if you really go after it.', u"When you dance, your purpose is not to get to a certain place on the floor. It's to enjoy each step along the way.", u'Freedom means you are unobstructed in living your life as you choose. Anything less is a form of slavery.', u'When I chased after money, I never had enough. When I got my life on purpose and focused on giving of myself and everything that arrived into my life, then I was prosperous.', u"Your children will see what you're all about by what you live rather than what you say.", u'It is impossible for you to be angry and laugh at the same time. Anger and laughter are mutually exclusive and you have the power to choose either.', u'Conflict cannot survive without your participation.', u'Abundance is not something we acquire. It is something we tune into.', u"Successful people make money. It's not that people who make money become successful, but that successful people attract money. They bring success to what they do.", u'Our intention creates our reality.', u'What we think determines what happens to us, so if we want to change our lives, we need to stretch our minds.', u'Everything in the universe has a purpose. Indeed, the invisible intelligence that flows through everything in a purposeful fashion is also flowing through you.', u"Deficiency motivation doesn't work. It will lead to a life-long pursuit of try to fix me. Learn to appreciate what you have and where and who you are."], u'Richard M. Nixon': [u"Don't get the impression that you arouse my anger. You see, one can only be angry with those he respects.", u"Never let your head hang down. Never give up and sit down and grieve. Find another way. And don't pray when it rains if you don't pray when the sun shines.", u'If you want to make beautiful music, you must play the black and the white notes together.', u'Only if you have been in the deepest valley, can you ever know how magnificent it is to be on the highest mountain.', u"Remember, always give your best. Never get discouraged. Never be petty. Always remember, others may hate you. But those who hate you don't win unless you hate them. And then you destroy yourself.", u'A man is not finished when he is defeated. He is finished when he quits.', u"Defeat doesn't finish a man, quit does. A man is not finished when he's defeated. He's finished when he quits.", u"When the President does it, that means that it's not illegal.", u"Always remember that others may hate you but those who hate you don't win unless you hate them. And then you destroy yourself.", u'Americans admire a people who can scratch a desert and produce a garden. The Israelis have shown qualities that Americans identify with: guts, patriotism, idealism, a passion for freedom. I have seen it. I know. I believe that.', u"Those who hate you don't win unless you hate them, and then you destroy yourself.", u"Life isn't meant to be easy. It's hard to take being on the top - or on the bottom. I guess I'm something of a fatalist. You have to have a sense of history, I think, to survive some of these things... Life is one crisis after another.", u"You won't have Nixon to kick around anymore, because, gentlemen, this is my last press conference.", u'Certainly in the next 50 years we shall see a woman president, perhaps sooner than you think. A woman can and should be able to do any political job that a man can do.', u"If an individual wants to be a leader and isn't controversial, that means he never stood for anything.", u'The finest steel has to go through the hottest fire.', u'We must always remember that America is a great nation today not because of what government did for people but because of what people did for themselves and for one another.', u'You must never be satisfied with losing. You must get angry, terribly angry, about losing. But the mark of the good loser is that he takes his anger out on himself and not his victorious opponents or on his teammates.', u'A public man must never forget that he loses his usefulness when he as an individual, rather than his policy, becomes the issue.', u'Any change is resisted because bureaucrats have a vested interest in the chaos in which they exist.', u"I wish I could give you a lot of advice, based on my experience of winning political debates. But I don't have that experience. My only experience is at losing them.", u'If we take the route of the permanent handout, the American character will itself be impoverished.', u'In the long term we can hope that religion will change the nature of man and reduce conflict. But history is not encouraging in this respect. The bloodiest wars in history have been religious wars.', u'Our chief justices have probably had more profound and lasting influence on their times and on the direction of the nation than most presidents.', u"People react to fear, not love; they don't teach that in Sunday School, but it's true."], u'Ray Bradbury': [u"If we listened to our intellect, we'd never have a love affair. We'd never have a friendship. We'd never go into business, because we'd be cynical. Well, that's nonsense. You've got to jump off cliffs all the time and build your wings on the way down.", u"I spent three days a week for 10 years educating myself in the public library, and it's better than college. People should educate themselves - you can get a complete education for no money. At the end of 10 years, I had read every book in the library and I'd written a thousand stories.", u"Don't think. Thinking is the enemy of creativity. It's self-conscious, and anything self-conscious is lousy. You can't try to do things. You simply must do things.", u'Love. Fall in love and stay in love. Write only what you love, and love what you write. The key word is love. You have to get up in the morning and write something you love, something to live for.', u"I know you've heard it a thousand times before. But it's true - hard work pays off. If you want to be good, you have to practice, practice, practice. If you don't love something, then don't do it.", u"Stuff your eyes with wonder, live as if you'd drop dead in ten seconds. See the world. It's more fantastic than any dream made or paid for in factories.", u'There are worse crimes than burning books. One of them is not reading them.', u'Every morning I jump out of bed and step on a landmine. The landmine is me.After the explosion, I spent the rest of the day putting the pieces together.', u'My stories run up and bite me on the leg - I respond by writing down everything that goes on during the bite. When I finish, the idea lets go and runs off.', u"You don't have to burn books to destroy a culture. Just get people to stop reading them.", u'We are cups, constantly and quietly being filled. The trick is, knowing how to tip ourselves over and let the beautiful stuff out.', u'Jump, and you will find out how to unfold your wings as you fall.', u'If you enjoy living, it is not difficult to keep the sense of wonder.', u'We are the miracle of force and matter making itself over into imagination and will. Incredible. The Life Force experimenting with forms. You for one. Me for another. The Universe has shouted itself alive. We are one of the shouts.', u'If you dream the proper dreams, and share the myths with people, they will want to grow up to be like you.', u'Living at risk is jumping off the cliff and building your wings on the way down.', u"You've got to jump off cliffs and build your wings on the way down.", u"Americans are far more remarkable than we give ourselves credit for. We've been so busy damning ourselves for years. We've done it all, and yet we don't take credit for it.", u"Love is the answer to everything. It's the only reason to do anything. If you don't write stories you love, you'll never make it. If you don't write stories that other people love, you'll never make it.", u"I don't try to describe the future. I try to prevent it.", u'Without libraries what have we? We have no past and no future.', u"If you don't like what you're doing, then don't do it.", u'The best scientist is open to experience and begins with romance - the idea that anything is possible.', u'You fail only if you stop writing.', u"Love is easy, and I love writing. You can't resist love. You get an idea, someone says something, and you're in love."], u'Lucius Annaeus Seneca': [u'The wish for healing has always been half of health.', u'One of the most beautiful qualities of true friendship is to understand and to be understood.', u'A gift consists not in what is done or given, but in the intention of the giver or doer.', u'A gem cannot be polished without friction, nor a man perfected without trials.', u'Religion is regarded by the common people as true, by the wise as false, and by the rulers as useful.', u'If one does not know to which port one is sailing, no wind is favorable.', u'Anger, if not restrained, is frequently more hurtful to us than the injury that provokes it.', u'We are more often frightened than hurt; and we suffer more from imagination than from reality.', u'As is a tale, so is life: not how long it is, but how good it is, is what matters.', u'True happiness is... to enjoy the present, without anxious dependence upon the future.', u'The day which we fear as our last is but the birthday of eternity.', u'If you wished to be loved, love.', u"It is another's fault if he be ungrateful, but it is mine if I do not give. To find one thankful man, I will oblige a great many that are not so.", u'No man was ever wise by chance.', u"Life's like a play: it's not the length, but the excellence of the acting that matters.", u'A physician is not angry at the intemperance of a mad patient, nor does he take it ill to be railed at by a man in fever. Just so should a wise man treat all mankind, as a physician does his patient, and look upon them only as sick and extravagant.', u'All cruelty springs from weakness.', u'We can be thankful to a friend for a few acres, or a little money; and yet for the freedom and command of the whole earth, and for the great benefits of our being, our life, health, and reason, we look upon ourselves as under no obligation.', u'It is quality rather than quantity that matters.', u'A quarrel is quickly settled when deserted by one party; there is no battle unless there be two.', u'It is a rough road that leads to the heights of greatness.', u'A kingdom founded on injustice never lasts.', u'It is not because things are difficult that we do not dare, it is because we do not dare that they are difficult.', u'No one can be happy who has been thrust outside the pale of truth. And there are two ways that one can be removed from this realm: by lying, or by being lied to.', u'If a man knows not what harbor he seeks, any wind is the right wind.'], u'Clint Eastwood': [u"I have a very strict gun control policy: if there's a gun around, I want to be in control of it.", u"Respect your efforts, respect yourself. Self-respect leads to self-discipline. When you have both firmly under your belt, that's real power.", u"I tried being reasonable, I didn't like it.", u'Sometimes if you want to see a change for the better, you have to take things into your own hands.', u"I've never met a genius. A genius to me is someone who does well at something he hates. Anybody can do well at something he loves - it's just a question of finding the subject.", u"I don't believe in pessimism. If something doesn't come up the way you want, forge ahead. If you think it's going to rain, it will.", u'They say marriages are made in Heaven. But so is thunder and lightning.', u"I'm interested in the fact that the less secure a man is, the more likely he is to have extreme prejudice.", u'I would just like to say something, ladies and gentlemen. Something that I think is very important. It is that, you, we - we own this country. We - we own it. It is not you owning it, and not politicians owning it. Politicians are employees of ours.', u'If you want a guarantee, buy a toaster.', u"There's only one way to have a happy marriage and as soon as I learn what it is I'll get married again.", u'This film cost $31 million. With that kind of money I could have invaded some country.', u"I'm not really conservative. I'm conservative on certain things. I believe in less government. I believe in fiscal responsibility and all those things that maybe Republicans used to believe in but don't any more.", u'The less secure a man is, the more likely he is to have extreme prejudice.', u"If a person doesn't change, there's something really wrong with him.", u"I mean, I've always been a libertarian. Leave everybody alone. Let everybody else do what they want. Just stay out of everybody else's hair.", u'We boil at different degrees.', u'Crimes against children are the most heinous crime. That, for me, would be a reason for capital punishment because children are innocent and need the guidance of an adult society.', u'We are like boxers, one never knows how much longer one has.', u'I became a Republican in 1951, the first year I could vote.', u"And I think it's that time. And I think if you just step aside and Mr. Romney can kind of take over. You can maybe still use a plane. Though maybe a smaller one. Not that big gas guzzler you are going around to colleges and talking about student loans and stuff like that.", u'I think being able to age gracefully is a very important talent. It is too late for me.', u"If you think it's going to rain, it will.", u"If you're doing a biography, you try to stay as accurate as possible to reality. But you really don't know what was going on in the person's mind. You just know what was going on in the minds of people around him.", u'Men must know their limitations.'], u'Isaac Newton': [u'We build too many walls and not enough bridges.', u'I can calculate the motion of heavenly bodies, but not the madness of people.', u'If I have seen further than others, it is by standing upon the shoulders of giants.', u'I was like a boy playing on the sea-shore, and diverting myself now and then finding a smoother pebble or a prettier shell than ordinary, whilst the great ocean of truth lay all undiscovered before me.', u'A man may imagine things that are false, but he can only understand things that are true, for if the things be false, the apprehension of them is not understanding.', u'Tact is the art of making a point without making an enemy.', u'To every action there is always opposed an equal reaction.', u'To myself I am only a child playing on the beach, while vast oceans of truth lie undiscovered before me.', u'To me there has never been a higher source of earthly honor or distinction than that connected with advances in science.', u'Errors are not in the art but in the artificers.', u'We are to admit no more causes of natural things than such as are both true and sufficient to explain their appearances.', u'If I have done the public any service, it is due to my patient thought.', u'It is the weight, not numbers of experiments that is to be regarded.'], u'Mitt Romney': [u'America cannot continue to lead the family of nations around the world if we suffer the collapse of the family here at home.', u"And this President wakes up every morning, looks out across America and is proud to announce, 'It could be worse.' It could be worse? Is that what it means to be an American? It could be worse? Of course not. What defines us as Americans is our unwavering conviction that we know it must be better.", u'And the American people are the greatest people in the world. What makes America the greatest nation in the world is the heart of the American people: hardworking, innovative, risk-taking, God- loving, family-oriented American people.', u"Three years ago, this week, a newly elected President Obama faced the American people and he said, look, if I can't turn this economy around in three years, I'll be looking at a one-term proposition, and we're here to collect! You know the results. It's been 35 months of unemployment above 8 percent.", u'Leadership, leadership is about taking responsibility, not making excuses.', u"I spent my whole life in the private sector, 25 years in the private sector. I understand that when government takes more money out of the hands of people, it makes it more difficult for them to buy things. If they can't buy things, the economy doesn't grow. If the economy doesn't grow, we don't put Americans to work.", u'I have never once regretted missing a business opportunity so that I could be with my children and grandchildren.', u'Religious liberty is the first freedom in our Constitution. And whether the cause is justice for the persecuted, compassion for the needy and the sick, or mercy for the child waiting to be born, there is no greater force for good in the nation than Christian conscience in action.', u'I feel very deeply about the need to respect and tolerate people of different social - or sexual orientation. But at the same time, I believe marriage should be preserved as an institution for one man and one woman.', u'Christianity is not the faith of the complacent, the comfortable or of the timid. It demands and creates heroic souls like Wesley, Wilberforce, Bonhoeffer, John Paul the Second, and Billy Graham. Each showed, in their own way, the relentless and powerful influence of the message of Jesus Christ.', u"I stand ready to lead us down a different path where we're lifted up by our desire to succeed, not dragged down by a resentment of success.", u'I could have possibly beaten Senator McCain in the primary. Then I could have been the candidate who lost to Barack Obama.', u"I believe in an America where millions of Americans believe in an America that's the America millions of Americans believe in. That's the America I love.", u"Now, let me be clear. The path I lay out is not one paved with ever increasing government checks and cradle to grave assurance that government will always be the solution. If this election is a bidding war for who can promise the most goodies and the most benefits, I'm not your president. You have that president today.", u'When it comes to pinning blame, pin the tail on the donkeys.', u"Dependency is death to initiative, to risk-taking and opportunity. It's time to stop the spread of government dependency and fight it like the poison it is.", u"Government is taking 40 percent of the GDP. And that's at the state, local and federal level. President Obama has taken government spending at the federal level from 20 percent to 25 percent. Look, at some point, you cease being a free economy, and you become a government economy. And we've got to stop that.", u'America is not better off than it was $1.8 trillion dollars ago.', u'Conservatism has had from its inception vigorously positive, intellectually rigorous agenda and thinking. That agenda should have in my three pillars: strengthen the economy, strengthen our security, and strengthen our families.', u'People from both political parties have long recognized that welfare without work creates negative incentives that lead to permanent poverty. It robs people of self-esteem.', u'We believe in individual initiative, personal responsibility, opportunity, freedom, small government, the Constitution. These principles, these American principles are key to getting our economy back to being successful and leading the world.', u"My view is that marriage is a relationship between a man and a woman. That's the position I've had for some time, and I don't intend to make any adjustments at this point... Or ever, by the way.", u'Our plans protect freedom and opportunity, and our blueprint is the Constitution of the United States.', u"President Obama's view of a free economy is to send your money to his friends. My vision for a free enterprise economy is to return entrepreneurship and genius and creativity to the American people!", u'The invisible hand of the market always moves faster and better than the heavy hand of government.'], u'Thomas Fuller': [u'He that cannot forgive others breaks the bridge over which he must pass himself; for every man has need to be forgiven.', u'All things are difficult before they are easy.', u'If it were not for hopes, the heart would break.', u'Abused patience turns to fury.', u'Great hopes make great men.', u'If you have one true friend you have more than your share.', u'An invincible determination can accomplish almost anything and in this lies the great distinction between great men and little men.', u'One that would have the fruit must climb the tree.', u'A gift, with a kind countenance, is a double present.', u'It is madness for sheep to talk peace with a wolf.', u"If you command wisely, you'll be obeyed cheerfully.", u'Contentment consist not in adding more fuel, but in taking away some fire.', u'A good garden may have some weeds.', u'Absence sharpens love, presence strengthens it.', u'Health is not valued till sickness comes.', u"A fool's paradise is a wise man's hell!", u'An ounce of cheerfulness is worth a pound of sadness to serve God with.', u'Charity begins at home, but should not end there.', u'Choose a wife rather by your ear than your eye.', u'Vows made in storms are forgotten in calm.', u'Bad excuses are worse than none.', u'We are born crying, live complaining, and die disappointed.', u'We ought to see far enough into a hypocrite to see even his sincerity.', u'There is a scarcity of friendship, but not of friends.', u'All commend patience, but none can endure to suffer.'], u'Socrates': [u'The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing.', u"By all means, marry. If you get a good wife, you'll become happy; if you get a bad one, you'll become a philosopher.", u"All men's souls are immortal, but the souls of the righteous are immortal and divine.", u'I am the wisest man alive, for I know one thing, and that is that I know nothing.', u'As for me, all I know is that I know nothing.', u'An honest man is always a child.', u'Wisdom begins in wonder.', u"Employ your time in improving yourself by other men's writings, so that you shall gain easily what others have labored hard for.", u'False words are not only evil in themselves, but they infect the soul with evil.', u'True wisdom comes to each of us when we realize how little we understand about life, ourselves, and the world around us.', u'Be slow to fall into friendship; but when thou art in, continue firm and constant.', u'A system of morality which is based on relative emotional values is a mere illusion, a thoroughly vulgar conception which has nothing sound in it and nothing true.', u'Beware the barrenness of a busy life.', u'He is richest who is content with the least, for content is the wealth of nature.', u"My advice to you is get married: if you find a good wife you'll be happy; if not, you'll become a philosopher.", u'True knowledge exists in knowing that you know nothing.', u'Worthless people live only to eat and drink; people of worth eat and drink only to live.', u'Death may be the greatest of all human blessings.', u'From the deepest desires often come the deadliest hate.', u'I know nothing except the fact of my ignorance.', u'Be as you wish to seem.', u'Our prayers should be for blessings in general, for God knows best what is good for us.', u'Not life, but good life, is to be chiefly valued.', u'I decided that it was not wisdom that enabled poets to write their poetry, but a kind of instinct or inspiration, such as you find in seers and prophets who deliver all their sublime messages without knowing in the least what they mean.', u'I know that I am intelligent, because I know that I know nothing.'], u'Eric Hoffer': [u'Someone who thinks the world is always cheating him is right. He is missing that wonderful feeling of trust in someone or something.', u'Disappointment is a sort of bankruptcy - the bankruptcy of a soul that expends too much in hope and expectation.', u'The savior who wants to turn men into angels is as much a hater of human nature as the totalitarian despot who wants to turn them into puppets.', u'In times of change learners inherit the earth; while the learned find themselves beautifully equipped to deal with a world that no longer exists.', u'In a time of drastic change it is the learners who inherit the future. The learned usually find themselves equipped to live in a world that no longer exists.', u'Rudeness is a weak imitation of strength.', u'We feel free when we escape - even if it be but from the frying pan to the fire.', u'The suspicious mind believes more than it doubts. It believes in a formidable and ineradicable evil lurking in every person.', u'Our greatest pretenses are built up not to hide the evil and the ugly in us, but our emptiness. The hardest thing to hide is something that is not there.', u'It is futile to judge a kind deed by its motives. Kindness can become its own motive. We are made kind by being kind.', u'People who bite the hand that feeds them usually lick the boot that kicks them.', u'It almost seems that nobody can hate America as much as native Americans. America needs new immigrants to love and cherish it.', u'A nation without dregs and malcontents is orderly, peaceful and pleasant, but perhaps without the seed of things to come.', u'The leader has to be practical and a realist, yet must talk the language of the visionary and the idealist.', u'You can discover what your enemy fears most by observing the means he uses to frighten you.', u'An empty head is not really empty; it is stuffed with rubbish. Hence the difficulty of forcing anything into an empty head.', u'Faith in a holy cause is to a considerable extent a substitute for lost faith in ourselves.', u"It is easier to love humanity as a whole than to love one's neighbor.", u'Those in possession of absolute power can not only prophesy and make their prophecies come true, but they can also lie and make their lies come true.', u'A man by himself is in bad company.', u'Call not that man wretched, who whatever ills he suffers, has a child to love.', u'It is the awareness of unfulfilled desires which gives a nation the feeling that it has a mission and a destiny.', u'Our frustration is greater when we have much and want more than when we have nothing and want some. We are less dissatisfied when we lack many things than when we seem to lack but one thing.', u'The hardest arithmetic to master is that which enables us to count our blessings.', u'The pleasure we derive from doing favors is partly in the feeling it gives us that we are not altogether worthless. It is a pleasant surprise to ourselves.'], u'Douglas MacArthur': [u'Build me a son, O Lord, who will be strong enough to know when he is weak, and brave enough to face himself when he is afraid, one who will be proud and unbending in honest defeat, and humble and gentle in victory.', u'The soldier above all others prays for peace, for it is the soldier who must suffer and bear the deepest wounds and scars of war.', u'I am concerned for the security of our great Nation; not so much because of any threat from without, but because of the insidious forces working from within.', u'In my dreams I hear again the crash of guns, the rattle of musketry, the strange, mournful mutter of the battlefield.', u'Duty, Honor, Country. Those three hallowed words reverently dictate what you ought to be, what you can be, what you will be.', u'It is part of the general pattern of misguided policy that our country is now geared to an arms economy which was bred in an artificially induced psychosis of war hysteria and nurtured upon an incessant propaganda of fear.', u'Age wrinkles the body. Quitting wrinkles the soul.', u'We are not retreating - we are advancing in another direction.', u'A general is just as good or just as bad as the troops under his command make him.', u'And like the old soldier in that ballad, I now close my military career and just fade away, an old soldier who tried to do his duty as God gave him the sight to see that duty.', u'Old soldiers never die; they just fade away.', u"The world is in a constant conspiracy against the brave. It's the age-old struggle: the roar of the crowd on the one side, and the voice of your conscience on the other.", u"I have known war as few men now living know it. It's very destructiveness on both friend and foe has rendered it useless as a means of settling international disputes.", u"I suppose, in a way, this has become part of my soul. It is a symbol of my life. Whatever I have done that really matters, I've done wearing it. When the time comes, it will be in this that I journey forth. What greater honor could come to an American, and a soldier?", u'Part of the American dream is to live long and die young. Only those Americans who are willing to die for their country are fit to live.', u'A better world shall emerge based on faith and understanding.', u'Americans never quit.', u'It is fatal to enter any war without the will to win it.', u'The best luck of all is the luck you make for yourself.', u'In war there is no substitute for victory.', u'Our country is now geared to an arms economy bred in an artificially induced psychosis of war hysteria and an incessant propaganda of fear.', u'Our government has kept us in a perpetual state of fear - kept us in a continuous stampede of patriotic fervor - with the cry of grave national emergency.', u'Years wrinkle the skin, but to give up enthusiasm wrinkles the soul.', u'You are remembered for the rules you break.', u'Life is a lively process of becoming.'], u'David Herbert Lawrence': [u'I never saw a wild thing sorry for itself. A small bird will drop frozen dead from a bough without ever having felt sorry for itself.', u"Be still when you have nothing to say; when genuine passion moves you, say what you've got to say, and say it hot.", u'I am in love - and, my God, it is the greatest thing that can happen to a man. I tell you, find a woman you can fall in love with. Do it. Let yourself fall in love. If you have not done so already, you are wasting your life.', u'Love is the flower of life, and blossoms unexpectedly and without law, and must be plucked where it is found, and enjoyed for the brief hour of its duration.', u'In every living thing there is the desire for love.', u'This is the very worst wickedness, that we refuse to acknowledge the passionate evil that is in us. This makes us secret and rotten.', u'Do not allow to slip away from you freedoms the people who came before you won with such hard knocks.', u'The only justice is to follow the sincere intuition of the soul, angry or gentle. Anger is just, and pity is just, but judgement is never just.', u'One must learn to love, and go through a good deal of suffering to get to it... and the journey is always towards the other soul.', u'I want to live my life so that my nights are not full of regrets.', u'Creation destroys as it goes, throws down one tree for the rise of another. But ideal mankind would abolish death, multiply itself million upon million, rear up city upon city, save every parasite alive, until the accumulation of mere existence is swollen to a horror.', u'The business of art is to reveal the relation between man and his environment.', u'The Christian fear of the pagan outlook has damaged the whole consciousness of man.', u'Be a good animal, true to your animal instincts.', u'Death is the only pure, beautiful conclusion of a great passion.', u'Sex and beauty are inseparable, like life and consciousness. And the intelligence which goes with sex and beauty, and arises out of sex and beauty, is intuition.', u'They say geniuses mostly have great mothers. They mostly have sad fates.', u"You don't want to love - your eternal and abnormal craving is to be loved. You aren't positive, you're negative. You absorb, absorb, as if you must fill yourself up with love, because you've got a shortage somewhere.", u"A man has no religion who has not slowly and painfully gathered one together, adding to it, shaping it; and one's religion is never complete and final, it seems, but must always be undergoing modification.", u'Consciousness is an end in itself. We torture ourselves getting somewhere, and when we get there it is nowhere, for there is nowhere to get to.', u'My whole working philosophy is that the only stable happiness for mankind is that it shall live married in blessed union to woman-kind - intimacy, physical and psychical between a man and his wife. I wish to add that my state of bliss is by no means perfect.', u'The human consciousness is really homogeneous. There is no complete forgetting, even in death.', u'The human soul needs actual beauty more than bread.', u"The only history is a mere question of one's struggle inside oneself. But that is the joy of it. One need neither discover Americas nor conquer nations, and yet one has as great a work as Columbus or Alexander, to do.", u'There is no such thing as liberty. You only change one sort of domination for another. All we can do is to choose our master.'], u'Antoine de Saint-Exupery': [u"If you want to build a ship, don't drum up people to collect wood and don't assign them tasks and work, but rather teach them to long for the endless immensity of the sea.", u'Love does not consist in gazing at each other, but in looking outward together in the same direction.', u'True happiness comes from the joy of deeds well done, the zest of creating things new.', u'A designer knows he has achieved perfection not when there is nothing left to add, but when there is nothing left to take away.', u'And now here is my secret, a very simple secret; it is only with the heart that one can see rightly, what is essential is invisible to the eye.', u'It is only with the heart that one can see rightly; what is essential is invisible to the eye.', u'A rock pile ceases to be a rock pile the moment a single man contemplates it, bearing within him the image of a cathedral.', u'For true love is inexhaustible; the more you give, the more you have. And if you go to draw at the true fountainhead, the more water you draw, the more abundant is its flow.', u'Life has meaning only if one barters it day by day for something other than itself.', u'A single event can awaken within us a stranger totally unknown to us. To live is to be slowly born.', u"I have no right, by anything I do or say, to demean a human being in his own eyes. What matters is not what I think of him; it is what he thinks of himself. To undermine a man's self-respect is a sin.", u'Night, the beloved. Night, when words fade and things come alive. When the destructive analysis of day is done, and all that is truly important becomes whole and sound again. When man reassembles his fragmentary self and grows with the calm of a tree.', u"The time for action is now. It's never too late to do something.", u'Tell me who admires and loves you, and I will tell you who you are.', u'Grown-ups never understand anything for themselves, and it is tiresome for children to be always and forever explaining things to them.', u'You are responsible, forever, for what you have tamed. You are responsible for your rose.', u'A civilization is a heritage of beliefs, customs, and knowledge slowly accumulated in the course of centuries, elements difficult at times to justify by logic, but justifying themselves as paths when they lead somewhere, since they open up for man his inner distance.', u'A chief is a man who assumes responsibility. He says "I was beaten," he does not say "My men were beaten".', u'I know but one freedom, and that is the freedom of the mind.', u'He who has gone, so we but cherish his memory, abides with us, more potent, nay, more present than the living man.', u'It is such a secret place, the land of tears.', u"'Men have forgotten this truth,' said the fox. 'But you must not forget it. You become responsible, forever, for what you have tamed.'", u'It is in the compelling zest of high adventure and of victory, and in creative action, that man finds his supreme joys.', u'Perfection is finally attained not when there is no longer anything to add but when there is no longer anything to take away, when a body has been stripped down to its nakedness.', u'Each man must look to himself to teach him the meaning of life. It is not something discovered: it is something molded.'], u'John Burroughs': [u'I still find each day too short for all the thoughts I want to think, all the walks I want to take, all the books I want to read, and all the friends I want to see.', u"A man can fail many times, but he isn't a failure until he begins to blame somebody else.", u'Leap, and the net will appear.', u'For anything worth having one must pay the price; and the price is always work, patience, love, self-sacrifice - no paper currency, no promises to pay, but the gold of real service.', u'I go to nature to be soothed and healed, and to have my senses put in order.', u'To me - old age is always ten years older than I am.', u'A man can get discouraged many times but he is not a failure until he begins to blame somebody else and stops trying.', u'How beautiful the leaves grow old. How full of light and color are their last days.', u'The spirit of man can endure only so much and when it is broken only a miracle can mend it.', u'The lure of the distant and the difficult is deceptive. The great opportunity is where you are.', u'Nature teaches more than she preaches. There are no sermons in stones. It is easier to get a spark out of a stone than a moral.', u'The Kingdom of Heaven is not a place, but a state of mind.', u'The smallest deed is better than the greatest intention.', u'If we take science as our sole guide, if we accept and hold fast that alone which is verifiable, the old theology must go.', u'A somebody was once a nobody who wanted to and did.', u'If you think you can do it, you can.', u'It is always easier to believe than to deny. Our minds are naturally affirmative.', u'Life is a struggle, but not a warfare.', u'To learn something new, take the path that you took yesterday.', u'To treat your facts with imagination is one thing, to imagine your facts is another.', u'Blessed is the man who has some congenial work, some occupation in which he can put his heart, and which affords a complete outlet to all the forces there are in him.', u'I have discovered the secret of happiness - it is work, either with the hands or the head. The moment I have something to do, the draughts are open and my chimney draws, and I am happy.', u'I seldom go into a natural history museum without feeling as if I were attending a funeral.', u'Joy in the universe, and keen curiosity about it all - that has been my religion.', u'One may summon his philosophy when they are beaten in battle, not till then.'], u'Mignon McLaughlin': [u'A successful marriage requires falling in love many times, always with the same person.', u'A sense of humor is a major defense against minor troubles.', u"It's the most unhappy people who most fear change.", u'For the happiest life, days should be rigorously planned, nights left open to chance.', u'Albert Einstein when asked what he considered to be the most powerful force in the universe answered: Compound interest! What you have become is the price you paid to get what you used to want.', u'It is important to our friends to believe that we are unreservedly frank with them, and important to friendship that we are not.', u'We all become great explorers during our first few days in a new city, or a new love affair.', u'The head never rules the heart, but just becomes its partner in crime.', u"If you made a list of reasons why any couple got married, and another list of the reasons for their divorce, you'd have a hell of a lot of overlapping.", u'Love is the silent saying and saying of a single name.', u'In the arithmetic of love, one plus one equals everything, and two minus one equals nothing.', u'A woman telling her true age is like a buyer confiding his final price to an Armenian rug dealer.', u'Even cowards can endure hardship; only the brave can endure suspense.', u'Society honors its living conformists and its dead troublemakers.', u'What you have become is the price you paid to get what you used to want.', u'Youth is not enough. And love is not enough. And success is not enough. And, if we could achieve it, enough would not be enough.', u'A car is useless in New York, essential everywhere else. The same with good manners.', u"Courage can't see around corners but goes around them anyway.", u'Nymphomaniac: a woman as obsessed with sex as an average man.', u'Learning too soon our limitations, we never learn our powers.', u'No one has ever loved anyone the way everyone wants to be loved.', u'The only courage that matters is the kind that gets you from one moment to the next.', u'We lavish on animals the love we are afraid to show to people. They might not return it; or worse, they might.', u'Hope is the feeling we have that the feeling we have is not permanent.', u'If you are brave too often, people will come to expect it of you.'], u'Buddha': [u'Do not dwell in the past, do not dream of the future, concentrate the mind on the present moment.', u'The way is not in the sky. The way is in the heart.', u'An insincere and evil friend is more to be feared than a wild beast; a wild beast may wound your body, but an evil friend will wound your mind.', u'The tongue like a sharp knife... Kills without drawing blood.', u'Holding on to anger is like grasping a hot coal with the intent of throwing it at someone else; you are the one who gets burned.', u"To enjoy good health, to bring true happiness to one's family, to bring peace to all, one must first discipline and control one's own mind. If a man can control his mind he can find the way to Enlightenment, and all wisdom and virtue will naturally come to him.", u'Health is the greatest gift, contentment the greatest wealth, faithfulness the best relationship.', u'We are shaped by our thoughts; we become what we think. When the mind is pure, joy follows like a shadow that never leaves.', u'You can search throughout the entire universe for someone who is more deserving of your love and affection than you are yourself, and that person is not to be found anywhere. You yourself, as much as anybody in the entire universe deserve your love and affection.', u'Thousands of candles can be lighted from a single candle, and the life of the candle will not be shortened. Happiness never decreases by being shared.', u'However many holy words you read, however many you speak, what good will they do you if you do not act on upon them?', u'It is better to conquer yourself than to win a thousand battles. Then the victory is yours. It cannot be taken from you, not by angels or by demons, heaven or hell.', u'Three things cannot be long hidden: the sun, the moon, and the truth.', u'In the sky, there is no distinction of east and west; people create distinctions out of their own minds and then believe them to be true.', u'Do not overrate what you have received, nor envy others. He who envies others does not obtain peace of mind.', u'To be idle is a short road to death and to be diligent is a way of life; foolish people are idle, wise people are diligent.', u'Better than a thousand hollow words, is one word that brings peace.', u'The whole secret of existence is to have no fear. Never fear what will become of you, depend on no one. Only the moment you reject all help are you freed.', u'There is nothing more dreadful than the habit of doubt. Doubt separates people. It is a poison that disintegrates friendships and breaks up pleasant relations. It is a thorn that irritates and hurts; it is a sword that kills.', u'Hatred does not cease by hatred, but only by love; this is the eternal rule.', u'There are only two mistakes one can make along the road to truth; not going all the way, and not starting.', u'Just as a candle cannot burn without fire, men cannot live without a spiritual life.', u'I never see what has been done; I only see what remains to be done.', u'No one saves us but ourselves. No one can and no one may. We ourselves must walk the path.', u'To keep the body in good health is a duty... otherwise we shall not be able to keep our mind strong and clear.'], u'Steve Martin': [u'A day without sunshine is like, you know, night.', u"You know what your problem is, it's that you haven't seen enough movies - all of life's riddles are answered in the movies.", u'Boy, those French: they have a different word for everything!', u"Don't have sex man. It leads to kissing and pretty soon you have to start talking to them.", u'Talking about music is like dancing about architecture.', u'I like a woman with a head on her shoulders. I hate necks.', u'The real joy is in constructing a sentence. But I see myself as an actor first because writing is what you do when you are ready and acting is what you do when someone else is ready.', u"There is one thing I would break up over, and that is if she caught me with another woman. I won't stand for that.", u"I'm tired of wasting letters when punctuation will do, period.", u'What is comedy? Comedy is the art of making people laugh without making them puke.', u'An apology? Bah! Disgusting! Cowardly! Beneath the dignity of any gentleman, however wrong he might be.', u"Chaos in the midst of chaos isn't funny, but chaos in the midst of order is.", u"I believe entertainment can aspire to be art, and can become art, but if you set out to make art you're an idiot.", u'I believe that sex is one of the most beautiful, natural, wholesome things that money can buy.', u"When your hobbies get in the way of your work - that's OK; but when your hobbies get in the way of themselves... well.", u"Bad psychoanalysis would say I enjoyed pleasing people, working really hard and pleasing people, which is probably related to my father in some way. But I really liked working hard. When I worked at Disneyland, I'd do 12 hours straight and go home thrilled.", u"I loved to make people laugh in high school, and then I found I loved being on stage in front of people. I'm sure that's some kind of ego trip or a way to overcome shyness. I was very kind of shy and reserved, so there's a way to be on stage and be performing and balance your life out.", u"I realized that comedians of the day were operating on jokes and punch lines. The moment you say the punch line, the audience either laughs sincerely or they laugh automatically or they don't laugh. The thing that bothered me was that automatic laugh. I said, that's not real laughter.", u'I think I did pretty well, considering I started out with nothing but a bunch of blank paper.', u"I think I meant that, given the circumstances of my childhood, I had the illusion that it's easier to be alone. To have your relationships be casual and also to pose as a solitary person, because it was more romantic. You know, I was raised on the idea of the ramblin' man and the loner.", u'Love is a promise delivered already broken.', u'When I first started doing my comedy act, I just desperately needed material. So I took literally everything I knew how to do on stage with me, which was juggling, magic and banjo and my little comedy routines. I always felt the audience sorta tolerated the serious musical parts while I was doing my comedy.', u"Comedy may be big business but it isn't pretty.", u'Dinosaurs did not walk with humans. The evolutionary record says different. They gambled.', u"'Dirty Rotten Scoundrels' is a good one because it not only turned out, I think, to be a really funny movie but it was also a delight to shoot. We were in the South of France, working with Glenne Headly and Michael Caine and Frank Oz the director - who were just fun."], u'T. S. Eliot': [u'We shall not cease from exploration, and the end of all our exploring will be to arrive where we started and know the place for the first time.', u'Only those who will risk going too far can possibly find out how far one can go.', u'What we call the beginning is often the end. And to make an end is to make a beginning. The end is where we start from.', u'Poetry is not a turning loose of emotion, but an escape from emotion; it is not the expression of personality, but an escape from personality. But, of course, only those who have personality and emotions know what it means to want to escape from these things.', u'Anxiety is the hand maiden of creativity.', u'Genuine poetry can communicate before it is understood.', u"Half of the harm that is done in this world is due to people who want to feel important. They don't mean to do harm. But the harm does not interest them.", u'Where is the Life we have lost in living? Where is the wisdom we have lost in knowledge? Where is the knowledge we have lost in information?', u'All significant truths are private truths. As they become public they cease to become truths; they become facts, or at best, part of the public character; or at worst, catchwords.', u'For love would be love of the wrong thing; there is yet faith, But the faith and the love and the hope are all in the waiting.', u'You are the music while the music lasts.', u'It is obvious that we can no more explain a passion to a person who has never experienced it than we can explain light to the blind.', u'O Lord, deliver me from the man of excellent intention and impure heart: for the heart is deceitful above all things, and desperately wicked.', u"If you aren't in over your head, how do you know how tall you are?", u'A toothache, or a violent passion, is not necessarily diminished by our knowledge of its causes, its character, its importance or insignificance.', u'Humankind cannot bear very much reality.', u"I don't believe one grows older. I think that what happens early on in life is that at a certain age one stands still and stagnates.", u'I have measured out my life with coffee spoons.', u'I will show you fear in a handful of dust.', u'And they write innumerable books; being too vain and distracted for silence: seeking every one after his own elevation, and dodging his emptiness.', u'Every experience is a paradox in that it means to be absolute, and yet is relative; in that it somehow always goes beyond itself and yet never escapes itself.', u"It's strange that words are so inadequate. Yet, like the asthmatic struggling for breath, so the lover must struggle for words.", u'Home is where one starts from.', u'Immature poets imitate; mature poets steal.', u'I said to my soul, be still, and wait without hope, For hope would be hope for the wrong thing.'], u'George Bernard Shaw': [u'A life spent making mistakes is not only more honorable, but more useful than a life spent doing nothing.', u'A government that robs Peter to pay Paul can always depend on the support of Paul.', u'I learned long ago, never to wrestle with a pig. You get dirty, and besides, the pig likes it.', u'Youth is wasted on the young.', u'First love is only a little foolishness and a lot of curiosity.', u'The single biggest problem in communication is the illusion that it has taken place.', u"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself.", u"We don't stop playing because we grow old; we grow old because we stop playing.", u'If history repeats itself, and the unexpected always happens, how incapable must Man be of learning from experience.', u"A fool's brain digests philosophy into folly, science into superstition, and art into pedantry. Hence University education.", u'People who say it cannot be done should not interrupt those who are doing it.', u'Alcohol is the anesthesia by which we endure the operation of life.', u'Beware of false knowledge; it is more dangerous than ignorance.', u'Democracy is a device that insures we shall be governed no better than we deserve.', u'A happy family is but an earlier heaven.', u'We are made wise not by the recollection of our past, but by the responsibility for our future.', u'A gentleman is one who puts more into the world than he takes out.', u'Do not waste your time on Social Questions. What is the matter with the poor is Poverty; what is the matter with the rich is Uselessness.', u'Use your health, even to the point of wearing it out. That is what it is for. Spend all you have before you die; do not outlive yourself.', u'Clever and attractive women do not want to vote; they are willing to let men govern as long as they govern men.', u'It is a curious sensation: the sort of pain that goes mercifully beyond our powers of feeling. When your heart is broken, your boats are burned: nothing matters any more. It is the end of happiness and the beginning of peace.', u'Do not do unto others as you expect they should do unto you. Their tastes may not be the same.', u"If you can't get rid of the skeleton in your closet, you'd best teach it to dance.", u'Life does not cease to be funny when people die any more than it ceases to be serious when people laugh.', u'Progress is impossible without change, and those who cannot change their minds cannot change anything.'], u'Cesare Pavese': [u'Life is pain and the enjoyment of love is an anesthetic.', u'If you wish to travel far and fast, travel light. Take off all your envies, jealousies, unforgiveness, selfishness and fears.', u'Every luxury must be paid for, and everything is a luxury, starting with being in this world.', u'We do not remember days, we remember moments.', u'Give me the ready hand rather than the ready tongue.', u'It is not that the child lives in a world of imagination, but that the child within us survives and starts into life only at rare moments of recollection, which makes us believe, and it is not true, that, as children, we were imaginative?', u'No one ever lacks a good reason for suicide.', u'One does not kill oneself for love of a woman, but because love - any love - reveals us in our nakedness, our misery, our vulnerability, our nothingness.', u'The art of living is the art of knowing how to believe lies.', u'The closing years of life are like the end of a masquerade party, when the masks are dropped.', u"Hate is always a clash between our spirit and someone else's body.", u'He knows not his own strength that hath not met adversity.', u'No woman marries for money; they are all clever enough, before marrying a millionaire, to fall in love with him first.', u'One must look for one thing only, to find many.', u"One stops being a child when one realizes that telling one's trouble does not make it any better.", u'The only joy in the world is to begin.', u'The richness of life lies in memories we have forgotten.', u'A man is never completely alone in this world. At the worst, he has the company of a boy, a youth, and by and by a grown man - the one he used to be.', u'All sins have their origin in a sense of inferiority otherwise called ambition.', u'Artists are the monks of the bourgeois state.', u'If it were possible to have a life absolutely free from every feeling of sin, what a terrifying vacuum it would be.', u'Lessons are not given, they are taken.', u'Living is like working out a long addition sum, and if you make a mistake in the first two totals you will never find the right answer. It means involving oneself in a complicated chain of circumstances.', u'Love is the cheapest of religions.', u"Will power is only the tensile strength of one's own disposition. One cannot increase it by a single ounce."], u'Jim Valvano': [u"Don't give up. Don't ever give up.", u"If you laugh, you think, and you cry, that's a full day. That's a heck of a day. You do that seven days a week, you're going to have something special.", u'My father gave me the greatest gift anyone could give another person, he believed in me.', u'Cancer can take away all of my physical abilities. It cannot touch my mind, it cannot touch my heart, and it cannot touch my soul.', u'How do you go from where you are to where you wanna be? And I think you have to have an enthusiasm for life. You have to have a dream, a goal. And you have to be willing to work for it.', u"I just got one last thing, I urge all of you, all of you, to enjoy your life, the precious moments you have. To spend each day with some laughter and some thought, to get you're emotions going.", u"Be a dreamer. If you don't know how to dream, you're dead.", u"I asked a ref if he could give me a technical foul for thinking bad things about him. He said, of course not. I said, well, I think you stink. And he gave me a technical. You can't trust em.", u"Now I'm fighting cancer, everybody knows that. People ask me all the time about how you go through your life and how's your day, and nothing is changed for me.", u"And if you see me, smile and maybe give me a hug. That's important to me too.", u"Time is very precious to me. I don't know how much I have left and I have some things that I would like to say. Hopefully, at the end, I will have said something that will be important to other people too.", u'I will thank God for the day and the moment I have.', u"But try if you can to support, whether it's AIDS or the cancer foundation, so that someone else might survive, might prosper, and might actually be cured of this dreaded disease.", u"No matter what business you're in, you can't run in place or someone will pass you by. It doesn't matter how many games you've won.", u'Now, I look at where I am now and I know what I wanna to do. What I would like to be able to do is to spend whatever time I have left and to give, and maybe some hope to others.', u"We need your help. I need your help. We need money for research. It may not save my life. It may save my children's life. It may save someone you love. And it's very important.", u"And I'm going to work as hard as I can... for cancer research and hopefully, maybe, we'll have some cures and some breakthroughs. I'd like to think I'm going to fight my brains out to be back here again next year for the Arthur Ashe recipient. I want to give it next year!", u"I can't tell you what an honor it is, to even be mentioned in the same breath with Arthur Ashe. This is something I certainly will treasure forever.", u"I talked about my family, my family's so important.", u"I'll also tell you that five hundred thousand people will die this year of cancer. And I'll also tell you that one in every four will be afflicted with this disease, and yet, somehow, we seem to have put it in a little bit of the background.", u"People think I have courage. The courage in my family are my wife Pam, my three daughters, here, Nicole, Jamie, LeeAnn, my mom, who's right here too."], u'Benjamin Franklin': [u"The U. S. Constitution doesn't guarantee happiness, only the pursuit of it. You have to catch up with it yourself.", u'We are all born ignorant, but one must work hard to remain stupid.', u'They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety deserve neither liberty nor safety.', u'Wine is constant proof that God loves us and loves to see us happy.', u'By failing to prepare, you are preparing to fail.', u'Three can keep a secret, if two of them are dead.', u'Any fool can criticize, condemn and complain - and most fools do.', u'An investment in knowledge pays the best interest.', u'The Constitution only gives people the right to pursue happiness. You have to catch it yourself.', u'Money has never made man happy, nor will it, there is nothing in its nature to produce happiness. The more of it one has the more one wants.', u'Tell me and I forget. Teach me and I remember. Involve me and I learn.', u'Either write something worth reading or do something worth writing.', u'Honesty is the best policy.', u"Life's Tragedy is that we get old to soon and wise too late.", u'Remember not only to say the right thing in the right place, but far more difficult still, to leave unsaid the wrong thing at the tempting moment.', u'Lost time is never found again.', u'A house is not a home unless it contains food and fire for the mind as well as the body.', u'Do not fear mistakes. You will know failure. Continue to reach out.', u'All mankind is divided into three classes: those that are immovable, those that are movable, and those that move.', u'Who is wise? He that learns from everyone. Who is powerful? He that governs his passions. Who is rich? He that is content. Who is that? Nobody.', u'I wake up every morning at nine and grab for the morning paper. Then I look at the obituary page. If my name is not on it, I get up.', u'He that is good for making excuses is seldom good for anything else.', u'Guests, like fish, begin to smell after three days.', u'Well done is better than well said.', u'A penny saved is a penny earned.'], u'Galileo Galilei': [u'I do not feel obliged to believe that the same God who has endowed us with sense, reason, and intellect has intended us to forgo their use.', u'All truths are easy to understand once they are discovered; the point is to discover them.', u'We cannot teach people anything; we can only help them discover it within themselves.', u"I have never met a man so ignorant that I couldn't learn something from him.", u'The sun, with all those planets revolving around it and dependent on it, can still ripen a bunch of grapes as if it had nothing else in the universe to do.', u'Facts which at first seem improbable will, even on scant explanation, drop the cloak which has hidden them and stand forth in naked and simple beauty.', u'Measure what is measurable, and make measurable what is not so.', u'The Bible shows the way to go to heaven, not the way the heavens go.', u'It vexes me when they would constrain science by the authority of the Scriptures, and yet do not consider themselves bound to answer reason and experiment.', u'By denying scientific principles, one may maintain any paradox.', u'Where the senses fail us, reason must step in.', u'If I were again beginning my studies, I would follow the advice of Plato and start with mathematics.', u'In questions of science, the authority of a thousand is not worth the humble reasoning of a single individual.', u'And yet it moves.', u'I think that in the discussion of natural problems we ought to begin not with the Scriptures, but with experiments, and demonstrations.', u'Nature is relentless and unchangeable, and it is indifferent as to whether its hidden reasons and actions are understandable to man or not.', u'It is surely harmful to souls to make it a heresy to believe what is proved.', u'The Milky Way is nothing else but a mass of innumerable stars planted together in clusters.', u'We must say that there are as many squares as there are numbers.'], u'Che Guevara': [u'The revolution is not an apple that falls when it is ripe. You have to make it fall.', u'Cruel leaders are replaced only to have new leaders turn cruel.', u"I don't care if I fall as long as someone else picks up my gun and keeps on shooting.", u'Silence is argument carried out by other means.', u'Whenever death may surprise us, let it be welcome if our battle cry has reached even one receptive ear and another hand reaches out to take up our arms.', u'I know you are here to kill me. Shoot, coward, you are only going to kill a man.', u'Many will call me an adventurer - and that I am, only one of a different sort: one of those who risks his skin to prove his platitudes.'], u'James Russell Lowell': [u'One thorn of experience is worth a whole wilderness of warning.', u"Usually when people are sad, they don't do anything. They just cry over their condition. But when they get angry, they bring about a change.", u'Thank God every morning when you get up that you have something to do that day, which must be done, whether you like it or not.', u'All the beautiful sentiments in the world weigh less than a single lovely action.', u'Democracy gives every man the right to be his own oppressor.', u'Compromise makes a good umbrella, but a poor roof; it is temporary expedient, often wise in party politics, almost sure to be unwise in statesmanship.', u'Joy comes, grief goes, we know not how.', u"Children are God's Apostles, sent forth, day by day, to preach of love, and hope, and peace.", u'A weed is no more than a flower in disguise, Which is seen through at once, if love give a man eyes.', u'Fate loves the fearless.', u'Every man feels instinctively that all the beautiful sentiments in the world weigh less than a single lovely action.', u'Light is the symbol of truth.', u'Creativity is not the finding of a thing, but the making something out of it after it is found.', u'Not failure, but low aim, is crime.', u'Endurance is the crowning quality, And patience all the passion of great hearts.', u'Let us be of good cheer, however, remembering that the misfortunes hardest to bear are those which never come.', u'As life runs on, the road grows strange with faces new - and near the end. The milestones into headstones change, Neath every one a friend.', u'Blessed are they who have nothing to say and who cannot be persuaded to say it.', u'Every person born into this world their work is born with them.', u'Toward no crimes have men shown themselves so cold- bloodedly cruel as in punishing differences of belief.', u'A great man is made up of qualities that meet or make great occasions.', u'Books are the bees which carry the quickening pollen from one to another mind.', u'Folks never understand the folks they hate.', u'Freedom is the only law which genius knows.', u'On one issue at least, men and women agree; they both distrust women.'], u'Bob Dylan': [u"What's money? A man is a success if he gets up in the morning and goes to bed at night and in between does what he wants to do.", u'A hero is someone who understands the responsibility that comes with his freedom.', u'People seldom do what they believe in. They do what is convenient, then repent.', u"I don't think the human mind can comprehend the past and the future. They are both just illusions that can manipulate you into thinking theres some kind of change.", u'All I can do is be me, whoever that is.', u"Democracy don't rule the world, You'd better get that in your head; This world is ruled by violence, But I guess that's better left unsaid.", u"I am against nature. I don't dig nature at all. I think nature is very unnatural. I think the truly natural things are dreams, which nature can't touch with decay.", u'All this talk about equality. The only thing people really have in common is that they are all going to die.', u'Take care of all your memories. For you cannot relive them.', u'A mistake is to commit a misunderstanding.', u"Don't matter how much money you got, there's only two kinds of people: there's saved people and there's lost people.", u'All the truth in the world adds up to one big lie.', u'Being noticed can be a burden. Jesus got himself crucified because he got himself noticed. So I disappear a lot.', u'At times in my life the only place I have been happy is when I am on stage.', u'I define nothing. Not beauty, not patriotism. I take each thing as it is, without prior rules about what it should be.', u'This land is your land and this land is my land, sure, but the world is run by those that never listen to music anyway.', u'He not busy being born is busy dying.', u"I consider myself a poet first and a musician second. I live like a poet and I'll die like a poet.", u'No one is free, even the birds are chained to the sky.', u"I accept chaos, I'm not sure whether it accepts me.", u'To live outside the law, you must be honest.', u'Chaos is a friend of mine.', u'I think of a hero as someone who understands the degree of responsibility that comes with his freedom.', u"Money doesn't talk, it swears.", u'People today are still living off the table scraps of the sixties. They are still being passed around - the music and the ideas.'], u'Walt Whitman': [u'Do I contradict myself? Very well, then I contradict myself, I am large, I contain multitudes.', u'Keep your face always toward the sunshine - and shadows will fall behind you.', u'Every moment of light and dark is a miracle.', u'Have you learned the lessons only of those who admired you, and were tender with you, and stood aside for you? Have you not learned great lessons from those who braced themselves against you, and disputed passage with you?', u'I am as bad as the worst, but, thank God, I am as good as the best.', u'Be curious, not judgmental.', u'After you have exhausted what there is in business, politics, conviviality, and so on - have found that none of these finally satisfy, or permanently wear - what remains? Nature remains.', u"I no doubt deserved my enemies, but I don't believe I deserved my friends.", u'Re-examine all that you have been told... dismiss that which insults your soul.', u'Behold I do not give lectures or a little charity, When I give I give myself.', u"I see great things in baseball. It's our game - the American game.", u'A morning-glory at my window satisfies me more than the metaphysics of books.', u'I believe a leaf of grass is no less than the journey-work of the stars.', u'Give me odorous at sunrise a garden of beautiful flowers where I can walk undisturbed.', u'I have learned that to be with those I like is enough.', u"If you done it, it ain't bragging.", u'There is no week nor day nor hour when tyranny may not enter upon this country, if the people lose their roughness and spirit of defiance.', u'In the confusion we stay with each other, happy to be together, speaking without uttering a single word.', u'Oh while I live, to be the ruler of life, not a slave, to meet life as a powerful conqueror, and nothing exterior to me will ever take command of me.', u'I cannot be awake for nothing looks to me as it did before, Or else I am awake for the first time, and all before has been a mean sleep.', u'O public road, I say back I am not afraid to leave you, yet I love you, you express me better than I can express myself.', u'I exist as I am, that is enough.', u'Let your soul stand cool and composed before a million universes.', u'The genius of the United States is not best or most in its executives or legislatures, nor in its ambassadors or authors or colleges, or churches, or parlors, nor even in its newspapers or inventors, but always most in the common people.', u'The future is no more uncertain than the present.'], u'Fran Lebowitz': [u"Life is something to do when you can't get to sleep.", u'Food is an important part of a balanced diet.', u'There is no such thing as inner peace. There is only nervousness or death. Any attempt to prove otherwise constitutes unacceptable behavior.', u"Do not, on a rainy day, ask your child what he feels like doing, because I assure you that what he feels like doing, you won't feel like watching.", u'Great people talk about ideas, average people talk about things, and small people talk about wine.', u'Very few people possess true artistic ability. It is therefore both unseemly and unproductive to irritate the situation by making an effort. If you have a burning, restless urge to write or paint, simply eat something sweet and the feeling will pass.', u"You're only as good as your last haircut.", u'I place a high moral value on the way people behave. I find it repellent to have a lot, and to behave with anything other than courtesy in the old sense of the word - politeness of the heart, a gentleness of the spirit.', u'As a teenager you are at the last stage in your life when you will be happy to hear that the phone is for you.', u"Romantic love is mental illness. But it's a pleasurable one. It's a drug. It distorts reality, and that's the point of it. It would be impossible to fall in love with someone that you really saw.", u"Ask your child what he wants for dinner only if he's buying.", u"The opposite of talking isn't listening. The opposite of talking is waiting.", u"I've done the calculation and your chances of winning the lottery are identical whether you play or not.", u'In the Soviet Union, capitalism triumphed over communism. In this country, capitalism triumphed over democracy.', u'Stand firm in your refusal to remain conscious during algebra. In real life, I assure you, there is no such thing as algebra.', u"I never met anyone who didn't have a very smart child. What happens to these children, you wonder, when they reach adulthood?", u"All God's children are not beautiful. Most of God's children are, in fact, barely presentable.", u"Success didn't spoil me, I've always been insufferable.", u'Original thought is like original sin: both happened before you were born to people you could not have possibly met.', u'Children are the most desirable opponents at scrabble as they are both easy to beat and fun to cheat.', u'My favorite animal is steak.', u'To put it rather bluntly, I am not the type who wants to go back to the land; I am the type who wants to go back to the hotel.', u'I never took hallucinogenic drugs because I never wanted my consciousness expanded one unnecessary iota.', u'Polite conversation is rarely either.', u'Vegetables are interesting but lack a sense of purpose when unaccompanied by a good cut of meat.'], u'Napoleon Hill': [u'Think twice before you speak, because your words and influence will plant the seed of either success or failure in the mind of another.', u'Think and grow rich.', u'Fears are nothing more than a state of mind.', u"Before success comes in any man's life, he's sure to meet with much temporary defeat and, perhaps some failures. When defeat overtakes a man, the easiest and the most logical thing to do is to quit. That's exactly what the majority of men do.", u'Patience, persistence and perspiration make an unbeatable combination for success.', u'Action is the real measure of intelligence.', u'Great achievement is usually born of great sacrifice, and is never the result of selfishness.', u'Any idea, plan, or purpose may be placed in the mind through repetition of thought.', u'Every adversity, every failure, every heartache carries with it the seed on an equal or greater benefit.', u'All the breaks you need in life wait within your imagination, Imagination is the workshop of your mind, capable of turning mind energy into accomplishment and wealth.', u'A goal is a dream with a deadline.', u'Cherish your visions and your dreams as they are the children of your soul, the blueprints of your ultimate achievements.', u'Desire is the starting point of all achievement, not a hope, not a wish, but a keen pulsating desire which transcends everything.', u'Effort only fully releases its reward after a person refuses to quit.', u"Don't wait. The time will never be just right.", u'First comes thought; then organization of that thought, into ideas and plans; then transformation of those plans into reality. The beginning, as you will observe, is in your imagination.', u'Edison failed 10,000 times before he made the electric light. Do not be discouraged if you fail a few times.', u'If you do not conquer self, you will be conquered by self.', u'Education comes from within; you get it by struggle and effort and thought.', u'Strength and growth come only through continuous effort and struggle.', u'Every person who wins in any undertaking must be willing to cut all sources of retreat. Only by doing so can one be sure of maintaining that state of mind known as a burning desire to win - essential to success.', u'There is one quality which one must possess to win, and that is definiteness of purpose, the knowledge of what one wants, and a burning desire to possess it.', u'Wise men, when in doubt whether to speak or to keep quiet, give themselves the benefit of the doubt, and remain silent.', u'We begin to see, therefore, the importance of selecting our environment with the greatest of care, because environment is the mental feeding ground out of which the food that goes into our minds is extracted.', u'Most great people have attained their greatest success just one step beyond their greatest failure.'], u'Michel de Montaigne': [u'A good marriage would be between a blind wife and a deaf husband.', u'If you press me to say why I loved him, I can say no more than because he was he, and I was I.', u'The value of life lies not in the length of days, but in the use we make of them... Whether you find satisfaction in life depends not on your tale of years, but on your will.', u'If there is such a thing as a good marriage, it is because it resembles friendship rather than love.', u'Nothing fixes a thing so intensely in the memory as the wish to forget it.', u'It is a monstrous thing that I will say, but I will say it all the same: I find in many things more restraint and order in my morals than in my opinions, and my lust less depraved than my reason.', u"Stubborn and ardent clinging to one's opinion is the best proof of stupidity.", u"Confidence in others' honesty is no light testimony of one's own integrity.", u'It is good to rub and polish our brain against that of others.', u'The beautiful souls are they that are universal, open, and ready for all things.', u'There is no pleasure to me without communication: there is not so much as a sprightly thought comes into my mind that it does not grieve me to have produced alone, and that I have no one to tell it to.', u'A man who fears suffering is already suffering from what he fears.', u'There is no conversation more boring than the one where everybody agrees.', u"Confidence in the goodness of another is good proof of one's own goodness.", u'I quote others only in order the better to express myself.', u'My life has been full of terrible misfortunes most of which never happened.', u'I study myself more than any other subject. That is my metaphysics, that is my physics.', u'Lend yourself to others, but give yourself to yourself.', u'He who establishes his argument by noise and command shows that his reason is weak.', u'I have never seen a greater monster or miracle in the world than myself.', u'Marriage is like a cage; one sees the birds outside desperate to get in, and those inside equally desperate to get out.', u'Valor is stability, not of legs and arms, but of courage and the soul.', u'I care not so much what I am to others as what I am to myself. I will be rich by myself, and not by borrowing.', u'I do myself a greater injury in lying than I do him of whom I tell a lie.', u'I speak the truth not so much as I would, but as much as I dare, and I dare a little more as I grow older.'], u'Colin Powell': [u"A dream doesn't become reality through magic; it takes sweat, determination and hard work.", u'Leadership is solving problems. The day soldiers stop bringing you their problems is the day you have stopped leading them. They have either lost confidence that you can help or concluded you do not care. Either case is a failure of leadership.', u'There are no secrets to success. It is the result of preparation, hard work, and learning from failure.', u"But just as they did in Philadelphia when they were writing the constitution, sooner or later, you've got to compromise. You've got to start making the compromises that arrive at a consensus and move the country forward.", u'Get mad, then get over it.', u"Don't let your ego get too close to your position, so that if your position gets shot down, your ego doesn't go with it.", u'Surround yourself with people who take their work seriously, but not themselves, those who work hard and play hard.', u'Success is the result of perfection, hard work, learning from failure, loyalty, and persistence.', u'If you are going to achieve excellence in big things, you develop the habit in little matters. Excellence is not an exception, it is a prevailing attitude.', u'Avoid having your ego so close to your position that when your position falls, your ego goes with it.', u'Great leaders are almost always great simplifiers, who can cut through argument, debate and doubt, to offer a solution everybody can understand.', u'Perpetual optimism is a force multiplier.', u'The chief condition on which, life, health and vigor depend on, is action. It is by action that an organism develops its faculties, increases its energy, and attains the fulfillment of its destiny.', u"You don't know what you can get away with until you try.", u"I think whether you're having setbacks or not, the role of a leader is to always display a winning attitude.", u"Many interviewers when they come to talk to me, think they're being progressive by not mentioning in their stories any longer that I'm black. I tell them, 'Don't stop now. If I shot somebody you'd mention it.'", u'90 percent of my time is spent on 10 percent of the world.', u"It ain't as bad as you think. It will look better in the morning.", u"Bad news isn't wine. It doesn't improve with age.", u'I respect the fact that many denominations have different points of view with respect to gay marriage and they can hold that in the sanctity in the place of their religion and not bless them or solemnize them.', u"Don't bother people for help without first trying to solve the problem yourself.", u"Fit no stereotypes. Don't chase the latest management fads. The situation dictates which approach best accomplishes the team's mission.", u"My own experience is use the tools that are out there. Use the digital world. But never lose sight of the need to reach out and talk to other people who don't share your view. Listen to them and see if you can find a way to compromise.", u'Giving back involves a certain amount of giving up.', u"It isn't enough just to scream at the Occupy Wall Street demonstrations. We need our political system to start reflect this anger back into, 'How do we fix it? How do we get the economy going again?'"], u'Patrick Henry': [u'The liberties of a people never were, nor ever will be, secure, when the transactions of their rulers may be concealed from them.', u'Is life so dear or peace so sweet as to be purchased at the price of chains and slavery? Forbid it, Almighty God! I know not what course others may take, but as for me, give me liberty, or give me death!', u'Guard with jealous attention the public liberty. Suspect everyone who approaches that jewel. Unfortunately, nothing will preserve it but downright force. Whenever you give up that force, you are inevitably ruined.', u'Are we at last brought to such humiliating and debasing degradation, that we cannot be trusted with arms for our defense?', u'For my part, whatever anguish of spirit it may cost, I am willing to know the whole truth; to know the worst and provide for it.', u'Give me liberty or give me death.', u'This is all the inheritance I give to my dear family. The religion of Christ will give them one which will make them rich indeed.', u'The Bible is worth all the other books which have ever been printed.', u'When the American spirit was in its youth, the language of America was different: Liberty, sir, was the primary object.', u'I know of no way of judging the future but by the past.', u'Perfect freedom is as necessary to the health and vigor of commerce as it is to the health and vigor of citizenship.', u'I have now disposed of all my property to my family. There is one thing more I wish I could give them, and that is the Christian religion.', u'Fear is the passion of slaves.', u'I know not what others may choose but, as for me, give me liberty or give me death.', u'The great object is that every man be armed.', u'We are not weak if we make a proper use of those means which the God of Nature has placed in our power... the battle, sir, is not to the strong alone it is to the vigilant, the active, the brave.', u'If this be treason, make the most of it!', u'I have but one lamp by which my feet are guided, and that is the lamp of experience.'], u'Marcus Tullius Cicero': [u'If you have a garden and a library, you have everything you need.', u'The wise are instructed by reason, average minds by experience, the stupid by necessity and the brute by instinct.', u"While there's life, there's hope.", u'The pursuit, even of the best things, ought to be calm and tranquil.', u'A man of courage is also full of faith.', u'Nobody can give you wiser advice than yourself.', u'The life of the dead is placed in the memory of the living.', u'Any man can make mistakes, but only an idiot persists in his error.', u"Advice in old age is foolish; for what can be more absurd than to increase our provisions for the road the nearer we approach to our journey's end.", u'As fire when thrown into water is cooled down and put out, so also a false accusation when brought against a man of the purest and holiest character, boils over and is at once dissipated, and vanishes and threats of heaven and sea, himself standing unmoved.', u'A friend is, as it were, a second self.', u'According to the law of nature it is only fair that no one should become richer through damages and injuries suffered by another.', u'As I approve of a youth that has something of the old man in him, so I am no less pleased with an old man that has something of the youth. He that follows this rule may be old in body, but can never be so in mind.', u'Nothing is more noble, nothing more venerable than fidelity. Faithfulness and truth are the most sacred excellences and endowments of the human mind.', u'The rule of friendship means there should be mutual sympathy between them, each supplying what the other lacks and trying to benefit the other, always using friendly and sincere words.', u'Gratitude is not only the greatest of virtues, but the parent of all the others.', u'Nothing is more unreliable than the populace, nothing more obscure than human intentions, nothing more deceptive than the whole electoral system.', u'If you have no confidence in self, you are twice defeated in the race of life. With confidence, you have won even before you have started.', u'What sweetness is left in life, if you take away friendship? Robbing life of friendship is like robbing the world of the sun. A true friend is more to be esteemed than kinsfolk.', u'Just as the soul fills the body, so God fills the world. Just as the soul bears the body, so God endures the world. Just as the soul sees but is not seen, so God sees but is not seen. Just as the soul feeds the body, so God gives food to the world.', u'Let us not listen to those who think we ought to be angry with our enemies, and who believe this to be great and manly. Nothing is so praiseworthy, nothing so clearly shows a great and noble soul, as clemency and readiness to forgive.', u'In a republic this rule ought to be observed: that the majority should not have the predominant power.', u'It is the peculiar quality of a fool to perceive the faults of others and to forget his own.', u'Cultivation to the mind is as necessary as food to the body.', u'A home without books is a body without soul.'], u'Rene Descartes': [u'Divide each difficulty into as many parts as is feasible and necessary to resolve it.', u'The senses deceive from time to time, and it is prudent never to trust wholly those who have deceived us even once.', u'An optimist may see a light where there is none, but why must the pessimist always run to blow it out?', u'I think; therefore I am.', u'It is not enough to have a good mind; the main thing is to use it well.', u'You just keep pushing. You just keep pushing. I made every mistake that could be made. But I just kept pushing.', u'I am accustomed to sleep and in my dreams to imagine the same things that lunatics imagine when awake.', u'Common sense is the most fairly distributed thing in the world, for each one thinks he is so well-endowed with it that even those who are hardest to satisfy in all other matters are not in the habit of desiring more of it than they already have.', u'I hope that posterity will judge me kindly, not only as to the things which I have explained, but also to those which I have intentionally omitted so as to leave to others the pleasure of discovery.', u'A state is better governed which has few laws, and those laws strictly observed.', u'If you would be a real seeker after truth, it is necessary that at least once in your life you doubt, as far as possible, all things.', u'Whenever anyone has offended me, I try to raise my soul so high that the offense cannot reach it.', u'Except our own thoughts, there is nothing absolutely in our power.', u'Each problem that I solved became a rule, which served afterwards to solve other problems.', u'The first precept was never to accept a thing as true until I knew it as such without a single doubt.', u'Perfect numbers like perfect men are very rare.', u'Everything is self-evident.', u'The reading of all good books is like a conversation with the finest minds of past centuries.', u'When it is not in our power to follow what is true, we ought to follow what is most probable.', u'It is only prudent never to place complete confidence in that by which we have even once been deceived.', u'The greatest minds are capable of the greatest vices as well as of the greatest virtues.', u'Nothing is more fairly distributed than common sense: no one thinks he needs more of it than he already has.', u'In order to improve the mind, we ought less to learn, than to contemplate.', u'The two operations of our understanding, intuition and deduction, on which alone we have said we must rely in the acquisition of knowledge.', u'Travelling is almost like talking with those of other centuries.'], u'James Dean': [u"Dream as if you'll live forever. Live as if you'll die today.", u"If a man can bridge the gap between life and death, if he can live on after he's dead, then maybe he was a great man.", u'Only the gentle are ever really strong.', u"Studying cows, pigs and chickens can help an actor develop his character. There are a lot of things I learned from animals. One was that they couldn't hiss or boo me.", u'Trust and belief are two prime considerations. You must not allow yourself to be opinionated.', u'The gratification comes in the doing, not in the results.', u'An actor must interpret life, and in order to do so must be willing to accept all the experiences life has to offer. In fact, he must seek out more of life than life puts at his feet.', u'I want to be a Texan 24 hours a day.', u'I also became close to nature, and am now able to appreciate the beauty with which this world is endowed.', u"Being an actor is the loneliest thing in the world. You are all alone with your concentration and imagination, and that's all you have.", u'There is no way to be truly great in this world. We are all impaled on the crook of conditioning.', u"Being a good actor isn't easy. Being a man is even harder. I want to be both before I'm done.", u'The only greatness for man is immortality.', u"But you can't show some far off idyllic conception of behavior if you want the kids to come and see the picture. You've got to show what it's really like, and try to reach them on their own grounds.", u"When an actor plays a scene exactly the way a director orders, it isn't acting. It's following instructions. Anyone with the physical qualifications can do that.", u"I think the one thing this picture shows that's new is the psychological disproportion of the kids' demands on the parents. Parents are often at fault, but the kids have some work to do, too.", u"To grasp the full significance of life is the actor's duty; to interpret it his problem; and to express it his dedication.", u"To me, acting is the most logical way for people's neuroses to manifest themselves, in this great need we all have to express ourselves.", u"To my way of thinking, an actor's course is set even before he's out of the cradle."], u'Aristotle Onassis': [u'It is during our darkest moments that we must focus to see the light.', u"If women didn't exist, all the money in the world would have no meaning.", u'We must free ourselves of the hope that the sea will ever rest. We must learn to sail in high winds.', u'After a certain point, money is meaningless. It ceases to be the goal. The game is what counts.', u'The secret of business is to know something that nobody else knows.', u'I have no friends and no enemies - only competitors.', u'To succeed in business it is necessary to make others see things as you see them.', u"Find a priest who understands English and doesn't look like Rasputin.", u"The more you own, the more you know you don't own."], u'Pope John XXIII': [u'I have looked into your eyes with my eyes. I have put my heart near your heart.', u'It is easier for a father to have children than for children to have a real father.', u'Consult not your fears but your hopes and your dreams. Think not about your frustrations, but about your unfulfilled potential. Concern yourself not with what you tried and failed in, but with what it is still possible for you to do.', u'Men are like wine - some turn to vinegar, but the best improve with age.', u'Born poor, but of honored and humble people, I am particularly proud to die poor.', u'Here I am at the end of the road and at the top of the heap.', u'See everything, overlook a great deal, correct a little.', u'The family is the first essential cell of human society.', u'Every man has the right to life, to bodily integrity.', u'It often happens that I wake up at night and begin to think about a serious problem and decide I must tell the Pope about it. Then I wake up completely and remember that I am the Pope.', u'A peaceful man does more good than a learned one.', u'The feelings of my smallness and my nothingness always kept me good company.', u'It is now for the Catholic Church to bend herself to her work with calmness and generosity. It is for you to observe her with renewed and friendly attention.', u'Italians come to ruin most generally in three ways, women, gambling, and farming. My family chose the slowest one.', u'I am able to follow my own death step by step. Now I move softly towards the end.', u'Anybody can be Pope; the proof of this is that I have become one.', u'The council now beginning rises in the Church like the daybreak, a forerunner of most splendid light.', u'The true and solid peace of nations consists not in equality of arms, but in mutual trust alone.'], u'Aldous Huxley': [u"Experience is not what happens to you; it's what you do with what happens to you.", u'After silence, that which comes nearest to expressing the inexpressible is music.', u'A child-like man is not a man whose development has been arrested; on the contrary, he is a man who has given himself a chance of continuing to develop long after most adults have muffled themselves in the cocoon of middle-aged habit and convention.', u'Dream in a pragmatic way.', u"An intellectual is a person who's found one thing that's more interesting than sex.", u'A belief in hell and the knowledge that every ambition is doomed to frustration at the hands of a skeleton have never prevented the majority of human beings from behaving as though death were no more than an unfounded rumor.', u'Beauty is worse than wine, it intoxicates both the holder and beholder.', u"Maybe this world is another planet's hell.", u"There is only one corner of the universe you can be certain of improving, and that's your own self.", u'Facts do not cease to exist because they are ignored.', u'A democracy which makes or even effectively prepares for modern, scientific war must necessarily cease to be democratic. No country can be really well prepared for modern war unless it is governed by a tyrant, at the head of a highly trained and perfectly obedient bureaucracy.', u"It is a bit embarrassing to have been concerned with the human problem all one's life and find at the end that one has no more to offer by way of advice than 'try to be a little kinder.'", u"You should hurry up and acquire the cigar habit. It's one of the major happinesses. And so much more lasting than love, so much less costly in emotional wear and tear.", u'The more powerful and original a mind, the more it will incline towards the religion of solitude.', u'That men do not learn very much from the lessons of history is the most important of all the lessons of history.', u'Europe is so well gardened that it resembles a work of art, a scientific theory, a neat metaphysical system. Man has re-created Europe in his own image.', u'That we are not much sicker and much madder than we are is due exclusively to that most blessed and blessing of all natural graces, sleep.', u'There are things known and there are things unknown, and in between are the doors of perception.', u'My father considered a walk among the mountains as the equivalent of churchgoing.', u"Cynical realism is the intelligent man's best excuse for doing nothing in an intolerable situation.", u"God isn't compatible with machinery and scientific medicine and universal happiness. You must make your choice. Our civilization has chosen machinery and medicine and happiness.", u"One of the great attractions of patriotism - it fulfills our worst wishes. In the person of our nation we are able, vicariously, to bully and cheat. Bully and cheat, what's more, with a feeling that we are profoundly virtuous.", u'Amour is the one human activity of any importance in which laughter and pleasure preponderate, if ever so slightly, over misery and pain.', u'My fate cannot be mastered; it can only be collaborated with and thereby, to some extent, directed. Nor am I the captain of my soul; I am only its noisiest passenger.', u'The most shocking fact about war is that its victims and its instruments are individual human beings, and that these individual beings are condemned by the monstrous conventions of politics to murder or be murdered in quarrels not their own.'], u'Phyllis Diller': [u"Housework can't kill you, but why take a chance?", u'Cleaning your house while your kids are still growing up is like shoveling the walk before it stops snowing.', u'A smile is a curve that sets everything straight.', u"The reason women don't play football is because 11 of them would never wear the same outfit in public.", u'My cooking is so bad my kids thought Thanksgiving was to commemorate Pearl Harbor.', u'A bachelor is a guy who never made the same mistake once.', u'Always be nice to your children because they are the ones who will choose your rest home.', u'Best way to get rid of kitchen odors: Eat out.', u'My recipe for dealing with anger and frustration: set the kitchen timer for twenty minutes, cry, rant, and rave, and at the sound of the bell, simmer down and go about business as usual.', u'Never go to bed mad. Stay up and fight.', u"I want my children to have all the things I couldn't afford. Then I want to move in with them.", u"What I don't like about office Christmas parties is looking for a job the next day.", u"Aim high, and you won't shoot your foot off.", u'Most children threaten at times to run away from home. This is the only thing that keeps some parents going.', u"We spend the first twelve months of our children's lives teaching them to walk and talk and the next twelve telling them to sit down and shut up.", u'The only time I ever enjoyed ironing was the day I accidentally got gin in the steam iron.', u'Burt Reynolds once asked me out. I was in his room.', u'Any time three New Yorkers get into a cab without an argument, a bank has just been robbed.', u'My mother-in-law had a pain beneath her left breast. Turned out to be a trick knee.', u'I admit, I have a tremendous sex drive. My boyfriend lives forty miles away.', u'Whatever you may look like, marry a man your own age - as your beauty fades, so will his eyesight.', u"It's a good thing that beauty is only skin deep, or I'd be rotten to the core.", u"There's so little money in my bank account, my scenic checks show a ghetto.", u"You know you're old if your walker has an airbag.", u'His finest hour lasted a minute and a half.'], u'Marilyn Manson': [u"A lot of people don't want to make their own decisions. They're too scared. It's much easier to be told what to do.", u"Marilyn Monroe wasn't even her real name, Charles Manson isn't his real name, and now, I'm taking that to be my real name. But what's real? You can't find the truth, you just pick the lie you like the best.", u"I think art is the only thing that's spiritual in the world. And I refuse to forced to believe in other people's interpretations of God. I don't think anybody should be. No one person can own the copyright to what God means.", u'We live in a society of victimization, where people are much more comfortable being victimized than actually standing up for themselves.', u"The burden of originality is one that most people don't want to accept. They'd rather sit in front of the TV and let that tell them what they're supposed to like, what they're supposed to buy, and what they're supposed to laugh at.", u'When all of your wishes are granted, many of your dreams will be destroyed.', u"When you're taught to love everyone, to love your enemies, then what value does that place on love?", u"Part of me is afraid to get close to people because I'm afraid that they're going to leave.", u'Music is the strongest form of magic.', u"Anybody intelligent enough to realize what America is, is not going to sit around and do nothing about it. They're going to be the same way that I am. They're going to be the same way our fans are. They're going to be pissed.", u"Find out what's really out there. I never said to be like me, I say be like you and make a difference.", u'People tend to associate anyone who looks and behaves differently with illegal or immoral activity.', u"In the end we're all Jerry Springer Show guests, really, we just haven't been on the show.", u'Is adult entertainment killing our children? or is killing our children entertaining our adults?', u"This is the culture you're raising your kids in. Don't be surprised if it blows up in your face.", u"I don't want to feel like I've matured. That's a stupid word that I never want to use.", u'I never said to be like me, I say to be like you and make a difference.', u"Growing up going to Christian school and the concept that you're born a sinner and you don't really have a choice to change who you are has been hammered into my head and created the entire reason why I made art and made a band and made records called 'Antichrist Superstar.'", u"I am drawn to women who are independent and creative, which is problematic because it's a struggle, a competition of careers. There's jealousy.", u"I don't encourage people to choose any sort of sexuality.", u"There's no reason to change what you are, but if you're not being you, then you need to acknowledge that.", u'I was married to someone who wanted me to change. Become more adult, more responsible. I began not to like myself, not like what I do. I lost my identity. Everything began collapsing around me.', u"It's better to use a curse word than to hurt somebody else, I find.", u"Leave me in a room with some crayons and I'll draw on the wall.", u'Marriage changes everything.'], u'Norman Vincent Peale': [u'Believe in yourself! Have faith in your abilities! Without a humble but reasonable confidence in your own powers you cannot be successful or happy.', u'Change your thoughts and you change your world.', u'Action is a great restorer and builder of confidence. Inaction is not only the result, but the cause, of fear. Perhaps the action you take will be successful; perhaps different action or adjustments will have to follow. But any action is better than no action at all.', u'Any fact facing us is not as important as our attitude toward it, for that determines our success or failure. The way you think about a fact may defeat you before you ever do anything about it. You are overcome by the fact because you think you are.', u'Empty pockets never held anyone back. Only empty heads and empty hearts can do that.', u"It's always too early to quit.", u'It is of practical value to learn to like yourself. Since you must spend so much time with yourself you might as well get some satisfaction out of the relationship.', u'Watch your manner of speech if you wish to develop a peaceful state of mind. Start each day by affirming peaceful, contented and happy attitudes and your days will tend to be pleasant and successful.', u'Christmas waves a magic wand over this world, and behold, everything is softer and more beautiful.', u'Formulate and stamp indelibly on your mind a mental picture of yourself as succeeding. Hold this picture tenaciously. Never permit it to fade. Your mind will seek to develop the picture... Do not build up obstacles in your imagination.', u"Stand up to your obstacles and do something about them. You will find that they haven't half the strength you think they have.", u'Four things for success: work and pray, think and believe.', u'If you paint in your mind a picture of bright and happy expectations, you put yourself into a condition conducive to your goal.', u"Every problem has in it the seeds of its own solution. If you don't have any problems, you don't get any seeds.", u"Don't take tomorrow to bed with you.", u'We tend to get what we expect.', u"Drop the idea that you are Atlas carrying the world on your shoulders. The world would go on even without you. Don't take yourself so seriously.", u"Be interesting, be enthusiastic... and don't talk too much.", u'The trouble with most of us is that we would rather be ruined by praise than saved by criticism.', u"We've all heard that we have to learn from our mistakes, but I think it's more important to learn from successes. If you learn only from your mistakes, you are inclined to learn only errors.", u'When you pray for anyone you tend to modify your personal attitude toward him.', u'The more you lose yourself in something bigger than yourself, the more energy you will have.', u'Repetition of the same thought or physical action develops into a habit which, repeated frequently enough, becomes an automatic reflex.', u"One of the greatest moments in anybody's developing experience is when he no longer tries to hide from himself but determines to get acquainted with himself as he really is.", u'Change yourself and your work will seem different.'], u'Bill Watterson': [u'There is not enough time to do all the nothing we want to do.', u'The surest sign that intelligent life exists elsewhere in the universe is that it has never tried to contact us.', u'Nothing helps a bad mood like spreading it around.', u'God put me on this earth to accomplish a certain number of things. Right now I am so far behind that I will never die.', u"I liked things better when I didn't understand them.", u"If people sat outside and looked at the stars each night, I'll bet they'd live a lot differently.", u"It's not denial. I'm just selective about the reality I accept.", u"We don't devote enough scientific research to finding a cure for jerks.", u"If your knees aren't green by the end of the day, you ought to seriously re-examine your life.", u"I think we dream so we don't have to be apart so long. If we're in each other's dreams, we can play together all night.", u"I know the world isn't fair, but why isn't it ever unfair in my favor?", u"I find my life is a lot easier the lower I keep everyone's expectations.", u"Things are never quite as scary when you've got a best friend.", u"From now on, I'll connect the dots my own way.", u'Getting an inch of snow is like winning 10 cents in the lottery.', u"Know what's weird? Day by day, nothing seems to change. But pretty soon, everything's different.", u'The problem with the future is that it keeps turning into the present.', u"Weekends don't count unless you spend them doing something completely pointless.", u"I'm not dumb. I just have a command of thoroughly useless information.", u'Often it takes some calamity to make us live in the present. Then suddenly we wake up and see all the mistakes we have made.', u'Sometimes I think the surest sign that intelligent life exists elsewhere in the universe is that none of it has tried to contact us.', u'The purpose of writing is to inflate weak ideas, obscure pure reasoning, and inhibit clarity. With a little practice, writing can be an intimidating and impenetrable fog!', u'A real job is a job you hate.', u'Genius is never understood in its own time.', u'I thought my life would seem more interesting with a musical score and a laugh track.'], u'Percy Bysshe Shelley': [u"When my cats aren't happy, I'm not happy. Not because I care about their mood but because I know they're just sitting there thinking up ways to get even.", u'We look before and after, And pine for what is not; Our sincerest laughter With some pain is fraught; Our sweetest songs are those that tell of saddest thought.', u'There is a harmony in autumn, and a luster in its sky, which through the summer is not heard or seen, as if it could not be, as if it had not been!', u'Fear not for the future, weep not for the past.', u'Change is certain. Peace is followed by disturbances; departure of evil men by their return. Such recurrences should not constitute occasions for sadness but realities for awareness, so that one may be happy in the interim.', u'A poet is a nightingale, who sits in darkness and sings to cheer its own solitude with sweet sounds.', u'Our sweetest songs are those that tell of saddest thought.', u'A man, to be greatly good, must imagine intensely and comprehensively; he must put himself in the place of another and of many others; the pains and pleasures of his species must become his own.', u'Man has no right to kill his brother. It is no excuse that he does so in uniform: he only adds the infamy of servitude to the crime of murder.', u'Government is an evil; it is only the thoughtlessness and vices of men that make it a necessary evil. When all men are good and wise, government will of itself decay.', u'Familiar acts are beautiful through love.', u"Soul meets soul on lovers' lips.", u'All of us who are worth anything, spend our manhood in unlearning the follies, or expiating the mistakes of our youth.', u'History is a cyclic poem written by time upon the memories of man.', u'Poets are the unacknowledged legislators of the world.', u"The soul's joy lies in doing.", u'First our pleasures die - and then our hopes, and then our fears - and when these are dead, the debt is due dust claims dust - and we die too.', u'Music, when soft voices die Vibrates in the memory.', u'O, wind, if winter comes, can spring be far behind?', u'Concerning God, freewill and destiny: Of all that earth has been or yet may be, all that vain men imagine or believe, or hope can paint or suffering may achieve, we descanted.', u'Poetry is a mirror which makes beautiful that which is distorted.', u'The more we study the more we discover our ignorance.', u'I have drunken deep of joy, And I will taste no other wine tonight.', u'I think that the leaf of a tree, the meanest insect on which we trample, are in themselves arguments more conclusive than any which can be adduced that some vast intellect animates Infinity.', u'If Winter comes, can Spring be far behind?'], u'John D. Rockefeller': [u'A friendship founded on business is better than a business founded on friendship.', u'If you want to succeed you should strike out on new paths, rather than travel the worn paths of accepted success.', u"Don't be afraid to give up the good to go for the great.", u'Competition is a sin.', u'Good leadership consists of showing average people how to do the work of superior people.', u'I do not think that there is any other quality so essential to success of any kind as the quality of perseverance. It overcomes almost everything, even nature.', u'Charity is injurious unless it helps the recipient to become independent of it.', u"I would rather earn 1% off a 100 people's efforts than 100% of my own efforts.", u'Next to doing the right thing, the most important thing is to let people know you are doing the right thing.', u'I have ways of making money that you know nothing of.', u'I believe in the dignity of labor, whether with head or hand; that the world owes no man a living but that it owes every man an opportunity to make a living.', u'There is nothing in this world that can compare with the Christian fellowship; nothing that can satisfy but Christ.', u'Every right implies a responsibility; Every opportunity, an obligation, Every possession, a duty.', u'The ability to deal with people is as purchasable a commodity as sugar or coffee and I will pay more for that ability than for any other under the sun.', u'And we are never too old to study the Bible. Each time the lessons are studied comes some new meaning, some new thought which will make us better.', u'If your only goal is to become rich, you will never achieve it.', u'The way to make money is to buy when blood is running in the streets.', u'I always tried to turn every disaster into an opportunity.', u'We can never learn too much of His will towards us, too much of His messages and His advice. The Bible is His word and its study gives at once the foundation for our faith and an inspiration to battle onward in the fight against the tempter.', u'Good management consists in showing average people how to do the work of superior people.', u'I believe that thrift is essential to well-ordered living.', u"I know of nothing more despicable and pathetic than a man who devotes all the hours of the waking day to the making of money for money's sake.", u"Do you know the only thing that gives me pleasure? It's to see my dividends coming in.", u'I believe that every right implies a responsibility; every opportunity, an obligation; every possession, a duty.', u'The most important thing for a young man is to establish a credit... a reputation, character.'], u'Harvey Fierstein': [u"Never be bullied into silence. Never allow yourself to be made a victim. Accept no one's definition of your life; define yourself.", u"I do believe we're all connected. I do believe in positive energy. I do believe in the power of prayer. I do believe in putting good out into the world. And I believe in taking care of each other.", u"A child's kiss is magic. Why else would they be so stingy with them?", u"Time will tell us what we did and didn't do.", u'I burned out on AIDS and did no AIDS work for a couple of years. I was so angry that people were still getting this disease that nobody can give you - you have to go out and get it!', u"It would be nice to redefine ourselves - at the moment we are drowning in diversity. That's not a bad thing, its just going to take a while before we refocus.", u"When I write stuff and I help cast it, I turn away good people all the time. I may turn them down because this one's too tall and that one doesn't have a high enough voice or this one looks to old to match up with that one - there's a billion reasons not to hire somebody.", u'My play Safe Sex was picked apart because critics thought it was untrue. It was a play in which no one had AIDS, but the characters talked about how it was going to change their lives.', u'Political movements always belong to the young.', u"The great thing about suicide is that it's not one of those things you have to do now or you lose your chance. I mean, you can always do it later.", u'The world is full of more interesting things than my voice.', u'Well, I always looked at Mulan as a movie about a lesbian coming out.', u"Accept no one's definition of your life; define yourself.", u'Actually, I think the average voice is like 70 percent tone and 30 percent noise. My voice is 95 percent noise.', u'Also, if you want to reach people, theatre is not always the best way to do it.', u"Always admit when you're wrong. You'll save thousands in therapy... and a few friendships too.", u'And I believe that you never be limited in what you do, so I like to do movies, I like to do television.', u"Anyone with a smart phone is a potential eyewitness cameraman capturing and transmitting stories at speeds that turn Reuter photos and traditional reporting into, well... yesterday's news.", u'Art has the power to transform, to illuminate, to educate, inspire and motivate.', u'As soon as I started writing, other writers stopped wanting me acting in their shows - maybe they thought I was going to rewrite them.', u"Beware of anyone who says they know. Trust me, they don't, or they wouldn't have to say they did.", u"But actually just yesterday we raised the key of one of my songs two steps up, so my voice is obviously responding. It's a muscle, and the more you use it, the more you use it right, the more you should get out of it. So yes, I sing.", u"But I'm not adverse to the idea of Torch Song as a musical. It would just be different. Because the play will always be there exactly as it was, and in a musical you could tell a lot of the story through songs.", u"How time files when you's doin' all the talking.", u"I actually may do a musical next year... not one that I've written; one that I may star in. Plus my concert and other people's work and all of a sudden you've got a very full life."], u'William Feather': [u"A budget tells us what we can't afford, but it doesn't keep us from buying it.", u'Success seems to be largely a matter of hanging on after others have let go.', u'One way to get the most out of life is to look upon it as an adventure.', u'No man is a failure who is enjoying life.', u"Some people are making such thorough preparation for rainy days that they aren't enjoying today's sunshine.", u'Few of us get anything without working for it.', u"One of the many things nobody ever tells you about middle age is that it's such a nice change from being young.", u'Most of us regard good luck as our right, and bad luck as a betrayal of that right.', u'Early morning cheerfulness can be extremely obnoxious.', u"Plenty of people miss their share of happiness, not because they never found it, but because they didn't stop to enjoy it.", u"Beware of the person who can't be bothered by details.", u'Something that has always puzzled me all my life is why, when I am in special need of help, the good deed is usually done by somebody on whom I have no claim.', u'An invitation to a wedding invokes more trouble than a summons to a police court.', u'Books open your mind, broaden your mind, and strengthen you as nothing else can.', u'Every social injustice is not only cruel, but it is economic waste.', u"He isn't a real boss until he has trained subordinates to shoulder most of his responsibilities.", u'Next to a sincere compliment, I think I like a well-deserved and honest rebuke.', u"An idea isn't worth much until a man is found who has the energy and ability to make it work.", u"Don't let ambition get so far ahead that it loses sight of the job at hand.", u'Finishing a good book is like leaving a good friend.', u'Here is the secret of inspiration: Tell yourself that thousands and tens of thousands of people, not very intelligent and certainly no more intelligent than the rest of us, have mastered problems as difficult as those that now baffle you.', u'A man must not deny his manifest abilities, for that is to evade his obligations.', u'If we do not discipline ourselves the world will do it for us.', u'One of the indictments of civilizations is that happiness and intelligence are so rarely found in the same person.', u'Some of us might find happiness if we quit struggling so desperately for it.'], u'Rabindranath Tagore': [u'Clouds come floating into my life, no longer to carry rain or usher storm, but to add color to my sunset sky.', u'Everything comes to us that belongs to us if we create the capacity to receive it.', u'I slept and dreamt that life was joy. I awoke and saw that life was service. I acted and behold, service was joy.', u'Let us not pray to be sheltered from dangers but to be fearless when facing them.', u"I have become my own version of an optimist. If I can't make it through one door, I'll go through another door - or I'll make a door. Something terrific will come no matter how dark the present.", u'A mind all logic is like a knife all blade. It makes the hand bleed that uses it.', u"Don't limit a child to your own learning, for he was born in another time.", u'Depth of friendship does not depend on length of acquaintance.', u'The butterfly counts not months but moments, and has time enough.', u'Age considers; youth ventures.', u"Do not say, 'It is morning,' and dismiss it with a name of yesterday. See it for the first time as a newborn child that has no name.", u'Faith is the bird that feels the light when the dawn is still dark.', u"Beauty is truth's smile when she beholds her own face in a perfect mirror.", u'Death is not extinguishing the light; it is only putting out the lamp because the dawn has come.', u'Every child comes with the message that God is not yet discouraged of man.', u'The highest education is that which does not merely give us information but makes our life in harmony with all existence.', u'The water in a vessel is sparkling; the water in the sea is dark. The small truth has words which are clear; the great truth has great silence.', u'Let your life lightly dance on the edges of Time like dew on the tip of a leaf.', u'Facts are many, but the truth is one.', u'From the solemn gloom of the temple children run out to sit in the dust, God watches them play and forgets the priest.', u'Love is the only reality and it is not a mere sentiment. It is the ultimate truth that lies at the heart of creation.', u'By plucking her petals, you do not gather the beauty of the flower.', u'He who is too busy doing good finds no time to be good.', u'Bigotry tries to keep truth safe in its hand with a grip that kills it.', u"You can't cross the sea merely by standing and staring at the water."], u'Walter Hagen': [u"You're only here for a short visit. Don't hurry, don't worry. And be sure to smell the flowers along the way.", u'Make the hard ones look easy and the easy ones look hard.', u'It is the addition of strangeness to beauty that constitutes the romantic character in art.', u'My dear, did you ever stop to think what a wonderful bunker you would make?', u'No one remembers who came in second.', u'There is no tragedy in missing a putt, no matter how short. All have erred in this respect.'], u'George Washington': [u'Be courteous to all, but intimate with few, and let those few be well tried before you give them your confidence.', u'If the freedom of speech is taken away then dumb and silent we may be led, like sheep to the slaughter.', u'My mother was the most beautiful woman I ever saw. All I am I owe to my mother. I attribute all my success in life to the moral, intellectual and physical education I received from her.', u'It is impossible to rightly govern a nation without God and the Bible.', u'Happiness and moral duty are inseparably connected.', u'Government is not reason; it is not eloquent; it is force. Like fire, it is a dangerous servant and a fearful master.', u"Firearms are second only to the Constitution in importance; they are the peoples' liberty's teeth.", u'Let us with caution indulge the supposition that morality can be maintained without religion. Reason and experience both forbid us to expect that national morality can prevail in exclusion of religious principle.', u'Associate with men of good quality if you esteem your own reputation; for it is better to be alone than in bad company.', u'If we desire to avoid insult, we must be able to repel it; if we desire to secure peace, one of the most powerful instruments of our rising prosperity, it must be known, that we are at all times ready for War.', u"The very atmosphere of firearms anywhere and everywhere restrains evil interference - they deserve a place of honor with all that's good.", u'Guard against the impostures of pretended patriotism.', u'The time is near at hand which must determine whether Americans are to be free men or slaves.', u'True friendship is a plant of slow growth, and must undergo and withstand the shocks of adversity, before it is entitled to the appellation.', u'Experience teaches us that it is much easier to prevent an enemy from posting themselves than it is to dislodge them after they have got possession.', u'It is better to be alone than in bad company.', u'Let us raise a standard to which the wise and honest can repair; the rest is in the hands of God.', u'Labor to keep alive in your breast that little spark of celestial fire, called conscience.', u'Observe good faith and justice toward all nations. Cultivate peace and harmony with all.', u'The marvel of all history is the patience with which men and women submit to burdens unnecessarily laid upon them by their governments.', u'Mankind, when left to themselves, are unfit for their own government.', u'I hope I shall possess firmness and virtue enough to maintain what I consider the most enviable of all titles, the character of an honest man.', u'Truth will ultimately prevail where there is pains to bring it to light.', u'A slender acquaintance with the world must convince every man that actions, not words, are the true criterion of the attachment of friends.', u'Over grown military establishments are under any form of government inauspicious to liberty, and are to be regarded as particularly hostile to republican liberty.'], u'Franklin P. Adams': [u'Nothing is more responsible for the good old days than a bad memory.', u'Having imagination it takes you an hour to write a paragraph that if you were unimaginative would take you only a minute.', u'The trouble with this country is that there are too many politicians who believe, with a conviction based on experience, that you can fool all of the people all of the time.', u'Too much truth is uncouth.', u'Elections are won by men and women chiefly because most people vote against somebody rather than for somebody.', u'I find that a great part of the information I have was acquired by looking up something and finding something else on the way.', u'We have nothing in our history or position to invite aggression; we have everything to beckon us to the cultivation of relations of peace and amity with all nations.', u'Christmas is over and Business is Business.', u'Health is the thing that makes you feel that now is the best time of the year.', u'Middle age occurs when you are too young to take up golf and too old to rush up to the net.', u'The true republic: men, their rights and nothing more; women, their rights and nothing less.', u'There are plenty of good five cent cigars in the country. The trouble is they cost a quarter.', u"There must be a day or two in a man's life when he is the precise age for something important."], u'Jane Austen': [u'Friendship is certainly the finest balm for the pangs of disappointed love.', u'Vanity and pride are different things, though the words are often used synonymously. A person may be proud without being vain. Pride relates more to our opinion of ourselves; vanity, to what we would have others think of us.', u'An engaged woman is always more agreeable than a disengaged. She is satisfied with herself. Her cares are over, and she feels that she may exert all her powers of pleasing without suspicion. All is safe with a lady engaged; no harm can be done.', u'There is nothing like staying at home for real comfort.', u'Selfishness must always be forgiven you know, because there is no hope of a cure.', u'A large income is the best recipe for happiness I ever heard of.', u'Give a girl an education and introduce her properly into the world, and ten to one but she has the means of settling well, without further expense to anybody.', u'The person, be it gentleman or lady, who has not pleasure in a good novel, must be intolerably stupid.', u'There is no charm equal to tenderness of heart.', u"A lady's imagination is very rapid; it jumps from admiration to love, from love to matrimony in a moment.", u'My idea of good company is the company of clever, well-informed people who have a great deal of conversation; that is what I call good company.', u'There are people, who the more you do for them, the less they will do for themselves.', u'Nothing is more deceitful than the appearance of humility. It is often only carelessness of opinion, and sometimes an indirect boast.', u'If I loved you less, I might be able to talk about it more.', u'To sit in the shade on a fine day and look upon verdure is the most perfect refreshment.', u'A woman, especially, if she have the misfortune of knowing anything, should conceal it as well as she can.', u'Life seems but a quick succession of busy nothings.', u'To flatter and follow others, without being flattered and followed in turn, is but a state of half enjoyment.', u'The more I know of the world, the more I am convinced that I shall never see a man whom I can really love.', u'For what do we live, but to make sport for our neighbors and laugh at them in our turn?', u'I do not want people to be very agreeable, as it saves me the trouble of liking them a great deal.', u'A person who can write a long letter with ease, cannot write ill.', u'How quick come the reasons for approving what we like!', u'In nine cases out of ten, a woman had better show more affection than she feels.', u'Every man is surrounded by a neighborhood of voluntary spies.'], u'Wilson Mizner': [u"Be nice to people on your way up because you'll meet them on your way down.", u'God help those who do not help themselves.', u'Gambling: The sure way of getting nothing for something.', u'Most hard-boiled people are half-baked.', u"If you steal from one author it's plagiarism; if you steal from many it's research.", u'A slave has but one master. An ambition man, has as many as there are people who helped him get his fortune.', u'There is something about a closet that makes a skeleton terribly restless.', u"I'd rather know a square guy than own a square mile.", u'Art is science made clear.', u"Don't talk about yourself; it will be done when you leave.", u"A fellow who is always declaring he's no fool usually has his suspicions.", u'I hate careless flattery, the kind that exhausts you in your efforts to believe it.', u'All anger is not sinful, because some degree of it, and on some occasions, is inevitable. But it becomes sinful and contradicts the rule of Scripture when it is conceived upon slight and inadequate provocation, and when it continues long.', u'I respect faith, but doubt is what gives you an education.', u'In the battle of existence, Talent is the punch; Tact is the clever footwork.', u'Popularity is exhausting. The life of the party almost always winds up in a corner with an overcoat over him.', u'The first hundred years are the hardest.', u'To my embarrassment I was born in bed with a lady.', u'To profit from good advice requires more wisdom than to give it.', u'A drama critic is a person who surprises the playwright by informing him what he meant.', u'A good listener is not only popular everywhere, but after a while, he knows something.', u'Do not be desirous of having things done quickly. Do not look at small advantages. Desire to have things done quickly prevents their being done thoroughly. Looking at small advantages prevents great affairs from being accomplished.', u'Failure has gone to his head.', u'Hollywood is a sewer with service from the Ritz Carlton.', u'I can usually judge a fellow by what he laughs at.'], u'R. Buckminster Fuller': [u'When I am working on a problem, I never think about beauty but when I have finished, if the solution is not beautiful, I know it is wrong.', u'If humanity does not opt for integrity we are through completely. It is absolutely touch and go. Each one of us could make the difference.', u'A designer is an emerging synthesis of artist, inventor, mechanic, objective economist and evolutionary strategist.', u"I'm not a genius. I'm just a tremendous bundle of experience.", u"There is nothing in a caterpillar that tells you it's going to be a butterfly.", u'Everyone is born a genius, but the process of living de-geniuses them.', u"Pollution is nothing but the resources we are not harvesting. We allow them to disperse because we've been ignorant of their value.", u'Either war is obsolete, or men are.', u'Faith is much better than belief. Belief is when someone else does the thinking.', u'Ninety-nine percent of who you are is invisible and untouchable.', u"Don't fight forces, use them.", u'Nature is trying very hard to make us succeed, but nature does not depend on us. We are not the only experiment.', u'We are not going to be able to operate our Spaceship Earth successfully nor for much longer unless we see it as a whole spaceship and our fate as common. It has to be everybody or nobody.', u'God, to me, it seems, is a verb not a noun, proper or improper.', u'Parents are usually more careful to bestow knowledge on their children rather than virtue, the art of speaking well rather than doing well; but their manners should be of the greatest concern.', u'Great nations are simply the operating fronts of behind-the-scenes, vastly ambitious individuals who had become so effectively powerful because of their ability to remain invisible while operating behind the national scenery.', u'Search others for their virtue, and yourself for your vices.', u'God is a verb, not a noun.', u'Love is metaphysical gravity.', u'By 2000, politics will simply fade away. We will not see any political parties.', u'How often I found where I should be going only by setting out for somewhere else.', u'Integrity is the essence of everything successful.', u"Sometimes I think we're alone. Sometimes I think we're not. In either case, the thought is staggering.", u'What usually happens in the educational process is that the faculties are dulled, overloaded, stuffed and paralyzed so that by the time most people are mature they have lost their innate capabilities.', u'You can never learn less, you can only learn more.'], u'Les Brown': [u'If you take responsibility for yourself you will develop a hunger to accomplish your dreams.', u'Accept responsibility for your life. Know that it is you who will get you where you want to go, no one else.', u'Shoot for the moon and if you miss you will still be among the stars.', u'When life knocks you down, try to land on your back. Because if you can look up, you can get up. Let your reason get you back up.', u'Forgive yourself for your faults and your mistakes and move on.', u'Anytime you suffer a setback or disappointment, put your head down and plow ahead.', u"Don't let someone else's opinion of you become your reality.", u'If you are carrying strong feelings about something that happened in your past, they may hinder your ability to live in the present.', u"Just because Fate doesn't deal you the right cards, it doesn't mean you should give up. It just means you have to play the cards you get to their maximum potential.", u'Forgive those who have hurt you.', u"Other people's opinion of you does not have to become your reality.", u"Someone's sitting in the shade today because someone planted a tree a long time ago.", u'Help others achieve their dreams and you will achieve yours.', u'Honor your commitments with integrity.', u'If you set goals and go after them with all the determination you can muster, your gifts will take you places that will amaze you.', u'If you fall, fall on your back. If you can look up, you can get up.', u'If you put yourself in a position where you have to stretch outside your comfort zone, then you are forced to expand your consciousness.', u'A lot of people do not muster the courage to live their dreams because they are afraid to die.', u'Too many of us are not living our dreams because we are living our fears.', u'Your smile will give you a positive countenance that will make people feel comfortable around you.', u'Life has no limitations, except the ones you make.', u'Goals help you channel your energy into action.', u'Life takes on meaning when you become motivated, set goals and charge after them in an unstoppable manner.', u'The only limits to the possibilities in your life tomorrow are the buts you use today.', u'I advise you to say your dream is possible and then overcome all inconveniences, ignore all the hassles and take a running leap through the hoop, even if it is in flames.'], u'Bruce Lee': [u'Love is like a friendship caught on fire. In the beginning a flame, very pretty, often hot and fierce, but still only light and flickering. As love grows older, our hearts mature and our love becomes as coals, deep-burning and unquenchable.', u'Always be yourself, express yourself, have faith in yourself, do not go out and look for a successful personality and duplicate it.', u'I fear not the man who has practiced 10,000 kicks once, but I fear the man who has practiced one kick 10,000 times.', u'Mistakes are always forgivable, if one has the courage to admit them.', u'A wise man can learn more from a foolish question than a fool can learn from a wise answer.', u"If you love life, don't waste time, for time is what life is made up of.", u'If you always put limit on everything you do, physical or anything else. It will spread into your work and into your life. There are no limits. There are only plateaus, and you must not stay there, you must go beyond them.', u'A goal is not always meant to be reached, it often serves simply as something to aim at.', u"I'm not in this world to live up to your expectations and you're not in this world to live up to mine.", u'Knowledge will give you power, but character respect.', u"Ever since I was a child I have had this instinctive urge for expansion and growth. To me, the function and duty of a quality human being is the sincere and honest development of one's potential.", u'A quick temper will make a fool of you soon enough.', u'As you think, so shall you become.', u"If you spend too much time thinking about a thing, you'll never get it done.", u'Notice that the stiffest tree is most easily cracked, while the bamboo or willow survives by bending with the wind.', u"Showing off is the fool's idea of glory.", u'The key to immortality is first living a life worth remembering.', u'All fixed set patterns are incapable of adaptability or pliability. The truth is outside of all fixed patterns.', u'To hell with circumstances; I create opportunities.', u'Real living is living for others.', u"It's not the daily increase but daily decrease. Hack away at the unessential.", u'Man, the living creature, the creating individual, is always more important than any established style or system.', u'The less effort, the faster and more powerful you will be.', u'To me, the extraordinary aspect of martial arts lies in its simplicity. The easy way is also the right way, and martial arts is nothing at all special; the closer to the true way of martial arts, the less wastage of expression there is.', u'Take no thought of who is right or wrong or who is better than. Be not for or against.'], u'Mason Cooley': [u'Complainers change their complaints, but they never reduce the amount of time spent in complaining.', u'Forgiveness is like faith. You have to keep reviving it.', u'Office politics are bloody-minded, but weak on content.', u'The time I kill is killing me.', u'After an argument, silence may mean acceptance or the continuation of resistance by other means.', u'Only the broken-hearted know the truth about love.', u'The lonely become either thoughtful or empty.', u'A sense of blessedness comes from a change of heart, not from more blessings.', u'Living alone makes it harder to find someone to blame.', u'Magic trick: to make people disappear, ask them to fulfill their promises.', u'For many, immaturity is an ideal, not a defect.', u'If you call failures experiments, you can put them in your resume and claim them as achievements.', u'In the game of love, the losers are more celebrated than the winners.', u'Faith moves mountains, but you have to keep pushing while you are praying.', u'Cure for an obsession: get another one.', u'Excuses change nothing, but make everyone feel better.', u'Friends are sometimes boring, but enemies never.', u'Reality is the name we give to our disappointments.', u'A happy arrangement: many people prefer cats to other people, and many cats prefer people to other cats.', u'As equality increases, so does the number of people struggling for predominance.', u"'Be faithful to your roots' is the liberal version of 'Stay in your ghetto.'", u'Creativity makes a leap, then looks to see where it is.', u'Even cats grow lonely and anxious.', u'Every day begins with an act of courage and hope: getting out of bed.', u'Poor but happy is not a phrase invented by a poor person.'], u'Joel Osteen': [u"Choosing to be positive and having a grateful attitude is going to determine how you're going to live your life.", u'Faith activates God - Fear activates the Enemy.', u'When you focus on being a blessing, God makes sure that you are always blessed in abundance.', u"God didn't make a mistake when He made you. You need to see yourself as God sees you.", u'Do all you can to make your dreams come true.', u"A good thing to remember is somebody's got it a lot worse than we do.", u'You can change your world by changing your words... Remember, death and life are in the power of the tongue.', u'You can be committed to Church but not committed to Christ, but you cannot be committed to Christ and not committed to church.', u"If we say it long enough eventually we're going to reap a harvest. We're going to get exactly what we're saying.", u'God wants us to prosper financially, to have plenty of money, to fulfill the destiny He has laid out for us.', u"It's God's will for you to live in prosperity instead of poverty. It's God's will for you to pay your bills and not be in debt.", u"I'm going to let God be the judge of who goes to heaven and hell.", u"You may make some mistakes-but that doesn't make you a sinner. You've got the very nature of God on the inside of you.", u"If Jesus were here today, he wouldn't be riding around on a donkey. He'd be taking a plane, he'd be using the media.", u"Only God can look at somebody's heart.", u'I made a decision when my father passed away that I was going to be who God made me to be and not try to preach like my father.', u'You can be happy where you are.', u'People respond when you tell them there is a great future in front of you, you can leave your past behind.', u'If you give, you will be blessed.', u'God wants to bless us where we are.', u'If you want to rear financial blessings, you have to sow financially.', u"I don't think that a same-sex marriage is the way God intended it to be.", u"Prospering just doesn't have to do with money.", u"Keep a good attitude and do the right thing even when it's hard. When you do that you are passing the test. And God promises you your marked moments are on their way.", u'A lot of churches have not moved with the times.'], u'Babe Ruth': [u"Don't let the fear of striking out hold you back.", u"The way a team plays as a whole determines its success. You may have the greatest bunch of individual stars in the world, but if they don't play together, the club won't be worth a dime.", u'Never let the fear of striking out get in your way.', u'Baseball was, is and always will be to me the best game in the world.', u"Reading isn't good for a ballplayer. Not good for his eyes. If my eyes went bad even a little bit I couldn't hit home runs. So I gave up reading.", u"As soon as I got out there I felt a strange relationship with the pitcher's mound. It was as if I'd been born out there. Pitching just felt like the most natural thing in the world. Striking out batters was easy.", u"Yesterday's home runs don't win today's games.", u"You just can't beat the person who never gives up.", u'Cobb is a prick. But he sure can hit. God Almighty, that man can hit.', u'Every strike brings me closer to the next home run.', u"Let me show you how it's done... Loser!", u'All ballplayers should quit when it starts to feel as if all the baselines run uphill.', u'Baseball changes through the years. It gets milder.', u"Don't ever forget two things I'm going to tell you. One, don't believe everything that's written about you. Two, don't pick up too many checks.", u'I had only one superstition. I made sure to touch all the bases when I hit a home run.', u"I'll promise to go easier on drinking and to get to bed earlier, but not for you, fifty thousand dollars, or two-hundred and fifty thousand dollars will I give up women. They're too much fun.", u'Who is richer? The man who is seen, but cannot see? Or the man who is not being seen, but can see?', u"Gee, its lonesome in the outfield. It's hard to keep awake with nothing to do.", u"I didn't mean to hit the umpire with the dirt, but I did mean to hit that bastard in the stands.", u"If I'd just tried for them dinky singles I could've batted around .600.", u"All I can tell them is pick a good one and sock it. I get back to the dugout and they ask me what it was I hit and I tell them I don't know except it looked good.", u'How about a little noise. How do you expect a man to putt?', u'I learned early to drink beer, wine and whiskey. And I think I was about 5 when I first chewed tobacco.', u"I won't be happy until we have every boy in America between the ages of six and sixteen wearing a glove and swinging a bat.", u"If it wasn't for baseball, I'd be in either the penitentiary or the cemetery."], u'Will Rogers': [u'I am not a member of any organized political party. I am a Democrat.', u'There are three kinds of men. The one that learns by reading. The few who learn by observation. The rest of them have to pee on the electric fence for themselves.', u'A fool and his money are soon elected.', u"Democrats never agree on anything, that's why they're Democrats. If they agreed with each other, they would be Republicans.", u'Good judgment comes from experience, and a lot of that comes from bad judgment.', u'Everything is changing. People are taking their comedians seriously and the politicians as a joke.', u"If you want to be successful, it's just this simple. Know what you are doing. Love what you are doing. And believe in what you are doing.", u'Politics has become so expensive that it takes a lot of money even to be defeated.', u'Alexander Hamilton started the U.S. Treasury with nothing, and that was the closest our country has ever been to being even.', u'Diplomacy is the art of saying "Nice doggie" until you can find a rock.', u'About all I can say for the United States Senate is that it opens with a prayer and closes with an investigation.', u"The 1928 Republican Convention opened with a prayer. If the Lord can see His way clear to bless the Republican Party the way it's been carrying on, then the rest of us ought to get it without even asking.", u"It isn't what we don't know that gives us trouble, it's what we know that ain't so.", u"Be thankful we're not getting all the government we're paying for.", u"Don't let yesterday use up too much of today.", u'Anything important is never left to the vote of the people. We only get to vote on some man; we never get to vote on what he is to do.', u'A difference of opinion is what makes horse racing and missionaries.', u"I don't make jokes. I just watch the government and report the facts.", u"Even if you're on the right track, you'll get run over if you just sit there.", u"The only difference between death and taxes is that death doesn't get worse every time Congress meets.", u"Ancient Rome declined because it had a Senate, now what's going to happen to us with both a House and a Senate?", u'A man only learns in two ways, one by reading, and the other by association with smarter people.', u'America is becoming so educated that ignorance will be a novelty. I will belong to the select few.', u'The man with the best job in the country is the vice-president. All he has to do is get up every morning and say, "How is the president?"', u'I bet after seeing us, George Washington would sue us for calling him "father."'], u'Brian Tracy': [u'Develop an attitude of gratitude, and give thanks for everything that happens to you, knowing that every step forward is a step toward achieving something bigger and better than your current situation.', u'All successful people men and women are big dreamers. They imagine what their future could be, ideal in every respect, and then they work every day toward their distant vision, that goal or purpose.', u'The greatest gift that you can give to others is the gift of unconditional love and acceptance.', u'You cannot control what happens to you, but you can control your attitude toward what happens to you, and in that, you will be mastering change rather than allowing it to master you.', u'Move out of your comfort zone. You can only grow if you are willing to feel awkward and uncomfortable when you try something new.', u'If you raise your children to feel that they can accomplish any goal or task they decide upon, you will have succeeded as a parent and you will have given your children the greatest of all blessings.', u'Just as your car runs more smoothly and requires less energy to go faster and farther when the wheels are in perfect alignment, you perform better when your thoughts, feelings, emotions, goals, and values are in balance.', u'The key to success is to focus our conscious mind on things we desire not things we fear.', u'Successful people are always looking for opportunities to help others. Unsuccessful people are always asking, "What\'s in it for me?"', u"Communication is a skill that you can learn. It's like riding a bicycle or typing. If you're willing to work at it, you can rapidly improve the quality of evry part of your life.", u'Winners make a habit of manufacturing their own positive expectations in advance of the event.', u"I've found that luck is quite predictable. If you want more luck, take more chances. Be more active. Show up more often.", u'People with clear, written goals, accomplish far more in a shorter period of time than people without them could ever imagine.', u'Those people who develop the ability to continuously acquire new and better forms of knowledge that they can apply to their work and to their lives will be the movers and shakers in our society for the indefinite future.', u'Never say anything about yourself you do not want to come true.', u'Decisiveness is a characteristic of high-performing men and women. Almost any decision is better than no decision at all.', u'Successful people are simply those with successful habits.', u"It doesn't matter where you are coming from. All that matters is where you are going.", u'Goals allow you to control the direction of change in your favor.', u'If you wish to achieve worthwhile things in your personal and career life, you must become a worthwhile person in your own self-development.', u'No one lives long enough to learn everything they need to learn starting from scratch. To be successful, we absolutely, positively have to find people who have already paid the price to learn the things that we need to learn to achieve our goals.', u'Only by contending with challenges that seem to be beyond your strength to handle at the moment you can grow more surely toward the stars.', u'The happiest people in the world are those who feel absolutely terrific about themselves, and this is the natural outgrowth of accepting total responsibility for every part of their life.', u'Practice Golden-Rule 1 of Management in everything you do. Manage others the way you would like to be managed.', u'Whatever you believe with feeling becomes your reality.'], u'William Shatner': [u'Babies have big heads and big eyes, and tiny little bodies with tiny little arms and legs. So did the aliens at Roswell! I rest my case.', u'If you make a fool of yourself, you can do it with dignity, without taking your pants down. And if you do take your pants down, you can still do it with dignity.', u"How do I stay so healthy and boyishly handsome? It's simple. I drink the blood of young runaways.", u"Here's something pompous - you take your day and artistically create it, so every moment has an artistic flavor.", u"If saving money is wrong, I don't want to be right!", u'I enjoyed reading all the classic authors like Isaac Asimov and Bradbury.', u'I think making a good film shot is joyful.', u"I think of doing a series as very hard work. But then I've talked to coal miners, and that's really hard work.", u"No, I don't regret anything at this point. That may change on the next phone call, but at the moment I don't regret anything.", u"Oh, for God's sake... get a life, will you?", u'But if you want to know the truth, the weirdest thing that has happened has been my discovery that people who attend the conventions are filled with love.', u"I think the supernatural is a catch-all for everything we don't understand about the vast other parts of life that we cannot perceive.", u'A director is a choreographer, both politically and creatively.', u'A series is filled with compromises.', u"A stage actor has to be 10% aware of the audience as he's performing.", u'A tree you pass by every day is just a tree. If you are to closely examine what a tree has and the life a tree has, even the smallest thing can withstand a curiosity, and you can examine whole worlds.', u'Acting is easier - writing is more creative. The lazy man vies with the industrious.', u'Ads need to be little pieces of entertainment.', u'All any artist can do is please themselves.', u"All I know is that I am constantly intrigued by something I'm doing.", u"All in all, Kirk's character is something I am very proud of.", u"Although I'm a business major out of McGill University, I know nothing... but then I found out much later in life, nobody knows anything.", u'And I enjoyed the celebrity and the creativity that was involved in Star Trek.', u'At 40, I went to bed for three days. I thought my life is over.', u'Captain Kirk has been a source of pleasure and income for a long time.'], u'Billy Graham': [u'A child who is allowed to be disrespectful to his parents will not have true respect for anyone.', u'When wealth is lost, nothing is lost; when health is lost, something is lost; when character is lost, all is lost.', u'Being a Christian is more than just an instantaneous conversion - it is a daily process whereby you grow to be more and more like Christ.', u"God will prepare everything for our perfect happiness in heaven, and if it takes my dog being there, I believe he'll be there.", u"The Christian life is not a constant high. I have my moments of deep discouragement. I have to go to God in prayer with tears in my eyes, and say, 'O God, forgive me,' or 'Help me.'", u'A real Christian is a person who can give his pet parrot to the town gossip.', u'God proved His love on the Cross. When Christ hung, and bled, and died, it was God saying to the world, "I love you."', u"It is not the body's posture, but the heart's attitude that counts when we pray.", u"I've read the last page of the Bible. It's all going to turn out all right.", u'The framers of our Constitution meant we were to have freedom of religion, not freedom from religion.', u'Man has two great spiritual needs. One is for forgiveness. The other is for goodness.', u'God has given us two hands, one to receive with and the other to give with.', u'Only God Himself fully appreciates the influence of a Christian mother in the molding of character in her children.', u"My home is in Heaven. I'm just traveling through this world.", u'Nothing can bring a real sense of security into the home except true love.', u"Read the Bible. Work hard and honestly. And don't complain.", u"The word 'romance,' according to the dictionary, means excitement, adventure, and something extremely real. Romance should last a lifetime.", u'Tears shed for self are tears of weakness, but tears shed for others are a sign of strength.', u'The highest form of worship is the worship of unselfish Christian service. The greatest form of praise is the sound of consecrated feet seeking out the lost and helpless.', u'God is more interested in your future and your relationships than you are.', u'If a person gets his attitude toward money straight, it will help straighten out almost every other area in his life.', u'Believers, look up - take courage. The angels are nearer than you think.', u'Courage is contagious. When a brave man takes a stand, the spines of others are often stiffened.', u'Prayer is simply a two-way conversation between you and God.', u'Only those who want everything done for them are bored.'], u'Alan Watts': [u"You don't look out there for God, something in the sky, you look in you.", u'No work or love will flourish out of guilt, fear, or hollowness of heart, just as no valid plans for the future can be made by those who have no capacity for living now.', u'The only way to make sense out of change is to plunge into it, move with it, and join the dance.', u"The reason we have poverty is that we have no imagination. There are a great many people accumulating what they think is vast wealth, but it's only money... they don't know how to enjoy it, because they have no imagination.", u"To have faith is to trust yourself to the water. When you swim you don't grab hold of the water, because if you do you will sink and drown. Instead you relax, and float.", u'So then, the relationship of self to other is the complete realization that loving yourself is impossible without loving everything defined as other than yourself.', u"But I'll tell you what hermits realize. If you go off into a far, far forest and get very quiet, you'll come to understand that you're connected with everything.", u'Zen does not confuse spirituality with thinking about God while one is peeling potatoes. Zen spirituality is just to peel the potatoes.', u'A myth is an image in terms of which we try to make sense of the world.', u'How is it possible that a being with such sensitive jewels as the eyes, such enchanted musical instruments as the ears, and such fabulous arabesque of nerves as the brain can experience itself anything less than a god.', u'But to me nothing - the negative, the empty - is exceedingly powerful.', u'The ego is nothing other than the focus of conscious attention.', u'Reality is only a Rorschach ink-blot, you know.', u'I have realized that the past and future are real illusions, that they exist in the present, which is what there is and all there is.', u'But at any rate, the point is that God is what nobody admits to being, and everybody really is.', u'But the attitude of faith is to let go, and become open to truth, whatever it might turn out to be.', u'In other words, a person who is fanatic in matters of religion, and clings to certain ideas about the nature of God and the universe, becomes a person who has no faith at all.', u'Never pretend to a love which you do not actually feel, for love is not ours to command.', u'Some believe all that parents, tutors, and kindred believe. They take their principles by inheritance, and defend them as they would their estates, because they are born heirs to them.', u'And the attitude of faith is the very opposite of clinging to belief, of holding on.', u'Faith is a state of openness or trust.', u'We cannot be more sensitive to pleasure without being more sensitive to pain.', u"Omnipotence is not knowing how everything is done; it's just doing it.", u'Trying to define yourself is like trying to bite your own teeth.', u'Things are as they are. Looking out into it the universe at night, we make no comparisons between right and wrong stars, nor between well and badly arranged constellations.'], u'Fyodor Dostoevsky': [u'Deprived of meaningful work, men and women lose their reason for existence; they go stark, raving mad.', u'Beauty is mysterious as well as terrible. God and devil are fighting there, and the battlefield is the heart of man.', u'Sarcasm: the last refuge of modest and chaste-souled people when the privacy of their soul is coarsely and intrusively invaded.', u'The greatest happiness is to know the source of unhappiness.', u'We sometimes encounter people, even perfect strangers, who begin to interest us at first sight, somehow suddenly, all at once, before a word has been spoken.', u'The cleverest of all, in my opinion, is the man who calls himself a fool at least once a month.', u"One can know a man from his laugh, and if you like a man's laugh before you know anything of him, you may confidently say that he is a good man.", u'A real gentleman, even if he loses everything he owns, must show no emotion. Money must be so far beneath a gentleman that it is hardly worth troubling about.', u'The soul is healed by being with children.', u"It seems, in fact, as though the second half of a man's life is made up of nothing, but the habits he has accumulated during the first half.", u'If there is no God, everything is permitted.', u'Power is given only to those who dare to lower themselves and pick it up. Only one thing matters, one thing; to be able to dare!', u'Happiness does not lie in happiness, but in the achievement of it.', u'Much unhappiness has come into the world because of bewilderment and things left unsaid.', u'Man is fond of counting his troubles, but he does not count his joys. If he counted them up as he ought to, he would see that every lot has enough happiness provided for it.', u'To live without Hope is to Cease to live.', u'To love someone means to see him as God intended him.', u'It is not possible to eat me without insisting that I sing praises of my devourer?', u'Men do not accept their prophets and slay them, but they love their martyrs and worship those whom they have tortured to death.', u'There are things which a man is afraid to tell even to himself, and every decent man has a number of such things stored away in his mind.', u'There is no subject so old that something new cannot be said about it.', u'Realists do not fear the results of their study.', u'Man only likes to count his troubles, but he does not count his joys.', u"The formula 'Two and two make five' is not without its attractions.", u'If you were to destroy the belief in immortality in mankind, not only love but every living force on which the continuation of all life in the world depended, would dry up at once.'], u'Rose Kennedy': [u"Birds sing after a storm; why shouldn't people feel as free to delight in whatever remains to them?", u"Life isn't a matter of milestones, but of moments.", u"I'm like old wine. They don't bring me out very often, but I'm well preserved.", u'I looked on child rearing not only as a work of love and duty but as a profession that was fully as interesting and challenging as any honorable profession in the world and one that demanded the best that I could bring to it.', u'I tell myself that God gave my children many gifts - spirit, beauty, intelligence, the capacity to make friends and to inspire respect. There was only one gift he held back - length of life.', u"Make sure you never, never argue at night. You just lose a good night's sleep, and you can't settle anything until morning anyway.", u'The time will come when it will disgust you to look in the mirror.', u'More business is lost every year through neglect than through any other cause.', u'Neither comprehension nor learning can take place in an atmosphere of anxiety.', u'Prosperity tries the fortunate, adversity the great.', u"I've had an exciting time; I married for love and got a little money along with it.", u"It's our money, and we're free to spend it any way we please.", u"There's nothing I like less than bad arguments for a view that I hold dear."], u'Julius Caesar': [u'I came, I saw, I conquered.', u'It is better to create than to learn! Creating is the essence of life.', u'Cowards die many times before their actual deaths.', u"As a rule, men worry more about what they can't see than about what they can.", u'Experience is the teacher of all things.', u'It is easier to find men who will volunteer to die, than to find those who are willing to endure pain with patience.', u'I love the name of honor, more than I fear death.', u'No one is so brave that he is not disturbed by something unexpected.', u'The die is cast.', u'If you must break the law, do it to seize power: in all other cases observe it.', u'What we wish, we readily believe, and what we ourselves think, we imagine others think also.', u'Fortune, which has a great deal of power in other matters but especially in war, can bring about great changes in a situation through very slight forces.', u'I have lived long enough both in years and in accomplishments.', u'It is not these well-fed long-haired men that I fear, but the pale and the hungry-looking.', u'Men in general are quick to believe that which they wish to be true.', u'I had rather be first in a village than second at Rome.', u"Caesar's wife must be above suspicion.", u'Men willingly believe what they wish.', u'Which death is preferably to every other? "The unexpected".', u'In war, events of importance are the result of trivial causes.', u'Men freely believe that which they desire.', u'I have lived long enough to satisfy both nature and glory.', u'Men are nearly always willing to believe what they wish.'], u'Martin Luther King, Jr.': [u'Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that.', u'I have a dream that my four little children will one day live in a nation where they will not be judged by the color of their skin, but by the content of their character.', u"Faith is taking the first step even when you don't see the whole staircase.", u'The ultimate measure of a man is not where he stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but where he stands at times of challenge and controversy.', u"Take the first step in faith. You don't have to see the whole staircase, just take the first step.", u"A man who won't die for something is not fit to live.", u'Our scientific power has outrun our spiritual power. We have guided missiles and misguided men.', u"Change does not roll in on the wheels of inevitability, but comes through continuous struggle. And so we must straighten our backs and work for our freedom. A man can't ride you unless your back is bent.", u'A nation that continues year after year to spend more money on military defense than on programs of social uplift is approaching spiritual doom.', u'I have decided to stick with love. Hate is too great a burden to bear.', u'An individual has not started living until he can rise above the narrow confines of his individualistic concerns to the broader concerns of all humanity.', u'A genuine leader is not a searcher for consensus but a molder of consensus.', u'In the End, we will remember not the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends.', u'He who passively accepts evil is as much involved in it as he who helps to perpetrate it. He who accepts evil without protesting against it is really cooperating with it.', u'Nothing in the world is more dangerous than sincere ignorance and conscientious stupidity.', u'Every man must decide whether he will walk in the light of creative altruism or in the darkness of destructive selfishness.', u'Human progress is neither automatic nor inevitable... Every step toward the goal of justice requires sacrifice, suffering, and struggle; the tireless exertions and passionate concern of dedicated individuals.', u'History will have to record that the greatest tragedy of this period of social transition was not the strident clamor of the bad people, but the appalling silence of the good people.', u"A man can't ride your back unless it's bent.", u'A nation or civilization that continues to produce soft-minded men purchases its own spiritual death on the installment plan.', u'Our lives begin to end the day we become silent about things that matter.', u'We must develop and maintain the capacity to forgive. He who is devoid of the power to forgive is devoid of the power to love. There is some good in the worst of us and some evil in the best of us. When we discover this, we are less prone to hate our enemies.', u'All labor that uplifts humanity has dignity and importance and should be undertaken with painstaking excellence.', u'The function of education is to teach one to think intensively and to think critically. Intelligence plus character - that is the goal of true education.', u'A lie cannot live.'], u'Kim Kardashian': [u"You make mistakes, but I don't have any regrets. I'm the kind of person who takes responsibility for it and deals with it. I learn from everything I do. I work very hard, I have so many things going on in my life. Get to know me and see who I am.", u'I am Armenian, so of course I am obsessed with laser hair removal! Arms, bikini, legs, underarms... my entire body is hairless.', u"I have to be in a relationship in order to be intimate. I'm not the one-night-stand kind of girl. Despite the rumors.", u"I urge people to learn from the mistakes of others. Please drink responsibly and it's never acceptable to drink and drive!", u"I know people think we drive around in these nice cars and we do whatever we want and our parents will pay our credit cards, but that's not the case. Sure, my parents were generous; I got a nice car at 16, but at 18 I was cut off. I've worked really hard. I opened the store myself.", u"I'm totally not against plastic surgery. I've tried Botox before. That's the only thing that I've done.", u'The perfect date for me would be staying at home, making a big picnic in bed, eating Wotsits and cookies while watching cable TV.', u'Botox to me is not surgery.', u'Even the people I surround myself with... are wiser, a little bit older than me, where before, all my boyfriends were younger.', u'Everything family does is reflection on the other people.', u'First and foremost, I married for love.', u'Having lots of siblings is like having built-in best friends.', u"Holidays are the best. I couldn't imagine being from a small family.", u'I always put clothes and family photos under the mattress, in case the house burns down.', u"I always say you shouldn't weigh yourself. I don't even have a set of scales in my house.", u'I always wanted what Mom and Dad had.', u'I am fascinated by crime scene investigating. I swear, I wish I was a crime scene investigator sometimes!', u"I am hands-on in any project that I am associated with. I just don't want to put my face or name and lend it to a product that I'm not behind a hundred percent.", u'I am pretty honest about a lot of things that young girls question, like their body image.', u'I am really cautious about what I say and do.', u'I am so stereotyped into being this Hollywood girl.', u"I can't dwell.", u"I couldn't sacrifice my heart for a publicity stunt.", u"I definitely think anything I'd be in now is a permanent relationship.", u'I definitely want kids and I want four kids, for sure. But I need to find a husband first!'], u'Lance Armstrong': [u'Pain is temporary. It may last a minute, or an hour, or a day, or a year, but eventually it will subside and something else will take its place. If I quit, however, it lasts forever.', u"Two things scare me. The first is getting hurt. But that's not nearly as scary as the second, which is losing.", u'Pain is temporary. Quitting lasts forever.', u'If children have the ability to ignore all odds and percentages, then maybe we can all learn from them. When you think about it, what other choice is there but to hope? We have two options, medically and emotionally: give up, or Fight Like Hell.', u"If you worried about falling off the bike, you'd never get on.", u"There comes a point in every man's life when he has to say: 'Enough is enough.'", u'A boo is a lot louder than a cheer. If you have 10 people cheering and one person booing, all you hear is the booing.', u'I figure the faster I pedal, the faster I can retire.', u"Winning is about heart, not just legs. It's got to be in the right place.", u'Extraordinary allegations require extraordinary evidence.', u'The riskiest thing you can do is get greedy.', u"Through my illness I learned rejection. I was written off. That was the moment I thought, Okay, game on. No prisoners. Everybody's going down.", u"If I can't face my accusers, that's a joke. We did that in medieval times.", u"It's nice to win. I'll never win again. I may have to take up golf - take on Tiger.", u"Nobody needs to cry for me. I'm going to be great.", u"But, listen, Eddie Merkyx would have won six Tours if he hadn't been punched.", u'Cycling is a sport of the open road and spectators are lining that road.', u"For whatever reason, maybe it's because of my story, but people associate Livestrong with exercise and physical fitness, health and lifestyle choices like that.", u'I exercise everyday. I swim, I bike, I run and I go to the gym.', u'I have been dealing with claims that I cheated and had an unfair advantage in winning my seven Tours since 1999.', u'I joined the swim team when I was 12, and I was the worst kid in the pool - I was put with a group of 7-year-olds.', u"I still don't get golf.", u"I've committed to surfing the rest of my life.", u"If we don't somehow stem the tide of childhood obesity, we're going to have a huge problem.", u"It can't be any simpler: the farewell is going to be on the Champs-Elysees."], u'Helen Hayes': [u"Age is not important unless you're a cheese.", u"Every human being on this earth is born with a tragedy, and it isn't original sin. He's born with the tragedy that he has to grow up... a lot of people don't have the courage to do it.", u'From your parents you learn love and laughter and how to put one foot before the other. But when books are opened you discover that you have wings.', u'The good die young but not always. The wicked prevail but not consistently. I am confused by life, and I feel safe within the confines of the theatre.', u'The truth is that there is only one terminal dignity - love. And the story of a love is not important - what is important is that one is capable of love. It is perhaps the only glimpse we are permitted of eternity.', u"Mere longevity is a good thing for those who watch Life from the side lines. For those who play the game, an hour may be a year, a single day's work an achievement for eternity.", u'Actors cannot choose the manner in which they are born. Consequently, it is the one gesture in their lives completely devoid of self-consciousness.', u'I cry out for order and find it only in art.', u'If you rest, you rust.', u'Everybody starts at the top, and then has the problem of staying there. Lasting accomplishment, however, is still achieved through a long, slow climb and self-discipline.', u'One has to grow up with good talk in order to form the habit of it.', u'Only the poet can look beyond the detail and see the whole picture.', u'The hardest years in life are those between ten and seventy.', u"There's a little vanity chair that Charlie gave me the first Christmas we knew each other. I'll not be parting with that, nor our bed - the four-poster - I'll be needing that to die in.", u'We relish news of our heroes, forgetting that we are extraordinary to somebody too.', u'When traveling with someone, take large does of patience and tolerance with your morning coffee.', u'Actors work and slave and it is the color of your hair that can determine your fate in the end.', u'Childhood is a short season.', u"I'm leaving the screen because I don't think I am very good in the pictures and I have this beautiful dream that I'm elegant on the stage.", u'Legends die hard. They survive as truth rarely does.', u'People who refuse to rest honorably on their laurels when they reach retirement age seem very admirable to me.', u'Stardom can be a gilded slavery.', u'The story of a love is not important-what is important is that one is capable of love. It is perhaps the only glimpse we are permitted of eternity.', u'The worst constructed play is a Bach fugue when compared to life.'], u'Charles Lamb': [u'Let us live for the beauty of our own reality.', u'Here cometh April again, and as far as I can see the world hath more fools in it than ever.', u'We grow gray in our spirit long before we grow gray in our hair.', u'My motto is: Contented with little, yet wishing for more.', u'Pain is life - the sharper, the more evidence of life.', u"The most common error made in matters of appearance is the belief that one should disdain the superficial and let the true beauty of one's soul shine through. If there are places on your body where this is a possibility, you are not attractive - you are leaking.", u'I always arrive late at the office, but I make up for it by leaving early.', u'I have had playmates, I have had companions; In my days of childhood, in my joyful school days - All, all are gone, the old familiar faces.', u'Man is a gaming animal. He must always be trying to get the better in something or other.', u"New Year's Day is every man's birthday.", u"A book reads the better which is our own, and has been so long known to us, that we know the topography of its blots, and dog's ears, and can trace the dirt in it to having read it at tea with buttered muffins.", u'I could never hate anyone I knew.', u"I'd like to grow very old as slowly as possible.", u'Nothing puzzles me more than the time and space; and yet nothing troubles me less.', u'Some people have a knack of putting upon you gifts of no real value, to engage you to substantial gratitude. We thank them for nothing.', u'The greatest pleasure I know is to do a good action by stealth and have it found out by accident.', u'We gain nothing by being with such as ourselves. We encourage one another in mediocrity. I am always longing to be with men more excellent than myself.', u'What is reading, but silent conversation.', u'A laugh is worth a hundred groans in any market.', u'A pun is not bound by the laws which limit nicer wit. It is a pistol let off at the ear; not a feather to tickle the intellect.', u'Anything awful makes me laugh. I misbehaved once at a funeral.', u'Asparagus inspires gentle thoughts.', u'Boys are capital fellows in their own way, among their mates; but they are unwholesome companions for grown people.', u'Cards are war, in disguise of a sport.', u'Clap an extinguisher upon your irony if you are unhappily blessed with a vein of it.'], u'Gertrude Stein': [u"There ain't no answer. There ain't gonna be any answer. There never has been an answer. That's the answer.", u'Everybody gets so much information all day long that they lose their common sense.', u'A writer should write with his eyes and a painter paint with his ears.', u'It is funny that men who are supposed to be scientific cannot get themselves to realise the basic principle of physics, that action and reaction are equal and opposite, that when you persecute people you always rouse them to be strong and stronger.', u'America is my country and Paris is my hometown.', u"But the problem is that when I go around and speak on campuses, I still don't get young men standing up and saying, 'How can I combine career and family?'", u'An audience is always warming but it must never be necessary to your work.', u'Generally speaking, everyone is more interesting doing nothing than doing anything.', u'Americans are very friendly and very suspicious, that is what Americans are and that is what always upsets the foreigner, who deals with them, they are so friendly how can they be so suspicious they are so suspicious how can they be so friendly but they just are.', u'A diary means yes indeed.', u'If you can do it then why do it?', u'We are always the same age inside.', u'Disillusionment in living is finding that no one can really ever be agreeing with you completely in anything.', u'It is very easy to love alone.', u'The thing that differentiates man from animals is money.', u'Is it worse to be scared than to be bored, that is the question.', u'Let me listen to me and not to them.', u'The deepest thing in any one is the conviction of the bad luck that follows boasting.', u'There is no there there.', u'Considering how dangerous everything is, nothing is really very frightening.', u'Do you know because I tell you so, or do you know, do you know.', u'I could undertake to be an efficient pupil if it were possible to find an efficient teacher.', u"I've been rich and I've been poor. It's better to be rich.", u'When they are alone they want to be with others, and when they are with others they want to be alone. After all, human beings are like that.', u'A masterpiece... may be unwelcome but it is never dull.'], u'William Arthur Ward': [u'The pessimist complains about the wind; the optimist expects it to change; the realist adjusts the sails.', u'Flatter me, and I may not believe you. Criticize me, and I may not like you. Ignore me, and I may not forgive you. Encourage me, and I will not forget you. Love me and I may be forced to love you.', u'The mediocre teacher tells. The good teacher explains. The superior teacher demonstrates. The great teacher inspires.', u'A well-developed sense of humor is the pole that adds balance to your steps as you walk the tightrope of life.', u'Forgiveness is a funny thing. It warms the heart and cools the sting.', u'Adversity causes some men to break; others to break records.', u'Feeling gratitude and not expressing it is like wrapping a present and not giving it.', u'God gave you a gift of 86,400 seconds today. Have you used one to say "thank you?"', u'It is wise to direct your anger towards problems - not people; to focus your energies on answers - not excuses.', u'A warm smile is the universal language of kindness.', u'Happiness is an inside job.', u'To make mistakes is human; to stumble is commonplace; to be able to laugh at yourself is maturity.', u'A cloudy day is no match for a sunny disposition.', u'Change, like sunshine, can be a friend or a foe, a blessing or a curse, a dawn or a dusk.', u'If you can imagine it, you can achieve it. If you can dream it, you can become it.', u'Opportunities are like sunrises. If you wait too long, you miss them.', u'The more generous we are, the more joyous we become. The more cooperative we are, the more valuable we become. The more enthusiastic we are, the more productive we become. The more serving we are, the more prosperous we become.', u'When we seek to discover the best in others, we somehow bring out the best in ourselves.', u'Today is a most unusual day, because we have never lived it before; we will never live it again; it is the only day we have.', u'Wise are they who have learned these truths: Trouble is temporary. Time is tonic. Tribulation is a test tube.', u"Wise are those who learn that the bottom line doesn't always have to be their top priority.", u'Curiosity is the wick in the candle of learning.', u'Lose yourself in generous service and every day can be a most unusual day, a triumphant day, an abundantly rewarding day!', u'We can learn much from wise words, little from wisecracks, and less from wise guys.', u'Humanity either makes, or breeds, or tolerates all its afflictions.'], u'Henny Youngman': [u"Do you know what it means to come home at night to a woman who'll give you a little love, a little affection, a little tenderness? It means you're in the wrong house, that's what it means.", u'The secret of a happy marriage remains a secret.', u"If you're going to do something tonight that you'll be sorry for tomorrow morning, sleep late.", u'Some people ask the secret of our long marriage. We take time to go to a restaurant two times a week. A little candlelight, dinner, soft music and dancing. She goes Tuesdays, I go Fridays.', u'A Jewish woman had two chickens. One got sick, so the woman made chicken soup out of the other one to help the sick one get well.', u'I told the doctor I broke my leg in two places. He told me to quit going to those places.', u'You have a nice personality, but not for a human being.', u"I've got all the money I'll ever need, if I die by four o'clock.", u'I once wanted to become an atheist, but I gave up - they have no holidays.', u"How to drive a guy crazy: send him a telegram and on the top put 'page 2.'", u'While playing golf today I hit two good balls. I stepped on a rake.', u'I take my wife everywhere, but she keeps finding her way back.', u"If at first you don't succeed... so much for skydiving.", u'When I read about the evils of drinking, I gave up reading.', u'I played a lot of tough clubs in my time. Once a guy in one of those clubs wanted to bet me $10 that I was dead. I was afraid to bet.', u'Just got back from a pleasure trip: I took my mother-in-law to the airport.', u"She's been married so many times she has rice marks on her face.", u'There was a girl knocking on my hotel room door all night! Finally, I let her out.', u"A doctor gave a man six months to live. The man couldn't pay his bill, so he gave him another six months.", u'I played a great horse yesterday! It took seven horses to beat him.', u'My brother was a lifeguard in a car wash.', u"My son complains about headaches. I tell him all the time, when you get out of bed, it's feet first!", u'The horse I bet on was so slow, the jockey kept a diary of the trip.', u"This man is frank and earnest with women. In Fresno, he's Frank and in Chicago he's Ernest.", u"What's the use of happiness? It can't buy you money."], u'Dave Barry': [u'Not all chemicals are bad. Without chemicals such as hydrogen and oxygen, for example, there would be no way to make water, a vital ingredient in beer.', u"If you had to identify, in one word, the reason why the human race has not achieved, and never will achieve, its full potential, that word would be 'meetings.'", u"It is a scientific fact that your body will not absorb cholesterol if you take it from another person's plate.", u'Guys are simple... women are not simple and they always assume that men must be just as complicated as they are, only way more mysterious. The whole point is guys are not thinking much. They are just what they appear to be. Tragically.', u'Bill Gates is a very rich man today... and do you want to know why? The answer is one word: versions.', u'Once again, we come to the Holiday Season, a deeply religious time that each of us observes, in his own way, by going to the mall of his choice.', u'Never assume that the guy understands that you and he have a relationship.', u'Life is anything that dies when you stomp on it.', u'It is a well-documented fact that guys will not ask for directions. This is a biological thing. This is why it takes several million sperm cells... to locate a female egg, despite the fact that the egg is, relative to them, the size of Wisconsin.', u'Magnetism, as you recall from physics class, is a powerful force that causes certain items to be attracted to refrigerators.', u'The problem with winter sports is that - follow me closely here - they generally take place in winter.', u'Scientists now believe that the primary biological function of breasts is to make males stupid.', u'People who want to share their religious views with you almost never want you to share yours with them.', u'The word user is the word used by the computer professional when they mean idiot.', u'You can only be young once. But you can always be immature.', u'Gravity is a contributing factor in nearly 73 percent of all accidents involving falling objects.', u'Never under any circumstances take a sleeping pill and a laxative on the same night.', u'Dogs feel very strongly that they should always go with you in the car, in case the need should arise for them to bark violently at nothing right in your ear.', u'Eating rice cakes is like chewing on a foam coffee cup, only less filling.', u"'Escargot' is French for 'fat crawling bag of phlegm'.", u'Skiing combines outdoor fun with knocking down trees with your face.', u'To an adolescent, there is nothing in the world more embarrassing than a parent.', u"Although golf was originally restricted to wealthy, overweight Protestants, today it's open to anybody who owns hideous clothing.", u'Fishing is boring, unless you catch an actual fish, and then it is disgusting.', u"Nobody cares if you can't dance well. Just get up and dance."], u'Chris Rock': [u"Gun control? We need bullet control! I think every bullet should cost 5,000 dollars. Because if a bullet cost five thousand dollar, we wouldn't have any innocent bystanders.", u'There are only three things women need in life: food, water, and compliments.', u"I don't get high, but sometimes I wish I did. That way, when I messed up in life I would have an excuse. But right now there's no rehab for stupidity.", u'A man is only as faithful as his options.', u"If a woman tells you she's twenty and looks sixteen, she's twelve. If she tells you she's twenty-six and looks twenty-six, she's damn near fourty.", u'Every town has the same two malls: the one white people go to and the one white people used to go to.', u'Gay people got a right to be as miserable as everybody else.', u'I live in a neighborhood so bad that you can get shot while getting shot.', u'Everyone has favorite criminals. Mine are pimps. We can all rob a bank; we can all sell drugs. Being a pimp is a whole other thing.', u'You can only offend me if you mean something to me.', u"Charlie Brown is the one person I identify with. C.B. is such a loser. He wasn't even the star of his own Halloween special.", u"When I hear people talk about juggling, or the sacrifices they make for their children, I look at them like they're crazy, because 'sacrifice' infers that there was something better to do than being with your children.", u"You don't pay taxes - they take taxes.", u'A sense of humor is great - it goes a long, long way in a marriage.', u'Black people dominate sports in the United States. 20% of the population and 90% of the final four.', u"Yeah, I love being famous. It's almost like being white, y'know?", u"A white boy that makes C's in college can make it to the White House.", u"Funny is only something that others know about you - you can't be funny by yourself.", u'Only married people understand you can be miserable and happy at the same time.', u'School shootings were invented by blacks... and stolen by the white man.', u"A comedy club is a place where you work out material, you're trying material.", u'After I left high school and got my GED, I studied broadcast journalism for a year at a community college.', u'America is the greatest country in the whole world.', u'Anything you can suck at should make you nervous.', u"Bill Cosby was the first comedian I was exposed to, because he doesn't curse."], u'John Dewey': [u'Education is not preparation for life; education is life itself.', u'To find out what one is fitted to do, and to secure an opportunity to do it, is the key to happiness.', u'Arriving at one goal is the starting point to another.', u'To me faith means not worrying.', u'Education, therefore, is a process of living and not a preparation for future living.', u'The good man is the man who, no matter how morally unworthy he has been, is moving to become better.', u'The path of least resistance and least trouble is a mental rut already made. It requires troublesome work to undertake the alternation of old beliefs.', u'Man is not logical and his intellectual history is a record of mental reserves and compromises. He hangs on to what he can in his old beliefs even when he is compelled to surrender their logical basis.', u'We only think when we are confronted with problems.', u'Anyone who has begun to think, places some portion of the world in jeopardy.', u'Failure is instructive. The person who really thinks learns quite as much from his failures as from his successes.', u'Skepticism: the mark and even the pose of the educated mind.', u'Every great advance in science has issued from a new audacity of imagination.', u'Just as a flower which seems beautiful and has color but no perfume, so are the fruitless words of the man who speaks them but does them not.', u'Luck, bad if not good, will always be with us. But it has a way of favoring the intelligent and showing its back to the stupid.', u'Nature is the mother and the habitat of man, even if sometimes a stepmother and an unfriendly home.', u'The self is not something ready-made, but something in continuous formation through choice of action.', u'Without some goals and some efforts to reach it, no man can live.', u'By object is meant some element in the complex whole that is defined in abstraction from the whole of which it is a distinction.', u'Man lives in a world of surmise, of mystery, of uncertainties.', u"No man's credit is as good as his money.", u"One lives with so many bad deeds on one's conscience and some good intentions in one's heart.", u'Such happiness as life is capable of comes from the full participation of all our powers in the endeavor to wrest from each changing situations of experience its own full and unique meaning.', u'The belief that all genuine education comes about through experience does not mean that all experiences are genuinely or equally educative.', u"Time and memory are true artists; they remould reality nearer to the heart's desire."], u'Thomas Merton': [u"Every moment and every event of every man's life on earth plants something in his soul.", u'Love is our true destiny. We do not find the meaning of life by ourselves alone - we find it with another.', u'The beginning of love is to let those we love be perfectly themselves, and not to twist them to fit our own image. Otherwise we love only the reflection of ourselves we find in them.', u'Art enables us to find ourselves and lose ourselves at the same time.', u'Happiness is not a matter of intensity but of balance, order, rhythm and harmony.', u'A life is either all spiritual or not spiritual at all. No man can serve two masters. Your life is shaped by the end you live for. You are made in the image of what you desire.', u'Pride makes us artificial and humility makes us real.', u'By reading the scriptures I am so renewed that all nature seems renewed around me and with me. The sky seems to be a pure, a cooler blue, the trees a deeper green. The whole world is charged with the glory of God and I feel fire and music under my feet.', u'The biggest human temptation is to settle for too little.', u'Love seeks one thing only: the good of the one loved. It leaves all the other secondary effects to take care of themselves. Love, therefore, is its own reward.', u'Yet it is in this loneliness that the deepest activities begin. It is here that you discover act without motion, labor that is profound repose, vision in obscurity, and, beyond all desire, a fulfillment whose limits extend to infinity.', u'We are so obsessed with doing that we have no time and no imagination left for being. As a result, men are valued not for what they are but for what they do or what they have - for their usefulness.', u'In the last analysis, the individual person is responsible for living his own life and for "finding himself." If he persists in shifting his responsibility to somebody else, he fails to find out the meaning of his own existence.', u'We are not at peace with others because we are not at peace with ourselves, and we are not at peace with ourselves because we are not at peace with God.', u'Peace demands the most heroic labor and the most difficult sacrifice. It demands greater heroism than war. It demands greater fidelity to the truth and a much more perfect purity of conscience.', u'We stumble and fall constantly even when we are most enlightened. But when we are in true spiritual darkness, we do not even know that we have fallen.', u'What can we gain by sailing to the moon if we are not able to cross the abyss that separates us from ourselves? This is the most important of all voyages of discovery, and without it, all the rest are not only useless, but disastrous.', u'Be good, keep your feet dry, your eyes open, your heart at peace and your soul in the joy of Christ.', u'If you want to study the social and political history of modern nations, study hell.', u'Perhaps I am stronger than I think.', u'To consider persons and events and situations only in the light of their effect upon myself is to live on the doorstep of hell.', u'We have what we seek, it is there all the time, and if we give it time, it will make itself known to us.', u'The tighter you squeeze, the less you have.', u'When ambition ends, happiness begins.', u'I cannot make the universe obey me. I cannot make other people conform to my own whims and fancies. I cannot make even my own body obey me.'], u'Ambrose Bierce': [u'Speak when you are angry and you will make the best speech you will ever regret.', u'Future. That period of time in which our affairs prosper, our friends are true and our happiness is assured.', u"War is God's way of teaching Americans geography.", u'Love: A temporary insanity curable by marriage.', u'Corporation: An ingenious device for obtaining profit without individual responsibility.', u'Politics: A strife of interests masquerading as a contest of principles. The conduct of public affairs for private advantage.', u'Marriage, n: the state or condition of a community consisting of a master, a mistress, and two slaves, making in all, two.', u'Day, n. A period of twenty-four hours, mostly misspent.', u'Doubt, indulged and cherished, is in danger of becoming denial; but if honest, and bent on thorough investigation, it may soon lead to full establishment of the truth.', u'Belladonna, n.: In Italian a beautiful lady; in English a deadly poison. A striking example of the essential identity of the two tongues.', u'Conservative, n: A statesman who is enamored of existing evils, as distinguished from the Liberal who wishes to replace them with others.', u'History is an account, mostly false, of events, mostly unimportant, which are brought about by rulers, mostly knaves, and soldiers, mostly fools.', u'Sweater, n.: garment worn by child when its mother is feeling chilly.', u'Beauty, n: the power by which a woman charms a lover and terrifies a husband.', u'Friendless. Having no favors to bestow. Destitute of fortune. Addicted to utterance of truth and common sense.', u'Experience - the wisdom that enables us to recognise in an undesirable old acquaintance the folly that we have already embraced.', u'Academe, n.: An ancient school where morality and philosophy were taught. Academy, n.: A modern school where football is taught.', u'A person who doubts himself is like a man who would enlist in the ranks of his enemies and bear arms agains himself. He makes his failure certain by himself being the first person to be convinced of it.', u'Sabbath - a weekly festival having its origin in the fact that God made the world in six days and was arrested on the seventh.', u'Logic: The art of thinking and reasoning in strict accordance with the limitations and incapacities of the human misunderstanding.', u'Meekness: Uncommon patience in planning a revenge that is worth while.', u'Education, n.: That which discloses to the wise and disguises from the foolish their lack of understanding.', u'In our civilization, and under our republican form of government, intelligence is so highly honored that it is rewarded by exemption from the cares of office.', u'Perseverance - a lowly virtue whereby mediocrity achieves an inglorious success.', u'Photograph: a picture painted by the sun without instruction in art.'], u'F. Scott Fitzgerald': [u'The test of a first-rate intelligence is the ability to hold two opposed ideas in mind at the same time and still retain the ability to function.', u"Show me a hero and I'll write you a tragedy.", u'Forgotten is forgiven.', u'Cut out all these exclamation points. An exclamation point is like laughing at your own joke.', u'Either you think, or else others have to think for you and take power from you, pervert and discipline your natural tastes, civilize and sterilize you.', u'Life is essentially a cheat and its conditions are those of defeat; the redeeming things are not happiness and pleasure but the deeper satisfactions that come out of struggle.', u"Family quarrels are bitter things. They don't go according to any rules. They're not like aches or wounds, they're more like splits in the skin that won't heal because there's not enough material.", u'Vitality shows in not only the ability to persist but the ability to start over.', u'There are no second acts in American lives.', u'A great social success is a pretty girl who plays her cards as carefully as if she were plain.', u"I'm a romantic; a sentimental person thinks things will last, a romantic person hopes against hope that they won't.", u'Advertising is a racket, like the movies and the brokerage business. You cannot be honest without admitting that its constructive contribution to humanity is exactly minus zero.', u'It is sadder to find the past again and find it inadequate to the present than it is to have it elude you and remain forever a harmonious conception of memory.', u"In a real dark night of the soul, it is always three o'clock in the morning, day after day.", u'Never confuse a single defeat with a final defeat.', u"I've been drunk for about a week now, and I thought it might sober me up to sit in a library.", u'At eighteen our convictions are hills from which we look; at forty-five they are caves in which we hide.', u'First you take a drink, then the drink takes a drink, then the drink takes you.', u'All good writing is swimming under water and holding your breath.', u'Genius is the ability to put into effect what is on your mind.', u"It is in the thirties that we want friends. In the forties we know they won't save us any more than love did.", u'Action is character.', u"It's not a slam at you when people are rude, it's a slam at the people they've met before.", u'Men get to be a mixture of the charming mannerisms of the women they have known.', u"You don't write because you want to say something, you write because you have something to say."], u'Charles Lindbergh': [u'If I had to choose, I would rather have birds than airplanes.', u'Man must feel the earth to know himself and recognize his values... God made life simple. It is man who complicates it.', u'Is he alone who has courage on his right hand and faith on his left hand?', u'Life is like a landscape. You live in the midst of it but can describe it only from the vantage point of distance.', u'I have seen the science I worshiped, and the aircraft I loved, destroying the civilization I expected them to serve.', u'I owned the world that hour as I rode over it. free of the earth, free of the mountains, free of the clouds, but how inseparably I was bound to them.', u'In wilderness I sense the miracle of life, and behind it our scientific accomplishments fade to trivia.', u"Isn't it strange that we talk least about the things we think about most?", u'Life is a culmination of the past, an awareness of the present, an indication of a future beyond knowledge, the quality that gives a touch of divinity to matter.', u'Real freedom lies in wildness, not in civilization.', u'To a person in love, the value of the individual is intuitively known. Love needs no logic for its mission.', u'I realized that If I had to choose, I would rather have birds than airplanes.', u'It is the greatest shot of adrenaline to be doing what you have wanted to do so badly. You almost feel like you could fly without the plane.', u'Living in dreams of yesterday, we find ourselves still dreaming of impossible future conquests.'], u'Desiderius Erasmus': [u'Give light, and the darkness will disappear of itself.', u'When I get a little money I buy books; and if any is left I buy food and clothes.', u'In the kingdom of the blind, the one-eyed man is king.', u'There are some people who live in a dream world, and there are some who face reality; and then there are those who turn one into the other.', u'A nail is driven out by another nail. Habit is overcome by habit.', u"Women, can't live with them, can't live without them.", u'Concealed talent brings no reputation.', u'To know nothing is the happiest life.', u'By a Carpenter mankind was made, and only by that Carpenter can mankind be remade.', u'It is the chiefest point of happiness that a man is willing to be what he is.', u'Nature, more of a stepmother than a mother in several ways, has sown a seed of evil in the hearts of mortals, especially in the more thoughtful men, which makes them dissatisfied with their own lot and envious of another s.', u'Nowadays the rage for possession has got to such a pitch that there is nothing in the realm of nature, whether sacred or profane, out of which profit cannot be squeezed.', u'Prevention is better than cure.', u'He who allows oppression shares the crime.', u'The desire to write grows with writing.', u'Fools are without number.', u'Great abundance of riches cannot be gathered and kept by any man without sin.', u"If you keep thinking about what you want to do or what you hope will happen, you don't do it, and it won't happen.", u'Whether a party can have much success without a woman present I must ask others to decide, but one thing is certain, no party is any fun unless seasoned with folly.', u'Fortune favors the audacious.', u'I doubt if a single individual could be found from the whole of mankind free from some form of insanity. The only difference is one of degree. A man who sees a gourd and takes it for his wife is called insane because this happens to very few people.', u'In the country of the blind the one eyed man is king.', u'It is an unscrupulous intellect that does not pay to antiquity its due reverence.', u'Man is to man either a god or a wolf.', u"Nothing is as peevish and pedantic as men's judgments of one another."], u'Walt Disney': [u'All our dreams can come true, if we have the courage to pursue them.', u"We keep moving forward, opening new doors, and doing new things, because we're curious and curiosity keeps leading us down new paths.", u'If you can dream it, you can do it.', u"All the adversity I've had in my life, all my troubles and obstacles, have strengthened me... You may not realize it when it happens, but a kick in the teeth may be the best thing in the world for you.", u'The more you like yourself, the less you are like anyone else, which makes you unique.', u'A man should never neglect his family for business.', u'The way to get started is to quit talking and begin doing.', u'I always like to look on the optimistic side of life, but I am realistic enough to know that life is a complex matter.', u'When you believe in a thing, believe in it all the way, implicitly and unquestionable.', u'Crowded classrooms and half-day sessions are a tragic waste of our greatest national resource - the minds of our children.', u"It's kind of fun to do the impossible.", u'Mickey Mouse popped out of my mind onto a drawing pad 20 years ago on a train ride from Manhattan to Hollywood at a time when business fortunes of my brother Roy and myself were at lowest ebb and disaster seemed right around the corner.', u'I love Mickey Mouse more than any woman I have ever known.', u'Animation can explain whatever the mind of man can conceive. This facility makes it the most versatile and explicit means of communication yet devised for quick mass appreciation.', u'You can design and create, and build the most wonderful place in the world. But it takes people to make the dream a reality.', u'I would rather entertain and hope that people learned something than educate people and hope they were entertained.', u'You may not realize it when it happens, but a kick in the teeth may be the best thing in the world for you.', u"I have been up against tough competition all my life. I wouldn't know how to get along without it.", u"You're dead if you aim only for kids. Adults are only kids grown up, anyway.", u"When you're curious, you find lots of interesting things to do.", u'Disneyland will never be completed. It will continue to grow as long as there is imagination left in the world.', u'Of all of our inventions for mass communication, pictures still speak the most universally understood language.', u"Disneyland is a work of love. We didn't go into Disneyland just with the idea of making money.", u"Laughter is America's most important export.", u"I only hope that we don't lose sight of one thing - that it was all started by a mouse."], u'John Lennon': [u'Life is what happens while you are busy making other plans.', u"I believe in God, but not as one thing, not as an old man in the sky. I believe that what people call God is something in all of us. I believe that what Jesus and Mohammed and Buddha and all the rest said was right. It's just that the translations have gone wrong.", u"I'm not going to change the way I look or the way I feel to conform to anything. I've always been a freak. So I've been a freak all my life and I have to live with that, you know. I'm one of those people.", u"Imagine all the people living life in peace. You may say I'm a dreamer, but I'm not the only one. I hope someday you'll join us, and the world will be as one.", u"Our society is run by insane people for insane objectives. I think we're being run by maniacs for maniacal ends and I think I'm liable to be put away as insane for expressing that. That's what's insane about it.", u"I believe in everything until it's disproved. So I believe in fairies, the myths, dragons. It all exists, even if it's in your mind. Who's to say that dreams and nightmares aren't as real as the here and now?", u'Time you enjoy wasting, was not wasted.', u'As usual, there is a great woman behind every idiot.', u"If someone thinks that love and peace is a cliche that must have been left behind in the Sixties, that's his problem. Love and peace are eternal.", u"If everyone demanded peace instead of another television set, then there'd be peace.", u"We've got this gift of love, but love is like a precious plant. You can't just accept it and leave it in the cupboard or just think it's going to get on by itself. You've got to keep watering it. You've got to really look after it and nurture it.", u"You don't need anybody to tell you who you are or what you are. You are what you are!", u"Music is everybody's possession. It's only publishers who think that people own it.", u"Love is the flower you've got to let grow.", u"Everybody loves you when you're six foot in the ground.", u"Christianity will go. It will vanish and shrink. I needn't argue with that; I'm right and I will be proved right. We're more popular than Jesus now; I don't know which will go first - rock and roll or Christianity.", u"When you're drowning, you don't say 'I would be incredibly pleased if someone would have the foresight to notice me drowning and come and help me,' you just scream.", u"Everything is clearer when you're in love.", u'Yeah we all shine on, like the moon, and the stars, and the sun.', u'All you need is love.', u"I'm not claiming divinity. I've never claimed purity of soul. I've never claimed to have the answers to life. I only put out songs and answer questions as honestly as I can... But I still believe in peace, love and understanding.", u"Love is the answer, and you know that for sure; Love is a flower, you've got to let it grow.", u'All we are saying is give peace a chance.', u"The basic thing nobody asks is why do people take drugs of any sort? Why do we have these accessories to normal living to live? I mean, is there something wrong with society that's making us so pressurized, that we cannot live without guarding ourselves against it?", u"You're just left with yourself all the time, whatever you do anyway. You've got to get down to your own God in your own temple. It's all down to you, mate."], u'Steven Wright': [u"A lot of people are afraid of heights. Not me, I'm afraid of widths.", u'I intend to live forever. So far, so good.', u"Babies don't need a vacation, but I still see them at the beach... it pisses me off! I'll go over to a little baby and say 'What are you doing here? You haven't worked a day in your life!'", u'Everywhere is within walking distance if you have the time.', u"I remember when the candle shop burned down. Everyone stood around singing 'Happy Birthday.'", u'Cross country skiing is great if you live in a small country.', u'I busted a mirror and got seven years bad luck, but my lawyer thinks he can get me five.', u"There's a fine line between fishing and just standing on the shore like an idiot.", u'For my birthday I got a humidifier and a de-humidifier... I put them in the same room and let them fight it out.', u'I went to a restaurant that serves "breakfast at any time". So I ordered French Toast during the Renaissance.', u"I bought some batteries, but they weren't included.", u"I'm writing a book. I've got the page numbers done.", u"What's another word for Thesaurus?", u'Curiosity killed the cat, but for a while I was a suspect.', u"You can't have everything. Where would you put it?", u'I was reading the dictionary. I thought it was a poem about everything.', u"I got this powdered water - now I don't know what to add.", u"I have an answering machine in my car. It says, I'm home now. But leave a message and I'll call when I'm out.", u"I hooked up my accelerator pedal in my car to my brake lights. I hit the gas, people behind me stop, and I'm gone.", u"I think it's wrong that only one company makes the game Monopoly.", u'Last night I stayed up late playing poker with Tarot cards. I got a full house and four people died.', u'I drive way too fast to worry about cholesterol.', u"I have an existential map. It has 'You are here' written all over it.", u"If it's a penny for your thoughts and you put in your two cents worth, then someone, somewhere is making a penny.", u'I installed a skylight in my apartment... the people who live above me are furious!'], u'Anne Frank': [u'Despite everything, I believe that people are really good at heart.', u'The best remedy for those who are afraid, lonely or unhappy is to go outside, somewhere where they can be quiet, alone with the heavens, nature and God. Because only then does one feel that all is as it should be.', u"In spite of everything I still believe that people are really good at heart. I simply can't build up my hopes on a foundation consisting of confusion, misery and death.", u"Parents can only give good advice or put them on the right paths, but the final forming of a person's character lies in their own hands.", u"How true Daddy's words were when he said: all children must look after their own upbringing. Parents can only give good advice or put them on the right paths, but the final forming of a person's character lies in their own hands.", u'Whoever is happy will make others happy too.', u"Everyone has inside of him a piece of good news. The good news is that you don't know how great you can be! How much you can love! What you can accomplish! And what your potential is!", u'How wonderful it is that nobody need wait a single moment before starting to improve the world.', u'Think of all the beauty still left around you and be happy.', u'Laziness may appear attractive, but work gives satisfaction.', u"And finally I twist my heart round again, so that the bad is on the outside and the good is on the inside, and keep on trying to find a way of becoming what I would so like to be, and could be, if there weren't any other people living in the world.", u'No one has ever become poor by giving.', u"It's really a wonder that I haven't dropped all my ideals, because they seem so absurd and impossible to carry out. Yet I keep them, because in spite of everything I still believe that people are really good at heart.", u"I don't think of all the misery but of the beauty that still remains.", u"I simply can't build my hopes on a foundation of confusion, misery and death... I think... peace and tranquillity will return again.", u"Boys will be boys. And even that wouldn't matter if only we could prevent girls from being girls.", u"The final forming of a person's character lies in their own hands.", u'I keep my ideals, because in spite of everything I still believe that people are really good at heart.', u'If I read a book that impresses me, I have to take myself firmly by the hand, before I mix with other people; otherwise they would think my mind rather queer.', u'We all live with the objective of being happy; our lives are all different and yet the same.', u'I must uphold my ideals, for perhaps the time will come when I shall be able to carry them out.', u'I live in a crazy time.', u'I soothe my conscience now with the thought that it is better for hard words to be on paper than that Mummy should carry them in her heart.', u'Who would ever think that so much went on in the soul of a young girl?'], u'Charlie Chaplin': [u'A day without laughter is a day wasted.', u'The saddest thing I can imagine is to get used to luxury.', u"A man's true character comes out when he's drunk.", u'We think too much and feel too little.', u'Nothing is permanent in this wicked world - not even our troubles.', u'Life is a tragedy when seen in close-up, but a comedy in long-shot.', u'Failure is unimportant. It takes courage to make a fool of yourself.', u'To truly laugh, you must be able to take your pain, and play with it!', u'A tramp, a gentleman, a poet, a dreamer, a lonely fellow, always hopeful of romance and adventure.', u'I am at peace with God. My conflict is with Man.', u'I do not have much patience with a thing of beauty that must be explained to be understood. If it does need additional interpretation by someone other than the creator, then I question whether it has fulfilled its purpose.', u'Life could be wonderful if people would leave you alone.', u'The hate of men will pass, and dictators die, and the power they took from the people will return to the people. And so long as men die, liberty will never perish.', u'Laughter is the tonic, the relief, the surcease for pain.', u'I remain just one thing, and one thing only, and that is a clown. It places me on a far higher plane than any politician.', u'To help a friend in need is easy, but to give him your time is not always opportune.', u"We all want to help one another. Human beings are like that. We want to live by each other's happiness, not by each other's misery.", u"Words are cheap. The biggest thing you can say is 'elephant'.", u'I thought I would dress in baggy pants, big shoes, a cane and a derby hat. everything a contradiction: the pants baggy, the coat tight, the hat small and the shoes large.', u'I had no idea of the character. But the moment I was dressed, the clothes and the make-up made me feel the person he was. I began to know him, and by the time I walked onto the stage he was fully born.', u"I suppose that's one of the ironies of life doing the wrong thing at the right moment.", u'Man as an individual is a genius. But men in the mass form the headless monster, a great, brutish idiot that goes where prodded.', u"Brunettes are troublemakers. They're worse than the Jews.", u"I went into the business for the money, and the art grew out of it. If people are disillusioned by that remark, I can't help it. It's the truth.", u'What do you want a meaning for? Life is a desire, not a meaning.'], u'Earl Nightingale': [u"Learn to enjoy every minute of your life. Be happy now. Don't wait for something outside of yourself to make you happy in the future. Think how really precious is the time you have to spend, whether it's at work or with your family. Every minute should be enjoyed and savored.", u'The biggest mistake that you can make is to believe that you are working for somebody else. Job security is gone. The driving force of a career must come from the individual. Remember: Jobs are owned by the company, you own your career!', u'Our attitude towards others determines their attitude towards us.', u'Our environment, the world in which we live and work, is a mirror of our attitudes and expectations.', u"Don't let the fear of the time it will take to accomplish something stand in the way of your doing it. The time will pass anyway; we might just as well put that passing time to the best possible use.", u'Whatever we plant in our subconscious mind and nourish with repetition and emotion will one day become a reality.', u'People are where they are because that is exactly where they really want to be - whether they will admit that or not.', u'A great attitude does much more than turn on the lights in our worlds; it seems to magically connect us to all sorts of serendipitous opportunities that were somehow absent before the change.', u'Always keep that happy attitude. Pretend that you are holding a beautiful fragrant bouquet.', u'The more intensely we feel about an idea or a goal, the more assuredly the idea, buried deep in our subconscious, will direct us along the path to its fulfillment.', u'Any person who contributes to prosperity must prosper in turn.', u"People with goals succeed because they know where they're going.", u"All you have to do is know where you're going. The answers will come to you of their own accord.", u"Whenever we're afraid, it's because we don't know enough. If we understood enough, we would never be afraid.", u'Ideas are elusive, slippery things. Best to keep a pad of paper and a pencil at your bedside, so you can stab them during the night before they get away.', u"Picture yourself in your minds eye as having already achieved this goal. See yourself doing the things you'll be doing when you've reached your goal.", u'Your problem is to bridge the gap which exists between where you are now and the goal you intend to reach.', u'We can let circumstances rule us, or we can take charge and rule our lives from within.', u'We will receive not what we idly wish for but what we justly earn. Our rewards will always be in exact proportion to our service.', u'Wherever there is danger, there lurks opportunity; whenever there is opportunity, there lurks danger. The two are inseparable. They go together.', u'All you need is the plan, the road map, and the courage to press on to your destination.', u'Everything in the world we want to do or get done, we must do with and through people.', u'Success is the progressive realization of a worthy goal or ideal.', u'The mind moves in the direction of our currently dominant thoughts.', u"We are at our very best, and we are happiest, when we are fully engaged in work we enjoy on the journey toward the goal we've established for ourselves. It gives meaning to our time off and comfort to our sleep. It makes everything else in life so wonderful, so worthwhile."], u'Benjamin Disraeli': [u'Action may not always bring happiness; but there is no happiness without action.', u'I am prepared for the worst, but hope for the best.', u'The greatest good you can do for another is not just to share your riches but to reveal to him his own.', u'Never complain and never explain.', u'One secret of success in life is for a man to be ready for his opportunity when it comes.', u'Diligence is the mother of good fortune.', u'The world is governed by very different personages from what is imagined by those who are not behind the scenes.', u"Two nations between whom there is no intercourse and no sympathy; who are as ignorant of each other's habits, thoughts, and feelings, as if they were dwellers in different zones, or inhabitants of different planets. The rich and the poor.", u'Never apologize for showing feeling. When you do so, you apologize for the truth.', u'How much easier it is to be critical than to be correct.', u'Life is too short to be little. Man is never so manly as when he feels deeply, acts boldly, and expresses himself with frankness and with fervor.', u'Nurture your minds with great thoughts. To believe in the heroic makes heroes.', u'I say that justice is truth in action.', u'A Conservative Government is an organized hypocrisy.', u'Conservatism discards Prescription, shrinks from Principle, disavows Progress; having rejected all respect for antiquity, it offers no redress for the present, and makes no preparation for the future.', u'Courage is fire, and bullying is smoke.', u'We are all born for love. It is the principle of existence, and its only end.', u'Circumstances are beyond human control, but our conduct is in our own power.', u'Man is only great when he acts from passion.', u'What we anticipate seldom occurs: but what we least expect generally happens.', u'You can tell the strength of a nation by the women behind its men.', u'I repeat... that all power is a trust; that we are accountable for its exercise; that from the people and for the people all springs, and all must exist.', u'A consistent soul believes in destiny, a capricious one in chance.', u'I have brought myself, by long meditation, to the conviction that a human being with a settled purpose must accomplish it, and that nothing can resist a will which will stake even existence upon its fulfillment.', u'Youth is a blunder; Manhood a struggle, Old Age a regret.'], u'Niels Bohr': [u'Everything we call real is made of things that cannot be regarded as real.', u"Prediction is very difficult, especially if it's about the future.", u'An expert is a man who has made all the mistakes which can be made, in a narrow field.', u"If quantum mechanics hasn't profoundly shocked you, you haven't understood it yet.", u'Every great and deep difficulty bears in itself its own solution. It forces us to change our thinking in order to find it.', u'The best weapon of a dictatorship is secrecy, but the best weapon of a democracy should be the weapon of openness.', u'We are all agreed that your theory is crazy. The question which divides us is whether it is crazy enough to have a chance of being correct. My own feeling is that it is not crazy enough.', u'It is wrong to think that the task of physics is to find out how Nature is. Physics concerns what we say about Nature.', u'When it comes to atoms, language can be used only as in poetry. The poet, too, is not nearly so concerned with describing facts as with creating images.', u'Einstein, stop telling God what to do!', u'Never express yourself more clearly than you are able to think.', u'The opposite of a fact is falsehood, but the opposite of one profound truth may very well be another profound truth.', u"Your theory is crazy, but it's not crazy enough to be true.", u'There are some things so serious you have to laugh at them.', u'Technology has advanced more in the last thirty years than in the previous two thousand. The exponential increase in advancement will only continue. Anthropological Commentary The opposite of a trivial truth is false; the opposite of a great truth is also true.', u'An expert is someone who knows some of the worst mistakes, which can be made, in a very narrow field.', u'How wonderful that we have met with a paradox. Now we have some hope of making progress.', u'Every sentence I utter must be understood not as an affirmation, but as a question.', u"A physicist is just an atom's way of looking at itself.", u'There are trivial truths and the great truths. The opposite of a trivial truth is plainly false. The opposite of a great truth is also true.', u'If anybody says he can think about quantum physics without getting giddy, that only shows he has not understood the first thing about them.', u"No, no, you're not thinking; you're just being logical."], u'Bertrand Russell': [u'The trouble with the world is that the stupid are cocksure and the intelligent are full of doubt.', u'War does not determine who is right - only who is left.', u'I would never die for my beliefs because I might be wrong.', u'One should respect public opinion insofar as is necessary to avoid starvation and keep out of prison, but anything that goes beyond this is voluntary submission to an unnecessary tyranny.', u'The time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time.', u'To fear love is to fear life, and those who fear life are already three parts dead.', u'Three passions, simple but overwhelmingly strong, have governed my life: the longing for love, the search for knowledge, and unbearable pity for the suffering of mankind.', u'The world is full of magical things patiently waiting for our wits to grow sharper.', u'Love is something far more than desire for sexual intercourse; it is the principal means of escape from the loneliness which afflicts most men and women throughout the greater part of their lives.', u"Anything you're good at contributes to happiness.", u'I believe in using words, not fists. I believe in my outrage knowing people are living in boxes on the street. I believe in honesty. I believe in a good time. I believe in good food. I believe in sex.', u'The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts.', u'Advocates of capitalism are very apt to appeal to the sacred principles of liberty, which are embodied in one maxim: The fortunate must not be restrained in the exercise of tyranny over the unfortunate.', u"Work is of two kinds: first, altering the position of matter at or near the earth's surface relative to other matter; second, telling other people to do so.", u"Democracy is the process by which people choose the man who'll get the blame.", u'Dogmatism and skepticism are both, in a sense, absolute philosophies; one is certain of knowing, the other of not knowing. What philosophy should dissipate is certainty, whether of knowledge or ignorance.', u'The megalomaniac differs from the narcissist by the fact that he wishes to be powerful rather than charming, and seeks to be feared rather than loved. To this type belong many lunatics and most of the great men of history.', u'Boredom is... a vital problem for the moralist, since half the sins of mankind are caused by the fear of it.', u'Conventional people are roused to fury by departure from convention, largely because they regard such departure as a criticism of themselves.', u'To conquer fear is the beginning of wisdom.', u'Men are born ignorant, not stupid. They are made stupid by education.', u'It is preoccupation with possessions, more than anything else, that prevents us from living freely and nobly.', u'In America everybody is of the opinion that he has no social superiors, since all men are equal, but he does not admit that he has no social inferiors, for, from the time of Jefferson onward, the doctrine that all men are equal applies only upwards, not downwards.', u'Religion is something left over from the infancy of our intelligence, it will fade away as we adopt reason and science as our guidelines.', u'I say quite deliberately that the Christian religion, as organized in its Churches, has been and still is the principal enemy of moral progress in the world.'], u'Paris Hilton': [u'Some girls are just born with glitter in their veins.', u'The way I see it, you should live everyday like its your birthday.', u'Every woman should have four pets in her life. A mink in her closet, a jaguar in her garage, a tiger in her bed, and a jackass who pays for everything.', u"I get along with guys; most of my friends are guys. It's easier to trust men sometimes. I only have a few close girlfriends that I trust.", u"The only rule is don't be boring and dress cute wherever you go. Life is too short to blend in.", u'A true heiress is never mean to anyone - except a girl who steals your boyfriend.', u"I always knew I had a voice and I've always known I could sing, but I was too shy to let it come out. I think it's the hardest thing to do, to sing in front of people. When I finally let go and did it, I realized it's what I'm most talented at and what I love to do the most.", u"I'm blonde and tanned and normal-sized! I'm sweet, shy, funny, have a big heart and I'm nice - and I like to eat.", u"One night stands are not for me. I think it's gross when you just give it up.", u"I don't really think, I just walk.", u"I'm not the same person I was. I used to act dumb. It was an act. I am 26 years old, and that act is no longer cute. It is not who I am, nor do I want to be that person for the young girls who looked up to me. I know now that I can make a difference, that I have the power to do that.", u"Some people change when they think they're a star or something.", u'All British people have plain names, and that works pretty well over there.', u"All it takes is one drink to mess with the way you drive - it clouds your judgment and slows your reflexes. Don't take any chances. It just isn't worth it.", u"Being grown up and in a serious relationship, I've learned so much. I'm happier than I've every been.", u'Everything I do is blown out of proportion. It really hurts my feelings.', u"I hate the taste of alcohol. When I'm drinking, I'm drinking Red Bull.", u'I hate when a guy brags... or he sweats.', u"I have been celibate for about six or seven months, I think. I would rather just make out and kiss someone instead of sex. I'm single. I said I would be single for a year and I am.", u"I like it, but it's yellow, and I'm like, I didn't want yellow for my engagement ring.", u'I love Africa in general South Africa and West Africa, they are both great countries.', u"I think it's important for girls to be confident. Believe in yourself and... everybody's hot.", u"I'm very intelligent. I'm capable of doing everything put to me. I've launched a perfume and want my own hotel chain. I'm living proof blondes are not stupid.", u"I've made all my money on my own without my family and I work very hard.", u'Life is too short to blend in.'], u'Francis Bacon': [u'Imagination was given to man to compensate him for what he is not; a sense of humor to console him for what he is.', u'Knowledge is power.', u'Silence is the sleep that nourishes wisdom.', u'Age appears to be best in four things; old wood best to burn, old wine to drink, old friends to trust, and old authors to read.', u'A man that studieth revenge keeps his own wounds green.', u'A prudent question is one-half of wisdom.', u"A little philosophy inclineth man's mind to atheism, but depth in philosophy bringeth men's minds about to religion.", u'I will never be an old man. To me, old age is always 15 years older than I am.', u'Reading maketh a full man; conference a ready man; and writing an exact man.', u"A bachelor's life is a fine breakfast, a flat lunch, and a miserable dinner.", u'He that will not apply new remedies must expect new evils; for time is the greatest innovator.', u'In taking revenge, a man is but even with his enemy; but in passing it over, he is superior.', u'A wise man will make more opportunities than he finds.', u'The job of the artist is always to deepen the mystery.', u'Anger makes dull men witty, but it keeps them poor.', u'If we do not maintain justice, justice will not maintain us.', u'Things alter for the worse spontaneously, if they be not altered for the better designedly.', u'He that gives good advice, builds with one hand; he that gives good counsel and example, builds with both; but he that gives good admonition and bad example, builds with one hand and pulls down with the other.', u'It is impossible to love and to be wise.', u'In order for the light to shine so brightly, the darkness must be present.', u'Travel, in the younger sort, is a part of education; in the elder, a part of experience.', u'Who questions much, shall learn much, and retain much.', u'Beauty itself is but the sensible image of the Infinite.', u'Money is like manure, of very little use except it be spread.', u'Choose the life that is most useful, and habit will make it the most agreeable.'], u'Theodor Adorno': [u'Wrong life cannot be lived rightly.', u'A German is someone who cannot tell a lie without believing it himself.', u'Love is the power to see similarity in the dissimilar.', u'Love you will find only where you may show yourself weak without provoking strength.', u'Freedom would be not to choose between black and white but to abjure such prescribed choices.', u'Every work of art is an uncommitted crime.', u'He who matures early lives in anticipation.', u'Advice to intellectuals: let no-one represent you.', u'Art is permitted to survive only if it renounces the right to be different, and integrates itself into the omnipotent realm of the profane.', u'He who has loved and who betrays love does harm not only to the image of the past, but to the past itself.', u'He who stands aloof runs the risk of believing himself better than others and misusing his critique of society as an ideology for his private interest.', u"In many people it is already an impertinence to say 'I'.", u'Intelligence is a moral category.', u'But he who dies in despair has lived his whole life in vain.', u'Dialectic thought is an attempt to break through the coercion of logic by its own means.', u"Fascism is itself less 'ideological', in so far as it openly proclaims the principle of domination that is elsewhere concealed.", u'He who integrates is lost.', u'Life has become the ideology of its own absence.', u'Tact is the discrimination of differences. It consists in conscious deviations.', u'The good man is he who rules himself as he does his own property: his autonomous being is modelled on material power.', u'The most powerful person is he who is able to do least himself and burden others most with the things for which he lends his name and pockets the credit.', u'All satire is blind to the forces liberated by decay. Which is why total decay has absorbed the forces of satire.', u'An emancipated society, on the other hand, would not be a unitary state, but the realization of universality in the reconciliation of differences.', u'Anti-Semitism is the rumour about the Jews.', u'Domination delegates the physical violence on which it rests to the dominated.'], u'Ansel Adams': [u"You don't take a photograph, you make it.", u'When words become unclear, I shall focus with photographs. When images become inadequate, I shall be content with silence.', u'A good photograph is knowing where to stand.', u'There are no rules for good photographs, there are only good photographs.', u'It is horrifying that we have to fight our own government to save the environment.', u'Photography is more than a medium for factual communication of ideas. It is a creative art.', u'In wisdom gathered over time I have found that every experience is a form of exploration.', u'No man has the right to dictate what other men should perceive, create or produce, but all should be encouraged to reveal themselves, their perceptions and emotions, and to build confidence in the creative spirit.', u'A great photograph is one that fully expresses what one feels, in the deepest sense, about what is being photographed.', u'I tried to keep both arts alive, but the camera won. I found that while the camera does not express the soul, perhaps a photograph can!', u'A true photograph need not be explained, nor can it be contained in words.', u'There is nothing worse than a sharp image of a fuzzy concept.', u'Landscape photography is the supreme test of the photographer - and often the supreme disappointment.', u'There are always two people in every picture: the photographer and the viewer.', u'Not everybody trusts paintings but people believe photographs.', u"Sometimes I do get to places just when God's ready to have somebody click the shutter.", u'Millions of men have lived to fight, build palaces and boundaries, shape destinies and societies; but the compelling force of all times has been the force of originality and creation profoundly affecting the roots of human spirit.', u"The negative is comparable to the composer's score and the print to its performance. Each performance differs in subtle ways.", u'Twelve significant photographs in any one year is a good crop.', u'It is my intention to present - through the medium of photography - intuitive observations of the natural world which may have meaning to the spectators.', u'Some photographers take reality... and impose the domination of their own thought and spirit. Others come before reality more tenderly and a photograph to them is an instrument of love and revelation.', u'A photograph is usually looked at - seldom looked into.', u'Photography, as a powerful medium of expression and communications, offers an infinite variety of perception, interpretation and execution.', u'Yosemite Valley, to me, is always a sunrise, a glitter of green and golden wonder in a vast edifice of stone and space.', u'Dodging and burning are steps to take care of mistakes God made in establishing tonal relationships.'], u'William James': [u'Believe that life is worth living and your belief will help create the fact.', u'Act as if what you do makes a difference. It does.', u"Whenever you're in conflict with someone, there is one factor that can make the difference between damaging your relationship and deepening it. That factor is attitude.", u'Belief creates the actual fact.', u'Common sense and a sense of humor are the same thing, moving at different speeds. A sense of humor is just common sense, dancing.', u'The art of being wise is the art of knowing what to overlook.', u'Success or failure depends more upon attitude than upon capacity successful men act as though they have accomplished or are enjoying something. Soon it becomes a reality. Act, look, feel successful, conduct yourself accordingly, and you will be amazed at the positive results.', u'Begin to be now what you will be hereafter.', u'Acceptance of what has happened is the first step to overcoming the consequences of any misfortune.', u'This life is worth living, we can say, since it is what we make it.', u'A great many people think they are thinking when they are merely rearranging their prejudices.', u'The great use of life is to spend it for something that will outlast it.', u'The greatest discovery of my generation is that a human being can alter his life by altering his attitudes.', u'The world we see that seems so insane is the result of a belief system that is not working. To perceive the world differently, we must be willing to change our belief system, let the past slip away, expand our sense of now, and dissolve the fear in our minds.', u'To change ones life: Start immediately. Do it flamboyantly.', u"Most people never run far enough on their first wind to find out they've got a second.", u'If you believe that feeling bad or worrying long enough will change a past or future event, then you are residing on another planet with a different reality system.', u'Human beings can alter their lives by altering their attitudes of mind.', u"I don't sing because I'm happy; I'm happy because I sing.", u'Action seems to follow feeling, but really action and feeling go together; and by regulating the action, which is under the more direct control of the will, we can indirectly regulate the feeling, which is not.', u'A chain is no stronger than its weakest link, and life is after all a chain.', u'Nothing is so fatiguing as the eternal hanging on of an uncompleted task.', u'Wisdom is learning what to overlook.', u'It is our attitude at the beginning of a difficult task which, more than anything else, will affect its successful outcome.', u'Faith means belief in something concerning which doubt is theoretically possible.'], u'David Bowie': [u'It amazes me sometimes that even intelligent people will analyze a situation or make a judgement after only recognizing the standard or traditional structure of a piece.', u"I don't know where I'm going from here, but I promise it won't be boring.", u"I'm an instant star. Just add water and stir.", u"Heathenism is a state of mind. You can take it that I'm referring to one who does not see his world. He has no mental light. He destroys almost unwittingly. He cannot feel any Gods presence in his life. He is the 21st century man.", u"I'm always amazed that peole take what I say seriously. I don't even take what I am seriously.", u'The truth is of course is that there is no journey. We are arriving and departing all at the same time.', u"Frankly, I mean, sometimes the interpretations I've seen on some of the songs that I've written are a lot more interesting than the input that I put in.", u'I always had a repulsive need to be something more than human.', u"I had to resign myself, many years ago, that I'm not too articulate when it comes to explaining how I feel about things. But my music does it for me, it really does.", u'On the other hand, what I like my music to do to me is awaken the ghosts inside of me. Not the demons, you understand, but the ghosts.', u"As you get older, the questions come down to about two or three. How long? And what do I do with the time I've got left?", u"I believe that I often bring out the best in somebody's talents.", u'I felt I really wanted to back off from music completely and just work within the visual arts in some way. I started painting quite passionately at that time.', u'I think Mick Jagger would be astounded and amazed if he realized that to many people he is not a sex symbol, but a mother image.', u"I'm not a prophet or a stone aged man, just a mortal with potential of a superman. I'm living on.", u'When you think about it, Adolf Hitler was the first pop star.', u"But I'm pretty good with collaborative thinking. I work well with other people.", u"However, there's no theme or concept behind Heathen, just a number of songs but somehow there is a thread that runs through it that is quite as strong as any of my thematic type albums.", u"I don't have stylistic loyalty. That's why people perceive me changing all the time. But there is a real continuity in my subject matter. As an artist of artifice, I do believe I have more integrity than any one of my contemporaries.", u'I think it all comes back to being very selfish as an artist. I mean, I really do just write and record what interests me and I do approach the stage shows in much the same way.', u"I've never responded well to entrenched negative thinking.", u"Questioning my spiritual life has always been germane to what I was writing. Always. It's because I'm not quite an atheist and it worries me. There's that little bit that holds on: 'Well, I'm almost an atheist. Give me a couple of months.'", u"And I saw the sax line-up that he had behind him and I thought, I'm going to learn the saxophone. When I grow up, I'm going to play in his band. So I sort of persuaded my dad to get me a kind of a plastic saxophone on the hire purchase plan.", u"But I've got to think of myself as the luckiest guy. Robert Johnson only had one album's worth of work as his legacy. That's all that life allowed him.", u'Confront a corpse at least once. The absolute absence of life is the most disturbing and challenging confrontation you will ever have.'], u'Viktor E. Frankl': [u'Between stimulus and response there is a space. In that space is our power to choose our response. In our response lies our growth and our freedom.', u"Everything can be taken from a man or a woman but one thing: the last of human freedoms to choose one's attitude in any given set of circumstances, to choose one's own way.", u'When we are no longer able to change a situation - we are challenged to change ourselves.', u"Everyone has his own specific vocation or mission in life; everyone must carry out a concrete assignment that demands fulfillment. Therein he cannot be replaced, nor can his life be repeated, thus, everyone's task is unique as his specific opportunity to implement it.", u"For the meaning of life differs from man to man, from day to day and from hour to hour. What matters, therefore, is not the meaning of life in general but rather the specific meaning of a person's life at a given moment.", u'Ever more people today have the means to live, but no meaning to live for.', u'Life can be pulled by goals just as surely as it can be pushed by drives.', u'Live as if you were living a second time, and as though you had acted wrongly the first time.', u'What is to give light must endure burning.', u"The last of human freedoms - the ability to chose one's attitude in a given set of circumstances.", u'Each man is questioned by life; and he can only answer to life by answering for his own life; to life he can only respond by being responsible.', u'I recommend that the Statue of Liberty be supplemented by a Statue of Responsibility on the west coast.', u'A human being is a deciding being.', u'Challenging the meaning of life is the truest expression of the state of being human.', u'Ultimately, man should not ask what the meaning of his life is, but rather he must recognize that it is he who is asked.', u'Fear may come true that which one is afraid of.'], u'Taylor Swift': [u'In a relationship each person should support the other; they should lift each other up.', u"For me, when I picture the person I want to end up with, I don't think about what their career is, or what they look like. I picture the feeling I get when I'm with them.", u"You have people come into your life shockingly and surprisingly. You have losses that you never thought you'd experience. You have rejection and you have learn how to deal with that and how to get up the next day and go on with it.", u"Fans are my favorite thing in the world. I've never been the type of artist who has that line drawn between their friends and their fans. The line's always been really blurred for me. I'll hang out with them after the show. I'll hang out with them before the show. If I see them in the mall, I'll stand there and talk to them for 10 minutes.", u"I'm not the girl who always has a boyfriend. I'm the girl who rarely has a boyfriend.", u'For everything I do, I think about a 6-year-old girl and her mom that I saw at my concert last night. I think about what those two individuals would think if I were at a club last night. I never want to be arrested, and I never want to get a DUI, those are my moral values.', u'All you need to do to be my friend is like me.', u"When you're singing you can hear the echo of people in the audience singing every single word with you, and that was that big dream that I had for myself. It's happening.", u"If you cry over a guy, then your friends can't date him. It can't even be considered.", u'I am an over-achiever, and I want to be known for the good things in my life.', u"I believe when it comes to love, there's something intangible about who we are attracted to, and I don't think I have a pattern.", u"My mom and I have always been really close. She's always been the friend that was always there. There were times when, in middle school and junior high, I didn't have a lot of friends. But my mom was always my friend. Always.", u'I have this really high priority on happiness and finding something to be happy about.', u"I approach love differently now that I know it's hard for it to work out.", u'I know my flaws before other people point them out to me.', u"I'm not afraid to write my feelings in songs.", u"If you're yelling you're the one who's lost control of the conversation.", u'I wish all teenagers can filter through songs instead of turning to drugs and alcohol.', u"I'm intimidated by the fear of being average.", u"Factoring in millions of people when I'm writing a song is not a good idea. I don't ever do it.", u"I haven't had that one great love, which is good. I don't want that to be in the past - I want it to be in the future.", u"A lot of the jewelry that I wear are fan gifts because they're so awesome and they give me great presents.", u'I think I first realized I wanted to be in country music and be an artist when I was 10. And I started dragging my parents to festivals, and fairs, and karaoke contests, and I did that for about a year before I came to Nashville for the first time. I was 11 and I had this demo CD of me singing Dixie Chicks and Leanne Rimes songs.', u"I would love to continue in music, with writing... but I am not the kind of person who will hang around if I start to become irrelevant. If that happens, I will bow down gracefully, raise my kids, and have a garden. And I am going to let my hair go gray when I am older. I don't need to be blonde when I'm 60!", u"It feels kinda weird being back in a high school cause I haven't been in a high school for about a year. So um, it's kinda interesting coming back, and y'know seeing the lockers, with all the signs, the handmade signs, so being in high school again is a little bit strange but in a good way."], u'Michelangelo': [u'I saw the angel in the marble and carved until I set him free.', u'The greater danger for most of us lies not in setting our aim too high and falling short; but in setting our aim too low, and achieving our mark.', u'A man paints with his brains and not with his hands.', u'What spirit is so empty and blind, that it cannot recognize the fact that the foot is more noble than the shoe, and skin more beautiful than the garment with which it is clothed?', u'Every block of stone has a statue inside it and it is the task of the sculptor to discover it.', u'The true work of art is but a shadow of the divine perfection.', u'Genius is eternal patience.', u'I am still learning.', u'A beautiful thing never gives so much pain as does failing to hear and see it.', u'I am a poor man and of little worth, who is laboring in that art that God has given me in order to extend my life as long as possible.', u'Faith in oneself is the best and safest course.', u'Death and love are the two wings that bear the good man to heaven.', u'If in my youth I had realized that the sustaining splendour of beauty of with which I was in love would one day flood back into my heart, there to ignite a flame that would torture me without end, how gladly would I have put out the light in my eyes.', u'If we have been pleased with life, we should not be displeased with death, since it comes from the hand of the same master.', u"I live and love in God's peculiar light.", u"I live in sin, to kill myself I live; no longer my life my own, but sin's; my good is given to me by heaven, my evil by myself, by my free will, of which I am deprived.", u'Lord, grant that I may always desire more than I can accomplish.', u'Many believe - and I believe - that I have been designated for this work by God. In spite of my old age, I do not want to give it up; I work out of love for God and I put all my hope in Him.', u'Every beauty which is seen here by persons of perception resembles more than anything else that celestial source from which we all are come.', u"If people knew how hard I worked to get my mastery, it wouldn't seem so wonderful at all.", u'Trifles make perfection, and perfection is no trifle.', u'I hope that I may always desire more than I can accomplish.', u"My soul can find no staircase to Heaven unless it be through Earth's loveliness.", u"The promises of this world are, for the most part, vain phantoms; and to confide in one's self, and become something of worth and value is the best and safest course.", u'What do you despise? By this you are truly known.'], u'Keith Richards': [u"If you don't know the blues... there's no point in picking up the guitar and playing rock and roll or any other form of popular music.", u"I've never had a problem with drugs. I've had problems with the police.", u'Everyone talks about rock these days; the problem is they forget about the roll.', u"I look for ambiguity when I'm writing because life is ambiguous.", u"If you're going to kick authority in the teeth, you might as well use both feet.", u'I only get ill when I give up drugs.', u'I mean some doctor told me I had six months to live and I went to their funeral.', u"You've got the sun, you've got the moon, and you've got the Rolling Stones.", u"It's great to be here. It's great to be anywhere.", u"Good music comes out of people playing together, knowing what they want to do and going for it. You have to sweat over it and bug it to death. You can't do it by pushing buttons and watching a TV screen.", u"I mean, give me a guitar, give me a piano, give me a broom and string, I wouldn't get bored anywhere.", u"Let me be clear about this. I don't have a drug problem. I have a police problem.", u'The only things Mick and I disagree about is the band, the music and what we do.', u'The Stones in a club is still the ultimate rush.', u'You get onstage and make other people feel happy. Make them feel good.', u"Everybody's got a different way of telling a story - and has different stories to tell.", u'I never thought I was wasted, but I probably was.', u"It's an addiction... and addiction is something I should know something about.", u'Rock and Roll: Music for the neck downwards.', u"There's no substitute for live work to keep a band together.", u'And it was a very, very fruitful and great relationship between the Stones and The Beatles. It was very, very friendly.', u'Another thing to do with the blues is how they were recorded. They were done on the quick, and some of that stuff was made on wire, not even tape, let alone digital.', u"Hey, we just enjoy it. I think we think we're getting the hang of this thing, you know?", u'I achieved everything I wanted to achieve by being in the Rolling Stones and making records.', u"I don't trust doctors. It's not to say there ain't some good ones, but on a general level, no, I wouldn't trust 'em at all."], u'Donald Rumsfeld': [u"There are known knowns. These are things we know that we know. There are known unknowns. That is to say, there are things that we know we don't know. But there are also unknown unknowns. There are things we don't know we don't know.", u'Oh my goodness gracious, what you can buy off the Internet in terms of overhead photography. A trained ape can know an awful lot of what is going on in this world, just by punching on his mouse, for a relatively modest cost.', u"If you try to please everybody, somebody's not going to like it.", u'You will launch many projects, but have time to finish only a few. So think, plan, develop, launch and tap good people to be responsible. Give them authority and hold them accountable. Trying to do too much yourself creates a bottleneck.', u'Enjoy your time in public service. It may well be one of the most interesting and challenging times of your life.', u'Be yourself. Follow your instincts. Success depends, at least in part, on the ability to "carry it off."', u"I don't do quagmires.", u'Amidst all the clutter, beyond all the obstacles, aside from all the static, are the goals set. Put your head down, do the best job possible, let the flak pass, and work towards those goals.', u'Arguments of convenience lack integrity and inevitably trip you up.', u'Be precise. A lack of precision is dangerous when the margin of error is small.', u'Death has a tendency to encourage a depressing view of war.', u"If in doubt, don't. If still in doubt, do what's right.", u'If you are not criticized, you may not be doing much.', u"There are a lot of people who lie and get away with it, and that's just a fact.", u"Think ahead. Don't let day-to-day operations drive out planning.", u"Don't blame the boss. He has enough problems.", u'Don\'t divide the world into "them" and "us." Avoid infatuation with or resentment of the press, the Congress, rivals, or opponents. Accept them as facts. They have their jobs and you have yours.', u"Don't necessarily avoid sharp edges. Occasionally they are necessary to leadership.", u"Don't speak ill of your predecessors or successors. You didn't walk in their shoes.", u'If a prospective Presidential approach can\'t be explained clearly enough to be understood well, it probably hasn\'t been thought through well enough. If not well understood by the American people, it probably won\'t "sail" anyway. Send it back for further thought.', u'In our system leadership is by consent, not command. To lead a President must persuade. Personal contacts and experiences help shape his thinking. They can be critical to his persuasiveness and thus to his leadership.', u'In the execution of Presidential decisions work to be true to his views, in fact and tone.', u'It is easier to get into something than to get out of it.', u"It isn't making mistakes that's critical; it's correcting them and getting on with the principal task.", u"Look for what's missing. Many advisors can tell a President how to improve what's proposed or what's gone amiss. Few are able to see what isn't there."], u'Andre Maurois': [u'A successful marriage is an edifice that must be rebuilt every day.', u'Without a family, man, alone in the world, trembles with the cold.', u'Business is a combination of war and sport.', u'A happy marriage is a long conversation which always seems too short.', u'Growing old is no more than a bad habit which a busy person has no time to form.', u'People are what you make them. A scornful look turns into a complete fool a man of average intelligence. A contemptuous indifference turns into an enemy a woman who, well treated, might have been an angel.', u'Smile, for everyone lacks self-confidence and more than any other one thing a smile reassures them.', u'We owe to the Middle Ages the two worst inventions of humanity - romantic love and gunpowder.', u'The first recipe for happiness is: avoid too lengthy meditation on the past.', u'If you create an act, you create a habit. If you create a habit, you create a character. If you create a character, you create a destiny.', u'Modesty and unselfishness - these are the virtues which men praise - and pass by.', u'Self-pity comes so naturally to all of us. The most solid happiness can be shaken by the compassion of a fool.', u'Conversation would be vastly improved by the constant use of four simple words: I do not know.', u'Memory is a great artist. For every man and for every woman it makes the recollection of his or her life a work of art and an unfaithful record.', u'Old age is far more than white hair, wrinkles, the feeling that it is too late and the game finished, that the stage belongs to the rising generations. The true evil is not the weakening of the body, but the indifference of the soul.', u'A marriage without conflicts is almost as inconceivable as a nation without crises.', u'An artist must be a reactionary. He has to stand out against the tenor of the age and not go flopping along.', u'If men could regard the events of their own lives with more open minds, they would frequently discover that they did not really desire the things they failed to obtain.', u"If you value a man's regard, strive with him. As to liking, you like your newspaper - and despise it.", u'In literature as in love, we are astonished at what is chosen by others.', u'Lost Illusion is the undisclosed title of every novel.', u'Men and women are not born inconstant: they are made so by their early amorous experiences.', u'No one can be profoundly original who does not avoid eccentricity.', u'Style is the hallmark of a temperament stamped upon the material at hand.', u"The difficult part in an argument is not to defend one's opinion but rather to know it."], u'Stephen Hawking': [u'I have noticed even people who claim everything is predestined, and that we can do nothing to change it, look before they cross the road.', u'Intelligence is the ability to adapt to change.', u"I think computer viruses should count as life. I think it says something about human nature that the only form of life we have created so far is purely destructive. We've created life in our own image.", u'We are just an advanced breed of monkeys on a minor planet of a very average star. But we can understand the Universe. That makes us something very special.', u'God not only plays dice, He also sometimes throws the dice where they cannot be seen.', u"People won't have time for you if you are always angry or complaining.", u'My goal is simple. It is a complete understanding of the universe, why it is as it is and why it exists at all.', u'The whole history of science has been the gradual realization that events do not happen in an arbitrary manner, but that they reflect a certain underlying order, which may or may not be divinely inspired.', u'Even if there is only one possible unified theory, it is just a set of rules and equations. What is it that breathes fire into the equations and makes a universe for them to describe?', u'We are in danger of destroying ourselves by our greed and stupidity. We cannot remain looking inwards at ourselves on a small and increasingly polluted and overcrowded planet.', u'If we do discover a complete theory, it should be in time understandable in broad principle by everyone. Then we shall all, philosophers, scientists, and just ordinary people be able to take part in the discussion of why we and the universe exist.', u'It is no good getting furious if you get stuck. What I do is keep thinking about the problem but work on something else. Sometimes it is years before I see the way forward. In the case of information loss and black holes, it was 29 years.', u'Not only does God play dice, but... he sometimes throws them where they cannot be seen.', u"Life would be tragic if it weren't funny.", u'To confine our attention to terrestrial matters would be to limit the human spirit.', u"We only have to look at ourselves to see how intelligent life might develop into something we wouldn't want to meet.", u'One cannot really argue with a mathematical theorem.', u'It is not clear that intelligence has any long-term survival value.', u'Women. They are a complete mystery.', u"Although September 11 was horrible, it didn't threaten the survival of the human race, like nuclear weapons do.", u"I'm not afraid of death, but I'm in no hurry to die. I have so much I want to do first.", u'Most sets of values would give rise to universes that, although they might be very beautiful, would contain no one able to wonder at that beauty.', u'Nothing cannot exist forever.', u'The usual approach of science of constructing a mathematical model cannot answer the questions of why there should be a universe for the model to describe. Why does the universe go to all the bother of existing?', u'There is no heaven or afterlife for broken-down computers; that is a fairy story for people afraid of the dark.'], u'Simone de Beauvoir': [u"Change your life today. Don't gamble on the future, act now, without delay.", u"One's life has value so long as one attributes value to the life of others, by means of love, friendship, indignation and compassion.", u'All the idols made by man, however terrifying they may be, are in point of fact subordinate to him, and that is why he will always have it in his power to destroy them.', u'I wish that every human life might be pure transparent freedom.', u'To catch a husband is an art; to hold him is a job.', u'Man is defined as a human being and a woman as a female - whenever she behaves as a human being she is said to imitate the male.', u'One is not born a woman, but becomes one.', u'No one is more arrogant toward women, more aggressive or scornful, than the man who is anxious about his virility.', u'I tore myself away from the safe comfort of certainties through my love for truth - and truth rewarded me.', u'In itself, homosexuality is as limiting as heterosexuality: the ideal should be to be capable of loving a woman or a man; either, a human being, without feeling fear, restraint, or obligation.', u'I am incapable of conceiving infinity, and yet I do not accept finity.', u'In the face of an obstacle which is impossible to overcome, stubbornness is stupid.', u'The word love has by no means the same sense for both sexes, and this is one cause of the serious misunderstandings that divide them.', u'All oppression creates a state of war.', u'What is an adult? A child blown up by age.', u'Art is an attempt to integrate evil.', u'Defending the truth is not something one does out of a sense of duty or to allay guilt complexes, but is a reward in itself.', u"If you live long enough, you'll see that every victory turns into a defeat.", u'Life is occupied in both perpetuating itself and in surpassing itself; if all it does is maintain itself, then living is only not dying.', u'It is not in giving life but in risking life that man is raised above the animal; that is why superiority has been accorded in humanity not to the sex that brings forth but to that which kills.', u'One is not born, but rather becomes, a woman.', u'Representation of the world, like the world itself, is the work of men; they describe it from their own point of view, which they confuse with the absolute truth.', u'Sex pleasure in woman is a kind of magic spell; it demands complete abandon; if words or movements oppose the magic of caresses, the spell is broken.', u'Buying is a profound pleasure.', u"It is old age, rather than death, that is to be contrasted with life. Old age is life's parody, whereas death transforms life into a destiny: in a way it preserves it by giving it the absolute dimension. Death does away with time."], u'Alexander Pope': [u'To err is human; to forgive, divine.', u"Teach me to feel another's woe, to hide the fault I see, that mercy I to others show, that mercy show to me.", u'Hope springs eternal in the human breast: Man never is, but always To be Blest.', u'A person who is too nice an observer of the business of the crowd, like one who is too curious in observing the labor of bees, will often be stung for his curiosity.', u'No one should be ashamed to admit they are wrong, which is but saying, in other words, that they are wiser today than they were yesterday.', u'A little learning is a dangerous thing; Drink deep, or taste not the Pierian spring.', u'Beauties in vain their pretty eyes may roll; charms strike the sight, but merit wins the soul.', u'Blessed is the man who expects nothing, for he shall never be disappointed was the ninth beatitude.', u'Some people will never learn anything, for this reason, because they understand everything too soon.', u'Fools rush in where angels fear to tread.', u'No woman ever hates a man for being in love with her, but many a woman hate a man for being a friend to her.', u'To be angry is to revenge the faults of others on ourselves.', u'Act well your part, there all the honour lies.', u'The difference is too nice - Where ends the virtue or begins the vice.', u'For Forms of Government let fools contest; whatever is best administered is best.', u'Many men have been capable of doing a wise thing, more a cunning thing, but very few a generous thing.', u'I find myself hoping a total end of all the unhappy divisions of mankind by party-spirit, which at best is but the madness of many for the gain of a few.', u'Charms strike the sight, but merit wins the soul.', u'Trust not yourself, but your defects to know, make use of every friend and every foe.', u'Genius creates, and taste preserves. Taste is the good sense of genius; without taste, genius is only sublime folly.', u'And die of nothing but a rage to live.', u"How happy is the blameless vestal's lot? The world forgetting, by the world forgot.", u'The most positive men are the most credulous.', u"Education forms the common mind. Just as the twig is bent, the tree's inclined.", u'Fools admire, but men of sense approve.'], u'Rudyard Kipling': [u'God could not be everywhere, and therefore he made mothers.', u"If you can keep your wits about you while all others are losing theirs, and blaming you. The world will be yours and everything in it, what's more, you'll be a man, my son.", u"A woman's guess is much more accurate than a man's certainty.", u"When you're wounded and left on Afghanistan's plains, and the women come out to cut up what remains, jest roll to your rifle and blow out your brains and go to your gawd like a soldier.", u'An ounce of mother is worth a pound of clergy.', u'All the people like us are we, and everyone else is They.', u'And the first rude sketch that the world had seen was joy to his mighty heart, till the Devil whispered behind the leaves "It\'s pretty, but is it Art?"', u"Gardens are not made by singing 'Oh, how beautiful,' and sitting in the shade.", u'He wrapped himself in quotations - as a beggar would enfold himself in the purple of Emperors.', u"If I were hanged on the highest hill, Mother o' mine, O mother o' mine! I know whose love would follow me still Mother o' mine, O mother o' mine!", u'The silliest woman can manage a clever man; but it needs a very clever woman to manage a fool.', u"Borrow trouble for yourself, if that's your nature, but don't lend it to your neighbours.", u'Fill the unforgiving minute with sixty seconds worth of distance run.', u'He travels the fastest who travels alone.', u'If history were taught in the form of stories, it would never be forgotten.', u'A people always ends by resembling its shadow.', u'A woman is only a woman, but a good cigar is a smoke.', u"A man's mind is wont to tell him more than seven watchmen sitting in a tower.", u'I always prefer to believe the best of everybody, it saves so much trouble.', u'Asia is not going to be civilized after the methods of the West. There is too much Asia and she is too old.', u'I have struck a city - a real city - and they call it Chicago... I urgently desire never to see it again. It is inhabited by savages.', u'Everyone is more or less mad on one point.', u'For the female of the species is more deadly than the male.', u"And that is called paying the Dane-geld; but we've proved it again and again, that if once you have paid him the Dane-geld you never get rid of the Dane.", u'Down to Gehenna, or up to the Throne, He travels the fastest who travels alone.'], u'Marlene Dietrich': [u"It's the friends you can call up at 4 a.m. that matter.", u'Once a woman has forgiven her man, she must not reheat his sins for breakfast.', u'A man would prefer to come home to an unmade bed and a happy woman than to a neatly made bed and an angry woman.', u'Most women set out to try to change a man, and when they have changed him they do not like him.', u"To be completely woman you need a master, and in him a compass for your life. You need a man you can look up to and respect. If you dethrone him it's no wonder that you are discontented, and discontented women are not loved for long.", u'Latins are tenderly enthusiastic. In Brazil they throw flowers at you. In Argentina they throw themselves.', u'The weak are more likely to make the strong weak than the strong are likely to make the weak strong.', u'A king, realizing his incompetence, can either delegate or abdicate his duties. A father can do neither. If only sons could see the paradox, they would understand the dilemma.', u'I am at heart a gentleman.', u'Superstitions are habits rather than beliefs.', u"Darling, the legs aren't so beautiful, I just know what to do with them.", u'I dress for the image. Not for myself, not for the public, not for fashion, not for men.', u"Glamour is what I sell, it's my stock in trade.", u'I had no desire to be an film actress, to always play somebody else, to be always beautiful with somebody constantly straightening out your every eyelash. It was always a big bother to me.', u'I love quotations because it is a joy to find thoughts one might have, beautifully expressed with much authority by someone recognized wiser than oneself.', u"In America, sex is an obsession, in other parts of the world it's a fact.", u'The average man is more interested in a woman who is interested in him than he is in a woman with beautiful legs.', u'Think twice before burdening a friend with a secret.', u"I'm worth more dead than alive. Don't cry for me after I'm gone; cry for me now.", u'There is a gigantic difference between earning a great deal of money and being rich.', u'They want you to bring out your intestines.', u"When you're dead, you're dead. That's it.", u'Without tenderness, a man is uninteresting.', u'America took me into her bosom when there was no longer a country worthy of the name, but in my heart I am German - German in my soul.', u'Courage and grace are a formidable mixture. The only place to see it is in the bullring.'], u'Stendhal': [u'One can acquire everything in solitude except character.', u'A very small degree of hope is sufficient to cause the birth of love.', u"If you don't love me, it does not matter, anyway I can love for both of us.", u'People happy in love have an air of intensity.', u'The shepherd always tries to persuade the sheep that their interests and his own are the same.', u'A forty-year-old woman is only something to men who have loved her in her youth.', u'All religions are founded on the fear of the many and the cleverness of the few.', u'Logic is neither an art nor a science but a dodge.', u'This is the curse of our age, even the strangest aberrations are no cure for boredom.', u'A novel is a mirror carried along a main road.', u'If you think of paying court to the men in power, your eternal ruin is assured.', u'Life is too short, and the time we waste in yawning never can be regained.', u'Love has always been the most important business in my life, I should say the only one.', u'Only great minds can afford a simple style.', u'Pleasure is often spoiled by describing it.', u'The man of genius is he and he alone who finds such joy in his art that he will work at it come hell or high water.', u'The more one pleases everybody, the less one pleases profoundly.', u'True love makes the thought of death frequent, easy, without terrors; it merely becomes the standard of comparison, the price one would pay for many things.', u'What is really beautiful must always be true.', u'A wise woman never yields by appointment. It should always be an unforeseen happiness.', u'Far less envy in America than in France, and far less wit.', u'Friendship has its illusions no less than love.', u"God's only excuse is that he does not exist.", u'I think no woman I have had ever gave me so sweet a moment, or at so light a price, as the moment I owe to a newly heard musical phrase.', u'In love, unlike most other passions, the recollection of what you have had and lost is always better than what you can hope for in the future.'], u'Harry S. Truman': [u'I never did give anybody hell. I just told the truth and they thought it was hell.', u'Men make history and not the other way around. In periods where there is no leadership, society stands still. Progress occurs when courageous, skillful leaders seize the opportunity to change things for the better.', u'When even one American - who has done nothing wrong - is forced by fear to shut his mind and close his mouth - then all Americans are in peril.', u'A leader in the Democratic Party is a boss, in the Republican Party he is a leader.', u'It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.', u'A pessimist is one who makes difficulties of his opportunities and an optimist is one who makes opportunities of his difficulties.', u"If you can't stand the heat, get out of the kitchen.", u'You know that being an American is more than a matter of where your parents came from. It is a belief that all men are created free and equal and that everyone deserves an even break.', u"The Marine Corps is the Navy's police force and as long as I am President that is what it will remain. They have a propaganda machine that is almost equal to Stalin's.", u'You want a friend in Washington? Get a dog.', u'All the president is, is a glorified public relations man who spends his time flattering, kissing, and kicking people to get them to do what they are supposed to do anyway.', u'I do not believe there is a problem in this country or the world today which could not be settled if approached through the teaching of the Sermon on the Mount.', u'America was not built on fear. America was built on courage, on imagination and an unbeatable determination to do the job at hand.', u'I never gave anybody hell! I just told the truth and they thought it was hell.', u'The atom bomb was no "great decision." It was merely another powerful weapon in the arsenal of righteousness.', u"Carry the battle to them. Don't let them bring it to you. Put them on the defensive and don't ever apologize for anything.", u"It is understanding that gives us an ability to have peace. When we understand the other fellow's viewpoint, and he understands ours, then we can sit down and work out our differences.", u"Richard Nixon is a no good, lying bastard. He can lie out of both sides of his mouth at the same time, and if he ever caught himself telling the truth, he'd lie just to keep his hand in.", u'A president either is constantly on top of events or, if he hesitates, events will soon be on top of him. I never felt that I could let up for a moment.', u'Experience has shown how deeply the seeds of war are planted by economic rivalry and social injustice.', u'A bureaucrat is a Democrat who holds some office that a Republican wants.', u'Actions are the seed of fate deeds grow into destiny.', u"It's a recession when your neighbor loses his job; it's a depression when you lose yours.", u'Upon books the collective education of the race depends; they are the sole instruments of registering, perpetuating and transmitting thought.', u'All my life, whenever it comes time to make a decision, I make it and forget about it.'], u'J. K. Rowling': [u'If you want to see the true measure of a man, watch how he treats his inferiors, not his equals.', u'Indifference and neglect often do much more damage than outright dislike.', u'It is our choices... that show what we truly are, far more than our abilities.', u"Never trust anything that can think for itself if you can't see where it keeps its brain.", u'It is impossible to live without failing at something, unless you live so cautiously that you might has well not have lived at all, in which case you have failed by default.', u'Poverty entails fear and stress and sometimes depression. It meets a thousand petty humiliations and hardships. Climbing out of poverty by your own efforts that is something on which to pride yourself but poverty itself is romanticized by fools.', u'I was set free because my greatest fear had been realized, and I still had a daughter who I adored, and I had an old typewriter and a big idea. And so rock bottom became a solid foundation on which I rebuilt my life.', u'Imagination is not only the uniquely human capacity to envision that which is not, and therefore the fount of all invention and innovation. In its arguably most transformative and revelatory capacity, it is the power to that enables us to empathize with humans whose experiences we have never shared.', u"Anything's possible if you've got enough nerve.", u'The truth. It is a beautiful and terrible thing, and must therefore be treated with great caution.', u'The most important thing is to read as much as you can, like I did. It will give you an understanding of what makes good writing and it will enlarge your vocabulary.', u'However my parents - both of whom came from impoverished backgrounds and neither of whom had been to college, took the view that my overactive imagination was an amusing quirk that would never pay a mortgage or secure a pension.', u"Hearing voices no one else can hear isn't a good sign, even in the wizarding world.", u'It does not do to dwell on dreams and forget to live.', u'Humans have a knack for choosing precisely the things that are worst for them.', u'It takes a great deal of bravery to stand up to our enemies, but just as much to stand up to our friends.', u'Jane Austen is the pinnacle to which all other authors aspire.', u'The moment you are old enough to take the wheel, responsibility lies with you.', u'And the idea of just wandering off to a cafe with a notebook and writing and seeing where that takes me for awhile is just bliss.', u"I think you have a moral responsibility when you've been given far more than you need, to do wise things with it and give intelligently.", u"I will carry on writing, to be sure. But I don't know if I would want to publish again after Harry Potter.", u'Fear of a name increases fear of the thing itself.', u'I was convinced that the only thing I wanted to do ever - was write novels.', u'Why do I talk about the benefits of failure? Simply because failure meant a stripping away of the inessential. I stopped pretending to myself that I was anything other than what I was, and began to direct all my energy into finishing the only work that mattered to me.', u"Death is just life's next big adventure."], u'Clarence Darrow': [u'I have never killed a man, but I have read many obituaries with great pleasure.', u'True patriotism hates injustice in its own land more than anywhere else.', u'I never wanted to see anybody die, but there are a few obituary notices I have read with pleasure.', u'I do not consider it an insult, but rather a compliment to be called an agnostic. I do not pretend to know where many ignorant men are sure - that is all that agnosticism means.', u'I have suffered from being misunderstood, but I would have suffered a hell of a lot more if I had been understood.', u"Chase after the truth like all hell and you'll free yourself, even though you never touch its coat tails.", u'I am an agnostic; I do not pretend to know what many ignorant men are sure of.', u'The first half of our lives are ruined by our parents and the second half by our children.', u'As long as the world shall last there will be wrongs, and if no man objected and no man rebelled, those wrongs would last forever.', u"When I was a boy I was told that anybody could become President; I'm beginning to believe it.", u'I do not believe in God because I do not believe in Mother Goose.', u'If you lose the power to laugh, you lose the power to think.', u'The world is made up for the most part of morons and natural tyrants, sure of themselves, strong in their own opinions, never doubting anything.', u'You can only be free if I am free.', u'Lost causes are the only ones worth fighting for.', u"You can only protect your liberties in this world by protecting the other man's freedom.", u"History repeats itself, and that's one of the things that's wrong with history.", u'I do not pretend to know where many ignorant men are sure - that is all that agnosticism means.', u"I don't like spinach, and I'm glad I don't, because if I liked it I'd eat it, and I just hate it.", u'The law does not pretend to punish everything that is dishonest. That would seriously interfere with business.', u'The origin of the absurd idea of immortal life is easy to discover; it is kept alive by hope and fear, by childish faith, and by cowardice.', u'To think is to differ.', u'Calvin Coolidge was the greatest man who ever came out of Plymouth Corner, Vermont.', u'Depressions may bring people closer to the church but so do funerals.', u'Even if you do learn to speak correct English, whom are you going to speak it to?'], u'Jimi Hendrix': [u'When the power of love overcomes the love of power the world will know peace.', u"Music doesn't lie. If there is something to be changed in this world, then it can only happen through music.", u"I'm the one that has to die when it's time for me to die, so let me live my life, the way I want to.", u"I don't have nothing to regret at all in the past, except that I might've unintentionally hurt somebody else or something.", u'Knowledge speaks, but wisdom listens.', u'Music is my religion.', u'You have to go on and be crazy. Craziness is like heaven.', u'I used to live in a room full of mirrors; all I could see was me. I take my spirit and I crash my mirrors, now the whole world is here for me to see.', u'The story of life is quicker then the blink of an eye, the story of love is hello, goodbye.', u"All I'm gonna do is just go on and do what I feel.", u'Even Castles made of sand, fall into the sea, eventually.', u"I've been imitated so well I've heard people copy my mistakes.", u"Sometimes you want to give up the guitar, you'll hate the guitar. But if you stick with it, you're gonna be rewarded.", u'When I die, I want people to play my music, go wild and freak out and do anything they want to do.', u'Music is a safe kind of high.', u'Blues is easy to play, but hard to feel.', u'The time I burned my guitar it was like a sacrifice. You sacrifice the things you love. I love my guitar.', u"If I'm free, it's because I'm always running.", u"I'm gonna put a curse on you and all your kids will be born completely naked.", u'Excuse me while I kiss the sky.', u'In order to change the world, you have to get your head together first.', u'I just hate to be in one corner. I hate to be put as only a guitar player, or either only as a songwriter, or only as a tap dancer. I like to move around.', u"It's funny how most people love the dead, once you're dead your made for life.", u"To be with the others, you have to have your hair short and wear ties. So we're trying to make a third world happen, you know what I mean?", u"I wish they'd had electric guitars in cotton fields back in the good old days. A whole lot of things would've been straightened out."], u'Dwight L. Moody': [u'Faith makes all things possible... love makes all things easy.', u"We are told to let our light shine, and if it does, we won't need to tell anybody it does. Lighthouses don't fire cannons to call attention to their shining- they just shine.", u'I have had more trouble with myself than with any other man.', u'A man ought to live so that everybody knows he is a Christian... and most of all, his family ought to know.', u'God never made a promise that was too good to be true.', u'A rule I have had for years is: to treat the Lord Jesus Christ as a personal friend. His is not a creed, a mere doctrine, but it is He Himself we have.', u'The Bible will keep you from sin, or sin will keep you from the Bible.', u'Church attendance is as vital to a disciple as a transfusion of rich, healthy blood to a sick man.', u"God doesn't seek for golden vessels, and does not ask for silver ones, but He must have clean ones.", u'I know the Bible is inspired because it inspires me.', u'We can stand affliction better than we can prosperity, for in prosperity we forget God.', u'It is a masterpiece of the devil to make us believe that children cannot understand religion. Would Christ have made a child the standard of faith if He had known that it was not capable of understanding His words?', u'Death may be the King of terrors... but Jesus is the King of kings!', u'Where one man reads the Bible, a hundred read you and me.', u'If I take care of my character, my reputation will take care of me.', u"There's no better book with which to defend the Bible than the Bible itself.", u'A good example is far better than a good precept.', u'Give me a man who says this one thing I do, and not those fifty things I dabble in.', u'There are many of us that are willing to do great things for the Lord, but few of us are willing to do little things.', u'Character is what a man is in the dark.', u"Preparation for old age should begin not later than one's teens. A life which is empty of purpose until 65 will not suddenly become filled on retirement.", u'We talk about heaven being so far away. It is within speaking distance to those who belong there. Heaven is a prepared place for a prepared people.', u'Never think that Jesus commanded a trifle, nor dare to trifle with anything He has commanded.', u'No man can resolve himself into Heaven.', u'Where I was born and where and how I have lived is unimportant. It is what I have done with where I have been that should be of interest.'], u'Emo Philips': [u'A computer once beat me at chess, but it was no match for me at kick boxing.', u"When I was a kid I used to pray every night for a new bicycle. Then I realised that the Lord doesn't work that way so I stole one and asked Him to forgive me.", u'How many people here have telekenetic powers? Raise my hand.', u'My computer beat me at checkers, but I sure beat it at kickboxing.', u"Women: You can't live with them, and you can't get them to dress up in a skimpy little Nazi costume and beat you with a warm squash or something.", u"You don't appreciate a lot of stuff in school until you get older. Little things like being spanked every day by a middle-aged woman: Stuff you pay good money for in later life.", u"I was the kid next door's imaginary friend.", u"I go from stool to stool in singles bars hoping to get lucky, but there's never any gum under any of them.", u"I love to go down to the schoolyard and watch all the little children jump up and down and run around yelling and screaming. They don't know I'm only using blanks.", u'I was sleeping the other night, alone, thanks to the exterminator.', u'I was at a bar nursing a beer. My nipple was getting quite soggy.', u'I got in a fight one time with a really big guy, and he said, "I\'m going to mop the floor with your face." I said, "You\'ll be sorry." He said, "Oh, yeah? Why?" I said, "Well, you won\'t be able to get into the corners very well."', u"Probably the worst time in a person's life is when they have to kill a family member because they are the devil. But otherwise it's been a pretty good day.", u'At my lemonade stand I used to give the first glass away free and charge five dollars for the second glass. The refill contained the antidote.', u"I love to go to the playground and watch the children jumping up and down. They don't know I'm firing blanks.", u"I once heard two ladies going on and on about the pains of childbirth and how men don't seem to know what real pain is. I asked if either of them ever got themselves caught in a zipper.", u"Probably the toughest time in anyone's life is when you have to murder a loved one because they're the devil.", u"Some mornings, it's just not worth chewing through the leather straps.", u'You know what I hate? Indian givers... no, I take that back.', u'I once had a large gay following, but I ducked into an alleyway and lost him.', u"Some mornings it just doesn't seem worth it to gnaw through the leather straps.", u"Always remember the last words of my grandfather, who said: 'A truck!'", u'I got some new underwear the other day. Well, new to me.', u"I was in a bar the other night, hopping from barstool to barstool, trying to get lucky, but there wasn't any gum under any of them.", u'I was walking down fifth avenue today and I found a wallet, and I was gonna keep it, rather than return it, but I thought: well, if I lost a hundred and fifty dollars, how would I feel? And I realized I would want to be taught a lesson.'], u'Oscar Wilde': [u'Keep love in your heart. A life without it is like a sunless garden when the flowers are dead.', u'True friends stab you in the front.', u'A dreamer is one who can only find his way by moonlight, and his punishment is that he sees the dawn before the rest of the world.', u'Always forgive your enemies - nothing annoys them so much.', u'Children begin by loving their parents; after a time they judge them; rarely, if ever, do they forgive them.', u'Some cause happiness wherever they go; others whenever they go.', u'Every saint has a past and every sinner has a future.', u'How can a woman be expected to be happy with a man who insists on treating her as if she were a perfectly normal human being.', u'Between men and women there is no friendship possible. There is passion, enmity, worship, love, but no friendship.', u'Education is an admirable thing, but it is well to remember from time to time that nothing that is worth knowing can be taught.', u"I am so clever that sometimes I don't understand a single word of what I am saying.", u'Experience is simply the name we give our mistakes.', u"Men always want to be a woman's first love - women like to be a man's last romance.", u'We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars.', u'The only way to get rid of temptation is to yield to it... I can resist everything but temptation.', u'Man is least himself when he talks in his own person. Give him a mask, and he will tell you the truth.', u'Women are made to be loved, not understood.', u"A gentleman is one who never hurts anyone's feelings unintentionally.", u'When I was young I thought that money was the most important thing in life; now that I am old I know that it is.', u'A man can be happy with any woman, as long as he does not love her.', u'A work of art is the unique result of a unique temperament.', u'I regard the theatre as the greatest of all art forms, the most immediate way in which a human being can share with another the sense of what it is to be a human being.', u'I choose my friends for their good looks, my acquaintances for their good characters, and my enemies for their intellects. A man cannot be too careful in the choice of his enemies.', u'One should always be in love. That is the reason one should never marry.', u'It is better to be beautiful than to be good. But... it is better to be good than to be ugly.'], u'Robert Kennedy': [u'There are those who look at things the way they are, and ask why... I dream of things that never were, and ask why not?', u'Progress is a nice word. But change is its motivator. And change has its enemies.', u'Few will have the greatness to bend history itself; but each of us can work to change a small portion of events, and in the total; of all those acts will be written the history of this generation.', u'What is objectionable, what is dangerous about extremists, is not that they are extreme, but that they are intolerant. The evil is not what they say about their cause, but what they say about their opponents.', u'Only those who dare to fail greatly can ever achieve greatly.', u"All of us might wish at times that we lived in a more tranquil world, but we don't. And if our times are difficult and perplexing, so are they challenging and filled with opportunity.", u'But suppose God is black? What if we go to Heaven and we, all our lives, have treated the Negro as an inferior, and God is there, and we look up and He is not white? What then is our response?', u'Tragedy is a tool for the living to gain wisdom, not a guide by which to live.', u'People say I am ruthless. I am not ruthless. And if I find the man who is calling me ruthless, I shall destroy him.', u'If any man claims the Negro should be content... let him say he would willingly change the color of his skin and go to live in the Negro section of a large city. Then and only then has he a right to such a claim.', u'It is not enough to understand, or to see clearly. The future will be shaped in the arena of human activity, by those willing to commit their minds and their bodies to the task.', u'Let us dedicate ourselves to what the Greeks wrote so many years ago: to tame the savageness of man and make gentle the life of this world.', u'One-fifth of the people are against everything all the time.', u'Every society gets the kind of criminal it deserves. What is equally true is that every community gets the kind of law enforcement it insists on.', u'I believe that, as long as there is plenty, poverty is evil.', u'Whenever men take the law into their own hands, the loser is the law. And when the law loses, freedom languishes.', u"Ultimately, America's answer to the intolerant man is diversity, the very diversity which our heritage of religious freedom has inspired.", u'The free way of life proposes ends, but it does not prescribe means.', u'I was the seventh of nine children. When you come from that far down you have to struggle to survive.', u'Now I can go back to being ruthless again.', u"I thought they'd get one of us, but Jack, after all he's been through, never worried about it I thought it would be me."], u'Mark Twain': [u'Only one thing is impossible for God: To find any sense in any copyright law on the planet.', u"Don't go around saying the world owes you a living. The world owes you nothing. It was here first.", u'Apparently there is nothing that cannot happen today.', u"Age is an issue of mind over matter. If you don't mind, it doesn't matter.", u'Go to Heaven for the climate, Hell for the company.', u'Anger is an acid that can do more harm to the vessel in which it is stored than to anything on which it is poured.', u'Forgiveness is the fragrance that the violet sheds on the heel that has crushed it.', u'Get your facts first, then you can distort them as you please.', u"It is better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to open one's mouth and remove all doubt.", u'Suppose you were an idiot, and suppose you were a member of Congress; but I repeat myself.', u'The reports of my death have been greatly exaggerated.', u'Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to pause and reflect.', u"A person who won't read has no advantage over one who can't read.", u'Courage is resistance to fear, mastery of fear, not absence of fear.', u'A man who carries a cat by the tail learns something he can learn in no other way.', u"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything.", u"Truth is stranger than fiction, but it is because Fiction is obliged to stick to possibilities; Truth isn't.", u'Be careful about reading health books. You may die of a misprint.', u'Good friends, good books and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life.', u"Giving up smoking is the easiest thing in the world. I know because I've done it thousands of times.", u'Kindness is the language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see.', u'In the first place, God made idiots. That was for practice. Then he made school boards.', u'A man is never more truthful than when he acknowledges himself a liar.', u'Patriotism is supporting your country all the time, and your government when it deserves it.', u'Action speaks louder than words but not nearly as often.'], u'Euripides': [u'Friends show their love in times of trouble, not in happiness.', u'Cleverness is not wisdom.', u'No one can confidently say that he will still be living tomorrow.', u'Love is all we have, the only way that each can help the other.', u"Down on your knees, and thank heaven, fasting, for a good man's love.", u'He is not a lover who does not love forever.', u'The greatest pleasure of life is love.', u'One loyal friend is worth ten thousand relatives.', u'The best and safest thing is to keep a balance in your life, acknowledge the great powers around us and in us. If you can do that, and live that way, you are really a wise man.', u'There is just one life for each of us: our own.', u'To a father growing old nothing is dearer than a daughter.', u"It's not beauty but fine qualities, my girl, that keep a husband.", u'Ten soldiers wisely led will beat a hundred without a head.', u'Wealth stays with us a little moment if at all: only our characters are steadfast, not our gold.', u'Life has no blessing like a prudent friend.', u'Forgive, son; men are men; they needs must err.', u"Ignorance of one's misfortunes is clear gain.", u'Talk sense to a fool and he calls you foolish.', u'Events will take their course, it is no good of being angry at them; he is happiest who wisely turns them to the best account.', u'Do not consider painful what is good for you.', u'Question everything. Learn something. Answer nothing.', u"Silence is true wisdom's best reply.", u'Along with success comes a reputation for wisdom.', u'But learn that to die is a debt we must all pay.', u"Danger gleams like sunshine to a brave man's eyes."], u'Doug Coupland': [u'One of the cruelest things you can do to another person is pretend you care about them more than you really do.', u"Blame is just a lazy person's way of making sense of chaos.", u"If human beings had genuine courage, they'd wear their costumes every day of the year, not just on Halloween.", u"People are pretty forgiving when it comes to other people's families. The only family that ever horrifies you is your own.", u"Depression is when you have lots of love, but no one's taking.", u'Adventure without risk is Disneyland.', u"A bland smile is like a green light at an intersection, it feels good when you get one, but you forget it the moment you're past it.", u'The time you feel lonely is the time you most need to be by yourself.', u"Try not thinking of peeling an orange. Try not imagining the juice running down your fingers, the soft inner part of the peel. The smell. Try and you can't. The brain doesn't process negatives.", u'A man in a bookstore buys a book on loneliness and every woman in the store hits on him. A woman buys a book on loneliness and the store clears out.', u'Brain research tells us that only twenty percent of human beings have a sense of irony, which means that eighty percent of the world takes everything at face value.', u'Christmas makes everything twice as sad.', u'Every single moment is a coincidence.', u"There's nothing cure or funny or lovable about being cheap. It's a total turn-off.", u'Forget sex or politics or religion, loneliness is the subject that clears out a room.', u'The person who needs the other person the least in a relationship is the stronger member.', u'Birds are a miracle because they prove to us there is a finer, simpler state of being which we may strive to attain.', u"Canadians can easily 'pass for American' as long as we don't accidentally use metric measurements or apologize when hit by a car.", u'In the future, torture will once again become the recreational sport of the rich.', u'The capacity for not feeling lonely can carry a very real price, that of feeling nothing at all.', u"There's much to be said for feeling numb. Time passes more quickly. You eat less, and because numbness encourages laziness, you do fewer things, good or bad, and the world's probably a better place for it.", u'Where does personality end and brain damage begin?', u"With Google I'm starting to burn out on knowing the answer to everything. People in the year 2020 are going to be nostalgic for the sensation of feeling clueless.", u'Before machines the only form of entertainment people really had was relationships.', u"Being asked what animal you'd like to be is a trick question; you're already an animal."], u'Orison Swett Marden': [u'Success is not measured by what you accomplish, but by the opposition you have encountered, and the courage with which you have maintained the struggle against overwhelming odds.', u'All men who have achieved great things have been great dreamers.', u'Deep within man dwell those slumbering powers; powers that would astonish him, that he never dreamed of possessing; forces that would revolutionize his life if aroused and put into action.', u'There is an infinite difference between a little wrong and just right, between fairly good and the best, between mediocrity and superiority.', u'Achievement is not always success, while reputed failure often is. It is honest endeavor, persistent effort to do the best possible under any and all circumstances.', u"Don't wait for extraordinary opportunities. Seize common occasions and make them great. Weak men wait for opportunities; strong men make them.", u'Forests, lakes, and rivers, clouds and winds, stars and flowers, stupendous glaciers and crystal snowflakes - every form of animate or inanimate existence, leaves its impress upon the soul of man.', u'A constant struggle, a ceaseless battle to bring success from inhospitable surroundings, is the price of all great achievements.', u'We make the world we live in and shape our own environment.', u'Obstacles are like wild animals. They are cowards but they will bluff you if they can. If they see you are afraid of them... they are liable to spring upon you; but if you look them squarely in the eye, they will slink out of sight.', u'A strong, successful man is not the victim of his environment. He creates favorable conditions. His own inherent force and energy compel things to turn out as he desires.', u'Joyfulness keeps the heart and face young. A good laugh makes us better friends with ourselves and everybody around us.', u'Nothing else so destroys the power to stand alone as the habit of leaning upon others. If you lean, you will never be strong or original. Stand alone or bury your ambition to be somebody in the world.', u'There is no medicine like hope, no incentive so great, and no tonic so powerful as expectation of something tomorrow.', u'All who have accomplished great things have had a great aim, have fixed their gaze on a goal which was high, one which sometimes seemed impossible.', u'No employer today is independent of those about him. He cannot succeed alone, no matter how great his ability or capital. Business today is more than ever a question of cooperation.', u'Our destiny changes with our thought; we shall become what we wish to become, do what we wish to do, when our habitual thought corresponds with our desire.', u'If you do not feel yourself growing in your work and your life broadening and deepening, if your task is not a perpetual tonic to you, you have not found your place.', u'The Creator has not given you a longing to do that which you have no ability to do.', u'It is like the seed put in the soil - the more one sows, the greater the harvest.', u'Be larger than your task.', u'Character is the indelible mark that determines the only true value of all people and all their work.', u'There can be no failure to a man who has not lost his courage, his character, his self respect, or his self-confidence. He is still a King.', u'A will finds a way.', u'Our trials, our sorrows, and our grieves develop us.'], u'Anais Nin': [u'And the day came when the risk to remain tight in a bud was more painful than the risk it took to blossom.', u'Each friend represents a world in us, a world not born until they arrive, and it is only by this meeting that a new world is born.', u'I, with a deeper instinct, choose a man who compels my strength, who makes enormous demands on me, who does not doubt my courage or my toughness, who does not believe me naive or innocent, who has the courage to treat me like a woman.', u'Life is a process of becoming, a combination of states we have to go through. Where people fail is that they wish to elect a state and remain in it. This is a kind of death.', u"We don't see things as they are, we see them as we are.", u'Dreams are necessary to life.', u"Anxiety is love's greatest killer. It makes others feel as you might when a drowning man holds on to you. You want to save him, but you know he will strangle you with his panic.", u'Dreams pass into the reality of action. From the actions stems the dream again; and this interdependence produces the highest form of living.', u'How wrong it is for a woman to expect the man to build the world she wants, rather than to create it herself.', u"Love never dies a natural death. It dies because we don't know how to replenish it's source. It dies of blindness and errors and betrayals. It dies of illness and wounds; it dies of weariness, of witherings, of tarnishings.", u'Throw your dreams into space like a kite, and you do not know what it will bring back, a new life, a new friend, a new love, a new country.', u'Life is truly known only to those who suffer, lose, endure adversity and stumble from defeat to defeat.', u'Age does not protect you from love. But love, to some extent, protects you from age.', u'Do not seek the because - in love there is no because, no reason, no explanation, no solutions.', u'I postpone death by living, by suffering, by error, by risking, by giving, by losing.', u'People living deeply have no fear of death.', u'Good things happen to those who hustle.', u"Life shrinks or expands in proportion to one's courage.", u"If you do not breathe through writing, if you do not cry out in writing, or sing in writing, then don't write, because our culture has no use for it.", u'A leaf fluttered in through the window this morning, as if supported by the rays of the sun, a bird settled on the fire escape, joy in the task of coffee, joy accompanied me as I walked.', u'There are very few human beings who receive the truth, complete and staggering, by instant illumination. Most of them acquire it fragment by fragment, on a small scale, by successive developments, cellularly, like a laborious mosaic.', u'When we blindly adopt a religion, a political system, a literary dogma, we become automatons. We cease to grow.', u'If all of us acted in unison as I act individually there would be no wars and no poverty. I have made myself personally responsible for the fate of every human being who has come my way.', u'The only abnormality is the incapacity to love.', u'It is the function of art to renew our perception. What we are familiar with we cease to see. The writer shakes up the familiar scene, and, as if by magic, we see a new meaning in it.'], u'Robert Green Ingersoll': [u'It is a thousand times better to have common sense without education than to have education without common sense.', u'Happiness is the only good. The time to be happy is now. The place to be happy is here. The way to be happy is to make others so.', u'What light is to the eyes - what air is to the lungs - what love is to the heart, liberty is to the soul of man.', u'Religion can never reform mankind because religion is slavery.', u'If a man would follow, today, the teachings of the Old Testament, he would be a criminal. If he would follow strictly the teachings of the New, he would be insane.', u'Tolerance is giving to every other human being every right that you claim for yourself.', u'Anger is a wind which blows out the lamp of the mind.', u'Let us put theology out of religion. Theology has always sent the worst to heaven, the best to hell.', u'I will not attack your doctrines nor your creeds if they accord liberty to me. If they hold thought to be dangerous - if they aver that doubt is a crime, then I attack them one and all, because they enslave the minds of men.', u'A fact never went into partnership with a miracle. Truth scorns the assistance of wonders. A fact will fit every other fact in the universe, and that is how you can tell whether it is or is not a fact. A lie will not fit anything except another lie.', u'Happiness is not a reward - it is a consequence. Suffering is not a punishment - it is a result.', u'Give to every human being every right that you claim for yourself.', u'In nature there are neither rewards nor punishments; there are consequences.', u'Kindness is the sunshine in which virtue grows.', u'The greatest test of courage on earth is to bear defeat without losing heart.', u'We need men with moral courage to speak and write their real thoughts, and to stand by their convictions, even to the very death.', u'My creed is that: Happiness is the only good. The place to be happy is here. The time to be happy is now. The way to be happy is to make others so.', u'The inspiration of the Bible depends upon the ignorance of the gentleman who reads it.', u'Hope is the only universal liar who never loses his reputation for veracity.', u'I am the inferior of any man whose rights I trample under foot.', u'In the night of death, hope sees a star, and listening love can hear the rustle of a wing.', u'Insolence is not logic; epithets are the arguments of malice.', u'It is a blessed thing that in every age some one has had the individuality enough and courage enough to stand by his own convictions.', u'Courage without conscience is a wild beast.', u"If I owe Smith ten dollars and God forgives me, that doesn't pay Smith."], u'Helen Keller': [u'The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched - they must be felt with the heart.', u'Security is mostly a superstition. It does not exist in nature, nor do the children of men as a whole experience it. Avoiding danger is no safer in the long run than outright exposure. Life is either a daring adventure, or nothing.', u'Character cannot be developed in ease and quiet. Only through experience of trial and suffering can the soul be strengthened, ambition inspired, and success achieved.', u'I am only one, but still I am one. I cannot do everything, but still I can do something; and because I cannot do everything, I will not refuse to do something that I can do.', u'Optimism is the faith that leads to achievement. Nothing can be done without hope and confidence.', u'Walking with a friend in the dark is better than walking alone in the light.', u'The most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched, they must be felt with the heart.', u'It is wonderful how much time good people spend fighting the devil. If they would only expend the same amount of energy loving their fellow men, the devil would die in his own tracks of ennui.', u"Death is no more than passing from one room into another. But there's a difference for me, you know. Because in that other room I shall be able to see.", u'Alone we can do so little; together we can do so much.', u'While they were saying among themselves it cannot be done, it was done.', u'Everything has its wonders, even darkness and silence, and I learn, whatever state I may be in, therein to be content.', u'Your success and happiness lies in you. Resolve to keep happy, and your joy and you shall form an invincible host against difficulties.', u'Life is a succession of lessons which must be lived to be understood.', u'What we have once enjoyed we can never lose. All that we love deeply becomes a part of us.', u'Self-pity is our worst enemy and if we yield to it, we can never do anything wise in this world.', u'Love is like a beautiful flower which I may not touch, but whose fragrance makes the garden a place of delight just the same.', u'It is a terrible thing to see and have no vision.', u'Keep your face to the sunshine and you cannot see a shadow.', u'I long to accomplish a great and noble task, but it is my chief duty to accomplish small tasks as if they were great and noble.', u'Faith is the strength by which a shattered world shall emerge into the light.', u'All the world is full of suffering. It is also full of overcoming.', u'Never bend your head. Always hold it high. Look the world straight in the eye.', u'As selfishness and complaint pervert the mind, so love with its joy clears and sharpens the vision.', u'So long as the memory of certain beloved friends lives in my heart, I shall say that life is good.'], u'Sophocles': [u'Always desire to learn something useful.', u'A man growing old becomes a child again.', u'I would prefer even to fail with honor than win by cheating.', u"Children are the anchors of a mother's life.", u'Success is dependent on effort.', u'Rather fail with honor than succeed by fraud.', u'Money is the worst currency that ever grew among mankind. This sacks cities, this drives men from their homes, this teaches and corrupts the worthiest minds to turn base deeds.', u"Ignorant men don't know what good they hold in their hands until they've flung it away.", u'Who seeks shall find.', u'Trust dies but mistrust blossoms.', u'Whoever neglects the arts when he is young has lost the past and is dead to the future.', u'A short saying often contains much wisdom.', u'Look and you will find it - what is unsought will go undetected.', u'Men of ill judgment ignore the good that lies within their hands, till they have lost it.', u'Wisdom outweighs any wealth.', u'A wise man does not chatter with one whose mind is sick.', u'Hide nothing, for time, which sees all and hears all, exposes all.', u"All a man's affairs become diseased when he wishes to cure evils by evils.", u'One word frees us of all the weight and pain in life. That word is love.', u'There is no witness so terrible and no accuser so powerful as conscience which dwells within us.', u'Time alone reveals the just man; but you might discern a bad man in a single day.', u'A day lays low and lifts up again all human things.', u'A soul that is kind and intends justice discovers more than any sophist.', u'A word does not frighten the man who, in acting, feels no fear.', u'Alas, how quickly the gratitude owed to the dead flows off, how quick to be proved a deceiver.'], u'Calvin Coolidge': [u'Nothing in this world can take the place of persistence. Talent will not; nothing is more common than unsuccessful people with talent. Genius will not; unrewarded genius is almost a proverb. Education will not; the world is full of educated failures. Persistence and determination alone are omnipotent.', u'There is no force so democratic as the force of an ideal.', u'Christmas is not a time nor a season, but a state of mind. To cherish peace and goodwill, to be plenteous in mercy, is to have the real spirit of Christmas.', u"Don't expect to build up the weak by pulling down the strong.", u'I have never been hurt by what I have not said.', u'Collecting more taxes than is absolutely necessary is legalized robbery.', u'All growth depends upon activity. There is no development physically or intellectually without effort, and effort means work.', u'There is no dignity quite so impressive, and no one independence quite so important, as living within your means.', u'Knowledge comes, but wisdom lingers. It may not be difficult to store up in the mind a vast quantity of face within a comparatively short time, but the ability to form judgments requires the severe discipline of hard work and the tempering heat of experience and maturity.', u'It takes a great man to be a good listener.', u'The nation which forgets its defenders will be itself forgotten.', u'We do not need more intellectual power, we need more spiritual power. We do not need more of the things that are seen, we need more of the things that are unseen.', u'If you see ten troubles coming down the road, you can be sure that nine will run into the ditch before they reach you.', u'We cannot do everything at once, but we can do something at once.', u'Duty is not collective; it is personal.', u'The man who builds a factory builds a temple, that the man who works there worships there, and to each is due, not scorn and blame, but reverence and praise.', u'Patriotism is easy to understand in America. It means looking out for yourself by looking out for your country.', u"I have found it advisable not to give too much heed to what people say when I am trying to accomplish something of consequence. Invariably they proclaim it can't be done. I deem that the very best time to make the effort.", u'No person was ever honored for what he received. Honor has been the reward for what he gave.', u'We need more of the Office Desk and less of the Show Window in politics. Let men in office substitute the midnight oil for the limelight.', u'It is only when men begin to worship that they begin to grow.', u'Civilization and profit go hand in hand.', u'To live under the American Constitution is the greatest political privilege that was ever accorded to the human race.', u'I have noticed that nothing I never said ever did me any harm.', u'After all, the chief business of the American people is business. They are profoundly concerned with producing, buying, selling, investing and prospering in the world.'], u'Thomas Jefferson': [u'I predict future happiness for Americans if they can prevent the government from wasting the labors of the people under the pretense of taking care of them.', u'A wise and frugal Government, which shall restrain men from injuring one another, which shall leave them otherwise free to regulate their own pursuits of industry and improvement, and shall not take from the mouth of labor the bread it has earned. This is the sum of good government, and this is necessary to close the circlue of our felicities.', u'The tree of liberty must be refreshed from time to time with the blood of patriots and tyrants.', u'All tyranny needs to gain a foothold is for people of good conscience to remain silent.', u'But friendship is precious, not only in the shade, but in the sunshine of life, and thanks to a benevolent arrangement the greater part of life is sunshine.', u'I hope we shall crush in its birth the aristocracy of our monied corporations which dare already to challenge our government to a trial by strength, and bid defiance to the laws of our country.', u"Do you want to know who you are? Don't ask. Act! Action will delineate and define you.", u'The glow of one warm thought is to me worth more than money.', u'An association of men who will not quarrel with one another is a thing which has never yet existed, from the greatest confederacy of nations down to a town meeting or a vestry.', u'My reading of history convinces me that most bad government results from too much government.', u'When we get piled upon one another in large cities, as in Europe, we shall become as corrupt as Europe.', u'Honesty is the first chapter in the book of wisdom.', u'A strong body makes the mind strong. As to the species of exercises, I advise the gun. While this gives moderate exercise to the body, it gives boldness, enterprise and independence to the mind. Games played with the ball, and others of that nature, are too violent for the body and stamp no character on the mind. Let your gun therefore be your constant companion of your walks.', u'When you reach the end of your rope, tie a knot in it and hang on.', u'I never considered a difference of opinion in politics, in religion, in philosophy, as cause for withdrawing from a friend.', u'I believe that banking institutions are more dangerous to our liberties than standing armies.', u'When the people fear the government, there is tyranny. When the government fears the people, there is liberty.', u'It is incumbent on every generation to pay its own debts as it goes. A principle which if acted on would save one-half the wars of the world.', u'Question with boldness even the existence of a God; because, if there be one, he must more approve of the homage of reason, than that of blind-folded fear.', u'Experience hath shewn, that even under the best forms of government those entrusted with power have, in time, and by slow operations, perverted it into tyranny.', u'Nothing can stop the man with the right mental attitude from achieving his goal; nothing on earth can help the man with the wrong mental attitude.', u'Our greatest happiness does not depend on the condition of life in which chance has placed us, but is always the result of a good conscience, good health, occupation, and freedom in all just pursuits.', u'Experience demands that man is the only animal which devours his own kind, for I can apply no milder term to the general prey of the rich on the poor.', u'I tremble for my country when I reflect that God is just; that his justice cannot sleep forever.', u'A Bill of Rights is what the people are entitled to against every government, and what no just government should refuse, or rest on inference.'], u'J. R. R. Tolkien': [u'Not all who wander are lost.', u'If more of us valued food and cheer and song above hoarded gold, it would be a merrier world.', u'Courage is found in unlikely places.', u'It does not do to leave a live dragon out of your calculations, if you live near him.', u'Faithless is he that says farewell when the road darkens.', u'Still round the corner there may wait, A new road or a secret gate.', u"I don't know half of you half as well as I should like; and I like less than half of you half as well as you deserve.", u"It's the job that's never started takes longest to finish.", u'Do not meddle in the affairs of wizards, for they are subtle and quick to anger.', u'A box without hinges, key, or lid, yet golden treasure inside is hid.', u'I am told that I talk in shorthand and then smudge it.', u'I wish life was not so short, he thought. languages take such a time, and so do all the things one wants to know about.', u'Go not to the elves for counsel, for they will say both yes and no.'], u'Orson Welles': [u"We're born alone, we live alone, we die alone. Only through our love and friendship can we create the illusion for the moment that we're not alone.", u'If you want a happy ending, that depends, of course, on where you stop your story.', u'Popularity should be no scale for the election of politicians. If it would depend on popularity, Donald Duck and The Muppets would take seats in senate.', u"If there hadn't been women we'd still be squatting in a cave eating raw meat, because we made civilization in order to impress our girlfriends.", u'When you are down and out something always turns up - and it is usually the noses of your friends.', u'A film is never really good unless the camera is an eye in the head of a poet.', u'Create your own visual style... let it be unique for yourself and yet identifiable for others.', u"Criminals are never very amusing. It's because they're failures. Those who make real money aren't counted as criminals. This is a class distinction, not an ethical problem.", u'The enemy of art is the absence of limitations.', u"I do not suppose I shall be remembered for anything. But I don't think about my work in those terms. It is just as vulgar to work for the sake of posterity as to work for the sake of money.", u'My doctor told me to stop having intimate dinners for four. Unless there are three other people.', u'Nobody gets justice. People only get good luck or bad luck.', u"Ask not what you can do for your country. Ask what's for lunch.", u"I don't say we all ought to misbehave, but we ought to look as if we could.", u"I hate television. I hate it as much as peanuts. But I can't stop eating peanuts.", u'I have a great love and respect for religion, great love and respect for atheism. What I hate is agnosticism, people who do not choose.', u"Did you ever stop to think why cops are always famous for being dumb? Simple. Because they don't have to be anything else.", u"I want to give the audience a hint of a scene. No more than that. Give them too much and they won't contribute anything themselves. Give them just a suggestion and you get them working with you. That's what gives the theater meaning: when it becomes a social act.", u"A good artist should be isolated. If he isn't isolated, something is wrong.", u'Fake is as old as the Eden tree.', u"I've always found it very sanitary to be broke.", u'Man is a rational animal who always loses his temper when called upon to act in accordance with the dictates of reason.', u"Personally, I don't like a girlfriend to have a husband. If she'll fool her husband, I figure she'll fool me.", u'They teach anything in universities today. You can major in mud pies.', u'Gluttony is not a secret vice.'], u'Epicurus': [u"You don't develop courage by being happy in your relationships everyday. You develop it by surviving difficult times and challenging adversity.", u"It is not so much our friends' help that helps us, as the confidence of their help.", u'Do not spoil what you have by desiring what you have not; remember that what you now have was once among the things you only hoped for.', u'If God listened to the prayers of men, all men would quickly have perished: for they are forever praying for evil against one another.', u'Not what we have But what we enjoy, constitutes our abundance.', u'The art of living well and the art of dying well are one.', u'Death does not concern us, because as long as we exist, death is not here. And when it does come, we no longer exist.', u'Nothing is enough for the man to whom enough is too little.', u'It is better for you to be free of fear lying upon a pallet, than to have a golden couch and a rich table and be full of trouble.', u'If thou wilt make a man happy, add not unto his riches but take away from his desires.', u'A free life cannot acquire many possessions, because this is not easy to do without servility to mobs or monarchs.', u'I never desired to please the rabble. What pleased them, I did not learn; and what I knew was far removed from their understanding.', u'I have never wished to cater to the crowd; for what I know they do not approve, and what they approve I do not know.', u'Of all the things which wisdom provides to make us entirely happy, much the greatest is the possession of friendship.', u'I would rather be first in a little Iberian village than second in Rome.', u'It is impossible to live a pleasant life without living wisely and well and justly. And it is impossible to live wisely and well and justly without living a pleasant life.', u'It is folly for a man to pray to the gods for that which he has the power to obtain by himself.', u'The greater the difficulty, the more the glory in surmounting it.', u'The misfortune of the wise is better than the prosperity of the fool.', u'Skillful pilots gain their reputation from storms and tempest.', u'It is possible to provide security against other ills, but as far as death is concerned, we men live in a city without walls.', u'Riches do not exhilarate us so much with their possession as they torment us with their loss.', u'We do not so much need the help of our friends as the confidence of their help in need.', u'Justice... is a kind of compact not to harm or be harmed.', u'Misfortune seldom intrudes upon the wise man; his greatest and highest interests are directed by reason throughout the course of life.'], u'Kin Hubbard': [u'We would all like to vote for the best man but he is never a candidate.', u"Don't knock the weather; nine-tenths of the people couldn't start a conversation if it didn't change once in a while.", u'Fun is like life insurance; the older you get, the more it costs.', u'Boys will be boys, and so will a lot of middle-aged men.', u"A bee is never as busy as it seems; it's just that it can't buzz any slower.", u'Classical music is the kind we keep thinking will turn into a tune.', u'Of all the home remedies, a good wife is best.', u'The safe way to double your money is to fold it over once and put it in your pocket.', u'There are two ways to handle a woman, and nobody knows either of them.', u'Kindness goes a long ways lots of times when it ought to stay at home.', u'Getting talked about is one of the penalties for being pretty, while being above suspicion is about the only compensation for being homely.', u'There is no failure except in no longer trying. There is no defeat except from within, no really insurmountable barrier save our own inherent weakness of purpose.', u'A loafer always has the correct time.', u'Lots of folks confuse bad management with destiny.', u"Next to a circus there ain't nothing that packs up and tears out faster than the Christmas spirit.", u'Some folks can look so busy doing nothing that they seem indispensable.', u'A good listener is usually thinking about something else.', u'All the world loves a good loser.', u'It is pretty hard to tell what does bring happiness; poverty and wealth have both failed.', u'A lot of Thanksgiving days have been ruined by not carving the turkey in the kitchen.', u"If capital and labor ever do get together it's good night for the rest of us.", u"If you haven't seen your wife smile at a traffic cop, you haven't seen her smile her prettiest.", u"It's going to be fun to watch and see how long the meek can keep the earth once they inherit it.", u'Now and then an innocent man is sent to the legislature.', u"The worst feature of a new baby is its mother's singing."], u'Homer': [u'There is nothing nobler or more admirable than when two people who see eye to eye keep house as man and wife, confounding their enemies and delighting their friends.', u'Be still my heart; thou hast known worse than this.', u"Yet, taught by time, my heart has learned to glow for other's good, and melt at other's woe.", u'Hateful to me as are the gates of hell, Is he who, hiding one thing in his heart, Utters another.', u'And what he greatly thought, he nobly dared.', u'The difficulty is not so great to die for a friend, as to find a friend worth dying for.', u'A decent boldness ever meets with friends.', u'There is a time for many words, and there is also a time for sleep.', u'Hateful to me as the gates of Hades is that man who hides one thing in his heart and speaks another.', u'In youth and beauty, wisdom is but rare!', u'The charity that is a trifle to us can be precious to others.', u'For rarely are sons similar to their fathers: most are worse, and a few are better than their fathers.', u'A sympathetic friend can be quite as dear as a brother.', u'Light is the task where many share the toil.', u"Without a sign, his sword the brave man draws, and asks no omen, but his country's cause.", u'Even were sleep is concerned, too much is a bad thing.', u'It is not good to have a rule of many.', u'Words empty as the wind are best left unsaid.', u'But curb thou the high spirit in thy breast, for gentle ways are best, and keep aloof from sharp contentions.', u'How vain, without the merit, is the name.', u'Hunger is insolent, and will be fed.', u'Nothing shall I, while sane, compare with a friend.', u'To have a great man for an intimate friend seems pleasant to those who have never tried it; those who have, fear it.', u'True friends appear less moved than counterfeit.', u'Two friends, two bodies with one soul inspired.'], u'James M. Barrie': [u'Life is a long lesson in humility.', u'Those who bring sunshine into the lives of others cannot keep it from themselves.', u'Dreams do come true, if we only wish hard enough, You can have anything in life if you will sacrifice everything else for it.', u'A woman can be anything the man who loves her would have her be.', u'God gave us memory so that we might have roses in December.', u'Let no one who loves be unhappy, even love unreturned has its rainbow.', u'You must have been warned against letting the golden hours slip by; but some of them are golden only because we let them slip by.', u'Shall we make a new rule of life from tonight: always to try to be a little kinder than is necessary?', u'Do you believe in fairies? Say quick that you believe. If you believe, clap your hands!', u'The praise that comes from love does not make us vain, but more humble.', u"A safe but sometimes chilly way of recalling the past is to force open a crammed drawer. If you are searching for anything in particular you don't find it, but something falls out at the back that is often more interesting.", u'Ambition - it is the last infirmity of noble minds.', u'The most useless are those who never change through the years.', u'Every man who is high up likes to think that he has done it all himself, and the wife smiles and lets it go at that.', u"I'm youth, I'm joy, I'm a little bird that has broken out of the egg.", u'Strength instead of being the lusty child of passion, grows by grappling with and subduing them.', u'Temper is a weapon that we hold by the blade.', u'Always be a little kinder than necessary.', u"Everytime a child says 'I don't believe in fairies' there is a a little fairy somewhere that falls down dead.", u'For several days after my first book was published, I carried it about in my pocket and took surreptitious peeps at it to make sure the ink had not faded.', u'His lordship may compel us to be equal upstairs, but there will never be equality in the servants hall.', u'I am not young enough to know everything.', u'I know not, sir, whether Bacon wrote the works of Shakespeare, but if he did not, it seems to me that he missed the opportunity of his life.', u'It is not real work unless you would rather be doing something else.', u'Never ascribe to an opponent motives meaner than your own.'], u'Jean Paul': [u'God is an unutterable sigh, planted in the depths of the soul.', u'The more sand that has escaped from the hourglass of our life, the clearer we should see through it.', u'Humanity is never so beautiful as when praying for forgiveness, or else forgiving another.', u"Every man regards his own life as the New Year's Eve of time.", u'Joy descends gently upon us like the evening dew, and does not patter down like a hailstorm.', u'Music is moonlight in the gloomy night of life.', u'You prove your worth with your actions, not with your mouth.', u'A timid person is frightened before a danger, a coward during the time, and a courageous person afterward.', u'Be great in act, as you have been in thought.', u'Like a morning dream, life becomes more and more bright the longer we live, and the reason of everything appears more clear. What has puzzled us before seems less mysterious, and the crooked paths look straighter as we approach the end.', u'The conscience of children is formed by the influences that surround them; their notions of good and evil are the result of the moral atmosphere they breathe.', u'The darkness of death is like the evening twilight; it makes all objects appear more lovely to the dying.', u'Courage consists not in blindly overlooking danger, but in seeing it, and conquering it.', u'Every man has a rainy corner of his life whence comes foul weather which follows him.', u'Never part without loving words to think of during your absence. It may be that you will not meet again in this life.', u'Strong characters are brought out by change of situation, and gentle ones by permanence.', u'A man never discloses his own character so clearly as when he describes anothers.', u'Age does not matter if the matter does not age.', u'Do not wait for extraordinary circumstances to do good action; try to use ordinary situations.', u'Our birthdays are feathers in the broad wing of time.', u'The words that a father speaks to his children in the privacy of home are not heard by the world, but, as in whispering galleries, they are clearly heard at the end, and by posterity.', u'As winter strips the leaves from around us, so that we may see the distant regions they formerly concealed, so old age takes away our enjoyments only to enlarge the prospect of the coming eternity.', u'Beauty attracts us men; but if, like an armed magnet it is pointed, beside, with gold and silver, it attracts with tenfold power.', u'Death gives us sleep, eternal youth, and immortality.', u'For sleep, riches and health to be truly enjoyed, they must be interrupted.'], u'Stephen Covey': [u'Every human has four endowments- self awareness, conscience, independent will and creative imagination. These give us the ultimate human freedom... The power to choose, to respond, to change.', u'Effective leadership is putting first things first. Effective management is discipline, carrying it out.', u'There are three constants in life... change, choice and principles.', u'A cardinal principle of Total Quality escapes too many managers: you cannot continuously improve interdependent systems and processes until you progressively perfect interdependent, interpersonal relationships.', u'Management is efficiency in climbing the ladder of success; leadership determines whether the ladder is leaning against the right wall.', u'Live out of your imagination, not your history.', u'The main thing is to keep the main thing the main thing.', u'We are the creative force of our life, and through our own decisions rather than our conditions, if we carefully learn to do certain things, we can accomplish those goals.', u'We are not animals. We are not a product of what has happened to us in our past. We have the power of choice.', u'Our character is basically a composite of our habits. Because they are consistent, often unconcious patterns, they constantly, daily, express our character.', u'In the last analysis, what we are communicates far more eloquently than anything we say or do.', u"The key is not to prioritize what's on your schedule, but to schedule your priorities.", u"When you really listen to another person from their point of view, and reflect back to them that understanding, it's like giving them emotional oxygen.", u'Public behavior is merely private character writ large.', u'The key is taking responsibility and initiative, deciding what your life is about and prioritizing your life around the most important things.', u'Life is not accumulation, it is about contribution.', u"Trust is the glue of life. It's the most essential ingredient in effective communication. It's the foundational principle that holds all relationships.", u"When it comes to developing character strength, inner security and unique personal and interpersonal talents and skills in a child, no institution can or ever will compare with, or effectively substitute for, the home's potential for positive influence.", u'Instead, I have an abundance mentality: When people are genuinely happy at the successes of others, the pie gets larger.', u"It's a fact that more people watch television and get their information that way than read books. I find new technology and new ways of communication very exciting and would like to do more in this field.", u'The challenge of work-life balance is without question one of the most significant struggles faced by modern man.', u'But with the steady disintegration of the family in modern society over the last century, the role of the school in bridging the gap has become vital!', u'Despite all our gains in technology, product innovation and world markets, most people are not thriving in the organizations they work for.', u'Employers and business leaders need people who can think for themselves - who can take initiative and be the solution to problems.', u'Historically, the family has played the primary role in educating children for life, with the school providing supplemental scaffolding to the family.'], u'Immanuel Kant': [u'He who is cruel to animals becomes hard also in his dealings with men. We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals.', u"Immaturity is the incapacity to use one's intelligence without the guidance of another.", u'Two things awe me most, the starry sky above me and the moral law within me.', u'In law a man is guilty when he violates the rights of others. In ethics he is guilty if he only thinks of doing so.', u'By a lie, a man... annihilates his dignity as a man.', u'Morality is not the doctrine of how we may make ourselves happy, but how we may make ourselves worthy of happiness.', u'All our knowledge begins with the senses, proceeds then to the understanding, and ends with reason. There is nothing higher than reason.', u"It is not God's will merely that we should be happy, but that we should make ourselves happy.", u'Experience without theory is blind, but theory without experience is mere intellectual play.', u'All the interests of my reason, speculative as well as practical, combine in the three following questions: 1. What can I know? 2. What ought I to do? 3. What may I hope?', u'Happiness is not an ideal of reason, but of imagination.', u'Seek not the favor of the multitude; it is seldom got by honest and lawful means. But seek the testimony of few; and number not voices, but weigh them.', u'Always recognize that human individuals are ends, and do not use them as means to your end.', u'A categorical imperative would be one which represented an action as objectively necessary in itself, without reference to any other purpose.', u'To be is to do.', u'Act that your principle of action might safely be made a law for the whole world.', u'I had therefore to remove knowledge, in order to make room for belief.', u'Live your life as though your every act were to become a universal law.', u'Science is organized knowledge. Wisdom is organized life.', u"Even philosophers will praise war as ennobling mankind, forgetting the Greek who said: 'War is bad in that it begets more evil than it kills.'", u'Ingratitude is the essence of vileness.', u'From such crooked wood as that which man is made of, nothing straight can be fashioned.', u'Intuition and concepts constitute... the elements of all our knowledge, so that neither concepts without an intuition in some way corresponding to them, nor intuition without concepts, can yield knowledge.', u'If man makes himself a worm he must not complain when he is trodden on.', u'It is beyond a doubt that all our knowledge that begins with experience.'], u'Karl Marx': [u'From each according to his abilities, to each according to his needs.', u'History repeats itself, first as tragedy, second as farce.', u'Anyone who knows anything of history knows that great social changes are impossible without feminine upheaval. Social progress can be measured exactly by the social position of the fair sex, the ugly ones included.', u'Democracy is the road to socialism.', u'Capital is dead labor, which, vampire-like, lives only by sucking living labor, and lives the more, the more labor it sucks.', u'Workers of the world unite; you have nothing to lose but your chains.', u'Religion is the impotence of the human mind to deal with occurrences it cannot understand.', u'Religion is the opium of the masses.', u'Let the ruling classes tremble at a communist revolution. The proletarians have nothing to lose but their chains. They have a world to win. Workingmen of all countries, unite!', u'Social progress can be measured by the social position of the female sex.', u'The theory of Communism may be summed up in one sentence: Abolish all private property.', u'For the bureaucrat, the world is a mere object to be manipulated by him.', u'History does nothing; it does not possess immense riches, it does not fight battles. It is men, real, living, who do all this.', u'The meaning of peace is the absence of opposition to socialism.', u'If anything is certain, it is that I myself am not a Marxist.', u'Necessity is blind until it becomes conscious. Freedom is the consciousness of necessity.', u'The only antidote to mental suffering is physical pain.', u'A commodity appears at first sight an extremely obvious, trivial thing. But its analysis brings out that it is a very strange thing, abounding in metaphysical subtleties and theological niceties.', u'Capitalist production, therefore, develops technology, and the combining together of various processes into a social whole, only by sapping the original sources of all wealth - the soil and the labourer.', u'Art is always and everywhere the secret confession, and at the same time the immortal movement of its time.', u'It is not history which uses men as a means of achieving - as if it were an individual person - its own ends. History is nothing but the activity of men in pursuit of their ends.', u'In bourgeois society capital is independent and has individuality, while the living person is dependent and has no individuality.', u'In a higher phase of communist society... only then can the narrow horizon of bourgeois right be fully left behind and society inscribe on its banners: from each according to his ability, to each according to his needs.', u'The production of too many useful things results in too many useless people.', u'The rich will do anything for the poor but get off their backs.'], u'Paulo Coelho': [u'Waiting is painful. Forgetting is painful. But not knowing which to do is the worse kind of suffering.', u'Everything that happens once can never happen again. But everything that happens twice will surely happen a third time.', u'Be brave. Take risks. Nothing can substitute experience.', u'Tell your heart that the fear of suffering is worse than the suffering itself. And no heart has ever suffered when it goes in search of its dream.', u'When a person really desires something, all the universe conspires to help that person to realize his dream.', u'You have to take risks. We will only understand the miracle of life fully when we allow the unexpected to happen.', u"You can become blind by seeing each day as a similar one. Each day is a different one, each day brings a miracle of its own. It's just a matter of paying attention to this miracle.", u'Life was always a matter of waiting for the right moment to act.', u"The two worst strategic mistakes to make are acting prematurely and letting an opportunity slip; to avoid this, the warrior treats each situation as if it were unique and never resorts to formulae, recipes or other people's opinions.", u"No one can lie, no one can hide anything, when he looks directly into someone's eyes.", u'The wise are wise only because they love. The fool are fools only because they think they can understand love.', u'One is loved because one is loved. No reason is needed for loving.', u'When you want something, all the universe conspires in helping you to achieve it.', u'You drown not by falling into a river, but by staying submerged in it.', u'Every blessing ignored becomes a curse.', u'Love can consign us to hell or to paradise, but it always takes us somewhere.', u"If you start by promising what you don't even have yet, you'll lose your desire to work towards getting it.", u'Love is a trap. When it appears, we see only its light, not its shadows.', u'We have to stop and be humble enough to understand that there is something called mystery.', u"People are very reluctant to talk about their private lives but then you go to the internet and they're much more open.", u'All women have a perception much more developed than men. So all women somehow, being repressed for so many millennia, they ended up by developing this sixth sense and contemplation and love. And this is something that we have a hard time to accept as part of our society.', u'Beauty is the greatest seducer of man.', u"Of course, to have money is just great because you can do what you think is important to you. I always was a rich person because money's not related to happiness.", u"I'm not saying that love always takes you to heaven. Your life can become a nightmare. But that said, it is worth taking the risk.", u"I write from my soul. This is the reason that critics don't hurt me, because it is me. If it was not me, if I was pretending to be someone else, then this could unbalance my world, but I know who I am."], u'Simone Weil': [u'I can, therefore I am.', u'Humility is attentive patience.', u'In struggling against anguish one never produces serenity; the struggle against anguish only produces new forms of anguish.', u'A hurtful act is the transference to others of the degradation which we bear in ourselves.', u'All sins are attempts to fill voids.', u'Those who are unhappy have no need for anything in this world but people capable of giving them their attention.', u'Beauty always promises, but never gives anything.', u'Attachment is the great fabricator of illusions; reality can be attained only by someone who is detached.', u'To be rooted is perhaps the most important and least recognized need of the human soul.', u'Every time that I think of the crucifixion of Christ, I commit the sin of envy.', u'For when two beings who are not friends are near each other there is no meeting, and when friends are far apart there is no separation.', u'Humanism was not wrong in thinking that truth, beauty, liberty, and equality are of infinite value, but in thinking that man can get them for himself without grace.', u'Imagination and fiction make up more than three quarters of our real life.', u'It is an eternal obligation toward the human being not to let him suffer from hunger when one has a chance of coming to his assistance.', u"The only way into truth is through one's own annihilation; through dwelling a long time in a state of extreme and total humiliation.", u'To want friendship is a great fault. Friendship ought to be a gratuitous joy, like the joys afforded by art or life.', u'When a contradiction is impossible to resolve except by a lie, then we know that it is really a door.', u'A mind enclosed in language is in prison.', u'A science which does not bring us nearer to God is worthless.', u'As soon as men know that they can kill without fear of punishment or blame, they kill; or at least they encourage killers with approving smiles.', u'Charity. To love human beings in so far as they are nothing. That is to love them as God does.', u'Evil being the root of mystery, pain is the root of knowledge.', u'Petroleum is a more likely cause of international conflict than wheat.', u'The danger is not lest the soul should doubt whether there is any bread, but lest, by a lie, it should persuade itself that it is not hungry.', u'The highest ecstasy is the attention at its fullest.'], u'John Locke': [u'As people are walking all the time, in the same spot, a path appears.', u'The Bible is one of the greatest blessings bestowed by God on the children of men. It has God for its author; salvation for its end, and truth without any mixture for its matter. It is all pure.', u'We are like chameleons, we take our hue and the color of our moral character, from those who are around us.', u'All mankind... being all equal and independent, no one ought to harm another in his life, health, liberty or possessions.', u'An excellent man, like precious metal, is in every way invariable; A villain, like the beams of a balance, is always varying, upwards and downwards.', u'All wealth is the product of labor.', u'A sound mind in a sound body, is a short, but full description of a happy state in this World: he that has these two, has little more to wish for; and he that wants either of them, will be little the better for anything else.', u'Parents wonder why the streams are bitter, when they themselves have poisoned the fountain.', u'I have always thought the actions of men the best interpreters of their thoughts.', u'Reading furnishes the mind only with materials of knowledge; it is thinking that makes what we read ours.', u'Where there is no property there is no injustice.', u'The end of law is not to abolish or restrain, but to preserve and enlarge freedom. For in all the states of created beings capable of law, where there is no law, there is no freedom.', u'All men are liable to error; and most men are, in many points, by passion or interest, under temptation to it.', u'Education begins the gentleman, but reading, good company and reflection must finish him.', u'Every man has a property in his own person. This nobody has a right to, but himself.', u'I have spent more than half a lifetime trying to express the tragic moment.', u'Government has no other end, but the preservation of property.', u'It is of great use to the sailor to know the length of his line, though he cannot with it fathom all the depths of the ocean.', u"To prejudge other men's notions before we have looked into them is not to show their darkness but to put out our own eyes.", u'Fortitude is the guard and support of the other virtues.', u"No man's knowledge here can go beyond his experience.", u'Our incomes are like our shoes; if too small, they gall and pinch us; but if too large, they cause us to stumble and to trip.', u'The dread of evil is a much more forcible principle of human actions than the prospect of good.', u'There cannot be greater rudeness than to interrupt another in the current of his discourse.', u'There is frequently more to be learned from the unexpected questions of a child than the discourses of men.'], u'Erma Bombeck': [u"When I stand before God at the end of my life, I would hope that I would not have a single bit of talent left, and could say, 'I used everything you gave me'.", u'Thanksgiving dinners take eighteen hours to prepare. They are consumed in twelve minutes. Half-times take twelve minutes. This is not coincidence.', u"A friend doesn't go on a diet because you are fat.", u"Dreams have only one owner at a time. That's why dreamers are lonely.", u'Do you know what you call those who use towels and never wash them, eat meals and never do the dishes, sit in rooms they never clean, and are entertained till they drop? If you have just answered, "A house guest," you\'re wrong because I have just described my kids.', u"I haven't trusted polls since I read that 62% of women had affairs during their lunch hour. I've never met a woman in my life who would give up lunch for sex.", u'There is a thin line that separates laughter and pain, comedy and tragedy, humor and hurt.', u"Don't confuse fame with success. Madonna is one; Helen Keller is the other.", u'When your mother asks, "Do you want a piece of advice?" it is a mere formality. It doesn\'t matter if you answer yes or no. You\'re going to get it anyway.', u"My theory on housework is, if the item doesn't multiply, smell, catch fire, or block the refrigerator door, let it be. No one else cares. Why should you?", u'A friend never defends a husband who gets his wife an electric skillet for her birthday.', u'Guilt: the gift that keeps on giving.', u'Never have more children than you have car windows.', u"For years my wedding ring has done its job. It has led me not into temptation. It has reminded my husband numerous times at parties that it's time to go home. It has been a source of relief to a dinner companion. It has been a status symbol in the maternity ward.", u"If you can't make it better, you can laugh at it.", u'It is not until you become a mother that your judgment slowly turns to compassion and understanding.', u'Children make your life important.', u'All of us have moments in out lives that test our courage. Taking children into a house with a white carpet is one of them.', u'Being a child at home alone in the summer is a high-risk occupation. If you call your mother at work thirteen times an hour, she can hurt you.', u'My second favorite household chore is ironing. My first being hitting my head on the top bunk bed until I faint.', u"People shop for a bathing suit with more care than they do a husband or wife. The rules are the same. Look for something you'll feel comfortable wearing. Allow for room to grow.", u'When humor goes, there goes civilization.', u'Housework, if you do it right, will kill you.', u'No one ever died from sleeping in an unmade bed. I have known mothers who remake the bed after their children do it because there is wrinkle in the spread or the blanket is on crooked. This is sick.', u"One thing they never tell you about child raising is that for the rest of your life, at the drop of a hat, you are expected to know your child's name and how old he or she is."], u'Meister Eckhart': [u'If the only prayer you ever say in your entire life is thank you, it will be enough.', u'Do exactly what you would do if you felt most secure.', u"God is at home, it's we who have gone out for a walk.", u"A human being has so many skins inside, covering the depths of the heart. We know so many things, but we don't know ourselves! Why, thirty or forty skins or hides, as thick and hard as an ox's or bear's, cover the soul. Go into your own ground and learn to know yourself there.", u'The more we have the less we own.', u'There exists only the present instant... a Now which always and without end is itself new. There is no yesterday nor any tomorrow, but only Now, as it was a thousand years ago and as it will be a thousand years hence.', u'He who would be serene and pure needs but one thing, detachment.', u'The eye with which I see God is the same eye with which God sees me.', u'What we plant in the soil of contemplation, we shall reap in the harvest of action.', u'All God wants of man is a peaceful heart.', u'You may call God love, you may call God goodness. But the best name for God is compassion.', u'Truly, it is in darkness that one finds the light, so when we are in sorrow, then this light is nearest of all to us.', u'God expects but one thing of you, and that is that you should come out of yourself in so far as you are a created being made and let God be God in you.', u'One person who has mastered life is better than a thousand persons who have mastered only the contents of books, but no one can get anything out of life without God.', u'The price of inaction is far greater than the cost of making a mistake.', u'Every creature is a word of God.', u'The knower and the known are one. Simple people imagine that they should see God as if he stood there and they here. This is not so. God and I, we are one in knowledge.', u'To be full of things is to be empty of God. To be empty of things is to be full of God.', u'A just person is one who is conformed and transformed into justice.', u'Only the hand that erases can write the true thing.', u'When you are thwarted, it is your own attitude that is out of order.', u'Man goes far away or near but God never goes far-off; he is always standing close at hand, and even if he cannot stay within he goes no further than the door.', u'The outward work will never be puny if the inward work is great.', u'We are celebrating the feast of the Eternal Birth which God the Father has borne and never ceases to bear in all eternity... But if it takes not place in me, what avails it? Everything lies in this, that it should take place in me.', u'What a man takes in by contemplation, that he pours out in love.'], u'C. S. Lewis': [u'Affection is responsible for nine-tenths of whatever solid and durable happiness there is in our lives.', u'Aim at heaven and you will get earth thrown in. Aim at earth and you get neither.', u'Friendship is unnecessary, like philosophy, like art... It has no survival value; rather it is one of those things that give value to survival.', u'I believe in Christianity as I believe that the sun has risen: not only because I see it, but because by it I see everything else.', u"A man can no more diminish God's glory by refusing to worship Him than a lunatic can put out the sun by scribbling the word, 'darkness' on the walls of his cell.", u'Education without values, as useful as it is, seems rather to make man a more clever devil.', u'Courage is not simply one of the virtues, but the form of every virtue at the testing point.', u"We all want progress, but if you're on the wrong road, progress means doing an about-turn and walking back to the right road; in that case, the man who turns back soonest is the most progressive.", u'You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream.', u'Even in literature and art, no man who bothers about originality will ever be original: whereas if you simply try to tell the truth (without caring twopence how often it has been told before) you will, nine times out of ten, become original without ever having noticed it.', u'Has this world been so kind to you that you should leave with regret? There are better things ahead than any we leave behind.', u'A man who is eating or lying with his wife or preparing to go to sleep in humility, thankfulness and temperance, is, by Christian standards, in an infinitely higher state than one who is listening to Bach or reading Plato in a state of pride.', u'Don\'t use words too big for the subject. Don\'t say "infinitely" when you mean "very"; otherwise you\'ll have no word left when you want to talk about something really infinite.', u'Christianity, if false, is of no importance, and if true, of infinite importance. The only thing it cannot be is moderately important.', u'Failures are finger posts on the road to achievement.', u'It may be hard for an egg to turn into a bird: it would be a jolly sight harder for it to learn to fly while remaining an egg. We are like eggs at present. And you cannot go on indefinitely being just an ordinary, decent egg. We must be hatched or go bad.', u'God cannot give us a happiness and peace apart from Himself, because it is not there. There is no such thing.', u'There are two kinds of people: those who say to God, "Thy will be done," and those to whom God says, "All right, then, have it your way."', u'A young man who wishes to remain a sound atheist cannot be too careful of his reading.', u'Experience: that most brutal of teachers. But you learn, my God do you learn.', u'An explanation of cause is not a justification by reason.', u'Eros will have naked bodies; Friendship naked personalities.', u'Can a mortal ask questions which God finds unanswerable? Quite easily, I should think. All nonsense questions are unanswerable.', u'Humans are amphibians - half spirit and half animal. As spirits they belong to the eternal world, but as animals they inhabit time.', u'How incessant and great are the ills with which a prolonged old age is replete.'], u'Sigmund Freud': [u'The great question that has never been answered, and which I have not yet been able to answer, despite my thirty years of research into the feminine soul, is "What does a woman want?"', u'Being entirely honest with oneself is a good exercise.', u"I cannot think of any need in childhood as strong as the need for a father's protection.", u'He that has eyes to see and ears to hear may convince himself that no mortal can keep a secret. If his lips are silent, he chatters with his fingertips; betrayal oozes out of him at every pore.', u'Love and work are the cornerstones of our humanness.', u'One is very crazy when in love.', u'Illusions commend themselves to us because they save us pain and allow us to enjoy pleasure instead. We must therefore accept it without complaint when they sometimes collide with a bit of reality against which they are dashed to pieces.', u'Most people do not really want freedom, because freedom involves responsibility, and most people are frightened of responsibility.', u'Time spent with cats is never wasted.', u'A civilization which leaves so large a number of its participants unsatisfied and drives them into revolt neither has nor deserves the prospect of a lasting existence.', u'Dreams are often most profound when they seem the most crazy.', u'The interpretation of dreams is the royal road to a knowledge of the unconscious activities of the mind.', u'A man should not strive to eliminate his complexes but to get into accord with them: they are legitimately what directs his conduct in the world.', u'I have found little that is "good" about human beings on the whole. In my experience most of them are trash, no matter whether they publicly subscribe to this or that ethical doctrine or to none at all. That is something that you cannot say aloud, or perhaps even think.', u'America is a mistake, a giant mistake.', u'A man who has been the indisputable favorite of his mother keeps for life the feeling of a conqueror.', u'We are never so defensless against suffering as when we love.', u'A certain degree of neurosis is of inestimable value as a drive, especially to a psychologist.', u'America is the most grandiose experiment the world has seen, but, I am afraid, it is not going to be a success.', u'It is impossible to overlook the extent to which civilization is built upon a renunciation of instinct.', u'Whoever loves becomes humble. Those who love have, so to speak, pawned a part of their narcissism.', u'A belligerent state permits itself every such misdeed, every such act of violence, as would disgrace the individual.', u'Flowers are restful to look at. They have neither emotions nor conflicts.', u'What we call happiness in the strictest sense comes from the (preferably sudden) satisfaction of needs which have been dammed up to a high degree.', u'Children are completely egoistic; they feel their needs intensely and strive ruthlessly to satisfy them.'], u'William S. Burroughs': [u"After a shooting spree, they always want to take the guns away from the people who didn't do it. I sure as hell wouldn't want to live in a society where the only people allowed guns are the police and the military.", u'Your mind will answer most questions if you learn to relax and wait for the answer.', u"After one look at this planet any visitor from outer space would say 'I want to see the manager.'", u'Desperation is the raw material of drastic change. Only those who can leave behind everything they have ever believed in can hope to escape.', u'Artists to my mind are the real architects of change, and not the political legislators who implement change after the fact.', u'Happiness is a byproduct of function, purpose, and conflict; those who seek happiness for itself seek victory without war.', u'How I hate those who are dedicated to producing conformity.', u"Most of the trouble in this world has been caused by folks who can't mind their own business, because they have no business of their own to mind, any more than a smallpox virus has.", u"A paranoid is someone who knows a little of what's going on.", u'Admittedly, a homosexual can be conditioned to react sexually to a woman, or to an old boot for that matter. In fact, both homo - and heterosexual experimental subjects have been conditioned to react sexually to an old boot, and you can save a lot of money that way.', u'Language is a virus from outer space.', u'A functioning police state needs no police.', u'Our national drug is alcohol. We tend to regard the use any other drug with special horror.', u'Every man has inside himself a parasitic being who is acting not at all to his advantage.', u'Silence is only frightening to people who are compulsively verbalizing.', u"There couldn't be a society of people who didn't dream. They'd be dead in two weeks.", u"I am getting so far out one day I won't come back at all.", u'Man is an artifact designed for space travel. He is not designed to remain in his present biologic state any more than a tadpole is designed to remain a tadpole.', u"Sometimes paranoia's just having all the facts.", u'Anything that can be done chemically can be done by other means.', u"A cat's rage is beautiful, burning with pure cat flame, all its hair standing up and crackling blue sparks, eyes blazing and sputtering.", u'Hustlers of the world, there is one mark you cannot beat: the mark inside.', u'In deep sadness there is no place for sentimentality.', u'Nothing is true, everything is permitted.', u'The way to kill a man or a nation is to cut off his dreams, the way the whites are taking care of the Indians: killing their dreams, their magic, their familiar spirits.'], u'Stephen King': [u"The trust of the innocent is the liar's most useful tool.", u'When his life was ruined, his family killed, his farm destroyed, Job knelt down on the ground and yelled up to the heavens, "Why god? Why me?" and the thundering voice of God answered, "There\'s just something about you that pisses me off."', u'The most important things are the hardest things to say. They are the things you get ashamed of because words diminish your feelings - words shrink things that seem timeless when they are in your head to no more than living size when they are brought out.', u'Talent in cheaper than table salt. What separates the talented individual from the successful one is a lot of hard work.', u'Get busy living, or get busy dying.', u'Only enemies speak the truth; friends and lovers lie endlessly, caught in the web of duty.', u"A lot of us grow up and we grow out of the literal interpretation that we get when we're children, but we bear the scars all our life. Whether they're scars of beauty or scars of ugliness, it's pretty much in the eye of the beholder.", u'I watched Titanic when I got back home from the hospital, and cried. I knew that my IQ had been damaged.', u'I am the literary equivalent of a Big Mac and fries.', u'People want to know why I do this, why I write such gross stuff. I like to tell them I have the heart of a small boy... and I keep it in a jar on my desk.', u'People think that I must be a very strange person. This is not correct. I have the heart of a small boy. It is in a glass jar on my desk.', u'I think there ought to be some serious discussion by smart people, really smart people, about whether or not proliferation of things like The Smoking Gun and TMZ and YouTube and the whole celebrity culture is healthy.', u'Fiction is the truth inside the lie.', u'God is cruel. Sometimes he makes you live.', u'I was in enough to get along with people. I was never socially inarticulate. Not a loner. And that saved my life, saved my sanity. That and the writing. But to this day I distrust anybody who thought school was a good time. Anybody.', u'Every book you pick up has its own lesson or lessons, and quite often the bad books have more to teach than the good ones.', u'French is the language that turns dirt into romance.', u"And in real life endings aren't always neat, whether they're happy endings, or whether they're sad endings.", u'The place where you made your stand never mattered. Only that you were there... and still on your feet.', u"You can't deny laughter; when it comes, it plops down in your favorite chair and stays as long as it wants.", u'I guess when you turn off the main road, you have to be prepared to see some funny houses.', u"It's better to be good than evil, but one achieves goodness at a terrific cost.", u'Life is like a wheel. Sooner or later, it always come around to where you started again.', u"The devil's voice is sweet to hear.", u'I love crime, I love mysteries, and I love ghosts.'], u'Roger Babson': [u'Let him who would enjoy a good future waste none of his present.', u'Property may be destroyed and money may lose its purchasing power; but, character, health, knowledge and good judgement will always be in demand under all conditions.', u'It is wise to keep in mind that neither success nor failure is ever final.', u'Keep in mind that neither success nor failure is ever final.', u'The finest command of language is often shown by saying nothing.', u'It takes a person who is wide awake to make his dream come true.', u'The successful man is the one who had the chance and took it.', u'When we are flat on our backs there is no way to look but up.'], u'George C. Marshall': [u"Don't fight the problem, decide it.", u'Go right straight down the road, to do what is best, and to do it frankly and without evasion.', u"I can't expect loyalty from the army if I do not give it.", u'I was very careful to send Mr. Roosevelt every few days a statement of our casualties. I tried to keep before him all the time the casualty results because you get hardened to these things and you have to be very careful to keep them always in the forefront of your mind.', u'I will give you the best I have.', u'If man does find the solution for world peace it will be the most revolutionary reversal of his record we have ever known.', u'Passive inactivity, because you have not been given specific instructions to do this or to do that, is a serious deficiency.', u'The only way human beings can win a war is to prevent it.', u"When a thing is done, it's done. Don't look back. Look forward to your next objective."], u'Will Smith': [u'Throughout life people will make you mad, disrespect you and treat you bad. Let God deal with the things they do, cause hate in your heart will consume you too.', u"Too many people spend money they haven't earned to buy things they don't want to impress people they don't like.", u"Money and success don't change people; they merely amplify what is already there.", u"There's so much negative imagery of black fatherhood. I've got tons of friends that are doing the right thing by their kids, and doing the right thing as a father - and how come that's not as newsworthy?", u"I don't know what my calling is, but I want to be here for a bigger reason. I strive to be like the greatest people who have ever lived.", u"You can cry, ain't no shame in it.", u"In my mind, I've always been an A-list Hollywood superstar. Y'all just didn't know yet.", u"If it was something that I really committed myself to, I don't think there's anything that could stop me becoming President of the United States.", u'The things that have been most valuable to me I did not learn in school.', u"If you're not willing to work hard, let someone else do it. I'd rather be with someone who does a horrible job, but gives 110% than with someone who does a good job and gives 60%.", u'I try to speak my points of view about black America, and how I feel about black men and the role that black men should play in their lives with their children and in their lives with their women.', u"I've never really viewed myself as particularly talented. I've viewed myself as slightly above average in talent.", u'I love being black in America, and especially being black in Hollywood.', u"It's quite highly possible that I have peaked. I mean, I just can't imagine what else I could do beyond this. It's really a bittersweet kind of feeling.", u"So if you stay ready, you ain't gotta get ready, and that is how I run my life.", u'The first step is you have to say that you can.', u"We all want to be in love and find that person who is going to love us no matter how our feet smell, no matter how angry we get one day, no matter the things we say that we don't mean.", u'Well, all I know is what I read in the papers.', u'A rapper is about being completely true to yourself. Being an actor is about changing who you are.', u"And where I excel is ridiculous, sickening, work ethic. You know, while the other guy's sleeping? I'm working.", u"I had to focus and create a character in Bagger Vance, not just do my 'Will Smith' thing and get paid.", u'I want the world to be better because I was here.', u'Life is lived on the edge.', u"The first time that I performed as an actor was the first day on the set of 'The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air.'", u'When you create art, the world has to wait.'], u'Thomas Huxley': [u'Economy does not lie in sparing money, but in spending it wisely.', u"The rung of a ladder was never meant to rest upon, but only to hold a man's foot long enough to enable him to put the other somewhat higher.", u'Make up your mind to act decidedly and take the consequences. No good is ever done in this world by hesitation.', u'It is not who is right, but what is right, that is of importance.', u'Every great advance in natural knowledge has involved the absolute rejection of authority.', u'I am content with nothing, restless and ambitious... and I despise myself for the vanity, which formed half the stimulus to my exertions. Oh would that I were one of those plodding wise fools who having once set their hand to the plough go on nothing doubting.', u'The great thing in the world is not so much to seek happiness as to earn peace and self-respect.', u'The world is neither wise nor just, but it makes up for all its folly and injustice by being damnably sentimental.', u'Nothing can be more incorrect than the assumption one sometimes meets with, that physics has one method, chemistry another, and biology a third.', u'Patience and tenacity are worth more than twice their weight of cleverness.', u'Sit down before fact as a little child, be prepared to give up every conceived notion, follow humbly wherever and whatever abysses nature leads, or you will learn nothing.', u'Teach a child what is wise, that is morality. Teach him what is wise and beautiful, that is religion!', u'The great tragedy of science - the slaying of a beautiful hypothesis by an ugly fact.', u'Freedom and order are not incompatible... truth is strength... free discussion is the very life of truth.', u'If a little knowledge is dangerous, where is the man who has so much as to be out of danger?', u'In scientific work, those who refuse to go beyond fact rarely get as far as fact.', u'It is one of the most saddening things in life that, try as we may, we can never be certain of making people happy, whereas we can almost always be certain of making them unhappy.', u'Logical consequences are the scarecrows of fools and the beacons of wise men.', u'Science commits suicide when it adopts a creed.', u'The chess-board is the world, the pieces are the phenomena of the universe, the rules of the game are what we call the laws of Nature. The player on the other side is hidden from us.', u'The struggle for existence holds as much in the intellectual as in the physical world. A theory is a species of thinking, and its right to exist is coextensive with its power of resisting extinction by its rivals.', u'All truth, in the long run, is only common sense clarified.', u'History warns us that it is the customary fate of new truths to begin as heresies and to end as superstitions.', u'I protest that if some great Power would agree to make me always think what is true and do what is right, on condition of being turned into a sort of clock and would up every morning before I got out of bed, I should instantly close with the offer.', u'Irrationally held truths may be more harmful than reasoned errors.'], u'Tom Stoppard': [u"A healthy attitude is contagious but don't wait to catch it from others. Be a carrier.", u'Age is a very high price to pay for maturity.', u"It's not the voting that's democracy; it's the counting.", u'If you carry your childhood with you, you never become older.', u"A movie camera is like having someone you have a crush on watching you from afar - you pretend it's not there.", u'I still believe that if your aim is to change the world, journalism is a more immediate short-term weapon.', u"We're actors. We're the opposite of people.", u"I'm hopeless at looking into myself and trying to see how things are working and why.", u"I'm vaguely embarrassed by myself sometimes.", u'My whole life is waiting for the questions to which I have prepared answers.', u'Every exit is an entry somewhere else.', u'I consider myself to be a very fortunate person and to have led a very fortunate life.', u'I think age is a very high price to pay for maturity.', u'If you associate enough with older people who do enjoy their lives, who are not stored away in any golden ghettos, you will gain a sense of continuity and of the possibility for a full life.', u"Life is a gamble, at terrible odds - if it was a bet you wouldn't take it.", u'Maturity is a high price to pay for growing up.', u'Responsibilities gravitate to the person who can shoulder them.', u'Skill without imagination is craftsmanship and gives us many useful objects such as wickerwork picnic baskets. Imagination without skill gives us modern art.', u'Beauty is desired in order that it may be befouled; not for its own sake, but for the joy brought by the certainty of profaning it.', u"Eternity's a terrible thought. I mean, where's it all going to end?", u'Good things, when short, are twice as good.', u"I write for film or, in this case, television when I haven't got a play cooking.", u'In the theater there is often a tension, almost a contradiction, between the way real people would think and behave, and a kind of imposed dramaticness.', u"It is not hard to understand modern art. If it hangs on a wall it's a painting, and if you can walk around it it's a sculpture.", u'A great production of a black comedy is better than a mediocre production of a comedy of errors.'], u'Noel Coward': [u'I like long walks, especially when they are taken by people who annoy me.', u'It is discouraging how many people are shocked by honesty and how few by deceit.', u"It's discouraging to think how many people are shocked by honesty and how few by deceit.", u"I love criticism just so long as it's unqualified praise.", u'If you must have motivation, think of your paycheck on Friday.', u'I have a memory like an elephant. In fact, elephants often consult me.', u'I have always paid income tax. I object only when it reaches a stage when I am threatened with having nothing left for my old age - which is due to start next Tuesday or Wednesday.', u"People are wrong when they say opera is not what it used to be. It is what it used to be. That is what's wrong with it.", u"I'll go through life either first class or third, but never in second.", u'Extraordinary how potent cheap music is.', u"Let's drink to the spirit of gallantry and courage that made a strange Heaven out of unbelievable Hell, and let's drink to the hope that one day this country of ours, which we love so much, will find dignity and greatness and peace again.", u'Wit ought to be a glorious treat like caviar; never spread it about like marmalade.', u"I don't believe in astrology. The only stars I can blame for my failures are those that walk about the stage.", u'My body has certainly wandered a good deal, but I have an uneasy suspicion that my mind has not wandered enough.', u'The higher the building the lower the morals.', u'We have no reliable guarantee that the afterlife will be any less exasperating than this one, have we?', u"I'm not a heavy drinker, I can sometimes go for hours without touching a drop.", u"I've sometimes thought of marrying - and then I've thought again.", u'Mona Lisa looks as if she has just been sick, or is about to be.', u'Work is much more fun than fun.', u"Just say the lines and don't trip over the furniture.", u"Never mind, dear, we're all made the same, though some more than others.", u'Someday I suspect, when Jesus has definitely got me for a sunbeam, my works may be adequately assessed.', u"Squash - that's not exercise, it's flagellation.", u'Success took me to her bosom like a maternal boa constrictor.'], u'H. Jackson Brown, Jr.': [u'Sometimes the heart sees what is invisible to the eye.', u'Never forget the three powerful resources you always have available to you: love, prayer, and forgiveness.', u'Live so that when your children think of fairness, caring, and integrity, they think of you.', u"Choose your life's mate carefully. From this one decision will come 90 percent of all your happiness or misery.", u'Remember that children, marriages, and flower gardens reflect the kind of care they get.', u'Find a job you like and you add five days to every week.', u"Love is when the other person's happiness is more important than your own.", u'Our character is what we do when we think no one is looking.', u'Let the refining and improving of your own life keep you so busy that you have little time to criticize others.', u"If you're doing your best, you won't have any time to worry about failure.", u"Always kiss your children goodnight, even if they're already asleep.", u"People take different roads seeking fulfillment and happiness. Just because they're not on your road doesn't mean they've gotten lost.", u"Good manners sometimes means simply putting up with other people's bad manners.", u'Remember that the most valuable antiques are dear old friends.', u"I never expect to lose. Even when I'm the underdog, I still prepare a victory speech.", u"Talent without discipline is like an octopus on roller skates. There's plenty of movement, but you never know if it's going to be forward, backwards, or sideways.", u"Life doesn't require that we be the best, only that we try our best.", u'Think big thoughts but relish small pleasures.', u'Opportunity dances with those already on the dance floor.', u'Never deprive someone of hope; it might be all they have.', u"Be smarter than other people, just don't tell them so.", u'Nothing is more expensive than a missed opportunity.', u'If someone offers you a breath mint, accept it.', u'Success is getting what you want. Happiness is liking what you get.', u"When you are angry or frustrated, what comes out? Whatever it is, it's a good indication of what you're made of."], u'Arnold Schwarzenegger': [u'Strength does not come from winning. Your struggles develop your strengths. When you go through hardships and decide not to surrender, that is strength.', u'Milk is for babies. When you grow up you have to drink beer.', u'Bodybuilding is much like any other sport. To be successful, you must dedicate yourself 100% to your training, diet and mental approach.', u'For me life is continuously being hungry. The meaning of life is not simply to exist, to survive, but to move ahead, to go up, to achieve, to conquer.', u"The last three or four reps is what makes the muscle grow. This area of pain divides the champion from someone else who is not a champion. That's what most people lack, having the guts to go on and just say they'll go through the pain no matter what happens.", u'I saw a woman wearing a sweatshirt with Guess on it. I said, Thyroid problem?', u'I think that gay marriage should be between a man and a woman.', u"Money doesn't make you happy. I now have $50 million but I was just as happy when I had $48 million.", u'I have a love interest in every one of my films: a gun.', u'The best activities for your health are pumping and humping.', u"And now, of course this is another thing I didn't count on, that now as the governor of the state of California, I am selling California worldwide. You see that? Selling.", u'The worst thing I can be is the same as everybody else. I hate that.', u"What we face may look insurmountable. But I learned something from all those years of training and competing. I learned something from all those sets and reps when I didn't think I could lift another ounce of weight. What I learned is that we are always stronger than we know.", u"It's simple, if it jiggles, it's fat.", u'The mind is the limit. As long as the mind can envision the fact that you can do something, you can do it, as long as you really believe 100 percent.', u'As long as I live, I will never forget that day 21 years ago when I raised my hand and took the oath of citizenship. Do you know how proud I was? I was so proud that I walked around with an American flag around my shoulders all day long.', u'Help others and give something back. I guarantee you will discover that while public service improves the lives and the world around you, its greatest reward is the enrichment and new meaning it will bring your own life.', u'Training gives us an outlet for suppressed energies created by stress and thus tones the spirit just as exercise conditions the body.', u'The resistance that you fight physically in the gym and the resistance that you fight in life can only build a strong character.', u'Start wide, expand further, and never look back.', u"I believe with all my heart that America remains 'the great idea' that inspires the world. It is a privilege to be born here. It is an honor to become a citizen here. It is a gift to raise your family here, to vote here, and to live here.", u'Failure is not an option. Everyone has to succeed.', u'In our society, the women who break down barriers are those who ignore limits.', u'I welcome and seek your ideas, but do not bring me small ideas; bring me big ideas to match our future.', u"I'll be back."], u'Salvador Dali': [u'Intelligence without ambition is a bird without wings.', u"Have no fear of perfection - you'll never reach it.", u"I don't do drugs. I am drugs.", u'At the age of six I wanted to be a cook. At seven I wanted to be Napoleon. And my ambition has been growing steadily ever since.', u'Drawing is the honesty of the art. There is no possibility of cheating. It is either good or bad.', u'Mistakes are almost always of a sacred nature. Never try to correct them. On the contrary: rationalize them, understand them thoroughly. After that, it will be possible for you to sublimate them.', u'Those who do not want to imitate anything, produce nothing.', u'Surrealism is destructive, but it destroys only what it considers to be shackles limiting our vision.', u'Take me, I am the drug; take me, I am hallucinogenic.', u'In order to acquire a growing and lasting respect in society, it is a good thing, if you possess great talent, to give, early in your youth, a very hard kick to the right shin of the society that you love. After that, be a snob.', u'There is only one difference between a madman and me. The madman thinks he is sane. I know I am mad.', u'What is a television apparatus to man, who has only to shut his eyes to see the most inaccessible regions of the seen and the never seen, who has only to imagine in order to pierce through walls and cause all the planetary Baghdads of his dreams to rise from the dust.', u'Each morning when I awake, I experience again a supreme pleasure - that of being Salvador Dali.', u'I seated ugliness on my knee, and almost immediately grew tired of it.', u'The thermometer of success is merely the jealousy of the malcontents.', u"There are some days when I think I'm going to die from an overdose of satisfaction.", u'The difference between false memories and true ones is the same as for jewels: it is always the false ones that look the most real, the most brilliant.', u'Painting is an infinitely minute part of my personality.', u'It is good taste, and good taste alone, that possesses the power to sterilize and is always the first handicap to any creative functioning.', u'Let my enemies devour each other.', u"Don't bother about being modern. Unfortunately it is the one thing that, whatever you do, you cannot avoid.", u'I have Dalinian thought: the one thing the world will never have enough of is the outrageous.', u"The only difference between me and a madman is that I'm not mad.", u'I do not paint a portrait to look like the subject, rather does the person grow to look like his portrait.', u'Wars have never hurt anybody except the people who die.'], u'Dolly Parton': [u"I'm not offended by all the dumb blonde jokes because I know I'm not dumb... and I also know that I'm not blonde.", u'The way I see it, if you want the rainbow, you gotta put up with the rain.', u"If you don't like the road you're walking, start paving another one.", u'We cannot direct the wind, but we can adjust the sails.', u"It's a good thing I was born a girl, otherwise I'd be a drag queen.", u"When I'm inspired, I get excited because I can't wait to see what I'll come up with next.", u"I'm old enough and cranky enough now that if someone tried to tell me what to do, I'd tell them where to put it.", u"I have a big gay and lesbian following and they've been very loyal and kind to me.", u'I was the first woman to burn my bra - it took the fire department four days to put it out.', u'Storms make trees take deeper roots.', u"The only way I'd be caught without makeup is if my radio fell in the bathtub while I was taking a bath and electrocuted me and I was in between makeup at home. I hope my husband would slap a little lipstick on me before he took me to the morgue.", u"You'd be surprised how much it costs to look this cheap!", u'My weaknesses have always been food and men - in that order.', u'I look just like the girls next door... if you happen to live next door to an amusement park.', u"If you talk bad about country music, it's like saying bad things about my momma. Them's fightin' words.", u"I'm not going to limit myself just because people won't accept the fact that I can do something else.", u"I feel that sin and evil are the negative part of you, and I think it's like a battery: you've got to have the negative and the positive in order to be a complete person.", u"You'll never do a whole lot unless you're brave enough to try.", u'I wanted to be the first woman to burn her bra, but it would have taken the fire department four days to put it out.', u"People make jokes about my bosoms, why don't they look underneath the breasts at the heart? It's obvious I've got big ones and if people want to assume they're not mine, then let them.", u'I still close my eyes and go home - I can always draw from that.', u'It costs a lot of money to look this cheap.', u"I hated school. Even to this day, when I see a school bus it's just depressing to me. The poor little kids.", u"I know who I am, I know what I can and can't do. I know what I will and won't do. I know what I'm capable of and I don't agree to do things that I don't think I can pull off.", u"I think every entertainer's had nights when things go wrong. I mean you can't remember everything all the time, and especially if you're having hard times personally, things going on that you - you know, and then people make it worse. And that makes you feel worse."], u'Niccolo Machiavelli': [u'No enterprise is more likely to succeed than one concealed from the enemy until it is ripe for execution.', u'Entrepreneurs are simply those who understand that there is little difference between obstacle and opportunity and are able to turn both to their advantage.', u'It is better to be feared than loved, if you cannot be both.', u'If an injury has to be done to a man it should be so severe that his vengeance need not be feared.', u'A return to first principles in a republic is sometimes caused by the simple virtues of one man. His good example has such an influence that the good men strive to imitate him, and the wicked are ashamed to lead a life so contrary to his example.', u'Politics have no relation to morals.', u'The more sand has escaped from the hourglass of our life, the clearer we should see through it.', u'When you disarm the people, you commence to offend them and show that you distrust them either through cowardice or lack of confidence, and both of these opinions generate hatred.', u'There are three kinds of intelligence: one kind understands things for itself, the other appreciates what others can understand, the third understands neither for itself nor through others. This first kind is excellent, the second good, and the third kind useless.', u'The first method for estimating the intelligence of a ruler is to look at the men he has around him.', u'A prince never lacks legitimate reasons to break his promise.', u'Before all else, be armed.', u'Men are so simple and so much inclined to obey immediate needs that a deceiver will never lack victims for his deceptions.', u"I'm not interested in preserving the status quo; I want to overthrow it.", u'He who wishes to be obeyed must know how to command.', u'It is double pleasure to deceive the deceiver.', u'God is not willing to do everything, and thus take away our free will and that share of glory which belongs to us.', u'The wise man does at once what the fool does finally.', u'Hatred is gained as much by good works as by evil.', u'It is much more secure to be feared than to be loved.', u'There is nothing more difficult to take in hand, more perilous to conduct, or more uncertain in its success, than to take the lead in the introduction of a new order of things.', u'Never was anything great achieved without danger.', u'A son can bear with equanimity the loss of his father, but the loss of his inheritance may drive him to despair.', u'It is not titles that honor men, but men that honor titles.', u'Men should be either treated generously or destroyed, because they take revenge for slight injuries - for heavy ones they cannot.'], u'Kurt Vonnegut': [u'True terror is to wake up one morning and discover that your high school class is running the country.', u'Laughter and tears are both responses to frustration and exhaustion. I myself prefer to laugh, since there is less cleaning up to do afterward.', u"I tell you, we are here on Earth to fart around, and don't let anybody tell you different.", u'Be careful what you pretend to be because you are what you pretend to be.', u"I want to stand as close to the edge as I can without going over. Out on the edge you see all the kinds of things you can't see from the center.", u"Human beings will be happier - not when they cure cancer or get to Mars or eliminate racial prejudice or flush Lake Erie but when they find ways to inhabit primitive communities again. That's my utopia.", u'What should young people do with their lives today? Many things, obviously. But the most daring thing is to create stable communities in which the terrible disease of loneliness can be cured.', u"People have to talk about something just to keep their voice boxes in working order so they'll have good voice boxes in case there's ever anything really meaningful to say.", u'About astrology and palmistry: they are good because they make people vivid and full of possibilities. They are communism at its best. Everybody has a birthday and almost everybody has a palm.', u"Still and all, why bother? Here's my answer. Many people need desperately to receive this message: I feel and think much as you do, care about many of the things you care about, although most people do not care about them. You are not alone.", u'Here we are, trapped in the amber of the moment. There is no why.', u'Maturity is a bitter disappointment for which no remedy exists, unless laughter could be said to remedy anything.', u'To whom it may concern: It is springtime. It is late afternoon.', u'We could have saved the Earth but we were too damned cheap.', u'Beware of the man who works hard to learn something, learns it, and finds himself no wiser than before.', u"If you can do a half-assed job of anything, you're a one-eyed man in a kingdom of the blind.", u'Who is more to be pitied, a writer bound and gagged by policemen or one living in perfect freedom who has nothing more to say?', u'Any reviewer who expresses rage and loathing for a novel is preposterous. He or she is like a person who has put on full armor and attacked a hot fudge sundae.', u'I really wonder what gives us the right to wreck this poor planet of ours.', u"I was taught that the human brain was the crowning glory of evolution so far, but I think it's a very poor scheme for survival.", u'The universe is a big place, perhaps the biggest.', u'We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful what we pretend to be.', u'The year was 2081, and everyone was finally equal.', u'All this happened, more or less. The war parts, anyway, are pretty much true.', u"People don't come to church for preachments, of course, but to daydream about God."], u'Henry Ward Beecher': [u"It's easier to go down a hill than up it but the view is much better at the top.", u'I can forgive, but I cannot forget, is only another way of saying, I will not forgive. Forgiveness ought to be like a cancelled note - torn in two, and burned up, so that it never can be shown against one.', u"A person without a sense of humor is like a wagon without springs. It's jolted by every pebble on the road.", u'A library is not a luxury but one of the necessities of life.', u'Every charitable act is a stepping stone toward heaven.', u'We should not judge people by their peak of excellence; but by the distance they have traveled from the point where they started.', u'Every tomorrow has two handles. We can take hold of it with the handle of anxiety or the handle of faith.', u'We never know the love of a parent till we become parents ourselves.', u'Pride slays thanksgiving, but an humble mind is the soil out of which thanks naturally grow. A proud man is seldom a grateful man, for he never thinks he gets as much as he deserves.', u'Good nature is worth more than knowledge, more than money, more than honor, to the persons who possess it.', u'Gratitude is the fairest blossom which springs from the soul.', u'Hold yourself responsible for a higher standard than anybody expects of you. Never excuse yourself.', u'The unthankful heart... discovers no mercies; but let the thankful heart sweep through the day and, as the magnet finds the iron, so it will find, in every hour, some heavenly blessings!', u'Every artist dips his brush in his own soul, and paints his own nature into his pictures.', u'I never knew how to worship until I knew how to love.', u'Greatness lies, not in being strong, but in the right using of strength; and strength is not used rightly when it serves only to carry a man above his fellows for his own solitary glory. He is the greatest whose strength carries up the most hearts by the attraction of his own.', u'Every young man would do well to remember that all successful business stands on the foundation of morality.', u'In this world it is not what we take up, but what we give up, that makes us rich.', u'Tears are often the telescope by which men see far into heaven.', u'There is no friendship, no love, like that of the parent for the child.', u'Flowers are the sweetest things God ever made and forgot to put a soul into.', u'The real man is one who always finds excuses for others, but never excuses himself.', u'The true secret of giving advice is, after you have honestly given it, to be perfectly indifferent whether it is taken or not, and never persist in trying to set people right.', u'Laughter is day, and sobriety is night; a smile is the twilight that hovers gently between both, more bewitching than either.', u"Love cannot endure indifference. It needs to be wanted. Like a lamp, it needs to be fed out of the oil of another's heart, or its flame burns low."], u'William Hazlitt': [u'A hypocrite despises those whom he deceives, but has no respect for himself. He would make a dupe of himself too, if he could.', u'Those who are at war with others are not at peace with themselves.', u'A gentle word, a kind look, a good-natured smile can work wonders and accomplish miracles.', u'The art of life is to know how to enjoy a little and to endure very much.', u'The only vice that cannot be forgiven is hypocrisy. The repentance of a hypocrite is itself hypocrisy.', u'We do not see nature with our eyes, but with our understandings and our hearts.', u'The most insignificant people are the most apt to sneer at others. They are safe from reprisals. And have no hope of rising in their own self esteem but by lowering their neighbors.', u'Man is the only animal that laughs and weeps; for he is the only animal that is struck with the difference between what things are, and what they ought to be.', u'He will never have true friends who is afraid of making enemies.', u'To give a reason for anything is to breed a doubt of it.', u'We often choose a friend as we do a mistress - for no particular excellence in themselves, but merely from some circumstance that flatters our self-love.', u'Even in the common affairs of life, in love, friendship, and marriage, how little security have we when we trust our happiness in the hands of others!', u'Life is the art of being well deceived; and in order that the deception may succeed it must be habitual and uninterrupted.', u'The love of liberty is the love of others; the love of power is the love of ourselves.', u'An honest man speaks the truth, though it may give offence; a vain man, in order that it may.', u"Cunning is the art of concealing our own defects, and discovering other people's weaknesses.", u'Every man, in his own opinion, forms an exception to the ordinary rules of morality.', u'Grace is the absence of everything that indicates pain or difficulty, hesitation or incongruity.', u"I'm not smart, but I like to observe. Millions saw the apple fall, but Newton was the one who asked why.", u'Look up, laugh loud, talk big, keep the color in your cheek and the fire in your eye, adorn your person, maintain your health, your beauty and your animal spirits.', u'Prejudice is the child of ignorance.', u'We grow tired of everything but turning others into ridicule, and congratulating ourselves on their defects.', u'Do not keep on with a mockery of friendship after the substance is gone - but part, while you can part friends. Bury the carcass of friendship: it is not worth embalming.', u'Envy among other ingredients has a mixture of the love of justice in it. We are more angry at undeserved than at deserved good-fortune.', u'If we wish to know the force of human genius, we should read Shakespeare. If we wish to see the insignificance of human learning, we may study his commentators.'], u'Vince Lombardi': [u"I firmly believe that any man's finest hour, the greatest fulfillment of all that he holds dear, is that moment when he has worked his heart out in a good cause and lies exhausted on the field of battle - victorious.", u'The difference between a successful person and others is not a lack of strength, not a lack of knowledge, but rather a lack of will.', u'Winners never quit and quitters never win.', u"It's not whether you get knocked down, it's whether you get up.", u'The price of success is hard work, dedication to the job at hand, and the determination that whether we win or lose, we have applied the best of ourselves to the task at hand.', u"Winning is not a sometime thing; it's an all time thing. You don't win once in a while, you don't do things right once in a while, you do them right all the time. Winning is habit. Unfortunately, so is losing.", u'Football is like life - it requires perseverance, self-denial, hard work, sacrifice, dedication and respect for authority.', u"Dictionary is the only place that success comes before work. Hard work is the price we must pay for success. I think you can accomplish anything if you're willing to pay the price.", u'The only place success comes before work is in the dictionary.', u'Perfection is not attainable, but if we chase perfection we can catch excellence.', u'Practice does not make perfect. Only perfect practice makes perfect.', u'Individual commitment to a group effort - that is what makes a team work, a company work, a society work, a civilization work.', u"If winning isn't everything, why do they keep score?", u"Winning isn't everything, it's the only thing.", u'People who work together will win, whether it be against complex football defenses, or the problems of modern society.', u"The quality of a person's life is in direct proportion to their commitment to excellence, regardless of their chosen field of endeavor.", u'Confidence is contagious. So is lack of confidence.', u"If you can accept losing, you can't win.", u"Show me a good loser, and I'll show you a loser.", u'Leaders are made, they are not born. They are made by hard effort, which is the price which all of us must pay to achieve any goal that is worthwhile.', u'Once you learn to quit, it becomes a habit.', u"Leaders aren't born they are made. And they are made just like anything else, through hard work. And that's the price we'll have to pay to achieve that goal, or any goal.", u'Coaches who can outline plays on a black board are a dime a dozen. The ones who win get inside their player and motivate.', u'The measure of who we are is what we do with what we have.', u"Once you agree upon the price you and your family must pay for success, it enables you to ignore the minor hurts, the opponent's pressure, and the temporary failures."], u'Henry Ford': [u"If you think you can do a thing or think you can't do a thing, you're right.", u'It is well enough that people of the nation do not understand our banking and monetary system, for if they did, I believe there would be a revolution before tomorrow morning.', u'Coming together is a beginning; keeping together is progress; working together is success.', u'Anyone who stops learning is old, whether at twenty or eighty. Anyone who keeps learning stays young. The greatest thing in life is to keep your mind young.', u'Failure is simply the opportunity to begin again, this time more intelligently.', u"I believe God is managing affairs and that He doesn't need any advice from me. With God in charge, I believe everything will work out for the best in the end. So what is there to worry about.", u"Don't find fault, find a remedy.", u'A business that makes nothing but money is a poor business.', u'Obstacles are those frightful things you see when you take your eyes off your goal.', u"Whether you think that you can, or that you can't, you are usually right.", u'Even a mistake may turn out to be the one thing necessary to a worthwhile achievement.', u'If everyone is moving forward together, then success takes care of itself.', u'Life is a series of experiences, each one of which makes us bigger, even though sometimes it is hard to realize this. For the world was built to develop character, and we must learn that the setbacks and grieves which we endure help us in our marching onward.', u'Thinking is the hardest work there is, which is probably the reason why so few engage in it.', u'There is one rule for the industrialist and that is: Make the best quality of goods possible at the lowest cost possible, paying the highest wages possible.', u'It is not the employer who pays the wages. Employers only handle the money. It is the customer who pays the wages.', u'My best friend is the one who brings out the best in me.', u'If money is your hope for independence you will never have it. The only real security that a man will have in this world is a reserve of knowledge, experience, and ability.', u'When everything seems to be going against you, remember that the airplane takes off against the wind, not with it.', u"I am looking for a lot of men who have an infinite capacity to not know what can't be done.", u'Business is never so healthy as when, like a chicken, it must do a certain amount of scratching around for what it gets.', u'Enthusiasm is the yeast that makes your hopes shine to the stars. Enthusiasm is the sparkle in your eyes, the swing in your gait. The grip of your hand, the irresistible surge of will and energy to execute your ideas.', u'Whether you believe you can do a thing or not, you are right.', u"If there is any one secret of success, it lies in the ability to get the other person's point of view and see things from that person's angle as well as from your own.", u"You can't build a reputation on what you are going to do."], u'Erich Fromm': [u"Immature love says: 'I love you because I need you.' Mature love says 'I need you because I love you.'", u'Who will tell whether one happy moment of love or the joy of breathing or walking on a bright morning and smelling the fresh air, is not worth all the suffering and effort which life implies.', u'Selfish persons are incapable of loving others, but they are not capable of loving themselves either.', u'Greed is a bottomless pit which exhausts the person in an endless effort to satisfy the need without ever reaching satisfaction.', u'In love the paradox occurs that two beings become one and yet remain two.', u"The mother-child relationship is paradoxical and, in a sense, tragic. It requires the most intense love on the mother's side, yet this very love must help the child grow away from the mother, and to become fully independent.", u'Why should society feel responsible only for the education of children, and not for the education of all adults of every age?', u'Love is the only sane and satisfactory answer to the problem of human existence.', u'The task we must set for ourselves is not to feel secure, but to be able to tolerate insecurity.', u'If I am what I have and if I lose what I have who then am I?', u"Man's main task in life is to give birth to himself, to become what he potentially is. The most important product of his effort is his own personality.", u"Mother's love is peace. It need not be acquired, it need not be deserved.", u'The danger of the past was that men became slaves. The danger of the future is that man may become robots.', u'Both dreams and myths are important communications from ourselves to ourselves. If we do not understand the language in which they are written, we miss a great deal of what we know and tell ourselves in those hours when we are not busy manipulating the outside world.', u'If a person loves only one other person and is indifferent to all others, his love is not love but a symbiotic attachment, or an enlarged egotism.', u'In the nineteenth century the problem was that God is dead. In the twentieth century the problem is that man is dead.', u'We all dream; we do not understand our dreams, yet we act as if nothing strange goes on in our sleep minds, strange at least by comparison with the logical, purposeful doings of our minds when we are awake.', u'The psychic task which a person can and must set for himself is not to feel secure, but to be able to tolerate insecurity.', u'Creativity requires the courage to let go of certainties.', u'As we ascend the social ladder, viciousness wears a thicker mask.', u'Man is the only animal for whom his own existence is a problem which he has to solve.', u'Most people die before they are fully born. Creativeness means to be born before one dies.', u'The most beautiful as well as the most ugly inclinations of man are not part of a fixed biologically given human nature, but result from the social process which creates man.', u'There is only one meaning of life: the act of living itself.', u'To die is poignantly bitter, but the idea of having to die without having lived is unbearable.'], u'Abraham Lincoln': [u'Better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to speak out and remove all doubt.', u'America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves.', u'Labor is prior to, and independent of, capital. Capital is only the fruit of labor, and could never have existed if labor had not first existed. Labor is the superior of capital, and deserves much the higher consideration.', u"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power.", u'Always bear in mind that your own resolution to succeed is more important than any other.', u'This country, with its institutions, belongs to the people who inhabit it. Whenever they shall grow weary of the existing government, they can exercise their constitutional right of amending it, or exercise their revolutionary right to overthrow it.', u'You can fool all the people some of the time, and some of the people all the time, but you cannot fool all the people all the time.', u'A friend is one who has the same enemies as you have.', u'Any people anywhere, being inclined and having the power, have the right to rise up, and shake off the existing government, and form a new one that suits them better. This is a most valuable - a most sacred right - a right, which we hope and believe, is to liberate the world.', u"In the end, it's not the years in your life that count. It's the life in your years.", u'Character is like a tree and reputation like a shadow. The shadow is what we think of it; the tree is the real thing.', u'Government of the people, by the people, for the people, shall not perish from the Earth.', u'All that I am, or hope to be, I owe to my angel mother.', u'We the people are the rightful masters of both Congress and the courts, not to overthrow the Constitution but to overthrow the men who pervert the Constitution.', u"Sir, my concern is not whether God is on our side; my greatest concern is to be on God's side, for God is always right.", u'Most folks are as happy as they make up their minds to be.', u'I am not bound to win, but I am bound to be true. I am not bound to succeed, but I am bound to live by the light that I have. I must stand with anybody that stands right, and stand with him while he is right, and part with him when he goes wrong.', u'A woman is the only thing I am afraid of that I know will not hurt me.', u'I am a firm believer in the people. If given the truth, they can be depended upon to meet any national crisis. The great point is to bring them the real facts.', u"With Malice toward none, with charity for all, with firmness in the right, as God gives us to see the right, let us strive on to finish the work we are in, to bind up the nation's wounds.", u'Give me six hours to chop down a tree and I will spend the first four sharpening the axe.', u'Am I not destroying my enemies when I make friends of them?', u"Don't interfere with anything in the Constitution. That must be maintained, for it is the only safeguard of our liberties.", u'Be sure you put your feet in the right place, then stand firm.', u'A house divided against itself cannot stand.'], u'Xenophon': [u'For what the horse does under compulsion, as Simon also observes, is done without understanding; and there is no beauty in it either, any more than if one should whip and spur a dancer.', u'The sweetest of all sounds is praise.', u'There is small risk a general will be regarded with contempt by those he leads, if, whatever he may have to preach, he shows himself best able to perform.', u'Fast is fine, but accuracy is everything.', u'The true test of a leader is whether his followers will adhere to his cause from their own volition, enduring the most arduous hardships without being forced to do so, and remaining steadfast in the moments of greatest peril.', u'Wherever magistrates were appointed from among those who complied with the injunctions of the laws, Socrates considered the government to be an aristocracy.', u'A horse is a thing of beauty... none will tire of looking at him as long as he displays himself in his splendor.', u'Excess of grief for the dead is madness; for it is an injury to the living, and the dead know it not.', u'For drink, there was beer which was very strong when not mingled with water, but was agreeable to those who were used to it. They drank this with a reed, out of the vessel that held the beer, upon which they saw the barley swim.', u'He who eats with most pleasure is he who least requires sauce.'], u'Kurt Cobain': [u"I'd rather be hated for who I am, than loved for who I am not.", u"I'm so happy because today I found my friends - they're in my head.", u"If you die you're completely happy and your soul somewhere lives on. I'm not afraid of dying. Total peace after death, becoming someone else is the best hope I've got.", u"Punk is musical freedom. It's saying, doing and playing what you want. In Webster's terms, 'nirvana' means freedom from pain, suffering and the external world, and that's pretty close to my definition of Punk Rock.", u"Drugs are a waste of time. They destroy your memory and your self-respect and everything that goes along with with your self-esteem. They're no good at all.", u'Wanting to be someone else is a waste of the person you are.', u'A friend is nothing but a known enemy.', u"If it's illegal to rock and roll, throw my ass in jail!", u'The duty of youth is to challenge corruption.', u"I really haven't had that exciting of a life. There are a lot of things I wish I would have done, instead of just sitting around and complaining about having a boring life. So I pretty much like to make it up. I'd rather tell a story about somebody else.", u"I started being really proud of the fact that I was gay even though I wasn't.", u'The sun is gone, but I have a light.', u'We have no right to express an opinion until we know all of the answers.', u"It's okay to eat fish because they don't have any feelings.", u'Rather be dead than cool.', u"If you ever need anything please don't hesitate to ask someone else first.", u'The worst crime is faking it.', u'I was looking for something a lot heavier, yet melodic at the same time. Something different from heavy metal, a different attitude.', u"So remember, it's better to burn out than fade away.", u'I had a really good childhood up until I was nine, then a classic case of divorce really affected me.', u"I'm too busy acting like I'm not Naive. I've seen it all, I was here first.", u"We're so trendy we can't even escape ourselves.", u'I bought a gun and chose drugs instead.', u"I won't eat anything green.", u"I've always had a problem with the average macho man - they've always been a threat to me."], u'Lily Tomlin': [u'I always wanted to be somebody, but now I realize I should have been more specific.', u'If love is the answer, could you please rephrase the question?', u"I always wondered why somebody doesn't do something about that. Then I realized I was somebody.", u"The trouble with the rat race is that even if you win, you're still a rat.", u'I like a teacher who gives you something to take home to think about besides homework.', u'If truth is beauty, how come no one has their hair done in the library?', u"Don't be afraid of missing opportunities. Behind every failure is an opportunity somebody wishes they had missed.", u"Ninety eight percent of the adults in this country are decent, hardworking, honest Americans. It's the other lousy two percent that get all the publicity. But then, we elected them.", u'I worry that the person who thought up Muzak may be thinking up something else.', u'Instead of working for the survival of the fittest, we should be working for the survival of the wittiest - then we can all die laughing.', u'Reality is the leading cause of stress among those in touch with it.', u'Man invented language to satisfy his deep need to complain.', u'For fast-acting relief try slowing down.', u"No matter how cynical you become, it's never enough to keep up.", u"Reality is a crutch for people who can't handle drugs.", u'Reality is nothing but a collective hunch.', u"Why is it that when we talk to God we're said to be praying but when God talks to us we're schizophrenic?", u"I've always wanted to be somebody, but I see now I should have been more specific.", u'I personally think we developed language because of our deep need to complain.', u'The road to success is always under construction.', u"Remember we're all in this alone.", u"If you read a lot of books you are considered well read. But if you watch a lot of TV, you're not considered well viewed.", u"The problem with winning the rat race is you're still a rat.", u"There's so much plastic in this culture that vinyl leopard skin is becoming an endangered synthetic.", u'Things are going to get a lot worse before they get worse.'], u'Joseph Campbell': [u"Find a place inside where there's joy, and the joy will burn out the pain.", u'We must let go of the life we have planned, so as to accept the one that is waiting for us.', u"God is a metaphor for that which transcends all levels of intellectual thought. It's as simple as that.", u'Follow your bliss and the universe will open doors where there were only walls.', u"I don't believe people are looking for the meaning of life as much as they are looking for the experience of being alive.", u'The privilege of a lifetime is being who you are.', u'Every religion is true one way or another. It is true when understood metaphorically. But when it gets stuck in its own metaphors, interpreting them as facts, then you are in trouble.', u'Life is without meaning. You bring the meaning to it. The meaning of life is whatever you ascribe it to be. Being alive is the meaning.', u'Computers are like Old Testament gods; lots of rules and no mercy.', u'Opportunities to find deeper powers within ourselves come when life seems most challenging.', u'When we quit thinking primarily about ourselves and our own self-preservation, we undergo a truly heroic transformation of consciousness.', u'A hero is someone who has given his or her life to something bigger than oneself.', u"When people get married because they think it's a long-time love affair, they'll be divorced very soon, because all love affairs end in disappointment. But marriage is a recognition of a spiritual identity.", u'Love is a friendship set to music.', u'Participate joyfully in the sorrows of the world. We cannot cure the world of sorrows, but we can choose to live in joy.', u'I think the person who takes a job in order to live - that is to say, for the money - has turned himself into a slave.', u'It is by going down into the abyss that we recover the treasures of life. Where you stumble, there lies your treasure.', u'Myths are public dreams, dreams are private myths.', u"When you make the sacrifice in marriage, you're sacrificing not to each other but to unity in a relationship.", u'Your life is the fruit of your own doing. You have no one to blame but yourself.', u"We're so engaged in doing things to achieve purposes of outer value that we forget the inner value, the rapture that is associated with being alive, is what it is all about.", u'Your sacred space is where you can find yourself again and again.', u'The goal of life is to make your heartbeat match the beat of the universe, to match your nature with Nature.', u'One way or another, we all have to find what best fosters the flowering of our humanity in this contemporary life, and dedicate ourselves to that.', u'The big question is whether you are going to be able to say a hearty yes to your adventure.'], u'Vincent Van Gogh': [u"If you hear a voice within you say 'you cannot paint,' then by all means paint, and that voice will be silenced.", u'For my part I know nothing with any certainty, but the sight of the stars makes me dream.', u'I often think that the night is more alive and more richly colored than the day.', u"I am still far from being what I want to be, but with God's help I shall succeed.", u'Love many things, for therein lies the true strength, and whosoever loves much performs much, and can accomplish much, and what is done in love is done well.', u'As we advance in life it becomes more and more difficult, but in fighting the difficulties the inmost strength of the heart is developed.', u'I dream of painting and then I paint my dream.', u'I put my heart and my soul into my work, and have lost my mind in the process.', u'It is better to be high-spirited even though one makes more mistakes, than to be narrow-minded and all too prudent.', u'When I have a terrible need of - shall I say the word - religion. Then I go out and paint the stars.', u"One may have a blazing hearth in one's soul and yet no one ever came to sit by it. Passers-by see only a wisp of smoke from the chimney and continue on their way.", u'The fishermen know that the sea is dangerous and the storm terrible, but they have never found these dangers sufficient reason for remaining ashore.', u'In spite of everything I shall rise again: I will take up my pencil, which I have forsaken in my great discouragement, and I will go on with my drawing.', u'The way to know life is to love many things.', u'I wish they would only take me as I am.', u'Do not quench your inspiration and your imagination; do not become the slave of your model.', u'Great things are done by a series of small things brought together.', u'The more I think about it, the more I realize there is nothing more artistic than to love others.', u'I feel that there is nothing more truly artistic than to love people.', u'Even the knowledge of my own fallibility cannot keep me from making mistakes. Only when I fall do I get up again.', u"Conscience is a man's compass.", u'The best way to know God is to love many things.', u'But I always think that the best way to know God is to love many things.', u'There may be a great fire in our hearts, yet no one ever comes to warm himself at it, and the passers-by see only a wisp of smoke.', u'What would life be if we had no courage to attempt anything?'], u'Gore Vidal': [u'As societies grow decadent, the language grows decadent, too. Words are used to disguise, not to illuminate, action: you liberate a city by destroying it. Words are to confuse, so that at election time people will solemnly vote against their own interests.', u'Any American who is prepared to run for president should automatically, by definition, be disqualified from ever doing so.', u'The genius of our ruling class is that it has kept a majority of the people from ever questioning the inequity of a system where most people drudge along, paying heavy taxes for which they get nothing in return.', u'Style is knowing who you are, what you want to say, and not giving a damn.', u'A good deed never goes unpunished.', u'Half of the American people have never read a newspaper. Half never voted for President. One hopes it is the same half.', u'The corporate grip on opinion in the United States is one of the wonders of the Western world. No First World country has ever managed to eliminate so entirely from its media all objectivity - much less dissent.', u'A narcissist is someone better looking than you are.', u'We must declare ourselves, become known; allow the world to discover this subterranean life of ours which connects kings and farm boys, artists and clerks. Let them see that the important thing is not the object of love, but the emotion itself.', u'Apparently, a democracy is a place where numerous elections are held at great cost without issues and with interchangeable candidates.', u"By the time a man gets to be presidential material, he's been bought ten times over.", u"Fifty percent of people won't vote, and fifty percent don't read newspapers. I hope it's the same fifty percent.", u"Democracy is supposed to give you the feeling of choice, like Painkiller X and Painkiller Y. But they're both just aspirin.", u'I never miss a chance to have sex or appear on television.', u'Our form of democracy is bribery, on the highest scale.', u"Andy Warhol is the only genius I've ever known with an I.Q. of 60.", u'All in all, I would not have missed this century for the world.', u'It is the spirit of the age to believe that any fact, no matter how suspect, is superior to any imaginative exercise, no matter how true.', u'Whenever a friend succeeds, a little something in me dies.', u'Think of the earth as a living organism that is being attacked by billions of bacteria whose numbers double every forty years. Either the host dies, or the virus dies, or both die.', u'Never have children, only grandchildren.', u'All children alarm their parents, if only because you are forever expecting to encounter yourself.', u"In writing and politicking, it's best not to think about it, just do it.", u'It is not enough to succeed. Others must fail.', u'There is no such thing as a homosexual or a heterosexual person. There are only homo- or heterosexual acts. Most people are a mixture of impulses if not practices.'], u'Warren Buffett': [u"It takes 20 years to build a reputation and five minutes to ruin it. If you think about that, you'll do things differently.", u'Rule No.1: Never lose money. Rule No.2: Never forget rule No.1.', u"You do things when the opportunities come along. I've had periods in my life when I've had a bundle of ideas come along, and I've had long dry spells. If I get an idea next week, I'll do something. If not, I won't do a damn thing.", u"The rich are always going to say that, you know, just give us more money and we'll go out and spend more and then it will all trickle down to the rest of you. But that has not worked the last 10 years, and I hope the American public is catching on.", u"Someone's sitting in the shade today because someone planted a tree a long time ago.", u'Chains of habit are too light to be felt until they are too heavy to be broken.', u"I always knew I was going to be rich. I don't think I ever doubted it for a minute.", u"It's better to hang out with people better than you. Pick out associates whose behavior is better than yours and you'll drift in that direction.", u'Price is what you pay. Value is what you get.', u"If anything, taxes for the lower and middle class and maybe even the upper middle class should even probably be cut further. But I think that people at the high end - people like myself - should be paying a lot more in taxes. We have it better than we've ever had it.", u'I buy expensive suits. They just look cheap on me.', u"I don't look to jump over 7-foot bars: I look around for 1-foot bars that I can step over.", u'Of the billionaires I have known, money just brings out the basic traits in them. If they were jerks before they had money, they are simply jerks with a billion dollars.', u"Risk comes from not knowing what you're doing.", u'Wall Street is the only place that people ride to in a Rolls Royce to get advice from those who take the subway.', u'I never attempt to make money on the stock market. I buy on the assumption that they could close the market the next day and not reopen it for five years.', u'In the business world, the rearview mirror is always clearer than the windshield.', u"Only when the tide goes out do you discover who's been swimming naked.", u'A public-opinion poll is no substitute for thought.', u'Derivatives are financial weapons of mass destruction.', u'If past history was all there was to the game, the richest people would be librarians.', u'When you combine ignorance and leverage, you get some pretty interesting results.', u"Economic medicine that was previously meted out by the cupful has recently been dispensed by the barrel. These once unthinkable dosages will almost certainly bring on unwelcome after-effects. Their precise nature is anyone's guess, though one likely consequence is an onslaught of inflation.", u'Beware of geeks bearing formulas.', u'The first rule is not to lose. The second rule is not to forget the first rule.'], u'Anatole France': [u'All changes, even the most longed for, have their melancholy; for what we leave behind us is a part of ourselves; we must die to one life before we can enter another.', u"An education isn't how much you have committed to memory, or even how much you know. It's being able to differentiate between what you know and what you don't.", u'To accomplish great things, we must not only act, but also dream; not only plan, but also believe.', u"Until one has loved an animal a part of one's soul remains unawakened.", u'The law, in its majestic equality, forbids the rich as well as the poor to sleep under bridges, to beg in the streets, and to steal bread.', u'It is well for the heart to be naive and the mind not to be.', u'To imagine is everything, to know is nothing at all.', u'The whole art of teaching is only the art of awakening the natural curiosity of young minds for the purpose of satisfying it afterwards.', u'I thank fate for having made me born poor. Poverty taught me the true value of the gifts useful to life.', u'The truth is that life is delicious, horrible, charming, frightful, sweet, bitter, and that is everything.', u'It is better to understand little than to misunderstand a lot.', u'In art as in love, instinct is enough.', u'What can be more foolish than to think that all this rare fabric of heaven and earth could come by chance, when all the skill of art is not able to make an oyster!', u'It is human nature to think wisely and act in an absurd fashion.', u'Devout believers are safeguarded in a high degree against the risk of certain neurotic illnesses; their acceptance of the universal neurosis spares them the task of constructing a personal one.', u'I prefer the folly of enthusiasm to the indifference of wisdom.', u'If the path be beautiful, let us not ask where it leads.', u"Only men who are not interested in women are interested in women's clothes. Men who like women never notice what they wear.", u'Religion has done love a great service by making it a sin.', u'We do not know what to do with this short life, yet we want another which will be eternal.', u'A person is never happy except at the price of some ignorance.', u'Chance is perhaps the pseudonym of God when he did not want to sign.', u'Ignorance and error are necessary to life, like bread and water.', u'Nature has no principles. She makes no distinction between good and evil.', u'Nine tenths of education is encouragement.'], u'Marcel Proust': [u'Let us be grateful to people who make us happy, they are the charming gardeners who make our souls blossom.', u'The real voyage of discovery consists not in seeking new landscapes, but in having new eyes.', u'The voyage of discovery is not in seeking new landscapes but in having new eyes.', u'The only real voyage of discovery consists not in seeking new landscapes but in having new eyes.', u'A change in the weather is sufficient to recreate the world and ourselves.', u'All our final decisions are made in a state of mind that is not going to last.', u"Every reader finds himself. The writer's work is merely a kind of optical instrument that makes it possible for the reader to discern what, without this book, he would perhaps never have seen in himself.", u'Everything great in the world comes from neurotics. They alone have founded our religions and composed our masterpieces.', u'Happiness is beneficial for the body, but it is grief that develops the powers of the mind.', u'There are perhaps no days of our childhood we lived so fully as those we spent with a favorite book.', u'Only through art can we emerge from ourselves and know what another person sees.', u"We don't receive wisdom; we must discover it for ourselves after a journey that no one can take for us or spare us.", u'It is in moments of illness that we are compelled to recognize that we live not alone but chained to a creature of a different kingdom, whole worlds apart, who has no knowledge of us and by whom it is impossible to make ourselves understood: our body.', u'Love is a reciprocal torture.', u'As long as men are free to ask what they must, free to say what they think, free to think what they will, freedom can never be lost and science can never regress.', u'A woman one loves rarely suffices for all our needs, so we deceive her with another whom we do not love.', u'If a little dreaming is dangerous, the cure for it is not to dream less but to dream more, to dream all the time.', u'Like many intellectuals, he was incapable of saying a simple thing in a simple way.', u'Time, which changes people, does not alter the image we have retained of them.', u"A fashionable milieu is one in which everybody's opinion is made up of the opinion of all the others. Has everybody a different opinion? Then it is a literary milieu.", u'A powerful idea communicates some of its strength to him who challenges it.', u'Illness is the doctor to whom we pay most heed; to kindness, to knowledge, we make promise only; pain we obey.', u'Let us leave pretty women to men devoid of imagination.', u'Love is space and time measured by the heart.', u'Our intonations contain our philosophy of life, what each of us is constantly telling himself about things.'], u'E. B. White': [u'I arise in the morning torn between a desire to improve the world and a desire to enjoy the world. This makes it hard to plan the day.', u'Be obscure clearly.', u'Analyzing humor is like dissecting a frog. Few people are interested and the frog dies of it.', u'Genius is more often found in a cracked pot than in a whole one.', u'Everything in life is somewhere else, and you get there in a car.', u'The world is full of people who have never, since childhood, met an open doorway with an open mind.', u'I would feel more optimistic about a bright future for man if he spent less time proving that he can outwit Nature and more time tasting her sweetness and respecting her seniority.', u'Prejudice is a great time saver. You can form opinions without having to get the facts.', u'It is not often that someone comes along who is a true friend and a good writer.', u'A good farmer is nothing more nor less than a handy man with a sense of humus.', u'We should all do what, in the long run, gives us joy, even if it is only picking grapes or sorting the laundry.', u'Writing is an act of faith, not a trick of grammar.', u'Commas in The New Yorker fall with the precision of knives in a circus act, outlining the victim.', u"Old age is a special problem for me because I've never been able to shed the mental image I have of myself - a lad of about 19.", u'Democracy is the recurrent suspicion that more than half of the people are right more than half of the time.', u'I can only assume that your editorial writer tripped over the First Amendment and thought it was the office cat.', u"I don't know which is more discouraging, literature or chickens.", u'Luck is not something you can mention in the presence of self-made men.', u'One of the most time-consuming things is to have an enemy.', u'The critic leaves at curtain fall To find, in starting to review it, He scarcely saw the play at all For starting to review it.', u"The terror of the atom age is not the violence of the new power but the speed of man's adjustment to it, the speed of his acceptance.", u'The trouble with the profit system has always been that it was highly unprofitable to most people.', u'To perceive Christmas through its wrappings becomes more difficult with every year.', u'A writer is like a bean plant - he has his little day, and then gets stringy.', u'All we need is a meteorologist who has once been soaked to the skin without ill effect. No one can write knowingly of the weather who walks bent over on wet days.'], u'Alexander Hamilton': [u'Those who stand for nothing fall for anything.', u'A well adjusted person is one who makes the same mistake twice without getting nervous.', u'Men often oppose a thing merely because they have had no agency in planning it, or because it may have been planned by those whom they dislike.', u'The voice of the people has been said to be the voice of God; and, however generally this maxim has been quoted and believed, it is not true to fact. The people are turbulent and changing, they seldom judge or determine right.', u'A national debt, if it is not excessive, will be to us a national blessing.', u'A promise must never be broken.', u'Why has government been instituted at all? Because the passions of man will not conform to the dictates of reason and justice without constraint.', u'I never expect to see a perfect work from an imperfect man.', u'Constitutions should consist only of general provisions; the reason is that they must necessarily be permanent, and that they cannot calculate for the possible change of things.', u"It's not tyranny we desire; it's a just, limited, federal government.", u'You should not have taken advantage of my sensibility to steal into my affections without my consent.', u'The sacred rights of mankind are not to be rummaged for among old parchments or musty records. They are written, as with a sunbeam, in the whole volume of human nature, by the hand of the divinity itself; and can never be erased.', u"In the main it will be found that a power over a man's support (salary) is a power over his will.", u'There is a certain enthusiasm in liberty, that makes human nature rise above itself, in acts of bravery and heroism.', u'Real firmness is good for anything; strut is good for nothing.', u'Here, sir, the people govern; here they act by their immediate representatives.', u'I think the first duty of society is justice.', u'In politics, as in religion, it is equally absurd to aim at making proselytes by fire and sword. Heresies in either can rarely be cured by persecution.', u"In the general course of human nature, A power over a man's subsistence amounts to a power over his will.", u"Power over a man's subsistence is power over his will.", u'Even to observe neutrality you must have a strong government.', u'In the usual progress of things, the necessities of a nation in every stage of its existence will be found at least equal to its resources.', u'It is the advertiser who provides the paper for the subscriber. It is not to be disputed, that the publisher of a newspaper in this country, without a very exhaustive advertising support, would receive less reward for his labor than the humblest mechanic.', u'Learn to think continentally.', u'Man is a reasoning rather than a reasonable animal.'], u'Joseph Wood Krutch': [u'It is not ignorance but knowledge which is the mother of wonder.', u'If people destroy something replaceable made by mankind, they are called vandals; if they destroy something irreplaceable made by God, they are called developers.', u'If we do not permit the earth to produce beauty and joy, it will in the end not produce food, either.', u'Happiness is itself a kind of gratitude.', u'Cats are rather delicate creatures and they are subject to a good many different ailments, but I have never heard of one who suffered from insomnia.', u"Any euphemism ceases to be euphemistic after a time and the true meaning begins to show through. It's a losing game, but we keep on trying.", u'It is sometimes easier to head an institute for the study of child guidance than it is to turn one brat into a decent human being.', u'Both the cockroach and the bird would get along very well without us, although the cockroach would miss us most.', u'Cats seem to go on the principle that it never does any harm to ask for what you want.', u'Few people have ever seriously wished to be exclusively rational. The good life which most desire is a life warmed by passions and touched with that ceremonial grace which is impossible without some affectionate loyalty to traditional form and ceremonies.', u'Only those within whose own consciousness the sun rise and set, the leaves burgeon and wither, can be said to be aware of what living is.', u'Security depends not so much upon how much you have, as upon how much you can do without.', u'The most serious charge which can be brought against New England is not Puritanism but February.', u'The snow itself is lonely or, if you prefer, self-sufficient. There is no other time when the whole world seems composed of one thing and one thing only.', u'There is no such thing as a dangerous woman; there are only susceptible men.', u'Though many have tried, no one has ever yet explained away the decisive fact that science, which can do so much, cannot decide what it ought to do.', u'What a man knows is everywhere at war with what he wants.', u'When a man wantonly destroys one of the works of man we call him a vandal. When he destroys one of the works of god we call him a sportsman.'], u'Hunter S. Thompson': [u"I hate to advocate drugs, alcohol, violence, or insanity to anyone, but they've always worked for me.", u'The Edge... there is no honest way to explain it because the only people who really know where it is are the ones who have gone over.', u'When the going gets weird, the weird turn pro.', u"In a closed society where everybody's guilty, the only crime is getting caught. In a world of thieves, the only final sin is stupidity.", u'America... just a nation of two hundred million used car salesmen with all the money we need to buy guns and no qualms about killing anybody else in the world who tries to make us uncomfortable.', u"If you're going to be crazy, you have to get paid for it or else you're going to be locked up.", u'The TV business is uglier than most things. It is normally perceived as some kind of cruel and shallow money trench through the heart of the journalism industry, a long plastic hallway where thieves and pimps run free and good men die like dogs, for no good reason.', u'No man is so foolish but he may sometimes give another good counsel, and no man so wise that he may not easily err if he takes no other counsel than his own. He that is taught only by himself has a fool for a master.', u"You better take care of me Lord, if you don't you're gonna have me on your hands.", u'Buy the ticket, take the ride.', u"I wouldn't recommend sex, drugs or insanity for everyone, but they've always worked for me.", u'You can turn your back on a person, but never turn your back on a drug, especially when its waving a razor sharp hunting knife in your eye.', u'Politics is the art of controlling your environment.', u'I feel the same way about disco as I do about herpes.', u'A word to the wise is infuriating.', u'For every moment of triumph, for every instance of beauty, many souls must be trampled.', u'I have a theory that the truth is never told during the nine-to-five hours.', u"If I'd written all the truth I knew for the past ten years, about 600 people - including me - would be rotting in prison cells from Rio to Seattle today. Absolute truth is a very rare and dangerous commodity in the context of professional journalism.", u'There is nothing more helpless and irresponsible than a man in the depths of an ether binge.', u'Going to trial with a lawyer who considers your whole life-style a Crime in Progress is not a happy prospect.', u'It was the Law of the Sea, they said. Civilization ends at the waterline. Beyond that, we all enter the food chain, and not always right at the top.', u"That was always the difference between Muhammad Ali and the rest of us. He came, he saw, and if he didn't entirely conquer - he came as close as anybody we are likely to see in the lifetime of this doomed generation.", u"The person who doesn't scatter the morning dew will not comb gray hairs.", u'Of all the men that have run for president in the twentieth century, only George McGovern truly understood what a monument America could be to the human race.', u"The trouble with Nixon is that he's a serious politics junkie. He's totally hooked and like any other junkie, he's a bummer to have around, especially as President."], u'Robert H. Schuller': [u'Never cut a tree down in the wintertime. Never make a negative decision in the low time. Never make your most important decisions when you are in your worst moods. Wait. Be patient. The storm will pass. The spring will come.', u'Problems are not stop signs, they are guidelines.', u'Tough times never last, but tough people do.', u'It takes but one positive thought when given a chance to survive and thrive to overpower an entire army of negative thoughts.', u"I'd rather attempt to do something great and fail than to attempt to do nothing and succeed.", u'What great thing would you attempt if you knew you could not fail?', u"Failure doesn't mean you are a failure it just means you haven't succeeded yet.", u'If you listen to your fears, you will die never knowing what a great person you might have been.', u'Again and again, the impossible problem is solved when we see that the problem is only a tough decision waiting to be made.', u'High achievers spot rich opportunities swiftly, make big decisions quickly and move into action immediately. Follow these principles and you can make your dreams come true.', u'Anyone can count the seeds in an apple, but only God can count the number of apples in a seed.', u'The truth of the matter is that you always know the right thing to do. The hard part is doing it.', u'Always look at what you have left. Never look at what you have lost.', u'Goals are not only absolutely necessary to motivate us. They are essential to really keep us alive.', u"God's delays are not God's denials.", u'It takes guts to get out of the ruts.', u"Most people who succeed in the face of seemingly impossible conditions are people who simply don't know how to quit.", u'Turn your scars into stars.', u'If there exists no possibility of failure, then victory is meaningless.', u'It is difficult to say what is impossible, for the dream of yesterday is the hope of today and the reality of tomorrow.', u'The hardest struggle of all is to be something different from what the average man is.', u'What appears to be the end of the road may simply be a bend in the road.', u'Better to do something imperfectly than to do nothing perfectly.', u'Let your hopes, not your hurts, shape your future.', u'Never bring the problem solving stage into the decision making stage. Otherwise, you surrender yourself to the problem rather than the solution.'], u'Denis Waitley': [u'Happiness cannot be traveled to, owned, earned, worn or consumed. Happiness is the spiritual experience of living every minute with love, grace, and gratitude.', u'Learn from the past, set vivid, detailed goals for the future, and live in the only moment of time over which you have any control: now.', u'Courage means to keep working a relationship, to continue seeking solutions to difficult problems, and to stay focused during stressful periods.', u"Don't dwell on what went wrong. Instead, focus on what to do next. Spend your energies on moving forward toward finding the answer.", u'A dream is your creative vision for your life in the future. You must break out of your current comfort zone and become comfortable with the unfamiliar and the unknown.', u'There are two primary choices in life: to accept conditions as they exist, or accept the responsibility for changing them.', u'A smile is the light in your window that tells others that there is a caring, sharing person inside.', u'Failure should be our teacher, not our undertaker. Failure is delay, not defeat. It is a temporary detour, not a dead end. Failure is something we can avoid only by saying nothing, doing nothing, and being nothing.', u'A life lived with integrity - even if it lacks the trappings of fame and fortune is a shinning star in whose light others may follow in the years to come.', u'I had the blues because I had no shoes until upon the street, I met a man who had no feet.', u'As long as we are persistence in our pursuit of our deepest destiny, we will continue to grow. We cannot choose the day or time when we will fully bloom. It happens in its own time.', u'Change the changeable, accept the unchangeable, and remove yourself from the unacceptable.', u'Losers live in the past. Winners learn from the past and enjoy working in the present toward the future.', u'Determination gives you the resolve to keep going in spite of the roadblocks that lay before you.', u'Relentless, repetitive self talk is what changes our self-image.', u"Time and health are two precious assets that we don't recognize and appreciate until they have been depleted.", u'Success is almost totally dependent upon drive and persistence. The extra energy required to make another effort or try another approach is the secret of winning.', u"The winners in life think constantly in terms of I can, I will, and I am. Losers, on the other hand, concentrate their waking thoughts on what they should have or would have done, or what they can't do.", u'It is not in the pursuit of happiness that we find fulfillment, it is in the happiness of pursuit.', u'To establish true self-esteem we must concentrate on our successes and forget about the failures and the negatives in our lives.', u'Goals provide the energy source that powers our lives. One of the best ways we can get the most from the energy we have is to focus it. That is what goals can do for us; concentrate our energy.', u'Losers make promises they often break. Winners make commitments they always keep.', u'The greatest gifts you can give your children are the roots of responsibility and the wings of independence.', u'You must welcome change as the rule but not as your ruler.', u'You must learn from your past mistakes, but not lean on your past successes.'], u"Carroll O'Connor": [u'Nations have come under the control of haters and fools.', u"I'm lucky. Lord, I'm lucky.", u'I do talk less now because the sound of my voice saying over and over the things I said years ago embarrasses and depresses me. Why do I say the same things over and over?', u'Even a true artist does not always produce art.', u"I enjoyed in every way my 12 years of playing Archie, and I wasn't personally sad about finishing a long job.", u'All in the Family was intellectual; it was art.', u'Both my brothers became physicians and I, of course, wandered into a business where the undisciplined are welcome.', u'Conventional show-biz savvy held that Americans hated to be the objects of satire.', u'Half the pictures directed by men of reputation fail.', u"I hate pride, but if I were going to be proud of anything it would have to be something I'd done myself. Race pride is kind of stupid.", u'I have heard show business characterized as a refuge for childlike persons in flight from all things harsh and real.', u"I've run into some S.O.B. directors, but I gave them back as good as I got.", u'In a capitalist society, persons who create capital, like Michael Eisner, are given the staggering rewards.', u'It seems that entertainment is what most excites us and what we value above everything else.', u"It was a lack of system that made the '30s Depression as inevitable as all others previously suffered.", u'Millions of people thought Archie was a happy hero.', u'My Irish derivation has nothing to do with me. Why should it?', u'My professional life in Hollywood has been filled with joy and laughter.', u'Not all celebrities are dunces.', u'One irreducible residual of 38 years in the business is the number of lasting, loving friendships I have made.', u'Sheer flattery got me into the theater. Flattery always works with me, particularly the flattery of women.', u'Some people thought we were presenting Archie as a false character. President Nixon thought we were making a fool out of a good man.', u'Talent can be developed, gift is God-given. But artists have both.', u'The reviewer is a singularly detested enemy because he is, unlike the hapless artist, invulnerable.', u'The wages of pedantry is pain.'], u'Jim Carrey': [u'Behind every great man is a woman rolling her eyes.', u"It is better to risk starving to death then surrender. If you give up on your dreams, what's left?", u"If you aren't in the moment, you are either looking forward to uncertainty, or back to pain and regret.", u'Life opens up opportunities to you, and you either take them or you stay afraid of taking them.', u"I absolutely want to have a career where you make'em laugh and make'em cry. It's all theater.", u'My focus is to forget the pain of life. Forget the pain, mock the pain, reduce it. And laugh.', u"I don't think human beings learn anything without desperation. Desperation is a necessary ingredient to learning anything or creating anything. Period. If you ain't desperate at some point, you ain't interesting.", u'I love playing ego and insecurity combined.', u"Maybe there is no actual place called hell. Maybe hell is just having to listen to our grandparents breathe through their noses when they're eating sandwiches.", u"If you've got a talent, protect it.", u"Either you're the one erasing or you're the one being erased.", u'I praticed making faces in the mirror and it would drive my mother crazy. She used to scare me by saying that I was going to see the devil if I kept looking in the mirror. That fascinated me even more, of course.', u"I'm very serious about no alcohol, no drugs. Life is too beautiful.", u'I know this sounds strange, but as a kid, I was really shy. Painfully shy. The turning point was freshman year, when I was the biggest geek alive. No one, I mean no one, even talked to me.', u"That's the trouble with being me. At this point, nobody gives a damn what my problem is. I could literally have a tumor on the side of my head and they'd be like, 'Yeah, big deal. I'd eat a tumor every morning for the kinda money you're pulling down.'", u"Desperation is a necessary ingredient to learning anything, or creating anything. Period. If you ain't desperate at some point, you ain't interesting.", u"I wake up some mornings and sit and have my coffee and look out at my beautiful garden, and I go, 'Remember how good this is. Because you can lose it.'", u"Ever since I started to get recognition I've picked out certain fans and reverse-stalked them.", u"Creative people don't behave very well generally. If you're looking for examples of good relationships in show business, you're gonna be depressed real fast. I don't have time for anything else right now but work and my daughter. She's my first priority.", u'I just want to be myself.', u'I need privacy. I would think that because what I do makes a lot of people happy that I might deserve a little bit of respect in return. Instead, the papers try to drag me off my pedestal.', u"I really believe in the philosophy that you create your own universe. I'm just trying to create a good one for myself.", u"Before I do anything, I think, well what hasn't been seen. Sometimes, that turns out to be something ghastly and not fit for society. And sometimes that inspiration becomes something that's really worthwhile.", u"I tend to stay up late, not because I'm partying but because it's the only time of the day when I'm alone and don't have to be performing.", u"I've arrived at the place if I'm not taking a career risk, I'm not happy. If I'm scared, then I know I'm being challenged."], u'George Santayana': [u'Those who do not remember the past are condemned to repeat it.', u'An artist is a dreamer consenting to dream of the actual world.', u"The family is one of nature's masterpieces.", u'Never build your emotional life on the weaknesses of others.', u'Almost every wise saying has an opposite one, no less wise, to balance it.', u'Only the dead have seen the end of the war.', u'Depression is rage spread thin.', u"A string of excited, fugitive, miscellaneous pleasures is not happiness; happiness resides in imaginative reflection and judgment, when the picture of one's life, or of human life, as it truly has been or is, satisfies the will, and is gladly accepted.", u'We must welcome the future, remembering that soon it will be the past; and we must respect the past, remembering that it was once all that was humanly possible.', u'A child educated only at school is an uneducated child.', u'To be interested in the changing seasons is a happier state of mind than to be hopelessly in love with spring.', u'America is a young country with an old mentality.', u'The dreamer can know no truth, not even about his dream, except by awaking out of it.', u"The Soul is the voice of the body's interests.", u'A conception not reducible to the small change of daily experience is like a currency not exchangeable for articles of consumption; it is not a symbol, but a fraud.', u"History is a pack of lies about events that never happened told by people who weren't there.", u"One's friends are that part of the human race with which one can be human.", u'Periods of tranquillity are seldom prolific of creative achievement. Mankind has to be stirred up.', u'Happiness is the only sanction of life; where happiness fails, existence remains a mad and lamentable experiment.', u'For a man who has done his natural duty, death is as natural as sleep.', u'Wisdom comes by disillusionment.', u'All living souls welcome whatever they are ready to cope with; all else they ignore, or pronounce to be monstrous and wrong, or deny to be possible.', u'In Greece wise men speak and fools decide.', u'It takes patience to appreciate domestic bliss; volatile spirits prefer unhappiness.', u"A man's feet should be planted in his country, but his eyes should survey the world."], u'Pierre Teilhard de Chardin': [u'We are not human beings having a spiritual experience. We are spiritual beings having a human experience.', u'Someday, after mastering the winds, the waves, the tides and gravity, we shall harness for God the energies of love, and then, for a second time in the history of the world, man will have discovered fire.', u'In the final analysis, the questions of why bad things happen to good people transmutes itself into some very different questions, no longer asking why something happened, but asking how we will respond, what we intend to do now that it happened.', u'We are one, after all, you and I, together we suffer, together exist and forever will recreate each other.', u'The world is round so that friendship may encircle it.', u"The most satisfying thing in life is to have been able to give a large part of one's self to others.", u'Love alone is capable of uniting living beings in such a way as to complete and fulfill them, for it alone takes them and joins them by what is deepest in themselves.', u'You are not a human being in search of a spiritual experience. You are a spiritual being immersed in a human experience.', u"Growing old is like being increasingly penalized for a crime you haven't committed.", u'Love is the affinity which links and draws together the elements of the world... Love, in fact, is the agent of universal synthesis.', u'It is our duty as men and women to proceed as though the limits of our abilities do not exist.', u'Our duty, as men and women, is to proceed as if limits to our ability did not exist. We are collaborators in creation.', u"It doesn't matter if the water is cold or warm if you're going to have to wade through it anyway.", u'He that will believe only what he can fully comprehend must have a long head or a very short creed.', u'Love is a sacred reserve of energy; it is like the blood of spiritual evolution.', u'Driven by the forces of love, the fragments of the world seek each other so that the world may come to being.', u'The universe as we know it is a joint product of the observer and the observed.'], u'Richard Dawkins': [u"By all means let's be open-minded, but not so open-minded that our brains drop out.", u'Faith is the great cop-out, the great excuse to evade the need to think and evaluate evidence. Faith is belief in spite of, even perhaps because of, the lack of evidence.', u'I am against religion because it teaches us to be satisfied with not understanding the world.', u"There may be fairies at the bottom of the garden. There is no evidence for it, but you can't prove that there aren't any, so shouldn't we be agnostic with respect to fairies?", u"Isn't it sad to go to your grave without ever wondering why you were born? Who, with such a thought, would not spring from bed, eager to resume discovering the world and rejoicing to be part of it?", u'The meme for blind faith secures its own perpetuation by the simple unconscious expedient of discouraging rational inquiry.', u'We humans are an extremely important manifestation of the replication bomb, because it is through us - through our brains, our symbolic culture and our technology - that the explosion may proceed to the next stage and reverberate through deep space.', u'Let us try to teach generosity and altruism, because we are born selfish.', u"Many of us saw religion as harmless nonsense. Beliefs might lack all supporting evidence but, we thought, if people needed a crutch for consolation, where's the harm? September 11th changed all that.", u'A universe with a God would look quite different from a universe without one. A physics, a biology where there is a God is bound to look different. So the most basic claims of religion are scientific. Religion is a scientific theory.', u'One of the things that is wrong with religion is that it teaches us to be satisfied with answers which are not really answers at all.', u'We are all atheists about most of the gods that societies have ever believed in. Some of us just go one god further.', u'The universe we observe has precisely the properties we should expect if there is, at bottom, no design, no purpose, no evil, no good, nothing but blind, pitiless indifference.', u'It has become almost a cliche to remark that nobody boasts of ignorance of literature, but it is socially acceptable to boast ignorance of science and proudly claim incompetence in mathematics.', u'Religion is about turning untested belief into unshakable truth through the power of institutions and the passage of time.', u'Personally, I rather look forward to a computer program winning the world chess championship. Humanity needs a lesson in humility.', u'For the first half of geological time our ancestors were bacteria. Most creatures still are bacteria, and each one of our trillions of cells is a colony of bacteria.', u'A delusion is something that people believe in despite a total lack of evidence.', u'The essence of life is statistical improbability on a colossal scale.', u'Complex, statistically improbable things are by their nature more difficult to explain than simple, statistically probable things.', u'My personal feeling is that understanding evolution led me to atheism.', u'The theory of evolution by cumulative natural selection is the only theory we know of that is in principle capable of explaining the existence of organized complexity.', u"What has 'theology' ever said that is of the smallest use to anybody? When has 'theology' ever said anything that is demonstrably true and is not obvious? What makes you think that 'theology' is a subject at all?", u"Nothing is wrong with peace and love. It is all the more regrettable that so many of Christ's followers seem to disagree.", u'The fact that life evolved out of nearly nothing, some 10 billion years after the universe evolved out of literally nothing, is a fact so staggering that I would be mad to attempt words to do it justice.'], u'Pedro Calderon de la Barca': [u'Green is the prime color of the world, and that from which its loveliness arises.', u'Love that is not madness is not love.', u'When love is not madness, it is not love.', u"But whether it be dream or truth, to do well is what matters. If it be truth, for truth's sake. If not, then to gain friends for the time when we awaken.", u'For all life is a dream, and dreams themselves are only dreams.', u'One may know how to gain a victory, and know not how to use it.', u'What is life? A madness. What is life? An illusion, a shadow, a story. And the greatest good is little enough; for all life is a dream, and dreams themselves are only dreams.', u"'Tis not where we lie, but whence we fell; the loss of heaven's the greatest pain in hell.", u"These flowers, which were splendid and sprightly, waking in the dawn of the morning, in the evening will be a pitiful frivolity, sleeping in the cold night's arms.", u'For even in dreams a good deed is not lost.', u'What law, what reason can deny that gift so sweet, so natural that God has given a stream, a fish, a beast, a bird?'], u'Christopher Morley': [u'A man who has never made a woman angry is a failure in life.', u'There is only one success - to be able to spend your life in your own way.', u'Read, every day, something no one else is reading. Think, every day, something no one else is thinking. Do, every day, something no one else would be silly enough to do. It is bad for the mind to continually be part of unanimity.', u'Humor is perhaps a sense of intellectual perspective: an awareness that some things are really important, others not; and that the two kinds are most oddly jumbled in everyday affairs.', u'Beauty is ever to the lonely mind a shadow fleeting; she is never plain. She is a visitor who leaves behind the gift of grief, the souvenir of pain.', u"In every man's heart there is a secret nerve that answers to the vibrations of beauty.", u'There are three ingredients in the good life: learning, earning and yearning.', u'High heels were invented by a woman who had been kissed on the forehead.', u'From now until the end of time no one else will ever see life with my eyes, and I mean to make the best of my chance.', u"When you sell a man a book, you don't sell him 12 ounces of paper and ink and glue - you sell him a whole new life.", u'My theology, briefly, is that the universe was dictated but not signed.', u'The enemies of the future are always the very nicest people.', u'A human being: an ingenious assembly of portable plumbing.', u'Act like you expect to get into the end zone.', u'All cities are mad: but the madness is gallant. All cities are beautiful: but the beauty is grim.', u'Big shots are only little shots who keep shooting.', u'Heavy hearts, like heavy clouds in the sky, are best relieved by the letting of a little water.', u"I had a million questions to ask God: but when I met Him, they all fled my mind; and it didn't seem to matter.", u'Life is a foreign language; all men mispronounce it.', u"Lots of times you have to pretend to join a parade in which you're not really interested in order to get where you're going.", u'The bicycle, the bicycle surely, should always be the vehicle of novelists and poets.', u'The courage of the poet is to keep ajar the door that leads into madness.', u'The real purpose of books is to trap the mind into doing its own thinking.', u"The trouble with wedlock is that there's not enough wed and too much lock.", u"We call a child's mind 'small' simply by habit; perhaps it is larger than ours is, for it can take in almost anything without effort."], u'Audrey Hepburn': [u'For beautiful eyes, look for the good in others; for beautiful lips, speak only words of kindness; and for poise, walk with the knowledge that you are never alone.', u'I believe in pink. I believe that laughing is the best calorie burner. I believe in kissing, kissing a lot. I believe in being strong when everything seems to be going wrong. I believe that happy girls are the prettiest girls. I believe that tomorrow is another day and I believe in miracles.', u"Nothing is impossible, the word itself says 'I'm possible'!", u'I believe in manicures. I believe in overdressing. I believe in primping at leisure and wearing lipstick. I believe in pink. I believe happy girls are the prettiest girls. I believe that tomorrow is another day, and... I believe in miracles.', u'The beauty of a woman is not in a facial mode but the true beauty in a woman is reflected in her soul. It is the caring that she lovingly gives the passion that she shows. The beauty of a woman grows with the passing years.', u"I love people who make me laugh. I honestly think it's the thing I like most, to laugh. It cures a multitude of ills. It's probably the most important thing in a person.", u'I was born with an enormous need for affection, and a terrible need to give it.', u'The best thing to hold onto in life is each other.', u'I decided, very early on, just to accept life unconditionally; I never expected it to do anything special for me, yet I seemed to accomplish far more than I had ever hoped. Most of the time it just happened to me without my ever seeking it.', u"The most important thing is to enjoy your life - to be happy - it's all that matters.", u'The beauty of a woman must be seen from in her eyes, because that is the doorway to her heart, the place where love resides.', u"Pick the day. Enjoy it - to the hilt. The day as it comes. People as they come... The past, I think, has helped me appreciate the present - and I don't want to spoil any of it by fretting about the future.", u'As you grow older, you will discover that you have two hands, one for helping yourself, the other for helping others.', u"Remember, if you ever need a helping hand, it's at the end of your arm, as you get older, remember you have another hand: The first is to help yourself, the second is to help others.", u"I heard a definition once: Happiness is health and a short memory! I wish I'd invented it, because it is very true.", u"I have to be alone very often. I'd be quite happy if I spent from Saturday night until Monday morning alone in my apartment. That's how I refuel.", u"There is more to sex appeal than just measurements. I don't need a bedroom to prove my womanliness. I can convey just as much sex appeal, picking apples off a tree or standing in the rain.", u'You can tell more about a person by what he says about others than you can by what others say about him.', u"I don't want to be alone, I want to be left alone.", u"I never think of myself as an icon. What is in other people's minds is not in my mind. I just do my thing.", u'The beauty of a woman is not in the clothes she wears, the figure that she carries or the way she combs her hair.', u"Let's face it, a nice creamy chocolate cake does a lot for a lot of people; it does for me.", u"If I'm honest I have to tell you I still read fairy-tales and I like them best of all.", u'If my world were to cave in tomorrow, I would look back on all the pleasures, excitements and worthwhilenesses I have been lucky enough to have had. Not the sadness, not my miscarriages or my father leaving home, but the joy of everything else. It will have been enough.', u'People, even more than things, have to be restored, renewed, revived, reclaimed, and redeemed; never throw out anyone.'], u'Gilbert Parker': [u'There is no refuge from memory and remorse in this world. The spirits of our foolish deeds haunt us, with or without repentance.', u'Love knows not distance; it hath no continent; its eyes are for the stars.', u'In all secrets there is a kind of guilt, however beautiful or joyful they may be, or for what good end they may be set to serve. Secrecy means evasion, and evasion means a problem to the moral mind.', u'Imagination is at the root of much that passes for love.', u'It is not the broken heart that kills, but broken pride, monseigneur.', u"Man is born in a day, and he dies in a day, and the thing is easily over; but to have a sick heart for three-fourths of one's lifetime is simply to have death renewed every morning; and life at that price is not worth living.", u'For when a child is born the mother also is born again.', u'He knew the lie of silence to be as evil as the lie of speech.', u"It's the people who try to be clever who never are; the people who are clever never think of trying to be.", u"Tomorrow is no man's gift.", u'He came by a leap to the goal of purpose, not by the toilsome steps of reason. On the instant his headlong spirit declared his purpose: this was the one being for him in all the world: at this altar he would light a lamp of devotion, and keep it burning forever.', u"Memory is man's greatest friend and worst enemy.", u'Nothing is so unproductive as the law. It is expensive whether you win or lose.', u'She belongs to a race of delightful women, who never do any harm, whom everybody calls good, and who are very severe on those who do not pretend to be good.', u'The real business of life is trying to understand each other.', u'There is no influence like the influence of habit.', u"There's no credit in not doing what you don't want to do. There's no virtue in not falling, when you're not tempted.", u'War is cruelty, and none can make it gentle.', u'But paying is part of the game of life: it is the joy of buying that we crave.', u'Every man should have laws of his own, I should think; commandments of his own, for every man has a different set of circumstances wherein to work - or worry.', u'Every shot that kills ricochets.', u'It must be remembered that the sea is a great breeder of friendship. Two men who have known each other for twenty years find that twenty days at sea bring them nearer than ever they were before, or else estrange them.'], u'William Congreve': [u'Heaven has no rage like love to hatred turned, nor hell a fury like a woman scorned.', u'Music has charms to sooth a savage breast, to soften rocks, or bend a knotted oak.', u'Never go to bed angry, stay up and fight.', u"Say what you will, 'tis better to be left than never to have been loved.", u'He who closes his ears to the views of others shows little confidence in the integrity of his own views.', u'Fear comes from uncertainty. When we are absolutely certain, whether of our worth or worthlessness, we are almost impervious to fear.', u'You are a woman: you must never speak what you think; your words must contradict your thoughts, but your actions may contradict your words.', u'Courtship is to marriage, as a very witty prologue to a very dull play.', u'A hungry wolf at all the herd will run, In hopes, through many, to make sure of one.', u'A little disdain is not amiss; a little scorn is alluring.', u"If there's delight in love, 'Tis when I see that heart, which others bleed for, bleed for me.", u'A wit should be no more sincere than a woman constant.', u"Beauty is the lover's gift.", u"Come, come, leave business to idlers, and wisdom to fools: they have need of 'em: wit be my faculty, and pleasure my occupation, and let father Time shake his glass.", u'Grief walks upon the heels of pleasure; married in haste, we repent at leisure.', u'I confess freely to you, I could never look long upon a monkey, without very mortifying reflections.', u'I find we are growing serious, and then we are in great danger of being dull.', u"I know that's a secret, for it's whispered every where.", u'If this be not love, it is madness, and then it is pardonable.', u'In my conscience I believe the baggage loves me, for she never speaks well of me herself, nor suffers any body else to rail at me.', u'Invention flags, his brain goes muddy, and black despair succeeds brown study.', u"No, I'm no enemy to learning; it hurts not me.", u'She likes herself, yet others hates, For that which in herself she prizes; And while she laughs at them, forgets She is the thing that she despises.', u'There is in true beauty, as in courage, something which narrow souls cannot dare to admire.', u'They are at the end of the gallery; retired to their tea and scandal, according to their ancient custom.'], u'Ralph Waldo Emerson': [u'Do not go where the path may lead, go instead where there is no path and leave a trail.', u'All life is an experiment. The more experiments you make the better.', u'Adopt the pace of nature: her secret is patience.', u'It is one of the blessings of old friends that you can afford to be stupid with them.', u'It is not length of life, but depth of life.', u'To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment.', u'For every minute you remain angry, you give up sixty seconds of peace of mind.', u'Love of beauty is taste. The creation of beauty is art.', u'All I have seen teaches me to trust the creator for all I have not seen.', u'Character is higher than intellect. A great soul will be strong to live as well as think.', u'The only way to have a friend is to be one.', u"A man's growth is seen in the successive choirs of his friends.", u'Peace cannot be achieved through violence, it can only be attained through understanding.', u'Nobody can bring you peace but yourself.', u'All mankind love a lover.', u'A man is what he thinks about all day long.', u'Our greatest glory is not in never failing, but in rising up every time we fail.', u'Always do what you are afraid to do.', u'A chief event of life is the day in which we have encountered a mind that startled us.', u'Every artist was first an amateur.', u'Though we travel the world over to find the beautiful, we must carry it with us or we find it not.', u"The age of a woman doesn't mean a thing. The best tunes are played on the oldest fiddles.", u'A friend may well be reckoned the masterpiece of nature.', u'A great man is always willing to be little.', u'Write it on your heart that every day is the best day in the year.'], u'Marcus Garvey': [u'A people without the knowledge of their past history, origin and culture is like a tree without roots.', u'God and Nature first made us what we are, and then out of our own created genius we make ourselves what we want to be. Follow always that great law. Let the sky and God be our limit and Eternity our measurement.', u'If you have no confidence in self, you are twice defeated in the race of life.', u'The Black skin is not a badge of shame, but rather a glorious symbol of national greatness.', u'With confidence, you have won before you have started.', u'I have no desire to take all black people back to Africa; there are blacks who are no good here and will likewise be no good there.', u'Liberate the minds of men and ultimately you will liberate the bodies of men.', u'There is no force like success, and that is why the individual makes all effort to surround himself throughout life with the evidence of it; as of the individual, so should it be of the nation.', u'A reading man and woman is a ready man and woman, but a writing man and woman is exact.', u'Chance has never yet satisfied the hope of a suffering people.', u'Progress is the attraction that moves humanity.', u'Africa for the Africans... at home and abroad!', u'Men who are in earnest are not afraid of consequences.', u'I know no national boundary where the Negro is concerned. The whole world is my province until Africa is free.', u'Our success educationally, industrially and politically is based upon the protection of a nation founded by ourselves. And the nation can be nowhere else but in Africa.', u'I regard the Klan, the Anglo-Saxon clubs and White American societies, as far as the Negro is concerned, as better friends of the race than all other groups of hypocritical whites put together.', u'You may call me a Klansman if you will, but, potentially, every white man is a Klansman, as far as the Negro in competition with whites socially, economically and politically is concerned, and there is no use lying.', u'Look to Africa, for there a king will be crowned.', u'The whole world is run on bluff.', u'There shall be no solution to this race problem until you, yourselves, strike the blow for liberty.', u'I like honesty and fair play.', u'Look for me in the whirlwind or the storm.', u'Up, you mighty race, accomplish what you will.', u'Whatsoever things common to man, that man has done, man can do.'], u'William Makepeace Thackeray': [u'Mother is the name for God in the lips and hearts of little children.', u'An evil person is like a dirty window, they never let the light shine through.', u'A clever, ugly man every now and then is successful with the ladies, but a handsome fool is irresistible.', u'Bravery never goes out of fashion.', u'It is only hope which is real, and reality is a bitterness and a deceit.', u'A good laugh is sunshine in the house.', u'Good humor is one of the best articles of dress one can wear in society.', u'Dinner was made for eating, not for talking.', u'Do not be in a hurry to succeed. What would you have to live for afterwards? Better make the horizon your goal; it will always be ahead of you.', u'The two most engaging powers of an author are to make new things familiar, familiar things new.', u'There are a thousand thoughts lying within a man that he does not know till he takes up a pen to write.', u"Except for the young or very happy, I can't say I am sorry for anyone who dies.", u'I never knew whether to pity or congratulate a man on coming to his senses.', u'It is best to love wisely, no doubt; but to love foolishly is better than not to be able to love at all.', u'Kindnesses are easily forgotten; but injuries! what worthy man does not keep those in mind?', u'Let a man who has to make his fortune in life remember this maxim: Attacking is the only secret. Dare and the world yields, or if it beats you sometimes, dare it again and you will succeed.', u'Next to excellence is the appreciation of it.', u'Next to the young, I suppose the very old are the most selfish.', u'People who do not know how to laugh are always pompous and self-conceited.', u'Despair is perfectly compatible with a good dinner, I promise you.', u'Follow your honest convictions and be strong.', u'I would rather make my name than inherit it.', u"If a secret history of books could be written, and the author's private thoughts and meanings noted down alongside of his story, how many insipid volumes would become interesting, and dull tales excite the reader!", u'It is impossible, in our condition of Society, not to be sometimes a Snob.', u'It is to the middle-class we must look for the safety of England.'], u'Paul Ryan': [u'A free economy and strong communities honor the dignity of every person, rewarding effort with justice, promoting upward mobility, and building solidarity among citizens.', u'Are we interested in treating the symptoms of poverty and economic stagnation through income redistribution and class warfare, or do we want to go at the root causes of poverty and economic stagnation by promoting pro-growth policies that promote prosperity?', u"Do we believe that the goal of government is to promote equal opportunity for all Americans to make the most of their lives? Or, do we now believe that government's role is to equalize the results of peoples lives?", u'Borrowing and spending is not the way to prosperity.', u"Big-government economics breeds crony capitalism. It's corrupt, anything but neutral, and a barrier to broad participation in prosperity.", u"Our founders got it right when they wrote in the Declaration of Independence that our rights come from nature and nature's God, not from government.", u'We believe a renewed commitment to limited government will unshackle our economy and create millions of new jobs and opportunities for all people, of every background, to succeed and prosper. Under this approach, the spirit of initiative - not political clout - determines who succeeds.', u"Here's the problem if you keep raising tax rates: You slow down economic growth.", u"If we don't make tough decisions today our children are going to have to make much, much tougher decisions tomorrow.", u"Exploiting people's emotions of fear, envy and anxiety is not hope, it's not change, it's partisanship. We don't need partisanship. We don't need demagoguery, we need solutions.", u'If borrowing and spending all this money led to more jobs than we would be at full employment already.', u'Every successful individual knows that his or her achievement depends on a community of persons working together.', u"Hey, I'm a Catholic deer hunter, I am happy to be clinging to my guns and my religion.", u"Behind every small business, there's a story worth knowing. All the corner shops in our towns and cities, the restaurants, cleaners, gyms, hair salons, hardware stores - these didn't come out of nowhere.", u"Back in 2008, candidate Obama called a $10 trillion national debt 'unpatriotic' - serious talk from what looked to be a serious reformer. Yet by his own decisions, President Obama has added more debt than any other president before him, and more than all the troubled governments of Europe combined. One president, one term, $5 trillion in new debt.", u"We believe, as our founders did, that 'the pursuit of happiness' depends upon individual liberty; and individual liberty requires limited government.", u'We will not spend four years blaming others, we will take responsibility.', u"By failing seriously to confront the most predicable economic crisis in our nation's history, the President's policies are committing us and our children to a diminished future.", u'Free enterprise empowers entrepreneurs who have ideas and imagination, investors who take risks, and workers who hone their skills and offer their labor.', u"I don't consult polls to tell me what my principles are or what our policies should be.", u'Our debt is out of control. What was a fiscal challenge is now a fiscal crisis. We cannot deny it; instead we must, as Americans, confront it responsibly. And that is exactly what Republicans pledge to do.', u'While President Obama shirks his responsibility to advance solutions to our fiscal challenges, he can no longer hide from the merciless math of the balance sheet. Conservatives have made certain of that.', u"I call crony capitalism, where you take money from successful small businesses, spend it in Washington on favored industries, on favored individuals, picking winners and losers in the economy, that's not pro-growth economics. That's not entrepreneurial economics. That's not helping small businesses. That's cronyism, that's corporate welfare.", u'Look, of course people are scared of entitlement reform because every time you put entitlement reform out there, the other party uses it as a political weapon against you.', u"What matters to me is that I do what I think is right and I see, I'm a numbers guy, that's my attitude. I know we have a debt tsunami coming, we are bankrupting this country and I'm in a position where I can actually advance ideas to prevent that from happening. That's exactly what I should be doing."], u'Lucretius': [u'Constant dripping hollows out a stone.', u'We are each of us angels with only one wing, and we can only fly by embracing one another.', u'The drops of rain make a hole in the stone, not by violence, but by oft falling.', u'The greatest wealth is to live content with little, for there is never want where the mind is satisfied.', u'And life is given to none freehold, but it is leasehold for all.', u'So potent was religion in persuading to evil deeds.', u"Pleasant it is, when over a great sea the winds trouble the waters, to gaze from shore upon another's great tribulation; not because any man's troubles are a delectable joy, but because to perceive you are free of them yourself is pleasant.", u'Such are the heights of wickedness to which men are driven by religion.', u'From the heart of the fountain of delight rises a jet of bitterness that tortures us among the very flowers.', u'It is great wealth to a soul to live frugally with a contented mind.', u"Sweet it is, when on the high seas the winds are lashing the waters, to gaze from the land on another's struggles.", u'The fall of dropping water wears away the Stone.', u'Life is one long struggle in the dark.', u'Thus the sum of things is ever being reviewed, and mortals dependent one upon another. Some nations increase, others diminish, and in a short space the generations of living creatures are changed and like runners pass on the torch of life.', u'Victory puts us on a level with heaven.', u'From the very fountain of enchantment there arises a taste of bitterness to spread anguish amongst the flowers.', u'In the midst of the fountain of wit there arises something bitter, which stings in the very flowers.', u'Pleasant it to behold great encounters of warfare arrayed over the plains, with no part of yours in peril.', u'The sum of all sums is eternity.', u'Though the dungeon, the scourge, and the executioner be absent, the guilty mind can apply the goad and scorch with blows.', u'What is food to one man is bitter poison to others.'], u'Lewis Carroll': [u"I can't go back to yesterday - because I was a different person then.", u"Sometimes I've believed as many as six impossible things before breakfast.", u'One of the secrets of life is that all that is really worth the doing is what we do for others.', u"'But I don't want to go among mad people,' said Alice. 'Oh, you can't help that,' said the cat. 'We're all mad here.'", u'There are three hundred and sixty-four days when you might get un-birthday presents, and only one for birthday presents, you know.', u"If you don't know where you are going, any road will get you there.", u"'When I use a word,' Humpty Dumpty said in rather a scornful tone, 'it means just what I choose it to mean - neither more nor less.'", u"'The time has come,' the walrus said, 'to talk of many things: of shoes and ships - and sealing wax - of cabbages and kings.'", u"Contrariwise, if it was so, it might be; and if it were so, it would be; but as it isn't, it ain't. That's logic.", u"Twinkle, twinkle little bat How I wonder what you're at! Up above the world you fly, Like a tea-tray in the sky.", u'Begin at the beginning and go on till you come to the end; then stop.', u'Which form of proverb do you prefer Better late than never, or Better never than late?', u"It's a poor sort of memory that only works backwards.", u'Always speak the truth, think before you speak, and write it down afterwards.', u"Everything's got a moral, if only you can find it.", u"Who in the world am I? Ah, that's the great puzzle.", u"Why, sometimes I've believed as many as six impossible things before breakfast.", u"Oh, 'tis love, 'tis love that makes the world go round.", u'The rule is, jam tomorrow and jam yesterday - but never jam today.', u'She generally gave herself very good advice, (though she very seldom followed it).', u'Take care of the sense and the sounds will take care of themselves.', u'There comes a pause, for human strength will not endure to dance without cessation; and everyone must reach the point at length of absolute prostration.', u"'What is the use of a book', thought Alice, 'without pictures or conversations?'", u'But I was thinking of a way To multiply by ten, And always, in the answer, get The question back again.', u'His answer trickled through my head like water through a sieve.'], u'Lyndon B. Johnson': [u"I have learned that only two things are necessary to keep one's wife happy. First, let her think she's having her own way. And second, let her have it.", u"If you let a bully come in your front yard, he'll be on your porch the next day and the day after that he'll rape your wife in your own bed.", u'If future generations are to remember us more with gratitude than sorrow, we must achieve more than just the miracles of technology. We must also leave them a glimpse of the world as it was created, not just as it looked when we got through with it.', u'If one morning I walked on top of the water across the Potomac River, the headline that afternoon would read: "President Can\'t Swim."', u'I am a freeman, an American, a United States Senator, and a Democrat, in that order.', u'There are no problems we cannot solve together, and very few that we can solve by ourselves.', u"Being president is like being a jackass in a hailstorm. There's nothing to do but to stand there and take it.", u'Any jackass can kick down a barn but it takes a good carpenter to build one.', u'You do not examine legislation in the light of the benefits it will convey if properly administered, but in the light of the wrongs it would do and the harms it would cause if improperly administered.', u'The vote is the most powerful instrument ever devised by man for breaking down injustice and destroying the terrible walls which imprison men because they are different from other men.', u'When the burdens of the presidency seem unusually heavy, I always remind myself it could be worse. I could be a mayor.', u'Peace is a journey of a thousand miles and it must be taken one step at a time.', u'Did you ever think that making a speech on economics is a lot like pissing down your leg? It seems hot to you, but it never does to anyone else.', u'We are not about to send American boys 9 or 10 thousand miles away from home to do what Asian boys ought to be doing for themselves.', u'Every man has a right to a Saturday night bath.', u"I will do my best. That is all I can do. I ask for your help - and God's.", u'Education is not a problem. Education is an opportunity.', u"No member of our generation who wasn't a Communist or a dropout in the thirties is worth a damn.", u"Doing what's right isn't the problem. It is knowing what's right.", u'There are no favorites in my office. I treat them all with the same general inconsideration.', u'I believe we can continue the Great Society while we fight in Vietnam.', u'John F. Kennedy was the victim of the hate that was a part of our country. It is a disease that occupies the minds of the few but brings danger to the many.', u'There are plenty of recommendations on how to get out of trouble cheaply and fast. Most of them come down to this: Deny your responsibility.', u"What convinces is conviction. Believe in the argument you're advancing. If you don't you're as good as dead. The other person will sense that something isn't there, and no chain of reasoning, no matter how logical or elegant or brilliant, will win your case for you.", u"A man can take a little bourbon without getting drunk, but if you hold his mouth open and pour in a quart, he's going to get sick on it."], u'Chanakya': [u'A good wife is one who serves her husband in the morning like a mother does, loves him in the day like a sister does and pleases him like a prostitute in the night.', u'Before you start some work, always ask yourself three questions - Why am I doing it, What the results might be and Will I be successful. Only when you think deeply and find satisfactory answers to these questions, go ahead.', u'A person should not be too honest. Straight trees are cut first and honest people are screwed first.', u'A man is born alone and dies alone; and he experiences the good and bad consequences of his karma alone; and he goes alone to hell or the Supreme abode.', u'Education is the best friend. An educated person is respected everywhere. Education beats the beauty and the youth.', u'Never make friends with people who are above or below you in status. Such friendships will never give you any happiness.', u'The biggest guru-mantra is: never share your secrets with anybody. It will destroy you.', u'A man is great by deeds, not by birth.', u'There is some self-interest behind every friendship. There is no friendship without self-interests. This is a bitter truth.', u'Books are as useful to a stupid person as a mirror is useful to a blind person.', u'He who is overly attached to his family members experiences fear and sorrow, for the root of all grief is attachment. Thus one should discard attachment to be happy.', u"Once you start a working on something, don't be afraid of failure and don't abandon it. People who work sincerely are the happiest.", u'God is not present in idols. Your feelings are your god. The soul is your temple.', u'Test a servant while in the discharge of his duty, a relative in difficulty, a friend in adversity, and a wife in misfortune.', u'Treat your kid like a darling for the first five years. For the next five years, scold them. By the time they turn sixteen, treat them like a friend. Your grown up children are your best friends.', u'As soon as the fear approaches near, attack and destroy it.', u'He who lives in our mind is near though he may actually be far away; but he who is not in our heart is far though he may really be nearby.', u"The world's biggest power is the youth and beauty of a woman.", u'The fragrance of flowers spreads only in the direction of the wind. But the goodness of a person spreads in all direction.', u'The serpent, the king, the tiger, the stinging wasp, the small child, the dog owned by other people, and the fool: these seven ought not to be awakened from sleep.', u'There is no austerity equal to a balanced mind, and there is no happiness equal to contentment; there is no disease like covetousness, and no virtue like mercy.', u'Even if a snake is not poisonous, it should pretend to be venomous.', u'O wise man! Give your wealth only to the worthy and never to others. The water of the sea received by the clouds is always sweet.', u'Do not be very upright in your dealings for you would see by going to the forest that straight trees are cut down while crooked ones are left standing.', u'The life of an uneducated man is as useless as the tail of a dog which neither covers its rear end, nor protects it from the bites of insects.'], u'John Wooden': [u'Be more concerned with your character than your reputation, because your character is what you really are, while your reputation is merely what others think you are.', u'Things turn out best for the people who make the best of the way things turn out.', u'Talent is God given. Be humble. Fame is man-given. Be grateful. Conceit is self-given. Be careful.', u"If you're not making mistakes, then you're not doing anything. I'm positive that a doer makes mistakes.", u"If you don't have time to do it right, when will you have time to do it over?", u"You can't live a perfect day without doing something for someone who will never be able to repay you.", u'Success is peace of mind which is a direct result of self-satisfaction in knowing you did your best to become the best you are capable of becoming.', u'Adversity is the state in which man most easily becomes acquainted with himself, being especially free of admirers then.', u"It's the little details that are vital. Little things make big things happen.", u'Material possessions, winning scores, and great reputations are meaningless in the eyes of the Lord, because He knows what we really are and that is all that matters.', u'Do not let what you cannot do interfere with what you can do.', u"You can't let praise or criticism get to you. It's a weakness to get caught up in either one.", u'Be true to yourself, help others, make each day your masterpiece, make friendship a fine art, drink deeply from good books - especially the Bible, build a shelter against a rainy day, give thanks for your blessings and pray for guidance every day.', u"It's what you learn after you know it all that counts.", u'Success comes from knowing that you did your best to become the best that you are capable of becoming.', u'There are many things that are essential to arriving at true peace of mind, and one of the most important is faith, which cannot be acquired without prayer.', u'Failure is not fatal, but failure to change might be.', u"Don't measure yourself by what you have accomplished, but by what you should have accomplished with your ability.", u'Consider the rights of others before your own feelings, and the feelings of others before your own rights.', u'A coach is someone who can give correction without causing resentment.', u'Winning takes talent, to repeat takes character.', u"Success is never final, failure is never fatal. It's courage that counts.", u'The main ingredient of stardom is the rest of the team.', u'Never mistake activity for achievement.', u"It isn't what you do, but how you do it."], u'Hillary Clinton': [u'Voting is the most precious right of every citizen, and we have a moral obligation to ensure the integrity of our voting process.', u"I'm undaunted in my quest to amuse myself by constantly changing my hair.", u"The American people are tired of liars and people who pretend to be something they're not.", u"Many of you are well enough off that the tax cuts may have helped you. We're saying that for America to get back on track, we're probably going to cut that short and not give it to you. We're going to take things away from you on behalf of the common good.", u"In the Bible it says they asked Jesus how many times you should forgive, and he said 70 times 7. Well, I want you all to know that I'm keeping a chart.", u"In almost every profession - whether it's law or journalism, finance or medicine or academia or running a small business - people rely on confidential communications to do their jobs. We count on the space of trust that confidentiality provides. When someone breaches that trust, we are all worse off for it.", u"There are 4 billion cell phones in use today. Many of them are in the hands of market vendors, rickshaw drivers, and others who've historically lacked access to education and opportunity. Information networks have become a great leveler, and we should use them together to help lift people out of poverty and give them a freedom from want.", u'Today we voted as Democrats and Republicans. Tomorrow we begin again as New Yorkers.', u"You show people what you're willing to fight for when you fight your friends.", u'Probably my worst quality is that I get very passionate about what I think is right.', u'What we have to do... is to find a way to celebrate our diversity and debate our differences without fracturing our communities.', u'If I want to knock a story off the front page, I just change my hairstyle.', u'The challenges of change are always hard. It is important that we begin to unpack those challenges that confront this nation and realize that we each have a role that requires us to change and become more responsible for shaping our own future.', u'All of us have to recognize that we owe our children more than we have been giving them.', u"I feel very lucky because of my parents and then my education, the opportunities that I've had, so I would like to continue working to improve lives for others.", u"One day after laying a wreath at the tomb of Martin Luther King Jr., President Bush appoints a federal judge who has built his career around dismantling Dr. King's legacy.", u'Both the American people and nations that censor the internet should understand that our government is committed to helping promote internet freedom.', u"Every president, if you watch what they look like when they come into office, you can see their hair turn white because it's such a hard job.", u'We must stop thinking of the individual and start thinking about what is best for society.', u'You cannot have maternal health without reproductive health. And reproductive health includes contraception and family planning and access to legal, safe abortion.', u'As I speak to you today, government censors somewhere are working furiously to erase my words from the records of history. But history itself has already condemned these tactics.', u'I also believe that we have an extraordinary opportunity for the United States and European Union to lead the world in developing and implementing new and more efficient technologies - smart electrical grids and electrical vehicles.', u'I believe in a zone of privacy.', u'In too many instances, the march to globalization has also meant the marginalization of women and girls. And that must change.', u"Often times when you face such an overwhelming challenge as global climate change, it can be somewhat daunting - it's kind of like trying to lose weight, which I know something about."], u'Douglas Adams': [u'A common mistake that people make when trying to design something completely foolproof is to underestimate the ingenuity of complete fools.', u'I love deadlines. I like the whooshing sound they make as they fly by.', u'It is a well-known fact that those people who must want to rule people are, ipso facto, those least suited to do it... anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job.', u"Isn't it enough to see that a garden is beautiful without having to believe that there are fairies at the bottom of it too?", u'Human beings, who are almost unique in having the ability to learn from the experience of others, are also remarkable for their apparent disinclination to do so.', u'Flying is learning how to throw yourself at the ground and miss.', u'If it looks like a duck, and quacks like a duck, we have at least to consider the possibility that we have a small aquatic bird of the family anatidae on our hands.', u'He was a dreamer, a thinker, a speculative philosopher... or, as his wife would have it, an idiot.', u'There is a theory which states that if ever anyone discovers exactly what the Universe is for and why it is here, it will instantly disappear and be replaced by something even more bizarre and inexplicable.There is another theory which states that this has already happened.', u"Space is big. You just won't believe how vastly, hugely, mind-bogglingly big it is. I mean, you may think it's a long way down the road to the drug store, but that's just peanuts to space.", u'To give real service you must add something which cannot be bought or measured with money, and that is sincerity and integrity.', u'In the beginning the Universe was created. This has made a lot of people very angry and been widely regarded as a bad move.', u"We have normality. I repeat, we have normality. Anything you still can't cope with is therefore your own problem.", u'The major difference between a thing that might go wrong and a thing that cannot possibly go wrong is that when a thing that cannot possibly go wrong goes wrong it usually turns out to be impossible to get at and repair.', u'This must be Thursday. I never could get the hang of Thursdays.', u'I may not have gone where I intended to go, but I think I have ended up where I intended to be.', u'Life is wasted on the living.', u'Anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job.', u'I think fish is nice, but then I think that rain is wet, so who am I to judge?', u"I don't believe it. Prove it to me and I still won't believe it.", u'The knack of flying is learning how to throw yourself at the ground and miss.', u'I seldom end up where I wanted to go, but almost always end up where I need to be.', u'For a moment, nothing happened. Then, after a second or so, nothing continued to happen.', u"He hoped and prayed that there wasn't an afterlife. Then he realized there was a contradiction involved here and merely hoped that there wasn't an afterlife.", u'It is a mistake to think you can solve any major problems just with potatoes.'], u'Charles Spurgeon': [u'A lie can travel half way around the world while the truth is putting on its shoes.', u'It is not how much we have, but how much we enjoy, that makes happiness.', u'A good character is the best tombstone. Those who loved you and were helped by you will remember you when forget-me-nots have withered. Carve your name on hearts, not on marble.', u'Sincerity makes the very least person to be of more value than the most talented hypocrite.', u'Anxiety does not empty tomorrow of its sorrows, but only empties today of its strength.', u"Saving faith is an immediate relation to Christ, accepting, receiving, resting upon Him alone, for justification, sanctification, and eternal life by virtue of God's grace.", u'Wisdom is the right use of knowledge. To know is not to be wise. Many men know a great deal, and are all the greater fools for it. There is no fool so great a fool as a knowing fool. But to know how to use knowledge is to have wisdom.', u'Free will carried many a soul to hell, but never a soul to heaven.', u'The greatest enemy to human souls is the self-righteous spirit which makes men look to themselves for salvation.', u'Beware of no man more than of yourself; we carry our worst enemies within us.', u'I would go to the deeps a hundred times to cheer a downcast spirit. It is good for me to have been afflicted, that I might know how to speak a word in season to one that is weary.', u'By perseverance the snail reached the ark.', u'If any of you should ask me for an epitome of the Christian religion, I should say that it is in one word - prayer. Live and die without prayer, and you will pray long enough when you get to hell.', u'A vigorous temper is not altogether an evil. Men who are easy as an old shoe are generally of little worth.', u'The Lord gets his best soldiers out of the highlands of affliction.', u'Trials teach us what we are; they dig up the soil, and let us see what we are made of.', u'It has been said that our anxiety does not empty tomorrow of its sorrow, but only empties today of its strength.', u"We have come to a turning point in the road. If we turn to the right mayhap our children and our children's children will go that way; but if we turn to the left, generations yet unborn will curse our names for having been unfaithful to God and to His Word.", u'Of two evils, choose neither.', u'I believe that nothing happens apart from divine determination and decree. We shall never be able to escape from the doctrine of divine predestination - the doctrine that God has foreordained certain people unto eternal life.', u"A sinner can no more repent and believe without the Holy Spirit's aid than he can create a world.", u'You might not always get what you want, but you always get what you expect.', u'Giving is true having.', u'No one knows who is listening, say nothing you would not wish put in the newspapers.', u'None are more unjust in their judgments of others than those who have a high opinion of themselves.'], u'Bill Gates': [u"Be nice to nerds. Chances are you'll end up working for one.", u"Success is a lousy teacher. It seduces smart people into thinking they can't lose.", u"I'm a great believer that any tool that enhances communication has profound effects in terms of how people can learn from each other, and how they can achieve the kind of freedoms that they're interested in.", u"It's fine to celebrate success but it is more important to heed the lessons of failure.", u"If you think your teacher is tough, wait until you get a boss. He doesn't have tenure.", u"If you can't make it good, at least make it look good.", u'I believe that if you show people the problems and you show them the solutions they will be moved to act.', u'The first rule of any technology used in a business is that automation applied to an efficient operation will magnify the efficiency. The second is that automation applied to an inefficient operation will magnify the inefficiency.', u'Life is not fair; get used to it.', u'As we look ahead into the next century, leaders will be those who empower others.', u"Information technology and business are becoming inextricably interwoven. I don't think anybody can talk meaningfully about one without the talking about the other.", u"I think it's fair to say that personal computers have become the most empowering tool we've ever created. They're tools of communication, they're tools of creativity, and they can be shaped by their user.", u"We always overestimate the change that will occur in the next two years and underestimate the change that will occur in the next ten. Don't let yourself be lulled into inaction.", u"Just in terms of allocation of time resources, religion is not very efficient. There's a lot more I could be doing on a Sunday morning.", u"At Microsoft there are lots of brilliant ideas but the image is that they all come from the top - I'm afraid that's not quite right.", u'Technology is just a tool. In terms of getting the kids working together and motivating them, the teacher is the most important.', u'640K ought to be enough for anybody.', u'I really had a lot of dreams when I was a kid, and I think a great deal of that grew out of the fact that I had a chance to read a lot.', u"In this business, by the time you realize you're in trouble, it's too late to save yourself. Unless you're running scared all the time, you're gone.", u'If GM had kept up with technology like the computer industry has, we would all be driving $25 cars that got 1,000 MPG.', u"Almost every way we make electricity today, except for the emerging renewables and nuclear, puts out CO2. And so, what we're going to have to do at a global scale, is create a new system. And so, we need energy miracles.", u'Intellectual property has the shelf life of a banana.', u"People always fear change. People feared electricity when it was invented, didn't they? People feared coal, they feared gas-powered engines... There will always be ignorance, and ignorance leads to fear. But with time, people will come to accept their silicon masters.", u'Your most unhappy customers are your greatest source of learning.', u"If I'd had some set idea of a finish line, don't you think I would have crossed it years ago?"], u'John Keats': [u'A thing of beauty is a joy forever: its loveliness increases; it will never pass into nothingness.', u"'Beauty is truth, truth beauty,' - that is all ye know on earth, and all ye need to know.", u'I love you the more in that I believe you had liked me for my own sake and for nothing else.', u'Love is my religion - I could die for it.', u'You are always new, the last of your kisses was ever the sweetest.', u'Nothing ever becomes real till it is experienced.', u'I have been astonished that men could die martyrs for religion - I have shuddered at it. I shudder no more - I could be martyred for my religion - Love is my religion - I could die for that.', u'Heard melodies are sweet, but those unheard are sweeter.', u'Do you not see how necessary a world of pains and troubles is to school an intelligence and make it a soul?', u"I am certain of nothing but the holiness of the heart's affections, and the truth of imagination.", u'I have two luxuries to brood over in my walks, your loveliness and the hour of my death. O that I could have possession of them both in the same minute.', u"The only means of strengthening one's intellect is to make up one's mind about nothing, to let the mind be a thoroughfare for all thoughts.", u'I would sooner fail than not be among the greatest.', u'Poetry should surprise by a fine excess and not by singularity, it should strike the reader as a wording of his own highest thoughts, and appear almost a remembrance.', u'Here lies one whose name was writ in water.', u'Land and sea, weakness and decline are great separators, but death is the great divorcer for ever.', u'Now a soft kiss - Aye, by that kiss, I vow an endless bliss.', u'I will give you a definition of a proud man: he is a man who has neither vanity nor wisdom one filled with hatreds cannot be vain, neither can he be wise.', u'You speak of Lord Byron and me; there is this great difference between us. He describes what he sees I describe what I imagine. Mine is the hardest task.', u'I am in that temper that if I were under water I would scarcely kick to come to the top.', u'The poetry of the earth is never dead.', u'There is an electric fire in human nature tending to purify - so that among these human creatures there is continually some birth of new heroism. The pity is that we must wonder at it, as we should at finding a pearl in rubbish.', u"He ne'er is crowned with immortality Who fears to follow where airy voices lead.", u"Philosophy will clip an angel's wings.", u'Praise or blame has but a momentary effect on the man whose love of beauty in the abstract makes him a severe critic on his own works.'], u'Albert Schweitzer': [u"In everyone's life, at some time, our inner fire goes out. It is then burst into flame by an encounter with another human being. We should all be thankful for those people who rekindle the inner spirit.", u'At times our own light goes out and is rekindled by a spark from another person. Each of us has cause to think with deep gratitude of those who have lighted the flame within us.', u'Think occasionally of the suffering of which you spare yourself the sight.', u'Life becomes harder for us when we live for others, but it also becomes richer and happier.', u'Do not let Sunday be taken from you If your soul has no Sunday, it becomes an orphan.', u'Happiness is nothing more than good health and a bad memory.', u'Constant kindness can accomplish much. As the sun makes ice melt, kindness causes misunderstanding, mistrust, and hostility to evaporate.', u'Success is not the key to happiness. Happiness is the key to success. If you love what you are doing, you will be successful.', u'Sometimes our light goes out but is blown into flame by another human being. Each of us owes deepest thanks to those who have rekindled this light.', u'One who gains strength by overcoming obstacles possesses the only strength which can overcome adversity.', u'Do something wonderful, people may imitate it.', u"I don't know what your destiny will be, but one thing I know: the only ones among you who will be really happy are those who will have sought and found how to serve.", u'There are two means of refuge from the miseries of life: music and cats.', u'An optimist is a person who sees a green light everywhere, while a pessimist sees only the red stoplight... the truly wise person is colorblind.', u'Example is leadership.', u'A man is ethical only when life, as such, is sacred to him, that of plants and animals as that of his fellow men, and when he devotes himself helpfully to all life that is in need of help.', u'A man can do only what he can do. But if he does that each day he can sleep at night and do it again the next day.', u'Anyone who proposes to do good must not expect people to roll stones out of his way, but must accept his lot calmly, even if they roll a few stones upon it.', u'The willow which bends to the tempest, often escapes better than the oak which resists it; and so in great calamities, it sometimes happens that light and frivolous spirits recover their elasticity and presence of mind sooner than those of a loftier character.', u'Compassion, in which all ethics must take root, can only attain its full breadth and depth if it embraces all living creatures and does not limit itself to mankind.', u'By having a reverence for life, we enter into a spiritual relation with the world By practicing reverence for life we become good, deep, and alive.', u'The true worth of a man is not to be found in man himself, but in the colours and textures that come alive in others.', u'The purpose of human life is to serve, and to show compassion and the will to help others.', u'A man is truly ethical only when he obeys the compulsion to help all life which he is able to assist, and shrinks from injuring anything that lives.', u'Day by day we should weigh what we have granted to the spirit of the world against what we have denied to the spirit of Jesus, in thought and especially in deed.'], u'Gilbert K. Chesterton': [u'One sees great things from the valley; only small things from the peak.', u'And when it rains on your parade, look up rather than down. Without the rain, there would be no rainbow.', u'To love means loving the unlovable. To forgive means pardoning the unpardonable. Faith means believing the unbelievable. Hope means hoping when everything seems hopeless.', u'The way to love anything is to realize that it may be lost.', u'Christianity has not been tried and found wanting; it has been found difficult and not tried.', u'The true object of all human life is play. Earth is a task garden; heaven is a playground.', u'A woman uses her intelligence to find reasons to support her intuition.', u'A stiff apology is a second insult... The injured party does not want to be compensated because he has been wronged; he wants to be healed because he has been hurt.', u'Let your religion be less of a theory and more of a love affair.', u'I would maintain that thanks are the highest form of thought, and that gratitude is happiness doubled by wonder.', u'When it comes to life the critical thing is whether you take things for granted or take them with gratitude.', u'Education is simply the soul of a society as it passes from one generation to another.', u'A room without books is like a body without a soul.', u'Tolerance is the virtue of the man without convictions.', u'Lying in bed would be an altogether perfect and supreme experience if only one had a colored pencil long enough to draw on the ceiling.', u'When we were children we were grateful to those who filled our stockings at Christmas time. Why are we not grateful to God for filling our stockings with legs?', u'Democracy means government by the uneducated, while aristocracy means government by the badly educated.', u'The word "good" has many meanings. For example, if a man were to shoot his grandmother at a range of five hundred yards, I should call him a good shot, but not necessarily a good man.', u'Love means to love that which is unlovable; or it is no virtue at all.', u'A good novel tells us the truth about its hero; but a bad novel tells us the truth about its author.', u'The aim of life is appreciation; there is no sense in not appreciating things; and there is no sense in having more of them if you have less appreciation of them.', u'Courage is almost a contradiction in terms. It means a strong desire to live taking the form of readiness to die.', u'I owe my success to having listened respectfully to the very best advice, and then going away and doing the exact opposite.', u'Art, like morality, consists in drawing the line somewhere.', u'The poets have been mysteriously silent on the subject of cheese.'], u'Thomas Aquinas': [u'There is nothing on this earth more to be prized than true friendship.', u'To one who has faith, no explanation is necessary. To one without faith, no explanation is possible.', u'Faith has to do with things that are not seen and hope with things that are not at hand.', u'Man cannot live without joy; therefore when he is deprived of true spiritual joys it is necessary that he become addicted to carnal pleasures.', u'Every judgement of conscience, be it right or wrong, be it about things evil in themselves or morally indifferent, is obligatory, in such wise that he who acts against his conscience always sins.', u'Love takes up where knowledge leaves off.', u'Friendship is the source of the greatest pleasures, and without friends even the most agreeable pursuits become tedious.', u'To live well is to work well, to show a good activity.', u'How is it they live in such harmony the billions of stars - when most men can barely go a minute without declaring war in their minds about someone they know.', u'Sorrow can be alleviated by good sleep, a bath and a glass of wine.', u'If the highest aim of a captain were to preserve his ship, he would keep it in port forever.', u'As regards the individual nature, woman is defective and misbegotten, for the active power of the male seed tends to the production of a perfect likeness in the masculine sex; while the production of a woman comes from defect in the active power.', u'A man has free choice to the extent that he is rational.', u'Because philosophy arises from awe, a philosopher is bound in his way to be a lover of myths and poetic fables. Poets and philosophers are alike in being big with wonder.', u'Better to illuminate than merely to shine, to deliver to others contemplated truths than merely to contemplate.', u'Man should not consider his material possession his own, but as common to all, so as to share them without hesitation when others are in need.', u'Because of the diverse conditions of humans, it happens that some acts are virtuous to some people, as appropriate and suitable to them, while the same acts are immoral for others, as inappropriate to them.', u'Distinctions drawn by the mind are not necessarily equivalent to distinctions in reality.', u'Clearly the person who accepts the Church as an infallible guide will believe whatever the Church teaches.', u'How can we live in harmony? First we need to know we are all madly in love with the same God.', u'The things that we love tell us what we are.', u'It is requisite for the relaxation of the mind that we make use, from time to time, of playful deeds and jokes.', u'To bear with patience wrongs done to oneself is a mark of perfection, but to bear with patience wrongs done to someone else is a mark of imperfection and even of actual sin.', u'All the efforts of the human mind cannot exhaust the essence of a single fly.', u'Beware of the person of one book.'], u'Plutarch': [u"I don't need a friend who changes when I change and who nods when I nod; my shadow does that much better.", u'What we achieve inwardly will change outer reality.', u'The mind is not a vessel to be filled but a fire to be kindled.', u'An imbalance between rich and poor is the oldest and most fatal ailment of all republics.', u'The real destroyer of the liberties of the people is he who spreads among them bounties, donations and benefits.', u'Do not speak of your happiness to one less fortunate than yourself.', u'Know how to listen, and you will profit even from those who talk badly.', u'To make no mistakes is not in the power of man; but from their errors and mistakes the wise and good learn wisdom for the future.', u'Character is long-standing habit.', u'Let us carefully observe those good qualities wherein our enemies excel us; and endeavor to excel them, by avoiding what is faulty, and imitating what is excellent in them.', u'Painting is silent poetry, and poetry is painting that speaks.', u'It is part of a good man to do great and noble deeds, though he risk everything.', u'Prosperity is no just scale; adversity is the only balance to weigh friends.', u'We ought not to treat living creatures like shoes or household belongings, which when worn with use we throw away.', u'A few vices are sufficient to darken many virtues.', u'Fate leads him who follows it, and drags him who resist.', u'The wildest colts make the best horses.', u'In words are seen the state of mind and character and disposition of the speaker.', u'Neither blame or praise yourself.', u'The very spring and root of honesty and virtue lie in good education.', u'To find fault is easy; to do better may be difficult.', u'Character is simply habit long continued.', u'Courage consists not in hazarding without fear; but being resolutely minded in a just cause.', u'For to err in opinion, though it be not the part of wise men, is at least human.', u'If I were not Alexander, I would be Diogenes.'], u'Frank Sinatra': [u"I feel sorry for people who don't drink. When they wake up in the morning, that's as good as they're going to feel all day.", u"Alcohol may be man's worst enemy, but the bible says love your enemy.", u"I'm not one of those complicated, mixed-up cats. I'm not looking for the secret to life... I just go on from day to day, taking what comes.", u'The best revenge is massive success.', u"I would like to be remembered as a man who had a wonderful time living life, a man who had good friends, fine family - and I don't think I could ask for anything more than that, actually.", u"Basically, I'm for anything that gets you through the night - be it prayer, tranquilizers or a bottle of Jack Daniels.", u"You gotta love livin', baby, 'cause dyin' is a pain in the ass.", u"I'm supposed to have a Ph.D. on the subject of women. But the truth is I've flunked more often than not. I'm very fond of women; I admire them. But, like all men, I don't understand them.", u"I like intelligent women. When you go out, it shouldn't be a staring contest.", u"People often remark that I'm pretty lucky. Luck is only important in so far as getting the chance to sell yourself at the right moment. After that, you've got to have talent and know how to use it.", u'Cock your hat - angles are attitudes.', u"I'm for whatever gets you through the night.", u"Rock 'n Roll: The most brutal, ugly, desperate, vicious form of expression it has been my misfortune to hear.", u"I'm gonna live till I die.", u'May you live to be 100 and may the last voice you hear be mine.', u'Throughout my career, if I have done anything, I have paid attention to every note and every word I sing - if I respect the song. If I cannot project this to a listener, I fail.', u'Oh, I just wish someone would try to hurt you so I could kill them for you.', u'When lip service to some mysterious deity permits bestiality on Wednesday and absolution on Sunday, cash me out.', u'You treat a lady like a dame, and a dame like a lady.', u'I am a thing of beauty.', u"Don't get even, get mad.", u'Dare to wear the foolish clown face.', u'Hell hath no fury like a hustler with a literary agent.', u'The martial music of every sideburned delinquent on the face of the earth.', u"Whatever else has been said about me personally is unimportant. When I sing, I believe. I'm honest."], u'Virginia Woolf': [u'One cannot think well, love well, sleep well, if one has not dined well.', u"I can only note that the past is beautiful because one never realises an emotion at the time. It expands later, and thus we don't have complete emotions about the present, only about the past.", u'As a woman I have no country. As a woman my country is the whole world.', u'You cannot find peace by avoiding life.', u'Some people go to priests; others to poetry; I to my friends.', u'Each has his past shut in him like the leaves of a book known to him by his heart, and his friends can only read the title.', u'For most of history, Anonymous was a woman.', u'We are nauseated by the sight of trivial personalities decomposing in the eternity of print.', u'I thought how unpleasant it is to be locked out; and I thought how it is worse, perhaps, to be locked in.', u'Life is not a series of gig lamps symmetrically arranged; life is a luminous halo, a semi-transparent envelope surrounding us from the beginning of consciousness to the end.', u"Every secret of a writer's soul, every experience of his life, every quality of his mind is written large in his works.", u'If you do not tell the truth about yourself you cannot tell it about other people.', u'The older one grows, the more one likes indecency.', u'Why are women... so much more interesting to men than men are to women?', u'A woman must have money and a room of her own if she is to write fiction.', u'Once conform, once do what other people do because they do it, and a lethargy steals over all the finer nerves and faculties of the soul. She becomes all outer show and inward emptiness; dull, callous, and indifferent.', u'Someone has to die in order that the rest of us should value life more.', u'Arrange whatever pieces come your way.', u"Really I don't like human nature unless all candied over with art.", u"These are the soul's changes. I don't believe in ageing. I believe in forever altering one's aspect to the sun. Hence my optimism.", u'Odd how the creative power at once brings the whole universe to order.', u'Mental fight means thinking against the current, not with it. It is our business to puncture gas bags and discover the seeds of truth.', u'Women have served all these centuries as looking glasses possessing the power of reflecting the figure of man at twice its natural size.', u'The eyes of others our prisons; their thoughts our cages.', u"I read the book of Job last night, I don't think God comes out well in it."], u'Steve Prefontaine': [u'To give anything less than your best is to sacrifice the gift.', u'A lot of people run a race to see who is fastest. I run to see who has the most guts, who can punish himself into exhausting pace, and then at the end, punish himself even more.', u"You have to wonder at times what you're doing out there. Over the years, I've given myself a thousand reasons to keep running, but it always comes back to where it started. It comes down to self-satisfaction and a sense of achievement.", u'Somebody may beat me, but they are going to have to bleed to do it.', u"Something inside of me just said 'Hey, wait a minute, I want to beat him,' and I just took off.", u"I'm going to work so that it's a pure guts race at the end, and if it is, I am the only one who can win it.", u'I run to see who has the most guts.', u'What I want is to be number one.', u'How does a kid from Coos Bay, with one leg longer than the other win races?'], u'Charles Darwin': [u'A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life.', u'It is not the strongest of the species that survives, nor the most intelligent that survives. It is the one that is the most adaptable to change.', u'Ignorance more frequently begets confidence than does knowledge: it is those who know little, and not those who know much, who so positively assert that this or that problem will never be solved by science.', u'An American monkey, after getting drunk on brandy, would never touch it again, and thus is much wiser than most men.', u'The mystery of the beginning of all things is insoluble by us; and I for one must be content to remain an agnostic.', u'I cannot persuade myself that a beneficent and omnipotent God would have designedly created parasitic wasps with the express intention of their feeding within the living bodies of Caterpillars.', u'The highest possible stage in moral culture is when we recognize that we ought to control our thoughts.', u'In the long history of humankind (and animal kind, too) those who learned to collaborate and improvise most effectively have prevailed.', u"A man's friendships are one of the best measures of his worth.", u'False facts are highly injurious to the progress of science, for they often endure long; but false views, if supported by some evidence, do little harm, for every one takes a salutary pleasure in proving their falseness.', u'If the misery of the poor be caused not by the laws of nature, but by our institutions, great is our sin.', u'Animals, whom we have made our slaves, we do not like to consider our equal.', u'A moral being is one who is capable of reflecting on his past actions and their motives - of approving of some and disapproving of others.', u'I am turned into a sort of machine for observing facts and grinding out conclusions.', u'A scientific man ought to have no wishes, no affections, - a mere heart of stone.', u'I have tried lately to read Shakespeare, and found it so intolerably dull that it nauseated me.', u'How paramount the future is to the present when one is surrounded by children.', u'It is a cursed evil to any man to become as absorbed in any subject as I am in mine.', u"I love fools' experiments. I am always making them.", u'Man is descended from a hairy, tailed quadruped, probably arboreal in its habits.', u'To kill an error is as good a service as, and sometimes even better than, the establishing of a new truth or fact.', u'At some future period, not very distant as measured by centuries, the civilized races of man will almost certainly exterminate, and replace the savage races throughout the world.', u'Man tends to increase at a greater rate than his means of subsistence.', u'We must, however, acknowledge, as it seems to me, that man with all his noble qualities... still bears in his bodily frame the indelible stamp of his lowly origin.', u'I have called this principle, by which each slight variation, if useful, is preserved, by the term of Natural Selection.'], u'Mother Teresa': [u'Be faithful in small things because it is in them that your strength lies.', u'I have found the paradox, that if you love until it hurts, there can be no more hurt, only more love.', u'Let us always meet each other with smile, for the smile is the beginning of love.', u'Being unwanted, unloved, uncared for, forgotten by everybody, I think that is a much greater hunger, a much greater poverty than the person who has nothing to eat.', u'If we have no peace, it is because we have forgotten that we belong to each other.', u'We need to find God, and he cannot be found in noise and restlessness. God is the friend of silence. See how nature - trees, flowers, grass- grows in silence; see the stars, the moon and the sun, how they move in silence... We need silence to be able to touch souls.', u'Love begins at home, and it is not how much we do... but how much love we put in that action.', u'Spread love everywhere you go. Let no one ever come to you without leaving happier.', u'We think sometimes that poverty is only being hungry, naked and homeless. The poverty of being unwanted, unloved and uncared for is the greatest poverty. We must start in our own homes to remedy this kind of poverty.', u'Love begins by taking care of the closest ones - the ones at home.', u'Peace begins with a smile.', u"If you can't feed a hundred people, then feed just one.", u'Loneliness and the feeling of being unwanted is the most terrible poverty.', u'Even the rich are hungry for love, for being cared for, for being wanted, for having someone to call their own.', u'Let us more and more insist on raising funds of love, of kindness, of understanding, of peace. Money will come if we seek first the Kingdom of God - the rest will be given.', u'If you want a love message to be heard, it has got to be sent out. To keep a lamp burning, we have to keep putting oil in it.', u'We ourselves feel that what we are doing is just a drop in the ocean. But the ocean would be less because of that missing drop.', u'Let us touch the dying, the poor, the lonely and the unwanted according to the graces we have received and let us not be ashamed or slow to do the humble work.', u'Let us not be satisfied with just giving money. Money is not enough, money can be got, but they need your hearts to love them. So, spread your love everywhere you go.', u'Love is a fruit in season at all times, and within reach of every hand.', u'The greatest destroyer of peace is abortion because if a mother can kill her own child, what is left for me to kill you and you to kill me? There is nothing between.', u'The hunger for love is much more difficult to remove than the hunger for bread.', u'I want you to be concerned about your next door neighbor. Do you know your next door neighbor?', u'Words which do not give the light of Christ increase the darkness.', u'Intense love does not measure, it just gives.'], u'James Madison': [u'If Tyranny and Oppression come to this land, it will be in the guise of fighting a foreign enemy.', u'Knowledge will forever govern ignorance; and a people who mean to be their own governors must arm themselves with the power which knowledge gives.', u'I believe there are more instances of the abridgement of freedom of the people by gradual and silent encroachments by those in power than by violent and sudden usurpations.', u'It will be of little avail to the people that the laws are made by men of their own choice if the laws be so voluminous that they cannot be read, or so incoherent that they cannot be understood.', u'The circulation of confidence is better than the circulation of money.', u'Americans have the right and advantage of being armed - unlike the citizens of other countries whose governments are afraid to trust the people with arms.', u'Do not separate text from historical background. If you do, you will have perverted and subverted the Constitution, which can only end in a distorted, bastardized form of illegitimate government.', u'No nation could preserve its freedom in the midst of continual warfare.', u'The purpose of separation of church and state is to keep forever from these shores the ceaseless strife that has soaked the soil of Europe with blood for centuries.', u'The Constitution preserves the advantage of being armed which Americans possess over the people of almost every other nation where the governments are afraid to trust the people with arms.', u'Where an excess of power prevails, property of no sort is duly respected. No man is safe in his opinions, his person, his faculties, or his possessions.', u'If men were angels, no government would be necessary.', u'A popular government without popular information or the means of acquiring it, is but a prologue to a farce, or a tragedy, or perhaps both.', u'And I have no doubt that every new example will succeed, as every past one has done, in showing that religion and Government will both exist in greater purity, the less they are mixed together.', u'America was indebted to immigration for her settlement and prosperity. That part of America which had encouraged them most had advanced most rapidly in population, agriculture and the arts.', u'A well regulated militia, composed of the body of the people, trained in arms, is the best most natural defense of a free country.', u'The means of defense against foreign danger historically have become the instruments of tyranny at home.', u'A man has a property in his opinions and the free communication of them.', u'All men having power ought to be distrusted to a certain degree.', u'Of all the enemies of public liberty, war is perhaps the most to be dreaded, because it comprises and develops the germ of every other.', u'Philosophy is common sense with big words.', u'In Republics, the great danger is, that the majority may not sufficiently respect the rights of the minority.', u'The class of citizens who provide at once their own food and their own raiment, may be viewed as the most truly independent and happy.', u'The loss of liberty at home is to be charged to the provisions against danger, real or imagined, from abroad.', u'Whenever a youth is ascertained to possess talents meriting an education which his parents cannot afford, he should be carried forward at the public expense.'], u'Edmund Burke': [u'The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing.', u'It is a general popular error to suppose the loudest complainers for the public to be the most anxious for its welfare.', u"All that's necessary for the forces of evil to win in the world is for enough good men to do nothing.", u'You can never plan the future by the past.', u"Those who don't know history are destined to repeat it.", u'Nobody made a greater mistake than he who did nothing because he could do only a little.', u'When bad men combine, the good must associate; else they will fall one by one, an unpitied sacrifice in a contemptible struggle.', u'Among a people generally corrupt liberty cannot long exist.', u'Hypocrisy can afford to be magnificent in its promises, for never intending to go beyond promise, it costs nothing.', u'It is not what a lawyer tells me I may do; but what humanity, reason, and justice tell me I ought to do.', u'Your representative owes you, not his industry only, but his judgment; and he betrays instead of serving you if he sacrifices it to your opinion.', u'By gnawing through a dike, even a rat may drown a nation.', u'Our patience will achieve more than our force.', u'All government, indeed every human benefit and enjoyment, every virtue, and every prudent act, is founded on compromise and barter.', u'Beauty is the promise of happiness.', u'In a democracy, the majority of the citizens is capable of exercising the most cruel oppressions upon the minority.', u'Sin has many tools, but a lie is the handle which fits them all.', u'Whenever a separation is made between liberty and justice, neither, in my opinion, is safe.', u'We must all obey the great law of change. It is the most powerful law of nature.', u'Religion is essentially the art and the theory of the remaking of man. Man is not a finished creation.', u'Toleration is good for all, or it is good for none.', u'A spirit of innovation is generally the result of a selfish temper and confined views. People will not look forward to posterity, who never look backward to their ancestors.', u'Bad laws are the worst sort of tyranny.', u'But what is liberty without wisdom, and without virtue? It is the greatest of all possible evils; for it is folly, vice, and madness, without tuition or restraint.', u'If we command our wealth, we shall be rich and free; if our wealth commands us, we are poor indeed.'], u'Honore de Balzac': [u'A woman knows the face of the man she loves as a sailor knows the open sea.', u'A mother who is really a mother is never free.', u'A good husband is never the first to go to sleep at night or the last to awake in the morning.', u'Love may be or it may not, but where it is, it ought to reveal itself in its immensity.', u'When women love us, they forgive us everything, even our crimes; when they do not love us, they give us credit for nothing, not even our virtues.', u'The fact is that love is of two kinds, one which commands, and one which obeys. The two are quite distinct, and the passion to which the one gives rise is not the passion of the other.', u"A mother's happiness is like a beacon, lighting up the future but reflected also on the past in the guise of fond memories.", u'Behind every great fortune lies a great crime.', u'Equality may perhaps be a right, but no power on earth can ever turn it into a fact.', u'Love is the poetry of the senses.', u'True love is eternal, infinite, and always like itself. It is equal and pure, without violent demonstrations: it is seen with white hairs and is always young in the heart.', u'Courtesy is only a thin veneer on the general selfishness.', u'If we could but paint with the hand what we see with the eye.', u'A lover always thinks of his mistress first and himself second; with a husband it runs the other way.', u"A mother's life, you see, is one long succession of dramas, now soft and tender, now terrible. Not an hour but has its joys and fears.", u'Laws are spider webs through which the big flies pass and the little ones get caught.', u'Love is a game in which one always cheats.', u'The motto of chivalry is also the motto of wisdom; to serve all, but love only one.', u'Love has its own instinct, finding the way to the heart, as the feeblest insect finds the way to its flower, with a will which nothing can dismay nor turn aside.', u'Women are tenacious, and all of them should be tenacious of respect; without esteem they cannot exist; esteem is the first demand that they make of love.', u'Nobody loves a woman because she is handsome or ugly, stupid or intelligent. We love because we love.', u'The more one judges, the less one loves.', u'The heart of a mother is a deep abyss at the bottom of which you will always find forgiveness.', u"It is as absurd to say that a man can't love one woman all the time as it is to say that a violinist needs several violins to play the same piece of music.", u'A man is a poor creature compared to a woman.'], u'Maya Angelou': [u"If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change your attitude.", u"I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel.", u'When someone shows you who they are, believe them the first time.', u'My great hope is to laugh as much as I cry; to get my work done and try to love somebody and have the courage to accept the love in return.', u'Bitterness is like cancer. It eats upon the host. But anger is like fire. It burns it all clean.', u"Courage is the most important of all the virtues, because without courage you can't practice any other virtue consistently. You can practice any virtue erratically, but nothing consistently without courage.", u"I've learned that you shouldn't go through life with a catcher's mitt on both hands; you need to be able to throw something back.", u'Love recognizes no barriers. It jumps hurdles, leaps fences, penetrates walls to arrive at it destination full of hope.', u'My mother said I must always be intolerant of ignorance but understanding of illiteracy. That some people, unable to go to school, were more educated and more intelligent than college professors.', u"While I know myself as a creation of God, I am also obligated to realize and remember that everyone else and everything else are also God's creation.", u'There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside you.', u'If we lose love and self respect for each other, this is how we finally die.', u'Words mean more than what is set down on paper. It takes the human voice to infuse them with deeper meaning.', u'All great achievements require time.', u'The ache for home lives in all of us, the safe place where we can go as we are and not be questioned.', u"One isn't necessarily born with courage, but one is born with potential. Without courage, we cannot practice any other virtue with consistency. We can't be kind, true, merciful, generous, or honest.", u'Nothing will work unless you do.', u'History, despite its wrenching pain, cannot be unlived, but if faced with courage, need not be lived again.', u'Any book that helps a child to form a habit of reading, to make reading one of his deep and continuing needs, is good for him.', u"Children's talent to endure stems from their ignorance of alternatives.", u'It is time for parents to teach young people early on that in diversity there is beauty and there is strength.', u'Music was my refuge. I could crawl into the space between the notes and curl my back to loneliness.', u'If you have only one smile in you give it to the people you love.', u'Perhaps travel cannot prevent bigotry, but by demonstrating that all peoples cry, laugh, eat, worry, and die, it can introduce the idea that if we try and understand each other, we may even become friends.', u"My life has been one great big joke, a dance that's walked a song that's spoke, I laugh so hard I almost choke when I think about myself."], u'Bob Marley': [u"Life is one big road with lots of signs. So when you riding through the ruts, don't complicate your mind. Flee from hate, mischief and jealousy. Don't bury your thoughts, put your vision to reality. Wake Up and Live!", u'One good thing about music, when it hits you, you feel no pain.', u"Open your eyes, look within. Are you satisfied with the life you're living?", u'Herb is the healing of a nation, alcohol is the destruction.', u"I don't stand for the black man's side, I don' t stand for the white man's side. I stand for God's side.", u'Emancipate yourselves from mental slavery, none but ourselves can free our minds!', u"Me only have one ambition, y'know. I only have one thing I really like to see happen. I like to see mankind live together - black, white, Chinese, everyone - that's all.", u'The good times of today, are the sad thoughts of tomorrow.', u'Every man gotta right to decide his own destiny.', u"When one door is closed, don't you know, another is open.", u"Get up, stand up, Stand up for your rights. Get up, stand up, Don't give up the fight.", u'None but ourselves can free our minds.', u"In this bright future you can't forget your past.", u'As a man sow, shall he reap. and I know that talk is cheap. But the heat of the battle is as sweet as the victory.', u"If you get down and quarell everyday, you're saying prayers to the devil, I say.", u'When you smoke the herb, it reveals you to yourself.', u'Every time I plant a seed, He say kill it before it grow, he say kill it before they grow.', u"My music will go on forever. Maybe it's a fool say that, but when me know facts me can say facts. My music will go on forever.", u'People want to listen to a message, word from Jah. This could be passed through me or anybody. I am not a leader. Messenger. The words of the songs, not the person, is what attracts people.', u"Rastafari not a culture, it's a reality.", u'The more people smoke herb, the more Babylon fall.', u'Man is a universe within himself.', u"Bob Marley isn't my name. I don't even know my name yet.", u'My music fights against the system that teaches to live and die.', u"I've been here before and will come again, but I'm not going this trip through."], u'Alice Walker': [u"Don't wait around for other people to be happy for you. Any happiness you get you've got to make yourself.", u'No person is your friend who demands your silence, or denies your right to grow.', u'The animals of the world exist for their own reasons. They were not made for humans any more than black people were made for white, or women created for men.', u'And so our mothers and grandmothers have, more often than not anonymously, handed on the creative spark, the seed of the flower they themselves never hoped to see - or like a sealed letter they could not plainly read.', u"I think it pisses God off if you walk by the color purple in a field somewhere and don't notice it.", u'For in the end, freedom is a personal and lonely battle; and one faces down fears of today so that those of tomorrow might be engaged.', u'Anybody can observe the Sabbath, but making it holy surely takes the rest of the week.', u'Is solace anywhere more comforting than that in the arms of a sister.', u'Yes, Mother. I can see you are flawed. You have not hidden it. That is your greatest gift to me.', u"In nature, nothing is perfect and everything is perfect. Trees can be contorted, bent in weird ways, and they're still beautiful.", u'Expect nothing. Live frugally on surprise.', u'I think we have to own the fears that we have of each other, and then, in some practical way, some daily way, figure out how to see people differently than the way we were brought up to.', u"In search of my mother's garden, I found my own.", u"The most common way people give up their power is by thinking they don't have any.", u'Life is better than death, I believe, if only because it is less boring, and because it has fresh peaches in it.', u'People do not wish to appear foolish; to avoid the appearance of foolishness, they are willing to remain actually fools.', u'All History is current; all injustice continues on some level, somewhere in the world.', u"Politically, the world is so confused right now - there's so much suffering caused by various movements by various parties and people in power in government.", u'Horses make a landscape look beautiful.', u'How simple a thing it seems to me that to know ourselves as we are, we must know our mothers names.', u'I have learned not to worry about love; but to honor its coming with all my heart.', u'Helped are those who create anything at all, for they shall relive the thrill of their own conception and realize a partnership in the creation of the Universe that keeps them responsible and cheerful.', u'It no longer bothers me that I may be constantly searching for father figures; by this time, I have found several and dearly enjoyed knowing them all.', u'Nobody is as powerful as we make them out to be.', u'Sometimes, reading a blog, which I do infrequently, I see that generations of Americans have been wilfully crippled, and can no longer spell or write a sentence.'], u'Princess Diana': [u'Carry out a random act of kindness, with no expectation of reward, safe in the knowledge that one day someone might do the same for you.', u'Family is the most important thing in the world.', u'Only do what your heart tells you.', u"I don't want expensive gifts; I don't want to be bought. I have everything I want. I just want someone to be there for me, to make me feel safe and secure.", u"I like to be a free spirit. Some don't like that, but that's the way I am.", u'I think the biggest disease the world suffers from in this day and age is the disease of people feeling unloved. I know that I can give love for a minute, for half an hour, for a day, for a month, but I can give. I am very happy to do that, I want to do that.', u'Nothing brings me more happiness than trying to help the most vulnerable people in society. It is a goal and an essential part of my life - a kind of destiny. Whoever is in distress can call on me. I will come running wherever they are.', u'There were three of us in this marriage, so it was a bit crowded.', u"I don't go by the rule book... I lead from the heart, not the head.", u'Everyone of us needs to show how much we care for each other and, in the process, care for ourselves.', u'I live for my sons. I would be lost without them.', u'They say it is better to be poor and happy than rich and miserable, but how about a compromise like moderately rich and just moody?', u"Being a princess isn't all it's cracked up to be.", u'Hugs can do great amounts of good - especially for children.', u'If you find someone you love in your life, then hang on to that love.', u'The biggest disease this day and age is that of people feeling unloved.', u'Any sane person would have left long ago. But I cannot. I have my sons.', u'When you are happy you can forgive a great deal.', u'Life is just a journey.', u'The greatest problem in the world today is intolerance. Everyone is so intolerant of each other.', u'I will fight for my children on any level so they can reach their potential as human beings and in their public duties.', u'I wear my heart on my sleeve.', u'What must it be like for a little boy to read that daddy never loved mummy?', u'Anywhere I see suffering, that is where I want to be, doing what I can.', u'HIV does not make people dangerous to know, so you can shake their hands and give them a hug: Heaven knows they need it.'], u'Carl Sandburg': [u"A baby is God's opinion that life should go on.", u"I'm an idealist. I don't know where I'm going, but I'm on my way.", u'Time is the coin of your life. It is the only coin you have, and only you can determine how it will be spent. Be careful lest you let other people spend it for you.', u'To be a good loser is to learn how to win.', u'Anger is the most impotent of passions. It effects nothing it goes about, and hurts the one who is possessed by it more than the one against whom it is directed.', u'A politician should have three hats. One for throwing into the ring, one for talking through, and one for pulling rabbits out of if elected.', u"I am an idealist. I don't know where I'm going but I'm on my way.", u'Poetry is an echo, asking a shadow to dance.', u'When a nation goes down, or a society perishes, one condition may always be found; they forgot where they came from. They lost sight of what had brought them along.', u'In these times you have to be an optimist to open your eyes when you awake in the morning.', u'Nearly all the best things that came to me in life have been unexpected, unplanned by me.', u'Nothing happens unless first we dream.', u'I tell you the past is a bucket of ashes, so live not in your yesterdays, no just for tomorrow, but in the here and now. Keep moving and forget the post mortems; and remember, no one can get the jump on the future.', u'Life is like an onion. You peel it off one layer at a time, and sometimes you weep.', u'Back of every mistaken venture and defeat is the laughter of wisdom, if you listen.', u'The secret of happiness is to admire without desiring.', u'All politicians should have 3 hats - one to throw into the ring, one to talk through, and one to pull rabbits out of if elected.', u'The moon is a friend for the lonesome to talk to.', u'To work hard, to live hard, to die hard, and then go to hell after all would be too damn hard.', u'Let a joy keep you. Reach out your hands and take it when it runs by.', u'Poetry is the opening and closing of a door, leaving those who look through to guess about what is seen during the moment.', u'A man may be born, but in order to be born he must first die, and in order to die he must first awake.', u'Arithmetic is where the answer is right and everything is nice and you can look out of the window and see the blue sky - or the answer is wrong and you have to start over and try again and see how it comes out this time.', u'Let the gentle bush dig its root deep and spread upward to split the boulder.', u"Love your neighbor as yourself; but don't take down the fence."], u'Jacques Yves Cousteau': [u'The sea, once it casts its spell, holds one in its net of wonder forever.', u'No aquarium, no tank in a marine land, however spacious it may be, can begin to duplicate the conditions of the sea. And no dolphin who inhabits one of those aquariums or one of those marine lands can be considered normal.', u'When one man, for whatever reason, has the opportunity to lead an extraordinary life, he has no right to keep it to himself.', u'In order to stabilize world population, we must eliminate 350,000 per day.', u'From birth, man carries the weight of gravity on his shoulders. He is bolted to earth. But man has only to sink beneath the surface and he is free.', u'People protect what they love.', u'No sooner does man discover intelligence than he tries to involve it in his own stupidity.', u'If we go on the way we have, the fault is our greed and if we are not willing to change, we will disappear from the face of the globe, to be replaced by the insect.', u'A lot of people attack the sea, I make love to it.', u'The happiness of the bee and the dolphin is to exist. For man it is to know that and to wonder at it.', u"The sea, the great unifier, is man's only hope. Now, as never before, the old phrase has a literal meaning: we are all in the same boat.", u'Water and air, the two essential fluids on which all life depends, have become global garbage cans.', u'We forget that the water cycle and the life cycle are one.', u'If we were logical, the future would be bleak, indeed. But we are more than logical. We are human beings, and we have faith, and we have hope, and we can work.', u'Mankind has probably done more damage to the Earth in the 20th century than in all of previous human history.', u'The real cure for our environmental problems is to understand that our job is to salvage Mother Nature. We are facing a formidable enemy in this field. It is the hunters... and to convince them to leave their guns on the wall is going to be very difficult.', u'I believe that national sovereignties will shrink in the face of universal interdependence.', u'Man, of all the animals, is probably the only one to regard himself as a great delicacy.', u'The awareness of our environment came progressively in all countries with different outlets.', u'The road to the future leads us smack into the wall. We simply ricochet off the alternatives that destiny offers. Our survival is no more than a question of 25, 50 or perhaps 100 years.', u'We must plant the sea and herd its animals using the sea as farmers instead of hunters. That is what civilization is all about - farming replacing hunting.', u"What is a scientist after all? It is a curious man looking through a keyhole, the keyhole of nature, trying to know what's going on.", u'Farming as we do it is hunting, and in the sea we act like barbarians.', u'However fragmented the world, however intense the national rivalries, it is an inexorable fact that we become more interdependent every day.', u'I am not a scientist. I am, rather, an impresario of scientists.'], u'John F. Kennedy': [u'My fellow Americans, ask not what your country can do for you, ask what you can do for your country.', u'Let us not seek the Republican answer or the Democratic answer, but the right answer. Let us not seek to fix the blame for the past. Let us accept our own responsibility for the future.', u'Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names.', u'Change is the law of life. And those who look only to the past or present are certain to miss the future.', u'We are tied to the ocean. And when we go back to the sea, whether it is to sail or to watch - we are going back from whence we came.', u'Do not pray for easy lives. Pray to be stronger men.', u'Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable.', u'Let every nation know, whether it wishes us well or ill, that we shall pay any price, bear any burden, meet any hardship, support any friend, oppose any foe to assure the survival and the success of liberty.', u'As we express our gratitude, we must never forget that the highest appreciation is not to utter words, but to live by them.', u'If a free society cannot help the many who are poor, it cannot save the few who are rich.', u"The best road to progress is freedom's road.", u'Israel was not created in order to disappear - Israel will endure and flourish. It is the child of hope and the home of the brave. It can neither be broken by adversity nor demoralized by success. It carries the shield of democracy and it honors the sword of freedom.', u'A nation that is afraid to let its people judge the truth and falsehood in an open market is a nation that is afraid of its people.', u'A man may die, nations may rise and fall, but an idea lives on.', u'The cost of freedom is always high, but Americans have always paid it. And one path we shall never choose, and that is the path of surrender, or submission.', u"A young man who does not have what it takes to perform military service is not likely to have what it takes to make a living. Today's military rejects include tomorrow's hard-core unemployed.", u'Conformity is the jailer of freedom and the enemy of growth.', u'Modern cynics and skeptics... see no harm in paying those to whom they entrust the minds of their children a smaller wage than is paid to those to whom they entrust the care of their plumbing.', u'Leadership and learning are indispensable to each other.', u'When written in Chinese, the word "crisis" is composed of two characters. One represents danger and the other represents opportunity.', u'Things do not happen. Things are made to happen.', u'Efforts and courage are not enough without purpose and direction.', u'A nation which has forgotten the quality of courage which in the past has been brought to public life is not as likely to insist upon or regard that quality in its chosen leaders today - and in fact we have forgotten.', u'Physical fitness is not only one of the most important keys to a healthy body, it is the basis of dynamic and creative intellectual activity.', u'I think this is the most extraordinary collection of talent, of human knowledge, that has ever been gathered at the White House - with the possible exception of when Thomas Jefferson dined alone.'], u'Elbert Hubbard': [u'A friend is one who knows you and loves you just the same.', u'Do not take life too seriously. You will never get out of it alive.', u'Never explain - your friends do not need it and your enemies will not believe you anyway.', u'Every man is a damn fool for at least five minutes every day; wisdom consists in not exceeding the limit.', u'The friend is the man who knows all about you, and still likes you.', u'A little more persistence, a little more effort, and what seemed hopeless failure may turn to glorious success.', u'To avoid criticism, do nothing, say nothing, and be nothing.', u'He who does not understand your silence will probably not understand your words.', u'Responsibility is the price of freedom.', u"Never get married in college; it's hard to get a start if a prospective employer finds you've already made one mistake.", u'Positive anything is better than negative nothing.', u'A retentive memory may be a good thing, but the ability to forget is the true token of greatness.', u'The best preparation for good work tomorrow is to do good work today.', u'Art is not a thing; it is a way.', u'Die, v.: To stop sinning suddenly.', u'Life in abundance comes only through great love.', u'A conservative is a man who is too cowardly to fight and too fat to run.', u'The love we give away is the only love we keep.', u'Pray that success will not come any faster than you are able to endure it.', u"Do your work with your whole heart, and you will succeed - there's so little competition.", u'God will not look you over for medals degrees or diplomas, but for scars.', u'The teacher is the one who gets the most out of the lessons, and the true teacher is the learner.', u'We are punished by our sins, not for them.', u'Know what you want to do, hold the thought firmly, and do every day what should be done, and every sunset will see you that much nearer to your goal.', u"The greatest mistake you can make in life is continually fearing that you'll make one."], u'Joseph Addison': [u'Everything that is new or uncommon raises a pleasure in the imagination, because it fills the soul with an agreeable surprise, gratifies its curiosity, and gives it an idea of which it was not before possessed.', u'Our real blessings often appear to us in the shape of pains, losses and disappointments; but let us have patience and we soon shall see them in their proper figures.', u'Three grand essentials to happiness in this life are something to do, something to love, and something to hope for.', u'Sunday clears away the rust of the whole week.', u'Man is subject to innumerable pains and sorrows by the very condition of humanity, and yet, as if nature had not sown evils enough in life, we are continually adding grief to grief and aggravating the common calamity by our cruel treatment of one another.', u'If you wish to succeed in life, make perseverance your bosom friend, experience your wise counselor, caution your elder brother, and hope your guardian genius.', u'A true critic ought to dwell upon excellencies rather than imperfections, to discover the concealed beauties of a writer, and communicate to the world such things as are worth their observation.', u'A cloudy day or a little sunshine have as great an influence on many constitutions as the most recent blessings or misfortunes.', u'Cheerfulness is the best promoter of health and is as friendly to the mind as to the body.', u'Mysterious love, uncertain treasure, hast thou more of pain or pleasure! Endless torments dwell about thee: Yet who would live, and live without thee!', u'Books are the legacies that a great genius leaves to mankind, which are delivered down from generation to generation as presents to the posterity of those who are yet unborn.', u'It is only imperfection that complains of what is imperfect. The more perfect we are the more gentle and quiet we become towards the defects of others.', u'A contented mind is the greatest blessing a man can enjoy in this world.', u'A man should always consider how much he has more than he wants.', u'A man must be both stupid and uncharitable who believes there is no virtue or truth but on his own side.', u'The greatest sweetener of human life is Friendship. To raise this to the highest pitch of enjoyment, is a secret which but few discover.', u"True happiness arises, in the first place, from the enjoyment of one's self, and in the next, from the friendship and conversation of a few select companions.", u'What sculpture is to a block of marble, education is to the soul.', u'A just and reasonable modesty does not only recommend eloquence, but sets off every great talent which a man can be possessed of.', u'I will indulge my sorrows, and give way to all the pangs and fury of despair.', u'A woman seldom asks advice before she has bought her wedding clothes.', u'An ostentatious man will rather relate a blunder or an absurdity he has committed, than be debarred from talking of his own dear person.', u'Better to die ten thousand deaths than wound my honor.', u"Is there not some chosen curse, some hidden thunder in the stores of heaven, red with uncommon wrath, to blast the man who owes his greatness to his country's ruin!", u'Reading is to the mind what exercise is to the body.'], u'Thomas Carlyle': [u'A loving heart is the beginning of all knowledge.', u'He who has health, has hope; and he who has hope, has everything.', u'Permanence, perseverance and persistence in spite of all obstacle s, discouragement s, and impossibilities: It is this, that in all things distinguishes the strong soul from the weak.', u'Blessed is he who has found his work; let him ask no other blessedness.', u'No pressure, no diamonds.', u'A laugh, to be joyous, must flow from a joyous heart, for without kindness, there can be no true joy.', u'Nothing builds self-esteem and self-confidence like accomplishment.', u'If you look deep enough you will see music; the heart of nature being everywhere music.', u'Imperfection clings to a person, and if they wait till they are brushed off entirely, they would spin for ever on their axis, advancing nowhere.', u'Adversity is the diamond dust Heaven polishes its jewels with.', u'There are good and bad times, but our mood changes more often than our fortune.', u'Every day that is born into the world comes like a burst of music and rings the whole day through, and you make of it a dance, a dirge, or a life march, as you will.', u'Music is well said to be the speech of angels.', u'A strong mind always hopes, and has always cause to hope.', u"Nothing stops the man who desires to achieve. Every obstacle is simply a course to develop his achievement muscle. It's a strengthening of his powers of accomplishment.", u'Reform is not pleasant, but grievous; no person can reform themselves without suffering and hard work, how much less a nation.', u'Endurance is patience concentrated.', u"I've got a great ambition to die of exhaustion rather than boredom.", u'Wondrous is the strength of cheerfulness, and its power of endurance - the cheerful man will do more in the same time, will do it; better, will preserve it longer, than the sad or sullen.', u'What we become depends on what we read after all of the professors have finished with us. The greatest university of all is a collection of books.', u"A man willing to work, and unable to find work, is perhaps the saddest sight that fortune's inequality exhibits under this sun.", u'Every noble work is at first impossible.', u'A man lives by believing something: not by debating and arguing about many things.', u"A man's felicity consists not in the outward and visible blessing of fortune, but in the inward and unseen perfections and riches of the mind.", u'Conviction is worthless unless it is converted into conduct.'], u'John Stuart Mill': [u'Although it is not true that all conservatives are stupid people, it is true that most stupid people are conservative.', u'War is an ugly thing, but not the ugliest of things. The decayed and degraded state of moral and patriotic feeling which thinks that nothing is worth war is much worse.', u'A man who has nothing for which he is willing to fight, nothing which is more important than his own personal safety, is a miserable creature and has no chance of being free unless made and kept so by the exertions of better men than himself.', u'Conservatives are not necessarily stupid, but most stupid people are conservatives.', u'One person with a belief is equal to ninety-nine who have only interests.', u'The person who has nothing for which he is willing to fight, nothing which is more important than his own personal safety, is a miserable creature and has no chance of being free unless made and kept so by the exertions of better men than himself.', u'Eccentricity has always abounded when and where strength of character had abounded; and the amount of eccentricity in a society has generally been proportional to the amount of genius, mental vigor, and courage which it contained.', u'A person may cause evil to others not only by his actions but by his inaction, and in either case he is justly accountable to them for the injury.', u'Life has a certain flavor for those who have fought and risked all that the sheltered and protected can never experience.', u'I have learned to seek my happiness by limiting my desires, rather than in attempting to satisfy them.', u'If all mankind minus one were of one opinion, mankind would be no more justified in silencing that one person than he, if he had the power, would be justified in silencing mankind.', u'Originality is the one thing which unoriginal minds cannot feel the use of.', u'The general tendency of things throughout the world is to render mediocrity the ascendant power among mankind.', u'The only freedom which deserves the name is that of pursuing our own good, in our own way, so long as we do not attempt to deprive others of theirs, or impede their efforts to obtain it.', u'All good things which exist are the fruits of originality.', u'What distinguishes the majority of men from the few is their inability to act according to their beliefs.', u'I am not aware that any community has a right to force another to be civilized.', u'He who knows only his own side of the case knows little of that.', u'In all intellectual debates, both sides tend to be correct in what they affirm, and wrong in what they deny.', u'That so few now dare to be eccentric, marks the chief danger of the time.', u'There are many truths of which the full meaning cannot be realized until personal experience has brought it home.', u'Whatever crushes individuality is despotism, by whatever name it may be called and whether it professes to be enforcing the will of God or the injunctions of men.', u'As long as justice and injustice have not terminated their ever renewing fight for ascendancy in the affairs of mankind, human beings must be willing, when need is, to do battle for the one against the other.', u'The individual is not accountable to society for his actions in so far as these concern the interests of no person but himself.', u'A party of order or stability, and a party of progress or reform, are both necessary elements of a healthy state of political life.'], u'Jonathan Swift': [u'When a true genius appears, you can know him by this sign: that all the dunces are in a confederacy against him.', u'For in reason, all government without the consent of the governed is the very definition of slavery.', u'Vision is the art of seeing what is invisible to others.', u'Blessed is he who expects nothing, for he shall never be disappointed.', u'May you live all the days of your life.', u'A lie does not consist in the indirect position of words, but in the desire and intention, by false speaking, to deceive and injure your neighbour.', u'We have enough religion to make us hate, but not enough to make us love one another.', u"Satire is a sort of glass, wherein beholders do generally discover everybody's face but their own.", u'A wise man should have money in his head, but not in his heart.', u'A man should never be ashamed to own that he has been in the wrong, which is but saying... that he is wiser today than yesterday.', u'Words are but wind; and learning is nothing but words; ergo, learning is nothing but wind.', u'Better belly burst than good liquor be lost.', u'There are few, very few, that will own themselves in a mistake.', u'I wonder what fool it was that first invented kissing.', u'Laws are like cobwebs, which may catch small flies, but let wasps and hornets break through.', u'Nothing is so hard for those who abound in riches as to conceive how others can be in want.', u'Although men are accused of not knowing their own weakness, yet perhaps few know their own strength. It is in men as in soils, where sometimes there is a vein of gold which the owner knows not of.', u'No wise man ever wished to be younger.', u'One enemy can do more hurt than ten friends can do good.', u'A tavern is a place where madness is sold by the bottle.', u'A wise person should have money in their head, but not in their heart.', u'Books, the children of the brain.', u"Don't set your wit against a child.", u'Every man desires to live long, but no man wishes to be old.', u'Nothing is so great an example of bad manners as flattery. If you flatter all the company, you please none; If you flatter only one or two, you offend the rest.'], u'Victor Hugo': [u'To love beauty is to see light.', u'Music expresses that which cannot be said and on which it is impossible to be silent.', u'A compliment is something like a kiss through a veil.', u'To give thanks in solitude is enough. Thanksgiving has wings and goes where it must go. Your prayer knows much more about it than you do.', u'He who opens a school door, closes a prison.', u'The greatest happiness of life is the conviction that we are loved; loved for ourselves, or rather, loved in spite of ourselves.', u'A faith is a necessity to a man. Woe to him who believes in nothing.', u'Have courage for the great sorrows of life and patience for the small ones; and when you have laboriously accomplished your daily task, go to sleep in peace.', u'Intelligence is the wife, imagination is the mistress, memory is the servant.', u'Life is the flower for which love is the honey.', u'Be like the bird who, pausing in her flight awhile on boughs too slight, feels them give way beneath her, and yet sings, knowing she hath wings.', u'All the forces in the world are not so powerful as an idea whose time has come.', u"A mother's arms are made of tenderness and children sleep soundly in them.", u'The wicked envy and hate; it is their way of admiring.', u'Adversity makes men, and prosperity makes monsters.', u'Change your opinions, keep to your principles; change your leaves, keep intact your roots.', u'I met in the street a very poor young man who was in love. His hat was old, his coat worn, his cloak was out at the elbows, the water passed through his shoes, - and the stars through his soul.', u'Fashions have done more harm than revolutions.', u'An intelligent hell would be better than a stupid paradise.', u'Forty is the old age of youth; fifty the youth of old age.', u'He, who every morning plans the transactions of the day, and follows that plan, carries a thread that will guide him through a labyrinth of the most busy life.', u'How did it happen that their lips came together? How does it happen that birds sing, that snow melts, that the rose unfolds, that the dawn whitens behind the stark shapes of trees on the quivering summit of the hill? A kiss, and all was said.', u'Be as a bird perched on a frail branch that she feels bending beneath her, still she sings away all the same, knowing she has wings.', u'The brutalities of progress are called revolutions. When they are over we realize this: that the human race has been roughly handled, but that it has advanced.', u'Dear God! how beauty varies in nature and art. In a woman the flesh must be like marble; in a statue the marble must be like flesh.'], u'Malcolm Forbes': [u'The purpose of education is to replace an empty mind with an open one.', u'Failure is success if we learn from it.', u"Education's purpose is to replace an empty mind with an open one.", u"Few businessmen are capable of being in politics, they don't understand the democratic process, they have neither the tolerance or the depth it takes. Democracy isn't a business.", u'The biggest mistake people make in life is not trying to make a living at doing what they most enjoy.', u"If you don't know what to do with many of the papers piled on your desk, stick a dozen colleagues initials on them and pass them along. When in doubt, route.", u"When what we are is what we want to be, that's happiness.", u'When you cease to dream you cease to live.', u"By the time we've made it, we've had it.", u"It's so much easier to suggest solutions when you don't know too much about the problem.", u'Let your children go if you want to keep them.', u'When things are bad, we take comfort in the thought that they could always get worse. And when they are, we find hope in the thought that things are so bad they have to get better.', u'Diamonds are nothing more than chunks of coal that stuck to their jobs.', u'Everybody has to be somebody to somebody to be anybody.', u'It is all one to me if a man comes from Sing Sing Prison or Harvard. We hire a man, not his history.', u'Anyone who says businessmen deal in facts, not fiction, has never read old five-year projections.', u"Pay your people the least possible and you'll get from them the same.", u'People who matter are most aware that everyone else does too.', u"Victory is sweetest when you've known defeat.", u'Being right half the time beats being half-right all the time.', u'Presence is more than just being there.', u'The best vision is insight.', u'Diversity: the art of thinking independently together.', u'Keeping score of old scores and scars, getting even and one-upping, always makes you less than you are.', u'Men who never get carried away should be.'], u'Tecumseh': [u'When you rise in the morning, give thanks for the light, for your life, for your strength. Give thanks for your food and for the joy of living. If you see no reason to give thanks, the fault lies in yourself.', u'When your time comes to die, be not like those whose hearts are filled with fear of death, so that when their time comes they weep and pray for a little more time to live their lives over again in a different way. Sing your death song, and die like a hero going home.', u'Let us form one body, one heart, and defend to the last warrior our country, our homes, our liberty, and the graves of our fathers.', u'Show respect to all people, but grovel to none.', u'A single twig breaks, but the bundle of twigs is strong.', u'Live your life that the fear of death can never enter your heart.', u'Always give a word or sign of salute when meeting or passing a friend, or even a stranger, if in a lonely place.', u'From my tribe I take nothing, I am the maker of my own fortune.', u'When the legends die, the dreams end; there is no more greatness.', u'Prepare a noble death song for the day when you go over the great divide.'], u'Edgar Allan Poe': [u'I became insane, with long intervals of horrible sanity.', u'Those who dream by day are cognizant of many things that escape those who dream only at night.', u'Deep into that darkness peering, long I stood there, wondering, fearing, doubting, dreaming dreams no mortal ever dared to dream before.', u'All that we see or seem is but a dream within a dream.', u'All religion, my friend, is simply evolved out of fraud, fear, greed, imagination, and poetry.', u'I have no faith in human perfectability. I think that human exertion will have no appreciable effect upon humanity. Man is now only more active - not more happy - nor more wise, than he was 6000 years ago.', u'If you wish to forget anything on the spot, make a note that this thing is to be remembered.', u'Beauty of whatever kind, in its supreme development, invariably excites the sensitive soul to tears.', u'We loved with a love that was more than love.', u'Words have no power to impress the mind without the exquisite horror of their reality.', u'I have great faith in fools; self-confidence my friends call it.', u'The boundaries which divide Life from Death are at best shadowy and vague. Who shall say where the one ends, and where the other begins?', u'I wish I could write as mysterious as a cat.', u'Experience has shown, and a true philosophy will always show, that a vast, perhaps the larger portion of the truth arises from the seemingly irrelevant.', u'The true genius shudders at incompleteness - and usually prefers silence to saying something which is not everything it should be.', u'Science has not yet taught us if madness is or is not the sublimity of the intelligence.', u'Once upon a midnight dreary, while I pondered weak and weary.', u'The death of a beautiful woman, is unquestionably the most poetical topic in the world.', u'They who dream by day are cognizant of many things which escape those who dream only by night.', u"Man's real life is happy, chiefly because he is ever expecting that it soon will be so.", u'That pleasure which is at once the most pure, the most elevating and the most intense, is derived, I maintain, from the contemplation of the beautiful.', u"Were I called on to define, very briefly, the term Art, I should call it 'the reproduction of what the Senses perceive in Nature through the veil of the soul.' The mere imitation, however accurate, of what is in Nature, entitles no man to the sacred name of 'Artist.'", u'In criticism I will be bold, and as sternly, absolutely just with friend and foe. From this purpose nothing shall turn me.', u'The ninety and nine are with dreams, content but the hope of the world made new, is the hundredth man who is grimly bent on making those dreams come true.', u'I am above the weakness of seeking to establish a sequence of cause and effect, between the disaster and the atrocity.'], u'Mahatma Gandhi': [u'Where there is love there is life.', u'An eye for an eye only ends up making the whole world blind.', u'A man is but the product of his thoughts what he thinks, he becomes.', u'I like your Christ, I do not like your Christians. Your Christians are so unlike your Christ.', u'You must be the change you wish to see in the world.', u"A 'No' uttered from the deepest conviction is better than a 'Yes' merely uttered to please, or worse, to avoid trouble.", u'A man who was completely innocent, offered himself as a sacrifice for the good of others, including his enemies, and became the ransom of the world. It was a perfect act.', u'You must not lose faith in humanity. Humanity is an ocean; if a few drops of the ocean are dirty, the ocean does not become dirty.', u'First they ignore you, then they laugh at you, then they fight you, then you win.', u'The weak can never forgive. Forgiveness is the attribute of the strong.', u'Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever.', u'Before the throne of the Almighty, man will be judged not by his acts but by his intentions. For God alone reads our hearts.', u'Prayer is the key of the morning and the bolt of the evening.', u'A coward is incapable of exhibiting love; it is the prerogative of the brave.', u'It is health that is real wealth and not pieces of gold and silver.', u"Prayer is not asking. It is a longing of the soul. It is daily admission of one's weakness. It is better in prayer to have a heart without words than words without a heart.", u'Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony.', u'A small body of determined spirits fired by an unquenchable faith in their mission can alter the course of history.', u'The greatness of a nation can be judged by the way its animals are treated.', u'Anger and intolerance are the enemies of correct understanding.', u'Spiritual relationship is far more precious than physical. Physical relationship divorced from spiritual is body without soul.', u'Always aim at complete harmony of thought and word and deed. Always aim at purifying your thoughts and everything will be well.', u'Even if you are a minority of one, the truth is the truth.', u'An error does not become truth by reason of multiplied propagation, nor does truth become error because nobody sees it.', u'An ounce of practice is worth more than tons of preaching.'], u'Margaret Mead': [u"Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful, committed citizens can change the world; indeed, it's the only thing that ever has.", u"A small group of thoughtful people could change the world. Indeed, it's the only thing that ever has.", u'Sister is probably the most competitive relationship within the family, but once the sisters are grown, it becomes the strongest relationship.', u'Always remember that you are absolutely unique. Just like everyone else.', u"Never believe that a few caring people can't change the world. For, indeed, that's all who ever have.", u"One of the oldest human needs is having someone to wonder where you are when you don't come home at night.", u'If we are to achieve a richer culture, rich in contrasting values, we must recognize the whole gamut of human potentialities, and so weave a less arbitrary social fabric, one in which each diverse human gift will find a fitting place.', u'It is utterly false and cruelly arbitrary to put all the play and learning into childhood, all the work into middle age, and all the regrets into old age.', u'I learned the value of hard work by working hard.', u"Prayer does not use up artificial energy, doesn't burn up any fossil fuel, doesn't pollute. Neither does song, neither does love, neither does the dance.", u'I was wise enough to never grow up while fooling most people into believing I had.', u"Nobody has ever before asked the nuclear family to live all by itself in a box the way we do. With no relatives, no support, we've put it in an impossible situation.", u'Instead of being presented with stereotypes by age, sex, color, class, or religion, children must have the opportunity to learn that within each range, some people are loathsome and some are delightful.', u'We are now at a point where we must educate our children in what no one knew yesterday, and prepare our schools for what no one knows yet.', u'Every time we liberate a woman, we liberate a man.', u'I must admit that I personally measure success in terms of the contributions an individual makes to her or his fellow human beings.', u'Fathers are biological necessities, but social accidents.', u"I have a respect for manners as such, they are a way of dealing with people you don't agree with or like.", u'What people say, what people do, and what they say they do are entirely different things.', u'A city is a place where there is no need to wait for next week to get the answer to a question, to taste the food of any country, to find new voices to listen to and familiar ones to listen to again.', u'And when our baby stirs and struggles to be born it compels humility: what we began is now its own.', u'For the very first time the young are seeing history being made before it is censored by their elders.', u'I do not believe in using women in combat, because females are too fierce.', u'Instead of needing lots of children, we need high-quality children.', u"Sooner or later I'm going to die, but I'm not going to retire."], u'Alfred Lord Tennyson': [u"'Tis better to have loved and lost than never to have loved at all.", u'Dreams are true while they last, and do we not live in dreams?', u"No man ever got very high by pulling other people down. The intelligent merchant does not knock his competitors. The sensible worker does not work those who work with him. Don't knock your friends. Don't knock your enemies. Don't knock yourself.", u'Words, like nature, half reveal and half conceal the soul within.', u'Ours not to reason why, ours but to do and die.', u'A lie which is half a truth is ever the blackest of lies.', u'Knowledge comes, but wisdom lingers.', u'Guard your roving thoughts with a jealous care, for speech is but the dialer of thoughts, and every fool can plainly read in your words what is the hour of your thoughts.', u'There lives more faith in honest doubt, believe me, than in half the creeds.', u'All experience is an arch wherethrough gleams that untravelled world whose margin fades for ever and for ever when I move.', u'Who is wise in love, love most, say least.', u'I am a part of all that I have met.', u'Love is the only gold.', u"A sorrow's crown of sorrow is remembering happier times.", u'My strength has the strength of ten because my heart is pure.', u'Better not be at all than not be noble.', u'Self-reverence, self-knowledge, self-control; these three alone lead one to sovereign power.', u'Theirs is not to make reply: Theirs is not to reason why: Theirs is but to do and die.', u"And out of darkness came the hands that reach thro' nature, moulding men.", u'By blood a king, in heart a clown.', u'I must lose myself in action, lest I wither in despair.', u"God's finger touched him, and he slept.", u"We cannot be kind to each other here for even an hour. We whisper, and hint, and chuckle and grin at our brother's shame; however you take it we men are a little breed.", u'A smile abroad is often a scowl at home.', u'He makes no friends who never made a foe.'], u'Paul McCartney': [u'I used to think anyone doing anything weird was weird. Now I know that it is the people that call others weird that are weird.', u'In the end, the love you take is equal to the love you make.', u"I used to think that anyone doing anything weird was weird. I suddenly realized that anyone doing anything weird wasn't weird at all and it was the people saying they were weird that were weird.", u'If slaughterhouses had glass walls, everyone would be a vegetarian.', u"I think people who create and write, it actually does flow-just flows from into their head, into their hand, and they write it down. It's simple.", u"I don't ever try to make a serious social comment.", u"I don't work at being ordinary.", u'I definitely did look up to John. We all looked up to John. He was older and he was very much the leader; he was the quickest wit and the smartest.', u"I saw that Meryl Streep said, I just want to do my job well. And really, that's all I'm ever trying to do.", u"Somebody said to me, 'But the Beatles were anti-materialistic.' That's a huge myth. John and I literally used to sit down and say, 'Now, let's write a swimming pool.'", u'Think globally, act locally.', u"When you first get money, you buy all these things so no one thinks you're mean, and you spread it around. You get a chauffeur and you find yourself thrown around the back of this car and you think, I was happier when I had my own little car! I could drive myself!", u'Being in the audience actually looks like quite a lot of fun.', u'Buy, buy, says the sign in the shop window; Why, why, says the junk in the yard.', u'None of us wanted to be the bass player. In our minds he was the fat guy who always played at the back.', u'I knew the words to 25 rock songs, so I got in the group. Long Tall Sally and Tutti-Frutti, that got me in. That was my audition.', u"I never look forward, because I have no idea about how any of it happened to getting here. I've no idea how the next five years are going to be.", u"I'm not religious, but I'm very spiritual.", u"I've got to admit it's getting better. It's a little better all the time.", u"John's time and effort were, in the main, spent on pretty honorable stuff. As for the other side, well, nobody's perfect, nobody's Jesus. And look what they did to him.", u'Nothing pleases me more than to go into a room and come out with a piece of music.', u'One of my biggest thrills for me still is sitting down with a guitar or a piano and just out of nowhere trying to make a song happen.', u'There are only four people who knew what the Beatles were about anyway.', u'At the end of the Beatles, I really was done in for the first time in my life. Until then, I really was a kind of cocky sod.', u'George wrote Taxman, and I played guitar on it. He wrote it in anger at finding out what the taxman did. He had never known before then what could happen to your money.'], u'Angelina Jolie': [u"I don't believe in guilt, I believe in living on impulse as long as you never intentionally hurt another person, and don't judge people in your life. I think you should live completely free.", u"Sometimes I think my husband is so amazing that I don't know why he's with me. I don't know whether I'm good enough. But if I make him happy, then I'm everything I want to be.", u'I like someone who is a little crazy but coming from a good place. I think scars are sexy because it means you made a mistake that led to a mess.', u'Without pain, there would be no suffering, without suffering we would never learn from our mistakes. To make it right, pain and suffering is the key to all windows, without it, there is no way of life.', u'I need more sex, OK? Before I die I wanna taste everyone in the world.', u"All women do have a different sense of sexuality, or sense of fun, or sense of like what's sexy or cool or tough.", u"I've realized that being happy is a choice. You never want to rub anybody the wrong way or not be fun to be around, but you have to be happy. When I get logical and I don't trust my instincts - Thats when I get in trouble.", u"I didn't really want to live, so anything that was an investment in time made me angry... but also I just felt sad. When the hopelessness is hurting you, it's the fixtures and fittings that finish you off.", u"I'm happy being myself, which I've never been before. I always hid in other people, or tried to find myself through the characters, or live out their lives, but I didn't have those things in mine.", u"When I get logical, and I don't trust my instincts - that's when I get in trouble.", u"I don't see myself as beautiful, because I can see a lot of flaws. People have really odd opinions. They tell me I'm skinny, as if that's supposed to make me happy.", u'When other little girls wanted to be ballet dancers I kind of wanted to be a vampire.', u"I think all women go through periods where we hate this about ourselves, we don't like that. It's great to get to a place where you dismiss anything you're worried about. I find flaws attractive. I find scars attractive.", u"If I make a fool of myself, who cares? I'm not frightened by anyone's perception of me.", u'I always play women I would date.', u"I grew up as this very carefree, happy kid then things turned darker for me. Maybe it was because I saw that the world wasn't as happy a place as I had hoped it would be for me.", u"To be intimate with a married man, when my own father cheated on my mother, is not something I could forgive. I could not look at myself in the morning if I did that. I wouldn't be attracted to a man who would cheat on his wife.", u"I love to put on lotion. Sometimes I'll watch TV and go into a lotion trance for an hour. I try to find brands that don't taste bad in case anyone wants to taste me.", u"The truth is I love being alive. And I love feeling free. So if I can't have those things then I feel like a caged animal and I'd rather not be in a cage. I'd rather be dead. And it's real simple. And I think it's not that uncommon.", u'Where ever I am I always find myself looking out the window wishing I was somewhere else.', u"I like everything. Boyish girls, girlish boys, the heavy and the skinny. Which is a problem when I'm walking down the street.", u"I've been reckless, but I'm not a rebel without a cause.", u'What nourishes me also destroys me.', u'Everyone got kind of crazy with me mentioning I was in love with a woman.', u"I've told Billy if I ever caught him cheating, I wouldn't kill him because I love his children and they need a dad. But I would beat him up. I know where all of his sports injuries are."], u'Friedrich Schiller': [u'Grace is the beauty of form under the influence of freedom.', u'Keep true to the dreams of your youth.', u'Every true genius is bound to be naive.', u'Against stupidity the very gods themselves contend in vain.', u'Happy he who learns to bear what he cannot change.', u'There is room in the smallest cottage for a happy loving pair.', u'Mankind is made great or little by its own will.', u'Great souls suffer in silence.', u'Will it, and set to work briskly.', u'Disappointments are to the soul what a thunderstorm is to the air.', u'It is criminal to steal a purse, daring to steal a fortune, a mark of greatness to steal a crown. The blame diminishes as the guilt increases.', u'Art is the right hand of Nature. The latter has only given us being, the former has made us men.', u'Dare to err and to dream. Deep meaning often lies in childish plays.', u'Lose not yourself in a far off time, seize the moment that is thine.', u'Art is the daughter of freedom.', u"The universe is one of God's thoughts.", u'There is no such thing as chance; and what seem to us merest accident springs from the deepest source of destiny.', u'A noble heart will always capitulate to reason.', u'Appearance rules the world.', u"Be noble minded! Our own heart, and not other men's opinions of us, forms our true honor.", u'Freedom can occur only through education.', u'He who considers too much will perform little.', u'He who has done his best for his own time has lived for all times.', u'Honesty prospers in every condition of life.', u'In the society, where people are just parts in a larger machine, individuals are unable to develop fully.'], u'Tony Robbins': [u"I've come to believe that all my past failure and frustration were actually laying the foundation for the understandings that have created the new level of living I now enjoy.", u"A real decision is measured by the fact that you've taken a new action. If there's no action, you haven't truly decided.", u"The secret of success is learning how to use pain and pleasure instead of having pain and pleasure use you. If you do that, you're in control of your life. If you don't, life controls you.", u'Beliefs have the power to create and the power to destroy. Human beings have the awesome ability to take any experience of their lives and create a meaning that disempowers them or one that can literally save their lives.', u'One reason so few of us achieve what we truly want is that we never direct our focus; we never concentrate our power. Most people dabble their way through life, never deciding to master anything in particular.', u"If you do what you've always done, you'll get what you've always gotten.", u'I challenge you to make your life a masterpiece. I challenge you to join the ranks of those people who live what they teach, who walk their talk.', u'Success comes from taking the initiative and following up... persisting... eloquently expressing the depth of your love. What simple action could you take today to produce a new momentum toward success in your life?', u'Life is a gift, and it offers us the privilege, opportunity, and responsibility to give something back by becoming more.', u"If you want to be successful, find someone who has achieved the results you want and copy what they do and you'll achieve the same results.", u'The higher your energy level, the more efficient your body The more efficient your body, the better you feel and the more you will use your talent to produce outstanding results.', u'Setting goals is the first step in turning the invisible into the visible.', u'We can change our lives. We can do, have, and be exactly what we wish.', u'It is in your moments of decision that your destiny is shaped.', u"In essence, if we want to direct our lives, we must take control of our consistent actions. It's not what we do once in a while that shapes our lives, but what we do consistently.", u"For changes to be of any true value, they've got to be lasting and consistent.", u'Successful people ask better questions, and as a result, they get better answers.', u'It is not what we get. But who we become, what we contribute... that gives meaning to our lives.', u'To effectively communicate, we must realize that we are all different in the way we perceive the world and use this understanding as a guide to our communication with others.', u'What we can or cannot do, what we consider possible or impossible, is rarely a function of our true capability. It is more likely a function of our beliefs about who we are.', u'My definition of success is to live your life in a way that causes you to feel a ton of pleasure and very little pain - and because of your lifestyle, have the people around you feel a lot more pleasure than they do pain.', u'Once you have mastered time, you will understand how true it is that most people overestimate what they can accomplish in a year - and underestimate what they can achieve in a decade!', u'Using the power of decision gives you the capacity to get past any excuse to change any and every part of your life in an instant.', u"Remember, a real decision is measured by the fact that you've taken new action. If there's no action, you haven't truly decided.", u"Only those who have learned the power of sincere and selfless contribution experience life's deepest joy: true fulfillment."], u'Vivien Leigh': [u'Life is too short to work so hard.', u"I'm a Scorpio, and Scorpios eat themselves out and burn themselves up like me.", u"Dear Lord, I'm so grateful I'm still loved.", u'I always know my lines.', u"Comedy is much more difficult than tragedy-and a much better training, I think. It's much easier to make people cry than to make them laugh.", u"A lucky thing Eva Peron was. She died at 32. I'm already 45.", u"Classical plays require more imagination and more general training to be able to do. That's why I like playing Shakespeare better than anything else.", u"Every single night I'm nervous. You never know how the audience is going to react.", u"I don't know what that Method is. Acting is life, to me, and should be.", u'I need something truly beautiful to look at in hotel rooms.', u"I think Edith Evans is the most marvelous actress in the world and she can look beautiful. People who aren't beautiful can look beautiful. She can look as beautiful as Diana Cooper, who was the most beautiful woman in the world.", u"I'm not young. What's wrong with that?", u"People think that if you look fairly reasonable, you can't possibly act, and as I only care about acting, I think beauty can be a great handicap.", u"Shaw is like a train. One just speaks the words and sits in one's place. But Shakespeare is like bathing in the sea - one swims where one wants.", u"English people don't have very good diction. In France you have to pronounce very particularly and clearly, and learning French at an early age helped me enormously.", u'I adore dancing.', u'I am going to be a great actress.', u"I have just made out my will and given all the things I have and many that I haven't.", u'I know I am right for Scarlett. I can convince Mr. Selznick.', u'I loved fencing and dancing and elocution.', u'I never found accents difficult, after learning languages.', u'I think any classical training in the theatre is of enormous value.', u"I'm not a film star, I am an actress. Being a film star is such a false life, lived for fake values and for publicity.", u"I'm not afraid to die.", u"I've always been mad about cats."], u'John W. Gardner': [u'The society which scorns excellence in plumbing as a humble activity and tolerates shoddiness in philosophy because it is an exalted activity will have neither good plumbing nor good philosophy: neither its pipes nor its theories will hold water.', u'Life is the art of drawing without an eraser.', u'Much education today is monumentally ineffective. All too often we are giving young people cut flowers when we should be teaching them to grow their own plants.', u'The creative individual has the capacity to free himself from the web of social pressures in which the rest of us are caught. He is capable of questioning the assumptions that the rest of us accept.', u"True happiness involves the full use of one's power and talents.", u"Political extremism involves two prime ingredients: an excessively simple diagnosis of the world's ills, and a conviction that there are identifiable villains back of it all.", u'Excellence is doing ordinary things extraordinarily well.', u'For every talent that poverty has stimulated it has blighted a hundred.', u'When one may pay out over two million dollars to presidential and Congressional campaigns, the U.S. government is virtually up for sale.', u'Whoever I am, or whatever I am doing, some kind of excellence is within my reach.', u"America's greatness has been the greatness of a free people who shared certain moral commitments. Freedom without moral commitment is aimless and promptly self-destructive.", u'History never looks like history when you are living through it.', u'Men of integrity, by their very existence, rekindle the belief that as a people we can live above the level of moral squalor. We need that belief; a cynical community is a corrupt community.', u'The idea for which this nation stands will not survive if the highest goal free man can set themselves is an amiable mediocrity. Excellence implies striving for the highest standards in every phase of life.', u'We are all faced with a series of great opportunities - brilliantly disguised as insoluble problems.', u'I am entirely certain that twenty years from now we will look back at education as it is practiced in most schools today and wonder that we could have tolerated anything so primitive.', u'Leaders come in many forms, with many styles and diverse qualities. There are quiet leaders and leaders one can hear in the next county. Some find strength in eloquence, some in judgment, some in courage.', u'One of the reasons people stop learning is that they become less and less willing to risk failure.', u'Our problem is not to find better values but to be faithful to those we profess.', u'Some people strengthen the society just by being the kind of people they are.', u'The ultimate goal of the educational system is to shift to the individual the burden of pursing his own education. This will not be a widely shared pursuit until we get over our odd conviction that education is what goes on in school buildings and nowhere else.', u'All laws are an attempt to domesticate the natural ferocity of the species.', u'If you have some respect for people as they are, you can be more effective in helping them to become better than they are.', u'It is hard to feel individually responsible with respect to the invisible processes of a huge and distant government.', u'Some people have greatness thrust upon them. Very few have excellence thrust upon them.'], u'Andre Gide': [u'Be faithful to that which exists within yourself.', u'A straight path never leads anywhere except to the objective.', u'It is only in adventure that some people succeed in knowing themselves - in finding themselves.', u'Everything has been said before, but since nobody listens we have to keep going back and beginning all over again.', u'Art is a collaboration between God and the artist, and the less the artist does the better.', u'It is better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for something you are not.', u'One does not discover new lands without consenting to lose sight of the shore for a very long time.', u'Most quarrels amplify a misunderstanding.', u'Believe those who are seeking the truth. Doubt those who find it.', u'What another would have done as well as you, do not do it. What another would have said as well as you, do not say it; what another would have written as well, do not write it. Be faithful to that which exists nowhere but in yourself-and thus make yourself indispensable.', u'Man cannot discover new oceans unless he has the courage to lose sight of the shore.', u'Fish die belly upward, and rise to the surface. Its their way of falling.', u'It is easier to lead men to combat, stirring up their passion, than to restrain them and direct them toward the patient labors of peace.', u'Nothing prevents happiness like the memory of happiness.', u"It is good to follow one's own bent, so long as it leads upward.", u'It is not always by plugging away at a difficulty and sticking to it that one overcomes it; often it is by working on the one next to it. Some things and some people have to be approached obliquely, at an angle.', u'Only those things are beautiful which are inspired by madness and written by reason.', u'The want of logic annoys. Too much logic bores. Life eludes logic, and everything that logic alone constructs remains artificial and forced.', u'There is no prejudice that the work of art does not finally overcome.', u'Art begins with resistance - at the point where resistance is overcome. No human masterpiece has ever been created without great labor.', u'Art is the collaboration between God and the artist, and the less the artist does the better.', u'God depends on us. It is through us that God is achieved.', u'I owe much to my friends; but, all things considered, it strikes me that I owe even more to my enemies. The real person springs life under a sting even better than under a caress.', u'Man is more interesting than men. God made him and not them in his image. Each one is more precious than all.', u'The color of truth is gray.'], u'Josh Billings': [u'Life consists not in holding good cards but in playing those you hold well.', u'A dog is the only thing on earth that loves you more than you love yourself.', u'Silence is one of the hardest arguments to refute.', u'There are lots of people who mistake their imagination for their memory.', u'There is no revenge so complete as forgiveness.', u"Genius ain't anything more than elegant common sense.", u'Love looks through a telescope; envy, through a microscope.', u'Every man has his follies - and often they are the most interesting thing he has got.', u"Honesty is the rarest wealth anyone can possess, and yet all the honesty in the world ain't lawful tender for a loaf of bread.", u'The wheel that squeaks the loudest is the one that gets the grease.', u'Be like a postage stamp. Stick to one thing until you get there.', u'Flattery is like cologne water, to be smelt, not swallowed.', u'Confess your sins to the Lord and you will be forgiven; confess them to man and you will be laughed at.', u"There are two kinds of fools: those who can't change their opinions and those who won't.", u'Learning sleeps and snores in libraries, but wisdom is everywhere, wide awake, on tiptoe.', u'One of the greatest victories you can gain over someone is to beat him at politeness.', u'As a general thing, when a woman wears the pants in a family, she has a good right to them.', u"There are some people so addicted to exaggeration that they can't tell the truth without lying.", u"Marrying for love may be a bit risky, but it is so honest that God can't help but smile on it.", u'The best time for you to hold your tongue is the time you feel you must say something or bust.', u'Adversity has the same effect on a man that severe training has on the pugilist: it reduces him to his fighting weight.', u'Common sense is the knack of seeing things as they are, and doing things as they ought to be done.', u'There is no greater evidence of superior intelligence than to be surprised at nothing.', u'Advice is like castor oil, easy enough to give but dreadful uneasy to take.', u'Economy is a savings-bank, into which men drop pennies, and get dollars in return.'], u'John Kenneth Galbraith': [u"The modern conservative is engaged in one of man's oldest exercises in moral philosophy; that is, the search for a superior moral justification for selfishness.", u'The only function of economic forecasting is to make astrology look respectable.', u'All of the great leaders have had one characteristic in common: it was the willingness to confront unequivocally the major anxiety of their people in their time. This, and not much else, is the essence of leadership.', u'We can safely abandon the doctrine of the eighties, namely that the rich were not working because they had too little money, the poor because they had much.', u'Economics is extremely useful as a form of employment for economists.', u'Politics is the art of choosing between the disastrous and the unpalatable.', u'Total physical and mental inertia are highly agreeable, much more so than we allow ourselves to imagine. A beach not only permits such inertia but enforces it, thus neatly eliminating all problems of guilt. It is now the only place in our overly active world that does.', u"Under capitalism, man exploits man. Under communism, it's just the opposite.", u'We all agree that pessimism is a mark of superior intellect.', u'The conventional view serves to protect us from the painful job of thinking.', u"Faced with the choice between changing one's mind and proving that there is no need to do so, almost everyone gets busy on the proof.", u'It is a far, far better thing to have a firm anchor in nonsense than to put out on the troubled seas of thought.', u'Liberalism is, I think, resurgent. One reason is that more and more people are so painfully aware of the alternative.', u'Few can believe that suffering, especially by others, is in vain. Anything that is disagreeable must surely have beneficial economic effects.', u'Humor is richly rewarding to the person who employs it. It has some value in gaining and holding attention, but it has no persuasive value at all.', u'More die in the United States of too much food than of too little.', u'The salary of the chief executive of a large corporation is not a market award for achievement. It is frequently in the nature of a warm personal gesture by the individual to himself.', u'In all life one should comfort the afflicted, but verily, also, one should afflict the comfortable, and especially when they are comfortably, contentedly, even happily wrong.', u'In economics, the majority is always wrong.', u'Nothing is so admirable in politics as a short memory.', u"A bad book is the worse that it cannot repent. It has not been the devil's policy to keep the masses of mankind in ignorance; but finding that they will read, he is doing all in his power to poison their books.", u'All successful revolutions are the kicking in of a rotten door.', u'In economics, hope and faith coexist with great scientific pretension and also a deep desire for respectability.', u'Modesty is a vastly overrated virtue.', u'The process by which banks create money is so simple that the mind is repelled.'], u'Ron Paul': [u'The moral and constitutional obligations of our representatives in Washington are to protect our liberty, not coddle the world, precipitating no-win wars, while bringing bankruptcy and economic turmoil to our people.', u'When the federal government spends more each year than it collects in tax revenues, it has three choices: It can raise taxes, print money, or borrow money. While these actions may benefit politicians, all three options are bad for average Americans.', u'I am just absolutely convinced that the best formula for giving us peace and preserving the American way of life is freedom, limited government, and minding our own business overseas.', u'If you like small government you need to work hard at having a strong national defense that is not so militant. Personal liberty is the purpose of government, to protect liberty - not to run your personal life, not to run the economy, and not to pretend that we can tell the world how they ought to live.', u'Believe me, the next step is a currency crisis because there will be a rejection of the dollar, the rejection of the dollar is a big, big event, and then your personal liberties are going to be severely threatened.', u"I will always vote what I have promised, and always vote the Constitution, as well as I will not vote for one single penny that isn't paid for, because debt is the monster, debt is what's going to eat us up and that is why our economy is on the brink.", u'A system of capitalism presumes sound money, not fiat money manipulated by a central bank. Capitalism cherishes voluntary contracts and interest rates that are determined by savings, not credit creation by a central bank.', u'Deficits mean future tax increases, pure and simple. Deficit spending should be viewed as a tax on future generations, and politicians who create deficits should be exposed as tax hikers.', u"I am absolutely opposed to a national ID card. This is a total contradiction of what a free society is all about. The purpose of government is to protect the secrecy and the privacy of all individuals, not the secrecy of government. We don't need a national ID card.", u'Another term for preventive war is aggressive war - starting wars because someday somebody might do something to us. That is not part of the American tradition.', u'Having federal officials, whether judges, bureaucrats, or congressmen, impose a new definition of marriage on the people is an act of social engineering profoundly hostile to liberty.', u"You wanna get rid of drug crime in this country? Fine, let's just get rid of all the drug laws.", u"1913 wasn't a very good year. 1913 gave us the income tax, the 16th amendment and the IRS.", u'Cliches about supporting the troops are designed to distract from failed policies, policies promoted by powerful special interests that benefit from war, anything to steer the discussion away from the real reasons the war in Iraq will not end anytime soon.', u"There is only one kind of freedom and that's individual liberty. Our lives come from our creator and our liberty comes from our creator. It has nothing to do with government granting it.", u'When one gets in bed with government, one must expect the diseases it spreads.', u"All initiation of force is a violation of someone else's rights, whether initiated by an individual or the state, for the benefit of an individual or group of individuals, even if it's supposed to be for the benefit of another individual or group of individuals.", u'Setting a good example is a far better way to spread ideals than through force of arms.', u"How did we win the election in the year 2000? We talked about a humble foreign policy: No nation-building; don't police the world. That's conservative, it's Republican, it's pro-American - it follows the founding fathers. And, besides, it follows the Constitution.", u'There is nothing wrong with describing Conservatism as protecting the Constitution, protecting all things that limit government. Government is the enemy of liberty. Government should be very restrained.', u'Prices are going up. Unemployment is continue to go up. And we have not had the necessary correction for the financial bubble created by our Federal Reserve system.', u"Of course I've already taken a very modest position on the monetary system, I do take the position that we should just end the Fed.", u'Everyone assumes America must play the leading role in crafting some settlement or compromise between the Israelis and the Palestinians. But Jefferson, Madison, and Washington explicitly warned against involving ourselves in foreign conflicts.', u'Legitimate use of violence can only be that which is required in self-defense.', u"I like Mitt Romney as a person. I think he's a dignified person. But I have no common ground on economics. He doesn't worry about the Federal Reserve. He doesn't worry about foreign policy. He doesn't talk about civil liberties, so I would have a hard time to expect him to ever invite me to campaign with him."], u'Voltaire': [u"I do not agree with what you have to say, but I'll defend to the death your right to say it.", u'Common sense is not so common.', u'Appreciation is a wonderful thing: It makes what is excellent in others belong to us as well.', u'God gave us the gift of life; it is up to us to give ourselves the gift of living well.', u'Faith consists in believing when it is beyond the power of reason to believe.', u'Anyone who has the power to make you believe absurdities has the power to make you commit injustices.', u'It is forbidden to kill; therefore all murderers are punished unless they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets.', u'I have never made but one prayer to God, a very short one: "O Lord make my enemies ridiculous." And God granted it.', u'Each player must accept the cards life deals him or her: but once they are in hand, he or she alone must decide how to play the cards in order to win the game.', u'Love is a canvas furnished by nature and embroidered by imagination.', u'Every man is guilty of all the good he did not do.', u'Stand upright, speak thy thoughts, declare The truth thou hast, that all may share; Be bold, proclaim it everywhere: They only live who dare.', u'Judge a man by his questions rather than his answers.', u'Life is thickly sown with thorns, and I know no other remedy than to pass quickly through them. The longer we dwell on our misfortunes, the greater is their power to harm us.', u'In general, the art of government consists of taking as much money as possible from one class of citizens to give to another.', u'All the reasonings of men are not worth one sentiment of women.', u'Those who can make you believe absurdities can make you commit atrocities.', u'All men are born with a nose and ten fingers, but no one was born with a knowledge of God.', u'God is a comedian, playing to an audience too afraid to laugh.', u'The instruction we find in books is like fire. We fetch it from our neighbours, kindle it at home, communicate it to others, and it becomes the property of all.', u'All murderers are punished unless they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets.', u"How pleasant it is for a father to sit at his child's board. It is like an aged man reclining under the shadow of an oak which he has planted.", u'As long as people believe in absurdities they will continue to commit atrocities.', u'I hate women because they always know where things are.', u'Of all religions, the Christian should of course inspire the most tolerance, but until now Christians have been the most intolerant of all men.'], u'Marcus Aurelius': [u'Everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact. Everything we see is a perspective, not the truth.', u'The sexual embrace can only be compared with music and with prayer.', u'When you arise in the morning, think of what a precious privilege it is to be alive - to breathe, to think, to enjoy, to love.', u'Accept the things to which fate binds you, and love the people with whom fate brings you together, but do so with all your heart.', u'The happiness of your life depends upon the quality of your thoughts: therefore, guard accordingly, and take care that you entertain no notions unsuitable to virtue and reasonable nature.', u'Our life is what our thoughts make it.', u'Confine yourself to the present.', u'A noble man compares and estimates himself by an idea which is higher than himself; and a mean man, by one lower than himself. The one produces aspiration; the other ambition, which is the way in which a vulgar man aspires.', u'The best revenge is to be unlike him who performed the injury.', u'Look within. Within is the fountain of good, and it will ever bubble up, if thou wilt ever dig.', u'The art of living is more like wrestling than dancing.', u'The object of life is not to be on the side of the majority, but to escape finding oneself in the ranks of the insane.', u'It is not death that a man should fear, but he should fear never beginning to live.', u'Very little is needed to make a happy life; it is all within yourself, in your way of thinking.', u'Do every act of your life as if it were your last.', u'You have power over your mind - not outside events. Realize this, and you will find strength.', u'Because a thing seems difficult for you, do not think it impossible for anyone to accomplish.', u"A man's worth is no greater than his ambitions.", u'Adapt yourself to the things among which your lot has been cast and love sincerely the fellow creatures with whom destiny has ordained that you shall live.', u'Dig within. Within is the wellspring of Good; and it is always ready to bubble up, if you just dig.', u'How much more grievous are the consequences of anger than the causes of it.', u'Anything in any way beautiful derives its beauty from itself and asks nothing beyond itself. Praise is no part of it, for nothing is made worse or better by praise.', u'Never let the future disturb you. You will meet it, if you have to, with the same weapons of reason which today arm you against the present.', u'Because your own strength is unequal to the task, do not assume that it is beyond the powers of man; but if anything is within the powers and province of man, believe that it is within your own compass also.', u'I have often wondered how it is that every man loves himself more than all the rest of men, but yet sets less value on his own opinions of himself than on the opinions of others.'], u'John Muir': [u'Climb the mountains and get their good tidings.', u'Everybody needs beauty as well as bread, places to play in and pray in, where nature may heal and give strength to body and soul.', u"Keep close to Nature's heart... and break clear away, once in awhile, and climb a mountain or spend a week in the woods. Wash your spirit clean.", u'In every walk with nature one receives far more than he seeks.', u'God has cared for these trees, saved them from drought, disease, avalanches, and a thousand tempests and floods. But he cannot save them from fools.', u'How glorious a greeting the sun gives the mountains!', u'The mountains are calling and I must go.', u'A few minutes ago every tree was excited, bowing to the roaring storm, waving, swirling, tossing their branches in glorious enthusiasm like worship. But though to the outer ear these trees are now silent, their songs never cease.', u'When we try to pick out anything by itself, we find it hitched to everything else in the universe.', u'The clearest way into the Universe is through a forest wilderness.', u'The power of imagination makes us infinite.', u'Trees go wandering forth in all directions with every wind, going and coming like ourselves, traveling with us around the sun two million miles a day, and through space heaven knows how fast and far!', u'To the lover of wilderness, Alaska is one of the most wonderful countries in the world.', u'The gross heathenism of civilization has generally destroyed nature, and poetry, and all that is spiritual.', u'Take a course in good water and air; and in the eternal youth of Nature you may renew your own. Go quietly, alone; no harm will befall you.', u"One may as well dam for water tanks the people's cathedrals and churches, for no holier temple has ever been consecrated by the heart of man.", u'I never saw a discontented tree. They grip the ground as though they liked it, and though fast rooted they travel about as far as we do.', u"There is that in the glance of a flower which may at times control the greatest of creation's braggart lords."], u'Barack Obama': [u"Change will not come if we wait for some other person or some other time. We are the ones we've been waiting for. We are the change that we seek.", u"Focusing your life solely on making a buck shows a certain poverty of ambition. It asks too little of yourself. Because it's only when you hitch your wagon to something larger than yourself that you realize your true potential.", u"We need to steer clear of this poverty of ambition, where people want to drive fancy cars and wear nice clothes and live in nice apartments but don't want to work hard to accomplish these things. Everyone should try to realize their full potential.", u'America and Islam are not exclusive and need not be in competition. Instead, they overlap, and share common principles of justice and progress, tolerance and the dignity of all human beings.', u'And I will do everything that I can as long as I am President of the United States to remind the American people that we are one nation under God, and we may call that God different names but we remain one nation.', u'It was the labor movement that helped secure so much of what we take for granted today. The 40-hour work week, the minimum wage, family leave, health insurance, Social Security, Medicare, retirement plans. The cornerstones of the middle-class security all bear the union label.', u"It's time to fundamentally change the way that we do business in Washington. To help build a new foundation for the 21st century, we need to reform our government so that it is more efficient, more transparent, and more creative. That will demand new thinking and a new sense of responsibility for every dollar that is spent.", u"The fact that we are here today to debate raising America's debt limit is a sign of leadership failure. America has a debt problem and a failure of leadership. Americans deserve better. I, therefore, intend to oppose the effort to increase America's debt.", u'It took a lot of blood, sweat and tears to get to where we are today, but we have just begun. Today we begin in earnest the work of making sure that the world we leave our children is just a little bit better than the one we inhabit today.', u"There is not a liberal America and a conservative America - there is the United States of America. There is not a black America and a white America and latino America and asian America - there's the United States of America.", u"We can't drive our SUVs and eat as much as we want and keep our homes on 72 degrees at all times... and then just expect that other countries are going to say OK. That's not leadership. That's not going to happen.", u"My family, frankly, they weren't folks who went to church every week. My mother was one of the most spiritual people I knew but she didn't raise me in the church, so I came to my Christian faith later in life and it was because the precepts of Jesus Christ spoke to me in terms of the kind of life that I would want to lead.", u"I believe marriage is between a man and a woman. I am not in favor of gay marriage. But when you start playing around with constitutions, just to prohibit somebody who cares about another person, it just seems to me that's not what America's about. Usually, our constitutions expand liberties, they don't contract them.", u'I consider it part of my responsibility as President of the United States to fight against negative stereotypes of Islam wherever they appear.', u"I've got two daughters. 9 years old and 6 years old. I am going to teach them first of all about values and morals. But if they make a mistake, I don't want them punished with a baby.", u"A good compromise, a good piece of legislation, is like a good sentence; or a good piece of music. Everybody can recognize it. They say, 'Huh. It works. It makes sense.'", u'And we can see the positive impacts right here at Solyndra. Less than a year ago, we were standing on what was an empty lot.But through the Recovery Act, this company received a loan to expand its operations. This new factory is the result of those loans.', u"Americans... still believe in an America where anything's possible - they just don't think their leaders do.", u'If the people cannot trust their government to do the job for which it exists - to protect them and to promote their common welfare - all else is lost.', u"If you're walking down the right path and you're willing to keep walking, eventually you'll make progress.", u'We have an obligation and a responsibility to be investing in our students and our schools. We must make sure that people who have the grades, the desire and the will, but not the money, can still get the best education possible.', u"But what we can do, as flawed as we are, is still see God in other people, and do our best to help them find their own grace. That's what I strive to do, that's what I pray to do every day.", u'I will cut taxes - cut taxes - for 95 percent of all working families, because, in an economy like this, the last thing we should do is raise taxes on the middle class.', u'After a century of striving, after a year of debate, after a historic vote, health care reform is no longer an unmet promise. It is the law of the land.', u"The thing about hip-hop today is it's smart, it's insightful. The way they can communicate a complex message in a very short space is remarkable."], u'John Lubbock': [u"Rest is not idleness, and to lie sometimes on the grass under trees on a summer's day, listening to the murmur of the water, or watching the clouds float across the sky, is by no means a waste of time.", u'Earth and sky, woods and fields, lakes and rivers, the mountain and the sea, are excellent schoolmasters, and teach some of us more than we can ever learn from books.', u'A day of worry is more exhausting than a week of work.', u'What we see depends mainly on what we look for.', u'Happiness is a thing to be practiced, like the violin.', u'Sunsets are so beautiful that they almost seem as if we were looking through the gates of Heaven.', u'A wise system of education will at last teach us how little man yet knows, how much he has still to learn.', u'If we are ever in doubt about what to do, it is a good rule to ask ourselves what we shall wish on the morrow that we had done.', u'Our duty is to believe that for which we have sufficient evidence, and to suspend our judgment when we have not.', u'The important thing is not so much that every child should be taught, as that every child should be given the wish to learn.', u'We often hear of people breaking down from overwork, but in nine out of ten they are really suffering from worry or anxiety.', u'When we have done our best, we should wait the result in peace.', u'Your character will be what you yourself choose to make it.'], u'Dale Carnegie': [u'Develop success from failures. Discouragement and failure are two of the surest stepping stones to success.', u'Feeling sorry for yourself, and your present condition, is not only a waste of energy but the worst habit you could possibly have.', u'Most of the important things in the world have been accomplished by people who have kept on trying when there seemed to be no hope at all.', u"Happiness doesn't depend on any external conditions, it is governed by our mental attitude.", u'One of the most tragic things I know about human nature is that all of us tend to put off living. We are all dreaming of some magical rose garden over the horizon instead of enjoying the roses that are blooming outside our windows today.', u"If you want to conquer fear, don't sit home and think about it. Go out and get busy.", u'Inaction breeds doubt and fear. Action breeds confidence and courage. If you want to conquer fear, do not sit home and think about it. Go out and get busy.', u'Are you bored with life? Then throw yourself into some work you believe in with all your heart, live for it, die for it, and you will find happiness that you had thought could never be yours.', u'Success is getting what you want. Happiness is wanting what you get.', u"If you can't sleep, then get up and do something instead of lying there worrying. It's the worry that gets you, not the lack of sleep.", u'People rarely succeed unless they have fun in what they are doing.', u'Flaming enthusiasm, backed up by horse sense and persistence, is the quality that most frequently makes for success.', u'When fate hands you a lemon, make lemonade.', u"It isn't what you have, or who you are, or where you are, or what you are doing that makes you happy or unhappy. It is what you think about.", u'The successful man will profit from his mistakes and try again in a different way.', u'Do the thing you fear to do and keep on doing it... that is the quickest and surest way ever yet discovered to conquer fear.', u"Remember happiness doesn't depend upon who you are or what you have; it depends solely on what you think.", u'When dealing with people, remember you are not dealing with creatures of logic, but creatures of emotion.', u'Instead of worrying about what people say of you, why not spend time trying to accomplish something they will admire.', u"Don't be afraid to give your best to what seemingly are small jobs. Every time you conquer one it makes you that much stronger. If you do the little jobs well, the big ones will tend to take care of themselves.", u'Today is life-the only life you are sure of. Make the most of today. Get interested in something. Shake yourself awake. Develop a hobby. Let the winds of enthusiasm sweep through you. Live today with gusto.', u'If you believe in what you are doing, then let nothing hold you up in your work. Much of the best work of the world has been done against seeming impossibilities. The thing is to get the work done.', u'Our fatigue is often caused not by work, but by worry, frustration and resentment.', u'There are four ways, and only four ways, in which we have contact with the world. We are evaluated and classified by these four contacts: what we do, how we look, what we say, and how we say it.', u"Fear doesn't exist anywhere except in the mind."], u'Francis of Assisi': [u'Preach the Gospel at all times and when necessary use words.', u"Start by doing what's necessary; then do what's possible; and suddenly you are doing the impossible.", u'For it is in giving that we receive.', u"If you have men who will exclude any of God's creatures from the shelter of compassion and pity, you will have men who will deal likewise with their fellow men.", u'It is no use walking anywhere to preach unless our walking is our preaching.', u'If God can work through me, he can work through anyone.', u'Lord, make me an instrument of thy peace. Where there is hatred, let me sow love.', u'Lord, grant that I might not so much seek to be loved as to love.', u'I have been all things unholy. If God can work through me, he can work through anyone.', u'While you are proclaiming peace with your lips, be careful to have it even more fully in your heart.', u'Above all the grace and the gifts that Christ gives to his beloved is that of overcoming self.', u'Where there is charity and wisdom, there is neither fear nor ignorance.', u'No one is to be called an enemy, all are your benefactors, and no one does you harm. You have no enemy except yourselves.', u"If a superior give any order to one who is under him which is against that man's conscience, although he do not obey it yet he shall not be dismissed.", u"It is not fitting, when one is in God's service, to have a gloomy face or a chilling look.", u'Where there is injury let me sow pardon.', u'Grant me the treasure of sublime poverty: permit the distinctive sign of our order to be that it does not possess anything of its own beneath the sun, for the glory of your name, and that it have no other patrimony than begging.', u'It is in pardoning that we are pardoned.'], u'Neil Armstrong': [u'This is one small step for a man, one giant leap for mankind.', u"It suddenly struck me that that tiny pea, pretty and blue, was the Earth. I put up my thumb and shut one eye, and my thumb blotted out the planet Earth. I didn't feel like a giant. I felt very, very small.", u"Mystery creates wonder and wonder is the basis of man's desire to understand.", u"I believe that every human has a finite number of heartbeats. I don't intend to waste any of mine running around doing exercises.", u"I believe every human has a finite number of heartbeats. I don't intend to waste any of mine.", u'The important achievement of Apollo was demonstrating that humanity is not forever chained to this planet and our visions go rather further than that and our opportunities are unlimited.', u"Well, I think we tried very hard not to be overconfident, because when you get overconfident, that's when something snaps up and bites you.", u'As a boy, because I was born and raised in Ohio, about 60 miles north of Dayton, the legends of the Wrights have been in my memories as long as I can remember.', u'Houston, Tranquillity Base here. The Eagle has landed.', u"I think we're going to the moon because it's in the nature of the human being to face challenges. It's by the nature of his deep inner soul... we're required to do these things just as salmon swim upstream.", u'Pilots take no special joy in walking. Pilots like flying.', u'I put up my thumb and it blotted out the planet Earth.', u'Science has not yet mastered prophecy. We predict too much for the next year and yet far too little for the next 10.', u'I guess we all like to be recognized not for one piece of fireworks, but for the ledger of our daily work.', u'I fully expected that, by the end of the century, we would have achieved substantially more than we actually did.', u"It's a brilliant surface in that sunlight. The horizon seems quite close to you because the curvature is so much more pronounced than here on earth. It's an interesting place to be. I recommend it.", u'Here men from the planet Earth first set foot upon the Moon. July 1969 AD. We came in peace for all mankind.', u'In much of society, research means to investigate something you do not know or understand.', u'I was elated, ecstatic and extremely surprised that we were successful.', u'Geologists have a saying - rocks remember.', u'Research is creating new knowledge.', u'I thought the attractions of being an astronaut were actually, not so much the Moon, but flying in a completely new medium.', u'The Eagle has landed.', u"Yeah, I wasn't chosen to be first. I was just chosen to command that flight. Circumstance put me in that particular role. That wasn't planned by anyone.", u'I am, and ever will be, a white socks, pocket protector, nerdy engineer.'], u'George Jean Nathan': [u'A man reserves his true and deepest love not for the species of woman in whose company he finds himself electrified and enkindled, but for that one in whose company he may feel tenderly drowsy.', u'Love is an emotion experienced by the many and enjoyed by the few.', u'Bad officials are the ones elected by good citizens who do not vote.', u'Love demands infinitely less than friendship.', u'No man can think clearly when his fists are clenched.', u'A man admires a woman not for what she says, but what she listens to.', u'Criticism is the windows and chandeliers of art: it illuminates the enveloping darkness in which art might otherwise rest only vaguely discernible, and perhaps altogether unseen.', u'The path of sound credence is through the thick forest of skepticism.', u"What passes for woman's intuition is often nothing more than man's transparency.", u"A man's wife is his compromise with the illusion of his first sweetheart.", u'Beauty makes idiots sad and wise men merry.', u'I drink to make other people interesting.', u"I know many married men, I even know a few happily married men, but I don't know one who wouldn't fall down the first open coal hole running after the first pretty girl who gave him a wink.", u'A life spent in constant labor is a life wasted, save a man be such a fool as to regard a fulsome obituary notice as ample reward.', u'To speak of morals in art is to speak of legislature in sex. Art is the sex of the imagination.', u"Whenever a man encounters a woman in a mood he doesn't understand, he wants to know if she's tired.", u'An optimist is a fellow who believes a housefly is looking for a way to get out.', u'Patriotism is often an arbitrary veneration of real estate above principles.', u'Politics is the diversion of trivial men who, when they succeed at it, become important in the eyes of more trivial men.', u'Common sense, in so far as it exists, is all for the bourgeoisie. Nonsense is the privilege of the aristocracy. The worries of the world are for the common people.', u"Criticism is the art of appraising others at one's own value.", u'Great art is as irrational as great music. It is mad with its own loveliness.', u'Love is the emotion that a woman feels always for a poodle dog and sometimes for a man.', u'An actor without a playwright is like a hole without a doughnut.', u'I have yet to find a man worth his salt in any direction who did not think of himself first and foremost.'], u'Jean-Jacques Rousseau': [u'Patience is bitter, but its fruit is sweet.', u'Absolute silence leads to sadness. It is the image of death.', u'Falsehood has an infinity of combinations, but truth has only one mode of being.', u'I may be no better, but at least I am different.', u'No man has any natural authority over his fellow men.', u'All of my misfortunes come from having thought too well of my fellows.', u'Although modesty is natural to man, it is not natural to children. Modesty only begins with the knowledge of evil.', u'Insults are the arguments employed by those who are in the wrong.', u'Every man has the right to risk his own life in order to preserve it. Has it ever been said that a man who throws himself out the window to escape from a fire is guilty of suicide?', u'People who know little are usually great talkers, while men who know much say little.', u'Gratitude is a duty which ought to be paid, but which none have a right to expect.', u'Nature never deceives us; it is we who deceive ourselves.', u'I hate books; they only teach us to talk about things we know nothing about.', u'The person who has lived the most is not the one with the most years but the one with the richest experiences.', u"We are born weak, we need strength; helpless, we need aid; foolish, we need reason. All that we lack at birth, all that we need when we come to man's estate, is the gift of education.", u'God made me and broke the mold.', u'A feeble body weakens the mind.', u'Every man has a right to risk his own life for the preservation of it.', u'You forget that the fruits belong to all and that the land belongs to no one.', u'Childhood is the sleep of reason.', u'Fame is but the breath of people, and that often unwholesome.', u'Happiness: a good bank account, a good cook, and a good digestion.', u'It is a mania shared by philosophers of all ages to deny what exists and to explain what does not exist.', u'The training of children is a profession, where we must know how to waste time in order to save it.', u'Whoever blushes is already guilty; true innocence is ashamed of nothing.'], u'Milton Friedman': [u'Concentrated power is not rendered harmless by the good intentions of those who create it.', u"If you put the federal government in charge of the Sahara Desert, in 5 years there'd be a shortage of sand.", u'We have a system that increasingly taxes work and subsidizes nonwork.', u'Only government can take perfectly good paper, cover it with perfectly good ink and make the combination worthless.', u'So that the record of history is absolutely crystal clear. That there is no alternative way, so far discovered, of improving the lot of the ordinary people that can hold a candle to the productive activities that are unleashed by a free enterprise system.', u'Many people want the government to protect the consumer. A much more urgent problem is to protect the consumer from the government.', u'The government solution to a problem is usually as bad as the problem.', u'The Great Depression, like most other periods of severe unemployment, was produced by government mismanagement rather than by any inherent instability of the private economy.', u"The world runs on individuals pursuing their self interests. The great achievements of civilization have not come from government bureaus. Einstein didn't construct his theory under order from a, from a bureaucrat. Henry Ford didn't revolutionize the automobile industry that way.", u"I am favor of cutting taxes under any circumstances and for any excuse, for any reason, whenever it's possible.", u'Every friend of freedom must be as revolted as I am by the prospect of turning the United States into an armed camp, by the vision of jails filled with casual drug users and of an army of enforcers empowered to invade the liberty of citizens on slight evidence.', u'Nothing is so permanent as a temporary government program.', u'Governments never learn. Only people learn.', u'The greatest advances of civilization, whether in architecture or painting, in science and literature, in industry or agriculture, have never come from centralized government.', u"And what does reward virtue? You think the communist commissar rewards virtue? You think a Hitler rewards virtue? You think, excuse me, if you'll pardon me, American presidents reward virtue? Do they choose their appointees on the basis of the virtue of the people appointed or on the basis of their political clout?", u'Most of the energy of political work is devoted to correcting the effects of mismanagement of government.', u'Inflation is taxation without legislation.', u'Inflation is the one form of taxation that can be imposed without legislation.', u'A major source of objection to a free economy is precisely that group thinks they ought to want. Underlying most arguments against the free market is a lack of belief in freedom itself.', u"I'm in favor of legalizing drugs. According to my values system, if people want to kill themselves, they have every right to do so. Most of the harm that comes from drugs is because they are illegal.", u'Most economic fallacies derive from the tendency to assume that there is a fixed pie, that one party can gain only at the expense of another.', u"The only way that has ever been discovered to have a lot of people cooperate together voluntarily is through the free market. And that's why it's so essential to preserving individual freedom.", u"There's no such thing as a free lunch.", u'Universities exist to transmit knowledge and understanding of ideas and values to students not to provide entertainment for spectators or employment for athletes.', u'The problem of social organization is how to set up an arrangement under which greed will do the least harm, capitalism is that kind of a system.'], u'e. e. cummings': [u'To be nobody but yourself in a world which is doing its best, night and day, to make you everybody else means to fight the hardest battle which any human being can fight; and never stop fighting.', u'I thank you God for this most amazing day, for the leaping greenly spirits of trees, and for the blue dream of sky and for everything which is natural, which is infinite, which is yes.', u'It takes courage to grow up and become who you really are.', u'Be of love a little more careful than of anything.', u'A wind has blown the rain away and blown the sky away and all the leaves away, and the trees stand. I think, I too, have known autumn too long.', u"America makes prodigious mistakes, America has colossal faults, but one thing cannot be denied: America is always on the move. She may be going to Hell, of course, but at least she isn't standing still.", u"Humanity I love you because when you're hard up you pawn your intelligence to buy a drink.", u"Unbeing dead isn't being alive.", u'The most wasted of all days is one without laughter.', u'Once we believe in ourselves, we can risk curiosity, wonder, spontaneous delight, or any experience that reveals the human spirit.', u"I'd rather learn from one bird how to sing than to teach ten thousand stars how not to dance.", u'Unless you love someone, nothing else makes any sense.', u"Listen; there's a hell of a good universe next door: let's go.", u'The world is mud-luscious and puddle-wonderful.', u'A politician is an arse upon which everyone has sat except a man.', u'Always the beautiful answer who asks a more beautiful question.', u"I'm living so far beyond my income that we may almost be said to be living apart.", u'I would rather learn from one bird how to sing than to teach 10,000 stars how not to dance.', u'I imagine that yes is the only living thing.', u'Kisses are a better fate than wisdom.', u"To like an individual because he's black is just as insulting as to dislike him because he isn't white.", u'Private property began the instant somebody had a mind of his own.', u'I like my body when it is with your body. It is so quite new a thing. Muscles better and nerves more.', u'It takes three to make a child.', u'Nothing recedes like progress.'], u'Aristotle': [u'Love is composed of a single soul inhabiting two bodies.', u'Hope is a waking dream.', u'A friend to all is a friend to none.', u"Anybody can become angry - that is easy, but to be angry with the right person and to the right degree and at the right time and for the right purpose, and in the right way - that is not within everybody's power and is not easy.", u'Friendship is a single soul dwelling in two bodies.', u'We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act, but a habit.', u'Democracy is when the indigent, and not the men of property, are the rulers.', u'It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it.', u'The most perfect political community is one in which the middle class is in control, and outnumbers both of the other classes.', u'A true friend is one soul in two bodies.', u'Happiness depends upon ourselves.', u'Excellence is an art won by training and habituation. We do not act rightly because we have virtue or excellence, but we rather have those because we have acted rightly. We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act but a habit.', u'I count him braver who overcomes his desires than him who conquers his enemies; for the hardest victory is over self.', u'You will never do anything in this world without courage. It is the greatest quality of the mind next to honor.', u'All human actions have one or more of these seven causes: chance, nature, compulsions, habit, reason, passion, desire.', u'The roots of education are bitter, but the fruit is sweet.', u'A tyrant must put on the appearance of uncommon devotion to religion. Subjects are less apprehensive of illegal treatment from a ruler whom they consider god-fearing and pious. On the other hand, they do less easily move against him, believing that he has the gods on his side.', u'Those who educate children well are more to be honored than they who produce them; for these only gave them life, those the art of living well.', u'Character may almost be called the most effective means of persuasion.', u'The aim of art is to represent not the outward appearance of things, but their inward significance.', u'Quality is not an act, it is a habit.', u'Wishing to be friends is quick work, but friendship is a slow ripening fruit.', u'The ultimate value of life depends upon awareness and the power of contemplation rather than upon mere survival.', u'My best friend is the man who in wishing me well wishes it for my sake.', u'At his best, man is the noblest of all animals; separated from law and justice he is the worst.'], u"Louis L'Amour": [u'Anger is a killing thing: it kills the man who angers, for each rage leaves him less than he had been before - it takes something from him.', u'A wise man fights to win, but he is twice a fool who has no plan for possible defeat.', u'All loose things seem to drift down to the sea, and so did I.', u'Nobody got anywhere in the world by simply being content.', u'There will come a time when you believe everything is finished. Yet that will be the beginning.', u'A good beginning makes a good end.', u"No memory is ever alone; it's at the end of a trail of memories, a dozen trails that each have their own associations.", u'To make democracy work, we must be a notion of participants, not simply observers. One who does not vote has no right to complain.', u'Too often I would hear men boast of the miles covered that day, rarely of what they had seen.', u'For one who reads, there is no limit to the number of lives that may be lived, for fiction, biography, and history offer an inexhaustible number of lives in many parts of the world, in all periods of time.', u'Victory is won not in miles but in inches. Win a little now, hold your ground, and later, win a little more.', u'He might never really do what he said, but at least he had it in mind. He had somewhere to go.', u'Knowledge is like money: to be of value it must circulate, and in circulating it can increase in quantity and, hopefully, in value.', u'No one can get an education, for of necessity education is a continuing process.', u'To disbelieve is easy; to scoff is simple; to have faith is harder.'], u'Saint Teresa of Avila': [u'Be gentle to all and stern with yourself.', u'The feeling remains that God is on the journey, too.', u'To have courage for whatever comes in life - everything lies in that.', u"We can only learn to know ourselves and do what we can - namely, surrender our will and fulfill God's will in us.", u'Our body has this defect that, the more it is provided care and comforts, the more needs and desires it finds.', u'Pain is never permanent.', u'There are more tears shed over answered prayers than over unanswered prayers.', u'God has been very good to me, for I never dwell upon anything wrong which a person has done, so as to remember it afterwards. If I do remember it, I always see some other virtue in that person.', u'God gave us faculties for our use; each of them will receive its proper reward. Then do not let us try to charm them to sleep, but permit them to do their work until divinely called to something higher.', u'To reach something good it is very useful to have gone astray, and thus acquire experience.', u'I do not fear Satan half so much as I fear those who fear him.', u'All things must come to the soul from its roots, from where it is planted.', u'It is here, my daughters, that love is to be found - not hidden away in corners but in the midst of occasions of sin. And believe me, although we may more often fail and commit small lapses, our gain will be incomparably the greater.', u'O my God, what must a soul be like when it is in this state! It longs to be all one tongue with which to praise the Lord. It utters a thousand pious follies, in a continuous endeavor to please Him who thus possesses it.', u'The tree that is beside the running water is fresher and gives more fruit.'], u'Rumi': [u'Everyone has been made for some particular work, and the desire for that work has been put in every heart.', u'Let the beauty of what you love be what you do.', u"Don't grieve. Anything you lose comes round in another form.", u'This is love: to fly toward a secret sky, to cause a hundred veils to fall each moment. First to let go of life. Finally, to take a step without feet.', u'Something opens our wings. Something makes boredom and hurt disappear. Someone fills the cup in front of us: We taste only sacredness.', u"It may be that the satisfaction I need depends on my going away, so that when I've gone and come back, I'll find it at home."], u'Napoleon Bonaparte': [u'Religion is what keeps the poor from murdering the rich.', u'A picture is worth a thousand words.', u'Impossible is a word to be found only in the dictionary of fools.', u'Never interrupt your enemy when he is making a mistake.', u'Great ambition is the passion of a great character. Those endowed with it may perform very good or very bad acts. All depends on the principles which direct them.', u'Ability is nothing without opportunity.', u'Women are nothing but machines for producing children.', u'A man will fight harder for his interests than for his rights.', u'Death is nothing, but to live defeated and inglorious is to die daily.', u'History is a set of lies agreed upon.', u'A leader is a dealer in hope.', u'A soldier will fight long and hard for a bit of colored ribbon.', u'Imagination rules the world.', u'A true man hates no one.', u'Never ascribe to malice that which is adequately explained by incompetence.', u'Courage is like love; it must have hope for nourishment.', u'A revolution can be neither made nor stopped. The only thing that can be done is for one of several of its children to give it a direction by dint of victories.', u'An army marches on its stomach.', u'I am sometimes a fox and sometimes a lion. The whole secret of government lies in knowing when to be the one or the other.', u'Men are moved by two levers only: fear and self interest.', u'If I had to choose a religion, the sun as the universal giver of life would be my god.', u'In politics stupidity is not a handicap.', u"The best way to keep one's word is not to give it.", u'A revolution is an idea which has found its bayonets.', u'A celebrated people lose dignity upon a closer view.'], u'Richard Bach': [u"Can miles truly separate you from friends... If you want to be with someone you love, aren't you already there?", u"If you love someone, set them free. If they come back they're yours; if they don't they never were.", u"Here is the test to find whether your mission on Earth is finished: if you're alive, it isn't.", u"The bond that links your true family is not one of blood, but of respect and joy in each other's life.", u"Don't be dismayed by good-byes. A farewell is necessary before you can meet again. And meeting again, after moments or lifetimes, is certain for those who are friends.", u'If your happiness depends on what somebody else does, I guess you do have a problem.', u'You are always free to change your mind and choose a different future, or a different past.', u"Don't believe what your eyes are telling you. All they show is limitation. Look with your understanding, find out what you already know, and you'll see the way to fly.", u"Argue for your limitations, and sure enough they're yours.", u'Your conscience is the measure of the honesty of your selfishness. Listen to it carefully.', u'What the caterpillar calls the end of the world the master calls a butterfly.', u'Every problem has a gift for you in its hands.', u'Your only obligation in any lifetime is to be true to yourself. Being true to anyone else or anything else is not only impossible, but the mark of a fake messiah.', u"There are no mistakes. The events we bring upon ourselves, no matter how unpleasant, are necessary in order to learn what we need to learn; whatever steps we take, they're necessary to reach the places we've chosen to go.", u"If it's never our fault, we can't take responsibility for it. If we can't take responsibility for it, we'll always be its victim.", u'The mark of your ignorance is the depth of your belief in injustice and tragedy. What the caterpillar calls the end of the world, the Master calls the butterfly.', u'Ask yourself the secret of your success. Listen to your answer, and practice it.', u'True love stories never have endings.', u'The best way to pay for a lovely moment is to enjoy it.', u'Every gift from a friend is a wish for your happiness.', u'Our soulmate is the one who makes life come to life.', u'I want to be very close to someone I respect and admire and have somebody who feels the same way about me.', u'Your friends will know you better in the first minute you meet than your acquaintances will know you in a thousand years.', u'Allow the world to live as it chooses, and allow yourself to live as you choose.', u"Avoid problems, and you'll never be the one who overcame them."], u'Dr. Seuss': [u"You have brains in your head. You have feet in your shoes. You can steer yourself in any direction you choose. You're on your own, and you know what you know. And you are the guy who'll decide where to go.", u"I like nonsense, it wakes up the brain cells. Fantasy is a necessary ingredient in living, it's a way of looking at life through the wrong end of a telescope. Which is what I do, and that enables you to laugh at life's realities.", u"Don't cry because it's over. Smile because it happened.", u'Today you are you! That is truer than true! There is no one alive who is you-er than you!', u"Unless someone like you cares a whole awful lot, nothing is going to get better. It's not.", u'How did it get so late so soon? Its night before its afternoon. December is here before its June. My goodness how the time has flewn. How did it get so late so soon?', u"Maybe Christmas, the Grinch thought, doesn't come from a store.", u'Think left and think right and think low and think high. Oh, the thinks you can think up if only you try!', u'Today was good. Today was fun. Tomorrow is another one.', u'You can get help from teachers, but you are going to have to learn a lot by yourself, sitting alone in a room.', u"A person's a person, no matter how small.", u'Adults are obsolete children.', u'From there to here, and here to there, funny things are everywhere.', u"When at last we are sure, You've been properly pilled, Then a few paper forms, Must be properly filled. So that you and your heirs, May be properly billed.", u"You're in pretty good shape for the shape you are in.", u'I meant what I said and I said what I meant.', u'Fun is good.', u'Preachers in pulpits talked about what a great message is in the book. No matter what you do, somebody always imputes meaning into your books.', u"You make 'em, I amuse 'em.", u'I start drawing, and eventually the characters involve themselves in a situation. Then in the end, I go back and try to cut out most of the preachments.'], u'Arthur Conan Doyle': [u"We can't command our love, but we can our actions.", u'My mind rebels at stagnation. Give me problems, give me work, give me the most abstruse cryptogram, or the most intricate analysis, and I am in my own proper atmosphere. But I abhor the dull routine of existence. I crave for mental exaltation.', u'Once you eliminate the impossible, whatever remains, no matter how improbable, must be the truth.', u'There is nothing more deceptive than an obvious fact.', u'Depend upon it there comes a time when for every addition of knowledge you forget something that you knew before. It is of the highest importance, therefore, not to have useless facts elbowing out the useful ones.', u'I have frequently gained my first real insight into the character of parents by studying their children.', u'It has long been an axiom of mine that the little things are infinitely the most important.', u'Any truth is better than indefinite doubt.', u"I consider that a man's brain originally is like a little empty attic, and you have to stock it with such furniture as you choose.", u'Of all ghosts the ghosts of our old loves are the worst.', u'When a doctor does go wrong he is the first of criminals. He has nerve and he has knowledge.', u'For strange effects and extraordinary combinations we must go to life itself, which is always far more daring than any effort of the imagination.', u'From a drop of water a logician could infer the possibility of an Atlantic or a Niagara without having seen or heard of one or the other.', u'His ignorance was as remarkable as his knowledge.', u'How often have I said to you that when you have eliminated the impossible, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth?', u'It is a capital mistake to theorize before one has data.', u'Where there is no imagination there is no horror.', u'A client is to me a mere unit, a factor in a problem.', u'A man should keep his little brain attic stocked with all the furniture that he is likely to use, and the rest he can put away in the lumber-room of his library, where he can get it if he wants it.', u'As a rule, said Holmes, the more bizarre a thing is the less mysterious it proves to be. It is your commonplace, featureless crimes which are really puzzling, just as a commonplace face is the most difficult to identify.', u'It is an old maxim of mine that when you have excluded the impossible, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth.', u'Nothing clears up a case so much as stating it to another person.', u'Our ideas must be as broad as Nature if they are to interpret Nature.', u'To the man who loves art for its own sake, it is frequently in its least important and lowliest manifestations that the keenest pleasure is to be derived.', u'When you have eliminated the impossible, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth.'], u'Pablo Picasso': [u'Action is the foundational key to all success.', u'Every child is an artist. The problem is how to remain an artist once we grow up.', u"My mother said to me, 'If you are a soldier, you will become a general. If you are a monk, you will become the Pope.' Instead, I was a painter, and became Picasso.", u'The purpose of art is washing the dust of daily life off our souls.', u'All children are artists. The problem is how to remain an artist once he grows up.', u'Never permit a dichotomy to rule your life, a dichotomy in which you hate what you do so you can have pleasure in your spare time. Look for a situation in which your work will give you as much happiness as your spare time.', u'Art washes away from the soul the dust of everyday life.', u'Good artists copy, great artists steal.', u'Our goals can only be reached through a vehicle of a plan, in which we must fervently believe, and upon which we must vigorously act. There is no other route to success.', u'I paint objects as I think them, not as I see them.', u"Are we to paint what's on the face, what's inside the face, or what's behind it?", u"The artist is a receptacle for emotions that come from all over the place: from the sky, from the earth, from a scrap of paper, from a passing shape, from a spider's web.", u'Only put off until tomorrow what you are willing to die having left undone.', u'God is really only another artist. He invented the giraffe, the elephant and the cat. He has no real style, He just goes on trying other things.', u'Computers are useless. They can only give you answers.', u'I am always doing that which I cannot do, in order that I may learn how to do it.', u'Every positive value has its price in negative terms... the genius of Einstein leads to Hiroshima.', u'Colors, like features, follow the changes of the emotions.', u"I'd like to live as a poor man with lots of money.", u'Love is the greatest refreshment in life.', u'It took me four years to paint like Raphael, but a lifetime to paint like a child.', u'Art is a lie that makes us realize truth.', u'It is your work in life that is the ultimate seduction.', u'There are only two types of women - goddesses and doormats.', u'Some painters transform the sun into a yellow spot, others transform a yellow spot into the sun.'], u'Francois de La Rochefoucauld': [u'Absence diminishes mediocre passions and increases great ones, as the wind extinguishes candles and fans fires.', u'True love is like ghosts, which everyone talks about and few have seen.', u'A true friend is the greatest of all blessings, and that which we take the least care of all to acquire.', u'Nothing is impossible; there are ways that lead to everything, and if we had sufficient will we should always have sufficient means. It is often merely for an excuse that we say things are impossible.', u'Hypocrisy is the homage vice pays to virtue.', u'One forgives to the degree that one loves.', u'Jealousy is bred in doubts. When those doubts change into certainties, then the passion either ceases or turns absolute madness.', u'We are so accustomed to disguise ourselves to others that in the end we become disguised to ourselves.', u'Jealousy contains more of self-love than of love.', u'Jealousy springs more from love of self than from love of another.', u'As great minds have the faculty of saying a great deal in a few words, so lesser minds have a talent of talking much, and saying nothing.', u'There is no disguise which can hide love for long where it exists, or simulate it where it does not.', u'We seldom find people ungrateful so long as it is thought we can serve them.', u'What men have called friendship is only a social arrangement, a mutual adjustment of interests, an interchange of services given and received; it is, in sum, simply a business from which those involved propose to derive a steady profit for their own self-love.', u'Jealousy lives upon doubts. It becomes madness or ceases entirely as soon as we pass from doubt to certainty.', u'People that are conceited of their own merit take pride in being unfortunate, that themselves and others may think them considerable enough to be the envy and the mark of fortune.', u'Few people have the wisdom to prefer the criticism that would do them good, to the praise that deceives them.', u'However rare true love may be, it is less so than true friendship.', u'We seldom find any person of good sense, except those who share our opinions.', u'Mediocre minds usually dismiss anything which reaches beyond their own understanding.', u'Passion makes idiots of the cleverest men, and makes the biggest idiots clever.', u'It is with true love as it is with ghosts; everyone talks about it, but few have seen it.', u'Not all those who know their minds know their hearts as well.', u'The man that thinks he loves his mistress for her own sake is mightily mistaken.', u'There is only one kind of love, but there are a thousand imitations.'], u'Epictetus': [u'The key is to keep company only with people who uplift you, whose presence calls forth your best.', u'Difficulties are things that show a person what they are.', u'Be careful to leave your sons well instructed rather than rich, for the hopes of the instructed are better than the wealth of the ignorant.', u'There is only one way to happiness and that is to cease worrying about things which are beyond the power of our will.', u'He is a wise man who does not grieve for the things which he has not, but rejoices for those which he has.', u"It's not what happens to you, but how you react to it that matters.", u"When you are offended at any man's fault, turn to yourself and study your own failings. Then you will forget your anger.", u'First learn the meaning of what you say, and then speak.', u'All religions must be tolerated... for every man must get to heaven in his own way.', u'People are not disturbed by things, but by the view they take of them.', u'We have two ears and one mouth so that we can listen twice as much as we speak.', u'Only the educated are free.', u'Wealth consists not in having great possessions, but in having few wants.', u'It is the nature of the wise to resist pleasures, but the foolish to be a slave to them.', u'If you want to improve, be content to be thought foolish and stupid.', u"It takes more than just a good looking body. You've got to have the heart and soul to go with it.", u'Do not seek to bring things to pass in accordance with your wishes, but wish for them as they are, and you will find them.', u"To accuse others for one's own misfortunes is a sign of want of education. To accuse oneself shows that one's education has begun. To accuse neither oneself nor others shows that one's education is complete.", u'Make the best use of what is in your power, and take the rest as it happens.', u'Imagine for yourself a character, a model personality, whose example you determine to follow, in private as well as in public.', u'First say to yourself what you would be; and then do what you have to do.', u'If you seek truth you will not seek victory by dishonorable means, and if you find truth you will become invincible.', u'The essence of philosophy is that a man should so live that his happiness shall depend as little as possible on external things.', u'If thy brother wrongs thee, remember not so much his wrong-doing, but more than ever that he is thy brother.', u'If evil be spoken of you and it be true, correct yourself, if it be a lie, laugh at it.'], u'Ernest Hemingway': [u'The world breaks everyone, and afterward, some are strong at the broken places.', u'There is no hunting like the hunting of man, and those who have hunted armed men long enough and liked it, never care for anything else thereafter.', u'The best way to find out if you can trust somebody is to trust them.', u"Always do sober what you said you'd do drunk. That will teach you to keep your mouth shut.", u'The first panacea for a mismanaged nation is inflation of the currency; the second is war. Both bring a temporary prosperity; both bring a permanent ruin. But both are the refuge of political and economic opportunists.', u"I love sleep. My life has the tendency to fall apart when I'm awake, you know?", u'Courage is grace under pressure.', u'An intelligent man is sometimes forced to be drunk to spend time with his fools.', u"Every man's life ends the same way. It is only the details of how he lived and how he died that distinguish one man from another.", u'Happiness in intelligent people is the rarest thing I know.', u'There is nothing to writing. All you do is sit down at a typewriter and bleed.', u'If you are lucky enough to have lived in Paris as a young man, then wherever you go for the rest of your life it stays with you, for Paris is a moveable feast.', u'About morals, I know only that what is moral is what you feel good after and what is immoral is what you feel bad after.', u'Never think that war, no matter how necessary, nor how justified, is not a crime.', u'I learned never to empty the well of my writing, but always to stop when there was still something there in the deep part of the well, and let it refill at night from the springs that fed it.', u'All things truly wicked start from innocence.', u'I like to listen. I have learned a great deal from listening carefully. Most people never listen.', u'A man can be destroyed but not defeated.', u'There is no lonelier man in death, except the suicide, than that man who has lived many years with a good wife and then outlived her. If two people love each other there can be no happy end to it.', u'The only thing that could spoil a day was people. People were always the limiters of happiness except for the very few that were as good as spring itself.', u'In modern war... you will die like a dog for no good reason.', u'All modern American literature comes from one book by Mark Twain called Huckleberry Finn.', u"To be a successful father... there's one absolute rule: when you have a kid, don't look at it for the first two years.", u'If a writer knows enough about what he is writing about, he may omit things that he knows. The dignity of movement of an iceberg is due to only one ninth of it being above water.', u'There is no friend as loyal as a book.'], u'Tupac Shakur': [u"It's the game of life. Do I win or do I lose? One day they're gonna shut the game down. I gotta have as much fun and go around the board as many times as I can before it's my turn to leave.", u'Reality is wrong. Dreams are for real.', u"My mama always used to tell me: 'If you can't find somethin' to live for, you best find somethin' to die for.'", u"I don't see myself being special; I just see myself having more responsibilities than the next man. People look to me to do things for them, to have answers.", u"All I'm trying to do is survive and make good out of the dirty, nasty, unbelievable lifestyle that they gave me.", u"I don't have no fear of death. My only fear is coming back reincarnated.", u'It seems like every time you come up something happens to bring you back down.', u'Is it a crime, to fight, for what is mine?', u"I think I'm a natural-born leader. I know how to bow down to authority if it's authority that I respect.", u"Don't change on me. Don't extort me unless you intend to do it forever.", u"I would rather have been shot straight-up in cold blood-but to be set up? By people who you trusted? That's bad.", u"I'm 23 years old. I might just be my mother's child, but in all reality, I'm everybody's child. Nobody raised me; I was raised in this society.", u'The only thing that comes to a sleeping man is dreams.', u"I'm a reflection of the community.", u'Thug Life to me is dead.', u"In my mind I'm a blind man doin' time.", u"It's a struggle for every young Black man. You know how it is, only God can judge us.", u'Somebody help me, tell me where to go from here cause even Thugs cry, but do the Lord care?', u'The only time I have problems is when I sleep.', u"I just don't know how to deal with so many people giving me that much affection. I never had that in my life.", u"I just spent 11 and a half months in a maximum-security jail, got shot five times, and was wrongly convicted of a crime I didn't commit.", u"I never killed anybody, I never raped anybody, I never committed no crimes that weren't honorable.", u'We all gonna die, we bleed from similar veins.', u"Dre was one of my heros in the music industry. If he's not down for his homeboys, I don't wanna be a part of him or around him.", u'Let the Lord judge the criminals.'], u'Dwight D. Eisenhower': [u'Every gun that is made, every warship launched, every rocket fired, signifies in the final sense a theft from those who hunger and are not fed, those who are cold and are not clothed.', u'In the councils of government, we must guard against the acquisition of unwarranted influence, whether sought or unsought, by the military-industrial complex. The potential for the disastrous rise of misplaced power exists and will persist.', u'The supreme quality for leadership is unquestionably integrity. Without it, no real success is possible, no matter whether it is on a section gang, a football field, in an army, or in an office.', u"If you want total security, go to prison. There you're fed, clothed, given medical care and so on. The only thing lacking... is freedom.", u'Leadership is the art of getting someone else to do something you want done because he wants to do it.', u'I think that people want peace so much that one of these days government had better get out of their way and let them have it.', u'A people that values its privileges above its principles soon loses both.', u'I hate war as only a soldier who has lived it can, only as one who has seen its brutality, its futility, its stupidity.', u'Plans are nothing; planning is everything.', u'The problem in defense is how far you can go without destroying from within what you are trying to defend from without.', u"There's no tragedy in life like the death of a child. Things never get back to the way they were.", u'Here in America we are descended in blood and in spirit from revolutionists and rebels - men and women who dare to dissent from accepted doctrine. As their heirs, may we never confuse honest dissent with disloyal subversion.', u'I despise people who go to the gutter on either the right or the left and hurl rocks at those in the center.', u"You don't lead by hitting people over the head - that's assault, not leadership.", u'This world of ours... must avoid becoming a community of dreadful fear and hate, and be, instead, a proud confederation of mutual trust and respect.', u'We will bankrupt ourselves in the vain search for absolute security.', u'An intellectual is a man who takes more words than necessary to tell more than he knows.', u'History does not long entrust the care of freedom to the weak or the timid.', u'Politics ought to be the part-time profession of every citizen who would protect the rights and privileges of free people and who would preserve what is good and fruitful in our national heritage.', u"If men can develop weapons that are so terrifying as to make the thought of global war include almost a sentence for suicide, you would think that man's intelligence and his comprehension... would include also his ability to find a peaceful solution.", u'In most communities it is illegal to cry "fire" in a crowded assembly. Should it not be considered serious international misconduct to manufacture a general war scare in an effort to achieve local political aims?', u'I like to believe that people in the long run are going to do more to promote peace than our governments. Indeed, I think that people want peace so much that one of these days governments had better get out of the way and let them have it.', u'Motivation is the art of getting people to do what you want them to do because they want to do it.', u'Whatever America hopes to bring to pass in the world must first come to pass in the heart of America.', u'Our forces saved the remnants of the Jewish people of Europe for a new life and a new hope in the reborn land of Israel. Along with all men of good will, I salute the young state and wish it well.'], u'Donald Trump': [u'Everything in life is luck.', u"Part of being a winner is knowing when enough is enough. Sometimes you have to give up the fight and walk away, and move on to something that's more productive.", u"I like thinking big. If you're going to be thinking anything, you might as well think big.", u"Experience taught me a few things. One is to listen to your gut, no matter how good something sounds on paper. The second is that you're generally better off sticking with what you know. And the third is that sometimes your best investments are the ones you don't make.", u'As long as your going to be thinking anyway, think big.', u"It's tangible, it's solid, it's beautiful. It's artistic, from my standpoint, and I just love real estate.", u'Money was never a big motivation for me, except as a way to keep score. The real excitement is playing the game.', u"I have made the tough decisions, always with an eye toward the bottom line. Perhaps it's time America was run like a business.", u'You have to think anyway, so why not think big?', u"I try to learn from the past, but I plan for the future by focusing exclusively on the present. That's were the fun is.", u'Sometimes by losing a battle you find a new way to win the war.', u'When somebody challenges you, fight back. Be brutal, be tough.', u'What separates the winners from the losers is how a person reacts to each new twist of fate.', u"It's always good to be underestimated.", u"With out passion you don't have energy, with out energy you have nothing.", u"I'm a bit of a P. T. Barnum. I make stars out of everyone.", u"One of the key problems today is that politics is such a disgrace, good people don't go into government.", u"Sometimes your best investments are the ones you don't make.", u"China gets their oil from Libya. Why isn't China involved? They're going out spending billions of dollars a day on trying to take over the world economically. And we're spending billions and billions and billions of dollars on policing the world. Why isn't China involved with Libya? That - we don't get oil from Libya, China does.", u"In the end, you're measured not by how much you undertake but by what you finally accomplish.", u'A certificate of live birth is not the same thing by any stretch of the imagination as a birth certificate.', u'Love him or hate him, Trump is a man who is certain about what he wants and sets out to get it, no holds barred. Women find his power almost as much of a turn-on as his money.', u"Well, real estate is always good, as far as I'm concerned.", u'Anyone who thinks my story is anywhere near over is sadly mistaken.', u'I mean, there\'s no arguing. There is no anything. There is no beating around the bush. "You\'re fired" is a very strong term.'], u'Baltasar Gracian': [u'True friendship multiplies the good in life and divides its evils. Strive to have friends, for life without friends is like life on a desert island... to find one real friend in a lifetime is good fortune; to keep him is a blessing.', u'Friendship multiplies the good of life and divides the evil.', u'A single lie destroys a whole reputation of integrity.', u"Don't show off every day, or you'll stop surprising people. There must always be some novelty left over. The person who displays a little more of it each day keeps up expectations, and no one ever discovers the limits of his talent.", u'Better mad with the rest of the world than wise alone.', u'The wise does at once what the fool does at last.', u'Dreams will get you nowhere, a good kick in the pants will take you a long way.', u'Never have a companion that casts you in the shade.', u'Always leave something to wish for; otherwise you will be miserable from your very happiness.', u'Know or listen to those who know.', u'Never do anything when you are in a temper, for you will do everything wrong.', u'At twenty a man is a peacock, at thirty a lion, at forty a camel, at fifty a serpent, at sixty a dog, at seventy an ape, at eighty a nothing at all.', u"Fortunate people often have very favorable beginnings and very tragic endings. What matters isn't being applauded when you arrive - for that is common - but being missed when you leave.", u'Attempt easy tasks as if they were difficult, and difficult as if they were easy; in the one case that confidence may not fall asleep, in the other that it may not be dismayed.', u'Never contend with a man who has nothing to lose.', u'A wise man gets more use from his enemies than a fool from his friends.', u'Respect yourself if you would have others respect you.', u'Even knowledge has to be in the fashion, and where it is not, it is wise to affect ignorance.', u'A beautiful woman should break her mirror early.', u'Let the first impulse pass, wait for the second.', u"Quit while you're ahead. All the best gamblers do.", u'A man of honour should never forget what he is because he sees what others are.', u'Aspire rather to be a hero than merely appear one.', u'Be content to act, and leave the talking to others.', u'Great ability develops and reveals itself increasingly with every new assignment.'], u'Lana Turner': [u'A successful man is one who makes more money than his wife can spend. A successful woman is one who can find such a man.', u'A gentleman is simply a patient wolf.', u"It's said in Hollywood that you should always forgive your enemies - because you never know when you'll have to work with them.", u"I've always loved a challenge.", u'I would rather lose a good earring than be caught without make-up.', u"Humor has been the balm of my life, but it's been reserved for those close to me, not part of the public Lana.", u"I'm so gullible. I'm so damn gullible. And I am so sick of me being gullible.", u'My life has been a series of emergencies.', u"The truth is, sex doesn't mean that much to me now."], u'Leo Tolstoy': [u'Everyone thinks of changing the world, but no one thinks of changing himself.', u'All, everything that I understand, I understand only because I love.', u'A man can live and be healthy without killing animals for food; therefore, if he eats meat, he participates in taking animal life merely for the sake of his appetite.', u'All happy families resemble one another, each unhappy family is unhappy in its own way.', u'If you want to be happy, be.', u"I sit on a man's back, choking him and making him carry me, and yet assure myself and others that I am very sorry for him and wish to ease his lot by all possible means - except by getting off his back.", u'It is amazing how complete is the delusion that beauty is goodness.', u'Government is an association of men who do violence to the rest of us.', u'Music is the shorthand of emotion.', u'The two most powerful warriors are patience and time.', u'The changes in our life must come from the impossibility to live otherwise than according to the demands of our conscience not from our mental resolution to try a new form of life.', u'Without knowing what I am and why I am here, life is impossible.', u'Boredom: the desire for desires.', u'Faith is the sense of life, that sense by virtue of which man does not destroy himself, but continues to live on. It is the force whereby we live.', u'Art is not a handicraft, it is the transmission of feeling the artist has experienced.', u'The sole meaning of life is to serve humanity.', u'If so many men, so many minds, certainly so many hearts, so many kinds of love.', u'In the name of God, stop a moment, cease your work, look around you.', u"To say that a work of art is good, but incomprehensible to the majority of men, is the same as saying of some kind of food that it is very good but that most people can't eat it.", u'In all history there is no war which was not hatched by the governments, the governments alone, independent of the interests of the people, to whom war is always pernicious even when successful.', u'One of the first conditions of happiness is that the link between Man and Nature shall not be broken.', u'True life is lived when tiny changes occur.', u'Even in the valley of the shadow of death, two and two do not make six.', u'Historians are like deaf people who go on answering questions that no one has asked them.', u'Truth, like gold, is to be obtained not by its growth, but by washing away from it all that is not gold.'], u'John Adams': [u'Facts are stubborn things; and whatever may be our wishes, our inclinations, or the dictates of our passions, they cannot alter the state of facts and evidence.', u'Democracy... while it lasts is more bloody than either aristocracy or monarchy. Remember, democracy never lasts long. It soon wastes, exhausts, and murders itself. There is never a democracy that did not commit suicide.', u'Our Constitution was made only for a moral and religious people. It is wholly inadequate to the government of any other.', u'All the perplexities, confusion and distress in America arise, not from defects in their Constitution or Confederation, not from want of honor or virtue, so much as from the downright ignorance of the nature of coin, credit and circulation.', u'Remember, democracy never lasts long. It soon wastes, exhausts, and murders itself. There never was a democracy yet that did not commit suicide.', u"Power always thinks... that it is doing God's service when it is violating all his laws.", u'Let us tenderly and kindly cherish, therefore, the means of knowledge. Let us dare to read, think, speak, and write.', u"Because power corrupts, society's demands for moral authority and character increase as the importance of the position increases.", u'I must study politics and war that my sons may have liberty to study mathematics and philosophy.', u'The Hebrews have done more to civilize men than any other nation. If I were an atheist, and believed blind eternal fate, I should still believe that fate had ordained the Jews to be the most essential instrument for civilizing the nations.', u'There is danger from all men. The only maxim of a free government ought to be to trust no man living with power to endanger the public liberty.', u'Abuse of words has been the great instrument of sophistry and chicanery, of party, faction, and division of society.', u'Fear is the foundation of most governments.', u'A desire to be observed, considered, esteemed, praised, beloved, and admired by his fellows is one of the earliest as well as the keenest dispositions discovered in the heart of man.', u'Liberty cannot be preserved without general knowledge among the people.', u'When people talk of the freedom of writing, speaking or thinking I cannot choose but laugh. No such thing ever existed. No such thing now exists; but I hope it will exist. But it must be hundreds of years after you and I shall write and speak no more.', u'A government of laws, and not of men.', u'I always consider the settlement of America with reverence and wonder, as the opening of a grand scene and design in providence, for the illumination of the ignorant and the emancipation of the slavish part of mankind all over the earth.', u'Old minds are like old horses; you must exercise them if you wish to keep them in working order.', u'The happiness of society is the end of government.', u'I have accepted a seat in the House of Representatives, and thereby have consented to my own ruin, to your ruin, and to the ruin of our children. I give you this warning that you may prepare your mind for your fate.', u'In politics the middle way is none at all.', u'The fundamental law of the militia is, that it be created, directed and commanded by the laws, and ever for the support of the laws.', u'Liberty, according to my metaphysics is a self-determining power in an intellectual agent. It implies thought and choice and power.', u'Great is the guilt of an unnecessary war.'], u'James A. Baldwin': [u'Love does not begin and end the way we seem to think it does. Love is a battle, love is a war; love is a growing up.', u'I love America more than any other country in this world, and, exactly for this reason, I insist on the right to criticize her perpetually.', u'People pay for what they do, and still more for what they have allowed themselves to become. And they pay for it very simply; by the lives they lead.', u'Love takes off masks that we fear we cannot live without and know we cannot live within.', u'Children have never been very good at listening to their elders, but they have never failed to imitate them.', u'Love him and let him love you. Do you think anything else under heaven really matters?', u'The most dangerous creation of any society is the man who has nothing to lose.', u'I imagine one of the reasons people cling to their hates so stubbornly is because they sense, once hate is gone, they will be forced to deal with pain.', u"Fires can't be made with dead embers, nor can enthusiasm be stirred by spiritless men. Enthusiasm in our daily work lightens effort and turns even labor into pleasant tasks.", u'If the relationship of father to son could really be reduced to biology, the whole earth would blaze with the glory of fathers and sons.', u'There is never time in the future in which we will work out our salvation. The challenge is in the moment; the time is always now.', u'Be careful what you set your heart upon - for it will surely be yours.', u'Anyone who has ever struggled with poverty knows how extremely expensive it is to be poor.', u"Everybody's journey is individual. If you fall in love with a boy, you fall in love with a boy. The fact that many Americans consider it a disease says more about them than it does about homosexuality.", u'It is certain, in any case, that ignorance, allied with power, is the most ferocious enemy justice can have.', u'A child cannot be taught by anyone who despises him, and a child cannot afford to be fooled.', u'It is very nearly impossible... to become an educated person in a country so distrustful of the independent mind.', u'I am what time, circumstance, history, have made of me, certainly, but I am also, much more than that. So are we all.', u'People who treat other people as less than human must not be surprised when the bread they have cast on the waters comes floating back to them, poisoned.', u'The paradox of education is precisely this - that as one begins to become conscious one begins to examine the society in which he is being educated.', u'Hatred, which could destroy so much, never failed to destroy the man who hated, and this was an immutable law.', u"The power of the white world is threatened whenever a black man refuses to accept the white world's definitions.", u'American history is longer, larger, more various, more beautiful, and more terrible than anything anyone has ever said about it.', u"I've always believed that you can think positive just as well as you can think negative.", u'No one can possibly know what is about to happen: it is happening, each time, for the first time, for the only time.'], u'Abdul Kalam': [u'If a country is to be corruption free and become a nation of beautiful minds, I strongly feel there are three key societal members who can make a difference. They are the father, the mother and the teacher.', u'Climbing to the top demands strength, whether it is to the top of Mount Everest or to the top of your career.', u'God, our Creator, has stored within our minds and personalities, great potential strength and ability. Prayer helps us tap and develop these powers.', u'Look at the sky. We are not alone. The whole universe is friendly to us and conspires only to give the best to those who dream and work.', u'Educationists should build the capacities of the spirit of inquiry, creativity, entrepreneurial and moral leadership among students and become their role model.', u'You have to dream before your dreams can come true.', u'Man needs his difficulties because they are necessary to enjoy success.', u'Let us sacrifice our today so that our children can have a better tomorrow.', u'As a child of God, I am greater than anything that can happen to me.', u'Tell me, why is the media here so negative? Why are we in India so embarrassed to recognise our own strengths, our achievements? We are such a great nation. We have so many amazing success stories but we refuse to acknowledge them. Why?', u'Be more dedicated to making solid achievements than in running after swift but synthetic happiness.', u'If we are not free, no one will respect us.', u'English is necessary as at present original works of science are in English. I believe that in two decades times original works of science will start coming out in our languages. Then we can move over like the Japanese.', u'To succeed in your mission, you must have single-minded devotion to your goal.', u'Great dreams of great dreamers are always transcended.', u'Do we not realize that self respect comes with self reliance?', u'It means, people who are in high and responsible positions, if they go against righteousness, righteousness itself will get transformed into a destroyer.', u'Life is a difficult game. You can win it only by retaining your birthright to be a person.', u"I was willing to accept what I couldn't change.", u'In India we only read about death, sickness, terrorism, crime.', u'Those who cannot work with their hearts achieve but a hollow, half-hearted success that breeds bitterness all around.', u'We should not give up and we should not allow the problem to defeat us.', u'Why are we, as a nation so obsessed with foreign things? Is it a legacy of our colonial years? We want foreign television sets. We want foreign shirts. We want foreign technology. Why this obsession with everything imported?', u'No religion has mandated killing others as a requirement for its sustenance or promotion.', u'My message, especially to young people is to have courage to think differently, courage to invent, to travel the unexplored path, courage to discover the impossible and to conquer the problems and succeed. These are great qualities that they must work towards. This is my message to the young people.'], u'Rush Limbaugh': [u"Being stuck is a position few of us like. We want something new but cannot let go of the old - old ideas, beliefs, habits, even thoughts. We are out of contact with our own genius. Sometimes we know we are stuck; sometimes we don't. In both cases we have to DO something.", u"Obama's health care plan will be written by a committee whose head, John Conyers, says he doesn't understand it. It'll be passed by Congress that has not read it, signed by a president who smokes, funded by a Treasury chief who didn't pay his taxes, overseen by a Surgeon General who is obese, and financed by a country that's nearly broke. What could possibly go wrong?", u"This is a frightening statistic. More people vote in 'American Idol' than in any US election.", u"The more dependent you are, the more ignorant you must be, and that's how they want you.", u"The future is not Big Government. Self-serving politicians. Powerful bureaucrats. This has been tried, tested throughout history. The result has always been disaster. President Obama, your agenda is not new. It's not change, and it's not hope.", u"You know why there's a Second Amendment? In case the government fails to follow the first one.", u'No nation ever taxed itself into prosperity.', u'Enraging liberals is simply one of the more enjoyable side effects of my wisdom.', u'Our nation was created in ways that allow human potential to prosper, and it created the greatest nation for people in the history of humanity. Now Obama is dismantling it, because he has no appreciation for our greatness. In fact, he resents it. He blames this country for whatever evils he sees around the world.', u"Police and firefighters are great, but they don't create wealth. They protect it. That's crucial. Teaching is a wonderful profession. Teachers help educate people to become good citizens so that citizens can then go create wealth. But they don't create the wealth themselves.", u'The truth does not require a majority to prevail, ladies and gentlemen. The truth is its own power. The truth will out. Never forget that.', u"How can people be so stupid? I marvel at that. See, I think you have to work as being ignorant - and if you're gonna work at being ignorant, why not work at being informed?", u"Let me tell you who we conservatives are: we love people. When we look out over the United States of America, when we are anywhere, when we see a group of people, such as this or anywhere, we see Americans. We see human beings. We don't see groups. We don't see victims.", u"None of what Barack Obama is doing or wants to do to this country is anything the rest of the world hasn't seen before and already failed at.", u"The message that President Obama delivered in his speech at Notre Dame was: morality is immoral. Pro-life is the extremist position, not a moral position. Yet we should compromise and work to reduce abortions. Where's the compromise between life and death - and why work to reduce the number of them occurring if there's nothing wrong with them?", u"Everything about the left is perception, manipulation, and lies. Everything. Everything is 'Wag the Dog.' Everything is a structured deception.", u'Folks, the most insidious part of this whole health care scheme is that all of these vast medical expenditures will become nothing more than government budget items. We individuals will no longer exist. The relationship between a government and citizen will change forever.', u'So what is so strange about saying I want Barack Obama to fail if his mission is to reconstruct and reform this nation so that capitalism and individual liberty are not its foundation? I want the country to survive. I want the country to succeed.', u"There's such cultural rot taking place, such a disintegration throughout our culture. Values, morality, you name it. Standards have been relaxed, and people are not being held to them. People's intentions, if they're said to be good and honorable, that's all that matters.", u'Football is like life and I know life.', u'If Thomas Jefferson thought taxation without representation was bad, he should see how it is with representation.', u"Let me tell you the polls that count, and those are the polls a couple of weeks before the election. That's when the pollsters worry about holding onto their credibility. Those are the polls that everybody remembers.", u'A loyal liberal can get away with anything with other liberals, as long as that loyal liberal is liberal and attacks conservatives left and right, spouts the right words, they get away with anything.', u"Barack Obama's enemies are the people who make this country work. Barack Obama's enemies are those who succeed. Those are the people whose income he wants to redistribute. Those are the people whose income he wants to take, using the power and the force of the federal government to do it.", u'Character matters; leadership descends from character.'], u'George Eliot': [u'It is never too late to be what you might have been.', u'I like not only to be loved, but also to be told I am loved.', u'Our dead are never dead to us, until we have forgotten them.', u'Delicious autumn! My very soul is wedded to it, and if I were a bird I would fly about the earth seeking the successive autumns.', u'Anger and jealousy can no more bear to lose sight of their objects than love.', u'Blessed is the influence of one true, loving human soul on another.', u'Animals are such agreeable friends - they ask no questions; they pass no criticisms.', u'Adventure is not outside man; it is within.', u"Life began with waking up and loving my mother's face.", u'What greater thing is there for two human souls than to feel that they are joined - to strengthen each other - to be at one with each other in silent unspeakable memories.', u'Failure after long perseverance is much grander than never to have a striving good enough to be called a failure.', u'It seems to me we can never give up longing and wishing while we are thoroughly alive. There are certain things we feel to be beautiful and good, and we must hunger after them.', u'The golden moments in the stream of life rush past us, and we see nothing but sand; the angels come to visit us, and we only know them when they are gone.', u"If we had a keen vision of all that is ordinary in human life, it would be like hearing the grass grow or the squirrel's heart beat, and we should die of that roar which is the other side of silence.", u'We must not sit still and look for miracles; up and doing, and the Lord will be with thee. Prayer and pains, through faith in Christ Jesus, will do anything.', u'Jealousy is never satisfied with anything short of an omniscience that would detect the subtlest fold of the heart.', u'There is a sort of jealousy which needs very little fire; it is hardly a passion, but a blight bred in the cloudy, damp despondency of uneasy egoism.', u'An election is coming. Universal peace is declared, and the foxes have a sincere interest in prolonging the lives of the poultry.', u'But what we call our despair is often only the painful eagerness of unfed hope.', u'The years between fifty and seventy are the hardest. You are always being asked to do things, and yet you are not decrepit enough to turn them down.', u'The world is full of hopeful analogies and handsome, dubious eggs, called possibilities.', u'What do we live for, if not to make life less difficult for each other?', u'It will never rain roses: when we want to have more roses we must plant more trees.', u'Little children are still the symbol of the eternal marriage between love and duty.', u'There is no despair so absolute as that which comes with the first moments of our first great sorrow, when we have not yet known what it is to have suffered and be healed, to have despaired and have recovered hope.'], u'W. Clement Stone': [u'There is little difference in people, but that little difference makes a big difference. The little difference is attitude. The big difference is whether it is positive or negative.', u'Be careful the environment you choose for it will shape you; be careful the friends you choose for you will become like them.', u'Have the courage to say no. Have the courage to face the truth. Do the right thing because it is right. These are the magic keys to living your life with integrity.', u'Like success, failure is many things to many people. With Positive Mental Attitude, failure is a learning experience, a rung on the ladder, a plateau at which to get your thoughts in order and prepare to try again.', u'If you are really thankful, what do you do? You share.', u'Aim for the moon. If you miss, you may hit a star.', u'Whatever the mind of man can conceive and believe, it can achieve.', u'You are a product of your environment. So choose the environment that will best develop you toward your objective. Analyze your life in terms of its environment. Are the things around you helping you toward success - or are they holding you back?', u'Every great man, every successful man, no matter what the field of endeavor, has known the magic that lies in these words: every adversity has the seed of an equivalent or greater benefit.', u'All personal achievement starts in the mind of the individual. Your personal achievement starts in your mind. The first step is to know exactly what your problem, goal or desire is.', u'Truth will always be truth, regardless of lack of understanding, disbelief or ignorance.', u'What contemptible scoundrel has stolen the cork to my lunch?', u'You always do what you want to do. This is true with every act. You may say that you had to do something, or that you were forced to, but actually, whatever you do, you do by choice. Only you have the power to choose for yourself.', u'Everyone who achieves success in a great venture, solves each problem as they came to it. They helped themselves. And they were helped through powers known and unknown to them at the time they set out on their voyage. They keep going regardless of the obstacles they met.', u'Your most precious, valued possessions and your greatest powers are invisible and intangible. No one can take them. You, and you alone, can give them. You will receive abundance for your giving.', u'Success is achieved and maintained by those who try and keep trying.', u'You affect your subconscious mind by verbal repetition.', u'Regardless of who you are or what you have been, you can be what you want to be.', u"When you do the wrong thing, knowing it is wrong, you do so because you haven't developed the habit of effectively controlling or neutralizing strong inner urges that tempt you, or because you have established the wrong habit and don't know how to eliminate them effectively.", u'Try, try, try, and keep on trying is the rule that must be followed to become an expert in anything.', u'Be careful the friends you choose for you will become like them.', u'Sales are contingent upon the attitude of the salesman - not the attitude of the prospect.', u'Prayer is mans greatest power!', u'All I want to do is change the world.', u'Bondage is - subjection to external influences and internal negative thoughts and attitudes.'], u'Sai Baba': [u'Life is a song - sing it. Life is a game - play it. Life is a challenge - meet it. Life is a dream - realize it. Life is a sacrifice - offer it. Life is love - enjoy it.', u'Love one another and help others to rise to the higher levels, simply by pouring out love. Love is infectious and the greatest healing energy.', u'What matters is to live in the present, live now, for every moment is now. It is your thoughts and acts of the moment that create your future. The outline of your future path already exists, for you created its pattern by your past.', u'Do not be misled by what you see around you, or be influenced by what you see. You live in a world which is a playground of illusion, full of false paths, false values and false ideals. But you are not part of that world.', u'All action results from thought, so it is thoughts that matter.', u'A house must be built on solid foundations if it is to last. The same principle applies to man, otherwise he too will sink back into the soft ground and becomes swallowed up by the world of illusion.', u'Man learns through experience, and the spiritual path is full of different kinds of experiences. He will encounter many difficulties and obstacles, and they are the very experiences he needs to encourage and complete the cleansing process.', u'Let love flow so that it cleanses the world. Then man can live in peace, instead of the state of turmoil he has created through his past ways of life, with all those material interests and earthly ambitions.', u'You must be a lotus, unfolding its petals when the sun rises in the sky, unaffected by the slush where it is born or even the water which sustains it!', u'You must pass your days in song. Let your whole life be a song.', u'Man is lost and is wandering in a jungle where real values have no meaning. Real values can have meaning to man only when he steps on to the spiritual path, a path where negative emotions have no use.', u'What is new in the world? Nothing. What is old in the world? Nothing. Everything has always been and will always be.', u'Look out into the universe and contemplate the glory of God. Observe the stars, millions of them, twinkling in the night sky, all with a message of unity, part of the very nature of God.', u'The life ahead can only be glorious if you learn to live in total harmony with the Lord.', u'Man seeks to change the foods available in nature to suit his tastes, thereby putting an end to the very essence of life contained in them.'], u'Arthur Schopenhauer': [u'All truth passes through three stages. First, it is ridiculed. Second, it is violently opposed. Third, it is accepted as being self-evident.', u'Talent hits a target no one else can hit; Genius hits a target no one else can see.', u'Each day is a little life: every waking and rising a little birth, every fresh morning a little youth, every going to rest and sleep a little death.', u'Every man takes the limits of his own field of vision for the limits of the world.', u'Change alone is eternal, perpetual, immortal.', u'Hatred is an affair of the heart; contempt that of the head.', u'They tell us that suicide is the greatest piece of cowardice... that suicide is wrong; when it is quite obvious that there is nothing in the world to which every man has a more unassailable title than to his own life and person.', u'Almost all of our sorrows spring out of our relations with other people.', u'After your death you will be what you were before your birth.', u'The two enemies of human happiness are pain and boredom.', u'Boredom is just the reverse side of fascination: both depend on being outside rather than inside a situation, and one leads to the other.', u'Money is human happiness in the abstract; he, then, who is no longer capable of enjoying human happiness in the concrete devotes himself utterly to money.', u'A man can be himself only so long as he is alone.', u'Will power is to the mind like a strong blind man who carries on his shoulders a lame man who can see.', u'Buying books would be a good thing if one could also buy the time to read them in: but as a rule the purchase of books is mistaken for the appropriation of their contents.', u'Religion is the masterpiece of the art of animal training, for it trains people as to how they shall think.', u'The doctor sees all the weakness of mankind; the lawyer all the wickedness, the theologian all the stupidity.', u'Honor means that a man is not exceptional; fame, that he is. Fame is something which must be won; honor, only something which must not be lost.', u"A man's face as a rule says more, and more interesting things, than his mouth, for it is a compendium of everything his mouth will ever say, in that it is the monogram of all this man's thoughts and aspirations.", u'Compassion is the basis of morality.', u"Because people have no thoughts to deal in, they deal cards, and try and win one another's money. Idiots!", u'The wise have always said the same things, and fools, who are the majority have always done just the opposite.', u'To live alone is the fate of all great souls.', u'A man can do what he wants, but not want what he wants.', u'Wicked thoughts and worthless efforts gradually set their mark on the face, especially the eyes.'], u'E. M. Forster': [u'We must be willing to let go of the life we have planned, so as to have the life that is waiting for us.', u'I am sure that if the mothers of various nations could meet, there would be no more wars.', u'Love is always being given where it is not required.', u'What is the good of your stars and trees, your sunrise and the wind, if they do not enter into our daily lives?', u'The main facts in human life are five: birth, food, sleep, love and death.', u"Think before you speak is criticism's motto; speak before you think, creation's.", u'Tolerance is a very dull virtue. It is boring. Unlike love, it has always had a bad press. It is negative. It merely means putting up with people, being able to stand things.', u'One always tends to overpraise a long book, because one has got through it.', u'I hate the idea of causes, and if I had to choose between betraying my country and betraying my friend, I hope I should have the guts to betray my country.', u'We are willing enough to praise freedom when she is safely tucked away in the past and cannot be a nuisance. In the present, amidst dangers whose outcome we cannot foresee, we get nervous about her, and admit censorship.', u'So, two cheers for Democracy: one because it admits variety and two because it permits criticism.', u'The four characteristics of humanism are curiosity, a free mind, belief in good taste, and belief in the human race.', u'Spoon feeding in the long run teaches us nothing but the shape of the spoon.', u'A poem is true if it hangs together. Information points to something else. A poem points to nothing but itself.', u'But nothing in India is identifiable, the mere asking of a question causes it to disappear or to merge in something else.', u'The fact is we can only love what we know personally. And we cannot know much. In public affairs, in the rebuilding of civilization, something less dramatic and emotional is needed, namely tolerance.', u'There is much good luck in the world, but it is luck. We are none of us safe. We are children, playing or quarrelling on the line.', u'At night, when the curtains are drawn and the fire flickers, my books attain a collective dignity.', u'Either life entails courage, or it ceases to be life.', u'How can I know what I think till I see what I say?', u'The people I respect most behave as if they were immortal and as if society was eternal.', u"The woman who can't influence her husband to vote the way she wants ought to be ashamed of herself.", u'Charm, in most men and nearly all women, is a decoration.', u'For our vanity is such that we hold our own characters immutable, and we are slow to acknowledge that they have changed, even for the better.', u'If I had to choose between betraying my country and betraying my friend, I hope I should have the guts to betray my country.'], u'Zhuangzi': [u'I do not know whether I was then a man dreaming I was a butterfly, or whether I am now a butterfly dreaming I am a man.', u'Happiness is the absence of the striving for happiness.', u'All existing things are really one. We regard those that are beautiful and rare as valuable, and those that are ugly as foul and rotten The foul and rotten may come to be transformed into what is rare and valuable, and the rare and valuable into what is foul and rotten.', u'I dreamed I was a butterfly, flitting around in the sky; then I awoke. Now I wonder: Am I a man who dreamt of being a butterfly, or am I a butterfly dreaming that I am a man?', u'Cherish that which is within you, and shut off that which is without; for much knowledge is a curse.', u'We cling to our own point of view, as though everything depended on it. Yet our opinions have no permanence; like autumn and winter, they gradually pass away.', u'Great wisdom is generous; petty wisdom is contentious.', u'Life comes from the earth and life returns to the earth.', u'Rewards and punishment is the lowest form of education.', u'Those who seek to satisfy the mind of man by hampering it with ceremonies and music and affecting charity and devotion have lost their original nature.', u'Where can I find a man who has forgotten words so I can have a word with him?', u'Men honor what lies within the sphere of their knowledge, but do not realize how dependent they are on what lies beyond it.', u'Flow with whatever may happen and let your mind be free. Stay centered by accepting whatever you are doing. This is the ultimate.', u'I know the joy of fishes in the river through my own joy, as I go walking along the same river.', u'Those who realize their folly are not true fools.'], u'Robert Louis Stevenson': [u"Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap but by the seeds that you plant.", u'Judge each day not by the harvest you reap but by the seeds you plant.', u'An aim in life is the only fortune worth finding.', u'A friend is a gift you give yourself.', u'There is only one difference between a long life and a good dinner: that, in the dinner, the sweets come last.', u'You can give without loving, but you can never love without giving.', u'Keep your eyes open to your mercies. The man who forgets to be thankful has fallen asleep in life.', u"I travel not to go anywhere, but to go. I travel for travel's sake. The great affair is to move.", u'Every heart that has beat strongly and cheerfully has left a hopeful impulse behind it in the world, and bettered the tradition of mankind.', u'Our business in life is not to succeed, but to continue to fail in good spirits.', u'You cannot run away from weakness; you must some time fight it out or perish; and if that be so, why not now, and where you stand?', u'Everybody, soon or late, sits down to a banquet of consequences.', u'Absences are a good influence in love and keep it bright and delicate.', u'Marriage is like life - it is a field of battle, not a bed of roses.', u'Quiet minds cannot be perplexed or frightened but go on in fortune or misfortune at their own private pace, like a clock during a thunderstorm.', u'Wine is bottled poetry.', u'We are all travelers in the wilderness of this world, and the best we can find in our travels is an honest friend.', u'Most of our pocket wisdom is conceived for the use of mediocre people, to discourage them from ambitious attempts, and generally console them in their mediocrity.', u'Fiction is to the grown man what play is to the child; it is there that he changes the atmosphere and tenor of his life.', u'Nothing more strongly arouses our disgust than cannibalism, yet we make the same impression on Buddhists and vegetarians, for we feed on babies, though not our own.', u'To be what we are, and to become what we are capable of becoming, is the only end of life.', u'Compromise is the best and cheapest lawyer.', u'We must accept life for what it actually is - a challenge to our quality without which we should never know of what stuff we are made, or grow to our full stature.', u"For my part, I travel not to go anywhere, but to go. I travel for travel's sake. The great affair is to move.", u'Books are good enough in their own way, but they are a poor substitute for life.'], u'Mae West': [u'Between two evils, I always pick the one I never tried before.', u'I used to be Snow White, but I drifted.', u"Save a boyfriend for a rainy day - and another, in case it doesn't rain.", u'An ounce of performance is worth pounds of promises.', u'You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough.', u"When I'm good, I'm very good. But when I'm bad I'm better.", u'All discarded lovers should be given a second chance, but with somebody else.', u'I never worry about diets. The only carrots that interest me are the number you get in a diamond.', u"Cultivate your curves - they may be dangerous but they won't be avoided.", u"A man's kiss is his signature.", u"A dame that knows the ropes isn't likely to get tied up.", u'It is better to be looked over than overlooked.', u"I'll try anything once, twice if I like it, three times to make sure.", u"Marriage is a great institution, but I'm not ready for an institution.", u"It isn't what I do, but how I do it. It isn't what I say, but how I say it, and how I look when I do it and say it.", u"A woman in love can't be reasonable - or she probably wouldn't be in love.", u'Love thy neighbor - and if he happens to be tall, debonair and devastating, it will be that much easier.', u"Don't keep a man guessing too long - he's sure to find the answer somewhere else.", u'I never loved another person the way I loved myself.', u"I generally avoid temptation unless I can't resist it.", u'Too much of a good thing can be wonderful.', u'When women go wrong, men go right after them.', u'Sex is emotion in motion.', u'The score never interested me, only the game.', u"When I'm good I'm very, very good, but when I'm bad, I'm better."], u"P. J. O'Rourke": [u"Anyway, no drug, not even alcohol, causes the fundamental ills of society. If we're looking for the source of our troubles, we shouldn't test people for drugs, we should test them for stupidity, ignorance, greed and love of power.", u"The good news is that, according to the Obama administration, the rich will pay for everything. The bad news is that, according to the Obama administration, you're rich.", u'Everybody knows how to raise children, except the people who have them.', u'Giving money and power to government is like giving whiskey and car keys to teenage boys.', u'Cleanliness becomes more important when godliness is unlikely.', u'Because of their size, parents may be difficult to discipline properly.', u'In our brief national history we have shot four of our presidents, worried five of them to death, impeached one and hounded another out of office. And when all else fails, we hold an election and assassinate their character.', u'Feeling good about government is like looking on the bright side of any catastrophe. When you quit looking on the bright side, the catastrophe is still there.', u'Seriousness is stupidity sent to college.', u'Always read something that will make you look good if you die in the middle of it.', u"America wasn't founded so that we could all be better. America was founded so we could all be anything we damned well pleased.", u'There is only one basic human right, the right to do as you damn well please. And with it comes the only basic human duty, the duty to take the consequences.', u'Even very young children need to be informed about dying. Explain the concept of death very carefully to your child. This will make threatening him with it much more effective.', u"After all, what is your host's purpose in having a party? Surely not for you to enjoy yourself; if that were their sole purpose, they'd have simply sent champagne and women over to your place by taxi.", u'There are a number of mechanical devices which increase sexual arousal, particularly in women. Chief among these is the Mercedes-Benz 380SL convertible.', u'When buying and selling are controlled by legislation, the first things to be bought and sold are legislators.', u"The weirder you're going to behave, the more normal you should look. It works in reverse, too. When I see a kid with three or four rings in his nose, I know there is absolutely nothing extraordinary about that person.", u'Staying married may have long-term benefits. You can elicit much more sympathy from friends over a bad marriage than you ever can from a good divorce.', u'I like to think of my behavior in the sixties as a "learning experience." Then again, I like to think of anything stupid I\'ve done as a "learning experience." It makes me feel less stupid.', u'The Clinton administration launched an attack on people in Texas because those people were religious nuts with guns. Hell, this country was founded by religious nuts with guns. Who does Bill Clinton think stepped ashore on Plymouth Rock?', u'Never fight an inanimate object.', u"You can't get rid of poverty by giving people money.", u'Family love is messy, clinging, and of an annoying and repetitive pattern, like bad wallpaper.', u'Whatever it is that the government does, sensible Americans would prefer that the government does it to somebody else. This is the idea behind foreign policy.', u"I think it's been hard for people to understand how Islam can be a good religion, and yet the Islamists are evil. Those of us who have had experience with Islam understand this, just as we understand the difference between snake handlers and people going to church on Sunday morning."], u'Katharine Hepburn': [u'If you obey all the rules you miss all the fun.', u'Life is hard. After all, it kills you.', u"I have many regrets, and I'm sure everyone does. The stupid things you do, you regret... if you have any sense, and if you don't regret them, maybe you're stupid.", u'Sometimes I wonder if men and women really suit each other. Perhaps they should live next door and just visit now and then.', u"We are taught you must blame your father, your sisters, your brothers, the school, the teachers - but never blame yourself. It's never your fault. But it's always your fault, because if you wanted to change you're the one who has got to change.", u'Love has nothing to do with what you are expecting to get - only with what you are expecting to give - which is everything.', u'If you want to sacrifice the admiration of many men for the criticism of one, go ahead, get married.', u"Life is to be lived. If you have to support yourself, you had bloody well better find some way that is going to be interesting. And you don't do that by sitting around.", u"Acting is a nice childish profession - pretending you're someone else and, at the same time, selling yourself.", u'If you want to give up the admiration of thousands of men for the distain of one, go ahead, get married.', u'I never lose sight of the fact that just being is fun.', u'If you always do what interests you, at least one person is pleased.', u'Enemies are so stimulating.', u'Why slap them on the wrist with feather when you can belt them over the head with a sledgehammer.', u'To keep your character intact you cannot stoop to filthy acts. It makes it easier to stoop the next time.', u"My greatest strength is common sense. I'm really a standard brand - like Campbell's tomato soup or Baker's chocolate.", u'As for me, prizes are nothing. My prize is my work.', u"Being a housewife and a mother is the biggest job in the world, but if it doesn't interest you, don't do it - I would have made a terrible mother.", u'I never realized until lately that women were supposed to be the inferior sex.', u'Death will be a great relief. No more interviews.', u"It's a rather rude gesture, but at least it's clear what you mean.", u"Without discipline, there's no life at all.", u"The average Hollywood film star's ambition is to be admired by an American, courted by an Italian, married to an Englishman and have a French boyfriend.", u'Plain women know more about men than beautiful women do.', u'Never complain. Never explain.'], u'H. G. Wells': [u"If we don't end war, war will end us.", u'Affliction comes to us, not to make us sad but sober; not to make us sorry but wise.', u'Every time I see an adult on a bicycle, I no longer despair for the future of the human race.', u'Beauty is in the heart of the beholder.', u"Adapt or perish, now as ever, is nature's inexorable imperative.", u'If you fell down yesterday, stand up today.', u"A time will come when a politician who has willfully made war and promoted international dissension will be as sure of the dock and much surer of the noose than a private homicide. It is not reasonable that those who gamble with men's lives should not stake their own.", u'After people have repeated a phrase a great number of times, they begin to realize it has meaning and may even be true.', u'Advertising is legalized lying.', u'History is a race between education and catastrophe.', u'The doctrine of the Kingdom of Heaven, which was the main teaching of Jesus, is certainly one of the most revolutionary doctrines that ever stirred and changed human thought.', u'The path of least resistance is the path of the loser.', u'I want to go ahead of Father Time with a scythe of my own.', u'Leaders should lead as far as they can and then vanish. Their ashes should not choke the fire they have lit.', u'Nothing leads so straight to futility as literary ambitions without systematic knowledge.', u"The uglier a man's legs are, the better he plays golf - it's almost a law.", u'What really matters is what you do with what you have.', u'Moral indignation is jealousy with a halo.', u'The crisis of today is the joke of tomorrow.', u'Human history becomes more and more a race between education and catastrophe.', u'In politics, strangely enough, the best way to play your cards is to lay them face upwards on the table.', u'Man is the unnatural animal, the rebel child of nature, and more and more does he turn himself against the harsh and fitful hand that reared him.', u'Our true nationality is mankind.', u"The New Deal is plainly an attempt to achieve a working socialism and avert a social collapse in America; it is extraordinarily parallel to the successive 'policies' and 'Plans' of the Russian experiment. Americans shirk the word 'socialism', but what else can one call it?", u'You have learned something. That always feels at first as if you had lost something.'], u'Chief Joseph': [u'I believe much trouble would be saved if we opened our hearts more.', u'Hear me, my chiefs! I am tired. My heart is sick and sad. From where the sun now stands, I will fight no more forever.', u'The earth is the mother of all people, and all people should have equal rights upon it.', u'It makes my heart sick when I remember all the good words and the broken promises.', u'I am tired of talk that comes to nothing.', u'An Indian respects a brave man, but he despises a coward.', u'I hope that no more groans of wounded men and women will ever go to the ear of the Great Spirit Chief above, and that all people may be one people.', u'We soon found that the white men were growing rich very fast, and were greedy.', u'It does not require many words to speak the truth.', u'All men were made by the Great Spirit Chief. They are all brothers.', u"I pressed my father's hand and told him I would protect his grave with my life. My father smiled and passed away to the spirit land.", u'You might as well expect rivers to run backwards as any man born free to be contented penned up.', u'A chief called Lawyer, because he was a great talker, took the lead in the council, and sold nearly all the Nez Perce country.', u'Good words will not give me back my children.', u'I labored hard to avoid trouble and bloodshed.', u'I only ask of the government to be treated as all other men are treated.', u'I would give up everything rather than have the blood of white men upon the hands of my people.', u'Let me be a free man - free to travel, free to stop, free to work.', u'Treat all men alike. Give them the same law. Give them an even chance to live and grow.', u'We had a great many horses, of which we gave Lewis and Clark what they needed, and they gave us guns and tobacco in return.', u'I have heard talk and talk, but nothing is done.', u'I will speak with a straight tongue.', u'It required a strong heart to stand up against such talk, but I urged my people to be quiet and not to begin a war.', u"A man who would not love his father's grave is worse than a wild animal.", u'From where the sun now stands I will fight no more.'], u'Edgar Cayce': [u"Dreams are today's answers to tomorrow's questions.", u"You can never lose anything that really belongs to you, and you can't keep that which belongs to someone else.", u'For, he that expects nothing shall not be disappointed, but he that expects much - if he lives and uses that in hand day by day - shall be full to running over.', u'There is progress whether ye are going forward or backward! The thing is to move!', u'It is thought and feeling which guides the universe, not deeds.', u'When ye are prepared for a thing, the opportunity to use it presents itself.'], u'Abraham Maslow': [u'If you only have a hammer, you tend to see every problem as a nail.', u'If you plan on being anything less than you are capable of being, you will probably be unhappy all the days of your life.', u'A musician must make music, an artist must paint, a poet must write, if he is to be ultimately at peace with himself.', u"One's only rival is one's own potentialities. One's only failure is failing to live up to one's own possibilities. In this sense, every man can be a king, and must therefore be treated like a king.", u"If I were dropped out of a plane into the ocean and told the nearest land was a thousand miles away, I'd still swim. And I'd despise the one who gave up.", u'But behavior in the human being is sometimes a defense, a way of concealing motives and thoughts, as language can be a way of hiding your thoughts and preventing communication.', u'What a man can be, he must be. This need we call self-actualization.', u'Classic economic theory, based as it is on an inadequate theory of human motivation, could be revolutionized by accepting the reality of higher human needs, including the impulse to self actualization and the love for the highest values.', u'The fact is that people are good, Give people affection and security, and they will give affection and be secure in their feelings and their behavior.', u'All the evidence that we have indicates that it is reasonable to assume in practically every human being, and certainly in almost every newborn baby, that there is an active will toward health, an impulse towards growth, or towards the actualization.', u'What is necessary to change a person is to change his awareness of himself.', u'The ability to be in the present moment is a major component of mental wellness.', u'The story of the human race is the story of men and women selling themselves short.', u"I was awfully curious to find out why I didn't go insane.", u'We may define therapy as a search for value.', u'A first-rate soup is more creative than a second-rate painting.', u'Dispassionate objectivity is itself a passion, for the real and for the truth.', u'We fear to know the fearsome and unsavory aspects of ourselves, but we fear even more to know the godlike in ourselves.'], u'Emile Zola': [u'If you ask me what I came into this life to do, I will tell you: I came to live out loud.', u'I am an artist... I am here to live out loud.', u'The truth is on the march and nothing will stop it.', u'If I cannot overwhelm with my quality, I will overwhelm with my quantity.', u'The artist is nothing without the gift, but the gift is nothing without work.', u'If you shut up truth, and bury it underground, it will but grow.', u'The fate of animals is of greater importance to me than the fear of appearing ridiculous; it is indissolubly connected with the fate of men.', u"I am little concerned with beauty or perfection. I don't care for the great centuries. All I care about is life, struggle, intensity.", u'Perfection is such a nuisance that I often regret having cured myself of using tobacco.', u'In my view you cannot claim to have seen something until you have photographed it.', u"One forges one's style on the terrible anvil of daily deadlines.", u'The thought is a deed. Of all deeds she fertilizes the world most.', u'There are two men inside the artist, the poet and the craftsman. One is born a poet. One becomes a craftsman.'], u'Robert Frost': [u"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on.", u"A diplomat is a man who always remembers a woman's birthday but never remembers her age.", u'A person will sometimes devote all his life to the development of one part of his body - the wishbone.', u'Education is the ability to listen to almost anything without losing your temper or your self-confidence.', u'By working faithfully eight hours a day you may eventually get to be boss and work twelve hours a day.', u'The brain is a wonderful organ; it starts working the moment you get up in the morning and does not stop until you get into the office.', u'But I have promises to keep, and miles to go before I sleep, and miles to go before I sleep.', u'Forgive me my nonsense, as I also forgive the nonsense of those that think they talk sense.', u'Love is an irresistible desire to be irresistibly desired.', u'Two roads diverged in a wood and I - I took the one less traveled by, and that has made all the difference.', u'A mother takes twenty years to make a man of her boy, and another woman makes a fool of him in twenty minutes.', u'The best way out is always through.', u'Home is the place where, when you have to go there, they have to take you in.', u"Half the world is composed of people who have something to say and can't, and the other half who have nothing to say and keep on saying it.", u'The woods are lovely, dark and deep. But I have promises to keep, and miles to go before I sleep.', u'A poem begins in delight and ends in wisdom.', u'A bank is a place where they lend you an umbrella in fair weather and ask for it back when it begins to rain.', u'Freedom lies in being bold.', u"And were an epitaph to be my story I'd have a short one ready for my own. I would have written of me on my stone: I had a lover's quarrel with the world.", u"My sorrow, when she's here with me, thinks these dark days of autumn rain are beautiful as days can be; she loves the bare, the withered tree; she walks the sodden pasture lane.", u'A poem begins as a lump in the throat, a sense of wrong, a homesickness, a lovesickness.', u"Don't ever take a fence down until you know why it was put up.", u'Poetry is what gets lost in translation.', u'Poetry is when an emotion has found its thought and the thought has found words.', u"Thinking isn't agreeing or disagreeing. That's voting."], u'Samuel Butler': [u'Most people have never learned that one of the main aims in life is to enjoy it.', u"A hen is only an egg's way of making another egg.", u'It is tact that is golden, not silence.', u'The best liar is he who makes the smallest amount of lying go the longest way.', u'The truest characters of ignorance are vanity and pride and arrogance.', u'Life is like playing a violin solo in public and learning the instrument as one goes on.', u'Life is not an exact science, it is an art.', u'Man is the only animal that can remain on friendly terms with the victims he intends to eat until he eats them.', u"Every man's work, whether it be literature, or music or pictures or architecture or anything else, is always a portrait of himself.", u'People are lucky and unlucky not according to what they get absolutely, but according to the ratio between what they get and what they have been led to expect.', u'A drunkard would not give money to sober people. He said they would only eat it, and buy clothes and send their children to school with it.', u'A friend who cannot at a pinch remember a thing or two that never happened is as bad as one who does not know how to forget.', u'Life is one long process of getting tired.', u'All animals, except man, know that the principal business of life is to enjoy it.', u'Let us be grateful to the mirror for revealing to us our appearance only.', u'Life is the art of drawing sufficient conclusions from insufficient premises.', u'Parents are the last people on earth who ought to have children.', u'Self-preservation is the first law of nature.', u'God cannot alter the past, though historians can.', u'If I die prematurely I shall be saved from being bored to death at my own success.', u'Christ: I dislike him very much. Still, I can stand him. What I cannot stand is the wretched band of people whose profession is to hoodwink us about him.', u'If the headache would only precede the intoxication, alcoholism would be a virtue.', u'It is not he who gains the exact point in dispute who scores most in controversy - but he who has shown the better temper.', u'Look before you leap for as you sow, ye are like to reap.', u'We are not won by arguments that we can analyse but by tone and temper, by the manner which is the man himself.'], u'Leonardo da Vinci': [u'Nothing strengthens authority so much as silence.', u"I love those who can smile in trouble, who can gather strength from distress, and grow brave by reflection. 'Tis the business of little minds to shrink, but they whose heart is firm, and whose conscience approves their conduct, will pursue their principles unto death.", u'It had long since come to my attention that people of accomplishment rarely sat back and let things happen to them. They went out and happened to things.', u'For once you have tasted flight you will walk the earth with your eyes turned skywards, for there you have been and there you will long to return.', u'Simplicity is the ultimate sophistication.', u'Life is pretty simple: You do some stuff. Most fails. Some works. You do more of what works. If it works big, others quickly copy it. Then you do something else. The trick is the doing something else.', u'While I thought that I was learning how to live, I have been learning how to die.', u'A well-spent day brings happy sleep.', u'Anyone who conducts an argument by appealing to authority is not using his intelligence; he is just using his memory.', u'Art is never finished, only abandoned.', u'The greatest deception men suffer is from their own opinions.', u'There are three classes of people: those who see, those who see when they are shown, those who do not see.', u'As a well-spent day brings happy sleep, so a life well spent brings happy death.', u'I have been impressed with the urgency of doing. Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Being willing is not enough; we must do.', u'Life well spent is long.', u'Although nature commences with reason and ends in experience it is necessary for us to do the opposite, that is to commence with experience and from this to proceed to investigate the reason.', u'He who loves practice without theory is like the sailor who boards ship without a rudder and compass and never knows where he may cast.', u'Water is the driving force of all nature.', u'Iron rusts from disuse; water loses its purity from stagnation... even so does inaction sap the vigor of the mind.', u'Blinding ignorance does mislead us. O! Wretched mortals, open your eyes!', u'Why does the eye see a thing more clearly in dreams than the imagination when awake?', u'Marriage is like putting your hand into a bag of snakes in the hope of pulling out an eel.', u'The human foot is a masterpiece of engineering and a work of art.', u'In rivers, the water that you touch is the last of what has passed and the first of that which comes; so with present time.', u'The noblest pleasure is the joy of understanding.'], u'Rodney Dangerfield': [u'I found there was only one way to look thin: hang out with fat people.', u'I get no respect. The way my luck is running, if I was a politician I would be honest.', u"My psychiatrist told me I was crazy and I said I want a second opinion. He said okay, you're ugly too.", u"I haven't spoken to my wife in years. I didn't want to interrupt her.", u"A girl phoned me the other day and said... 'Come on over, there's nobody home.' I went over. Nobody was home.", u'I drink too much. The last time I gave a urine sample it had an olive in it.', u'I went to a fight the other night, and a hockey game broke out.', u'I looked up my family tree and found three dogs using it.', u"I'm at the age where food has taken the place of sex in my life. In fact, I've just had a mirror put over my kitchen table.", u'I had plenty of pimples as a kid. One day I fell asleep in the library. When I woke up, a blind man was reading my face.', u"I'm taking Viagra and drinking prune juice - I don't know if I'm coming or going.", u"Yeah, I know I'm ugly... I said to a bartender, 'Make me a zombie.' He said 'God beat me to it.'", u"My wife was afraid of the dark... then she saw me naked and now she's afraid of the light.", u'On Halloween, the parents sent their kids out looking like me.', u'This morning when I put on my underwear I could hear the fruit-of-the-loom guys laughing at me.', u"My wife's jealousy is getting ridiculous. The other day she looked at my calendar and wanted to know who May was.", u"I told my psychiatrist that everyone hates me. He said I was being ridiculous - everyone hasn't met me yet.", u'I told my wife the truth. I told her I was seeing a psychiatrist. Then she told me the truth: that she was seeing a psychiatrist, two plumbers, and a bartender.', u'I was so ugly my mother used to feed me with a sling shot.', u'My mother had morning sickness after I was born.', u"It's tough to stay married. My wife kisses the dog on the lips, yet she won't drink from my glass.", u"With me, nothing goes right. My psychiatrist said my wife and I should have sex every night. Now, we'll never see each other!", u'I looked up my family tree and found out I was the sap.', u'I saved a girl from being attacked last night. I controlled myself.', u'I came from a real tough neighborhood. I put my hand in some cement and felt another hand.'], u'Megan Fox': [u"I like the bad-boy types. Generally the guy I'm attracted to is the guy in the club with all the tattoos and nail polish. He's usually the lead singer in a punk band and plays guitar. But my serious boyfriends are relatively clean-cut, nice guys. So it's strange.", u"I think people are born bisexual and the make subconscious choices based on the pressures of society. I have no question in my mind about being bisexual. But I'm also a hypocrite: I would never date a girl who is bisexual, because that means they also sleep with men, and men are so dirty that I'd never sleep with a girl who had slept with a man.", u"I'm the biggest nerd - I love comic books and stuff like that! I don't have any friends who are actresses. I only had one girlfriend when I was growing up. Most of my friends were boys. I was such a tomboy. I enjoyed doing guy things.", u"I could see myself in a relationship with a girl; Olivia Wilde is so sexy she makes me want to strangle a mountain ox with my bare hands. She's mesmerizing.", u"People who don't like me talk about it as though I'm trash because I have tattoos. I find that insane because it's 2008, not the 1950s. Tattoos aren't limited to sailors. It's a form of art I find beautiful. I love it.", u'I have no friends and I never leave my house.', u"I think that I'm so psychotic and so mentally ill that if I could tap into that I could do something really interesting.", u"I haven't gone completely insane, but it might happen soon.", u"I have the libido of a 15-year-old boy. My sex drive is so high. I'd rather have sex with Brian all the time than leave the house. He doesn't mind.", u"I'm smart and I can be really funny and interesting and I can go toe-to-toe with anybody in a conversation.", u'I need to behave in a way that will cause people to take me seriously.', u"I have a mouth and I'm not afraid to use it.", u"I think all women in Hollywood are known as sex symbols. That's what our purpose is in this business. You're merchandised, you're a product. You're sold and it's based on sex. But that's okay. I think women should be empowered by that, not degraded.", u"I'm horrible to live with. I don't clean. My clothes end up wherever I take them off. I forget to flush the toilet.", u"I'm very confident in how I project my personality.", u"I resent having to prove that I'm not a retard.", u"I'm just really confident sexually, and I think that sort of oozes out of my pores. It's just there. It's something I don't have to turn on.", u"I'm not on Twitter.", u"I've never been a big believer in formal education.", u'Sometimes I say things that I think are obviously sarcastic and people take them quite literally.', u"Well, I'm clearly not ugly.", u'All women in Hollywood are known as sex symbols.', u"And you know, the people who hate kids and don't want kids always end up having 50 of them.", u'But me contradicting a news story is not going to make my words fact. It will just create a new news story.', u"Hollywood is the most superficial thing you could possibly be a part of and if I weren't attractive I wouldn't be working at all."], u'Jiddu Krishnamurti': [u'It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society.', u'There is no end to education. It is not that you read a book, pass an examination, and finish with education. The whole of life, from the moment you are born to the moment you die, is a process of learning.', u'The moment you have in your heart this extraordinary thing called love and feel the depth, the delight, the ecstasy of it, you will discover that for you the world is transformed.', u'You must understand the whole of life, not just one little part of it. That is why you must read, that is why you must look at the skies, that is why you must sing and dance, and write poems and suffer and understand, for all that is life.', u'In oneself lies the whole world and if you know how to look and learn, the door is there and the key is in your hand. Nobody on earth can give you either the key or the door to open, except yourself.', u'If we can really understand the problem, the answer will come out of it, because the answer is not separate from the problem.', u'A man who is not afraid is not aggressive, a man who has no sense of fear of any kind is really a free, a peaceful man.', u'So when you are listening to somebody, completely, attentively, then you are listening not only to the words, but also to the feeling of what is being conveyed, to the whole of it, not part of it.', u'All ideologies are idiotic, whether religious or political, for it is conceptual thinking, the conceptual word, which has so unfortunately divided man.', u'I maintain that Truth is a pathless land, and you cannot approach it by any path whatsoever, by any religion, by any sect.', u'We all want to be famous people, and the moment we want to be something we are no longer free.', u'Hitler and Mussolini were only the primary spokesmen for the attitude of domination and craving for power that are in the heart of almost everyone. Until the source is cleared, there will always be confusion and hate, wars and class antagonisms.', u'What is needed, rather than running away or controlling or suppressing or any other resistance, is understanding fear; that means, watch it, learn about it, come directly into contact with it. We are to learn about fear, not how to escape from it.', u'A consistent thinker is a thoughtless person, because he conforms to a pattern; he repeats phrases and thinks in a groove.', u'Freedom from the desire for an answer is essential to the understanding of a problem.', u'Your belief in God is merely an escape from your monotonous, stupid and cruel life.', u"It's no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society.", u'Religion is the frozen thought of man out of which they build temples.', u'When we talk about understanding, surely it takes place only when the mind listens completely - the mind being your heart, your nerves, your ears- when you give your whole attention to it.', u'The flowering of love is meditation.', u'Tradition becomes our security, and when the mind is secure it is in decay.', u'The constant assertion of belief is an indication of fear.', u'The end is the beginning of all things, Suppressed and hidden, Awaiting to be released through the rhythm Of pain and pleasure.'], u'Robert Kiyosaki': [u'The size of your success is measured by the strength of your desire; the size of your dream; and how you handle disappointment along the way.', u'If you want to go somewhere, it is best to find someone who has already been there.', u"A lot of people are afraid to tell the truth, to say no. That's where toughness comes into play. Toughness is not being a bully. It's having backbone.", u'Face your fears and doubts, and new worlds will open to you.', u'Inside of every problem lies an opportunity.', u"Academic qualifications are important and so is financial education. They're both important and schools are forgetting one of them.", u"I have a problem with too much money. I can't reinvest it fast enough, and because I reinvest it, more money comes in. Yes, the rich do get richer.", u'We go to school to learn to work hard for money. I write books and create products that teach people how to have money work hard for them.', u"Money is kind of a base subject. Like water, food, air and housing, it affects everything yet for some reason the world of academics thinks it's a subject below their social standing.", u'A game is like a mirror that allows you to look at yourself.', u'When people are lame, they love to blame.', u'You have to be smart. The easy days are over.', u"If you're working for a good company and you're happy there, and you're being compensated accordingly, and your work satisfies you, you should stay there.", u'Confidence comes from discipline and training.', u'Quitting is the easiest thing to do.', u'I still consider myself a little, fat kid from Hawaii.', u'I would say raising capital is one of the weakest things for most entrepreneurs.', u'When times are bad is when the real entrepreneurs emerge.', u'As a young kid, I really wanted to be rich.', u'I mean, Hawaii is beautiful, but the world is full of beautiful places.', u"I worked for Xerox for 4 years and after that I knew I was never going to be a corporate person. It wasn't my environment.", u"I've actually taken companies public, I've actually busted companies, I've actually gone broke.", u"If I lost my job, I'd get a job at McDonald's.", u'If you can ask a young man to give his life for his country, you can lead people.', u'In military school, on day one you must memorize the mission of the Merchant Marine Academy.'], u'Saint Patrick': [u'Christ beside me, Christ before me, Christ behind me, Christ within me, Christ beneath me, Christ above me.', u'Before I was humiliated I was like a stone that lies in deep mud, and he who is mighty came and in his compassion raised me up and exalted me very high and placed me on the top of the wall.', u'I am Patrick, a sinner, most uncultivated and least of all the faithful and despised in the eyes of many.', u'The Lord opened the understanding of my unbelieving heart, so that I should recall my sins.', u'If I have any worth, it is to live my life for God so as to teach these peoples; even though some of them still look down on me.', u'If I be worthy, I live for my God to teach the heathen, even though they may despise me.', u"No one should ever say that it was my ignorance if I did or showed forth anything however small according to God's good pleasure; but let this be your conclusion and let it so be thought, that - as is the perfect truth - it was the gift of God.", u'That which I have set out in Latin is not my words but the words of God and of apostles and prophets, who of course have never lied. He who believes shall be saved, but he who does not believe shall be damned. God has spoken.'], u'Confucius': [u'Everything has beauty, but not everyone sees it.', u'By three methods we may learn wisdom: First, by reflection, which is noblest; Second, by imitation, which is easiest; and third by experience, which is the bitterest.', u'Choose a job you love, and you will never have to work a day in your life.', u'The will to win, the desire to succeed, the urge to reach your full potential... these are the keys that will unlock the door to personal excellence.', u'Our greatest glory is not in never falling, but in rising every time we fall.', u'Life is really simple, but we insist on making it complicated.', u'It is easy to hate and it is difficult to love. This is how the whole scheme of things works. All good things are difficult to achieve; and bad things are very easy to get.', u'If I am walking with two other men, each of them will serve as my teacher. I will pick out the good points of the one and imitate them, and the bad points of the other and correct them in myself.', u'I hear and I forget. I see and I remember. I do and I understand.', u"Real knowledge is to know the extent of one's ignorance.", u'In a country well governed, poverty is something to be ashamed of. In a country badly governed, wealth is something to be ashamed of.', u'A superior man is modest in his speech, but exceeds in his actions.', u'Silence is a true friend who never betrays.', u"When it is obvious that the goals cannot be reached, don't adjust the goals, adjust the action steps.", u'It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop.', u'He who learns but does not think, is lost! He who thinks but does not learn is in great danger.', u'Faced with what is right, to leave it undone shows a lack of courage.', u'The superior man understands what is right; the inferior man understands what will sell.', u'Without feelings of respect, what is there to distinguish men from beasts?', u'Do not impose on others what you yourself do not desire.', u'If you look into your own heart, and you find nothing wrong there, what is there to worry about? What is there to fear?', u'An oppressive government is more to be feared than a tiger.', u'Success depends upon previous preparation, and without such preparation there is sure to be failure.', u'Better a diamond with a flaw than a pebble without.', u'To be wronged is nothing unless you continue to remember it.'], u'Og Mandino': [u'Always do your best. What you plant now, you will harvest later.', u'Do all things with love.', u'Beginning today, treat everyone you meet as if they were going to be dead by midnight. Extend to them all the care, kindness and understanding you can muster, and do it with no thought of any reward. Your life will never be the same again.', u'I am here for a purpose and that purpose is to grow into a mountain, not to shrink to a grain of sand. Henceforth will I apply ALL my efforts to become the highest mountain of all and I will strain my potential until it cries for mercy.', u'I will love the light for it shows me the way, yet I will endure the darkness because it shows me the stars.', u'Failure will never overtake me if my determination to succeed is strong enough.', u'Take the attitude of a student, never be too big to ask questions, never know too much to learn something new.', u'Always render more and better service than is expected of you, no matter what your task may be.', u'Obstacles are necessary for success because in selling, as in all careers of importance, victory comes only after many struggles and countless defeats.', u'The person who knows one thing and does it better than anyone else, even if it only be the art of raising lentils, receives the crown he merits. If he raises all his energy to that end, he is a benefactor of mankind and its rewarded as such.', u'It is those who concentrates on but one thing at a time who advance in this world. The great man or woman is the one who never steps outside his or her specialty or foolishly dissipates his or her individuality.', u'To do anything truly worth doing, I must not stand back shivering and thinking of the cold and danger, but jump in with gusto and scramble through as well as I can.', u'Tomorrow is only found in the calendar of fools.', u'I seek constantly to improve my manners and graces, for they are the sugar to which all are attracted.', u'There is an immeasurable distance between late and too late.', u'Always seek out the seed of triumph in every adversity.', u'Sound character provides the power with which a person may ride the emergencies of life instead of being overwhelmed by them. Failure is... the highway to success.', u'Treasure the love you receive above all. It will survive long after your good health has vanished.', u"To be always intending to make a new and better life but never to find time to set about it is as to put off eating and drinking and sleeping from one day to the next until you're dead.", u'Work as though you would live forever, and live as though you would die today. Go another mile!', u'You never know what events are going to transpire to get you home.', u'I have never heard anything about the resolutions of the apostles, but a good deal about their acts.'], u'Horace': [u"Remember when life's path is steep to keep your mind even.", u'A picture is a poem without words.', u'Cease to inquire what the future has in store, and take as a gift whatever the day brings forth.', u'Anger is a short madness.', u'Life is largely a matter of expectation.', u'Avoid inquisitive persons, for they are sure to be gossips, their ears are open to hear, but they will not keep what is entrusted to them.', u'Wisdom is not wisdom when it is derived from books alone.', u'Adversity has the effect of eliciting talents, which in prosperous circumstances would have lain dormant.', u'A heart well prepared for adversity in bad times hopes, and in good times fears for a change in fortune.', u'A portion of mankind take pride in their vices and pursue their purpose; many more waver between doing what is right and complying with what is wrong.', u'One wanders to the left, another to the right. Both are equally in error, but, are seduced by different delusions.', u'Life grants nothing to us mortals without hard work.', u'Whatever advice you give, be short.', u"Don't think, just do.", u'It is courage, courage, courage, that raises the blood of life to crimson splendor. Live bravely and present a brave front to adversity.', u'It is the false shame of fools to try to conceal wounds that have not healed.', u"It's a good thing to be foolishly gay once in a while.", u'Seize the day, and put the least possible trust in tomorrow.', u'A word once uttered can never be recalled.', u'A word, once sent abroad, flies irrevocably.', u"Always keep your composure. You can't score from the penalty box; and to win, you have to score.", u'Choose a subject equal to your abilities; think carefully what your shoulders may refuse, and what they are capable of bearing.', u'Good sense is both the first principal and the parent source of good writing.', u'Money is a handmaiden, if thou knowest how to use it; a mistress, if thou knowest not.', u'Refrain from asking what going to happen tomorrow, and everyday that fortune grants you, count as gain.'], u'John Ruskin': [u'A little thought and a little kindness are often worth more than a great deal of money.', u'Sunshine is delicious, rain is refreshing, wind braces us up, snow is exhilarating; there is really no such thing as bad weather, only different kinds of good weather.', u"The first test of a truly great man is his humility. By humility I don't mean doubt of his powers or hesitation in speaking his opinion, but merely an understanding of the relationship of what he can say and what he can do.", u"There is hardly anything in the world that some man cannot make a little worse and sell a little cheaper, and the people who consider price only are this man's lawful prey.", u'There is no wealth but life.', u'Art is not a study of positive reality, it is the seeking for ideal truth.', u'Quality is never an accident. It is always the result of intelligent effort.', u'Fine art is that in which the hand, the head, and the heart of man go together.', u'Music when healthy, is the teacher of perfect order, and when depraved, the teacher of perfect disorder.', u'Endurance is nobler than strength, and patience than beauty.', u'I believe the first test of a truly great man is in his humility.', u'You may either win your peace or buy it: win it, by resistance to evil; buy it, by compromise with evil.', u'Great nations write their autobiographies in three manuscripts - the book of their deeds, the book of their words and the book of their art.', u'Let every dawn be to you as the beginning of life, and every setting sun be to you as its close.', u'Let us reform our schools, and we shall find little reform needed in our prisons.', u'The essence of lying is in deception, not in words.', u"Do not think of your faults, still less of other's faults; look for what is good and strong, and try to imitate it. Your faults will drop off, like dead leaves, when their time comes.", u'In general, pride is at the bottom of all great mistakes.', u"The highest reward for a person's toil is not what they get for it, but what they become by it.", u'The purest and most thoughtful minds are those which love colour the most.', u'To make your children capable of honesty is the beginning of education.', u'A book worth reading is worth buying.', u'All great and beautiful work has come of first gazing without shrinking into the darkness.', u'He that would be angry and sin not, must not be angry with anything but sin.', u'Nothing can be beautiful which is not true.'], u'Joseph Stalin': [u'It is enough that the people know there was an election. The people who cast the votes decide nothing. The people who count the votes decide everything.', u'One death is a tragedy; one million is a statistic.', u'Death solves all problems - no man, no problem.', u'Education is a weapon whose effects depend on who holds it in his hands and at whom it is aimed.', u'Ideas are more powerful than guns. We would not let our enemies have guns, why should we let them have ideas.', u"The people who cast the votes don't decide an election, the people who count the votes do.", u'Death is the solution to all problems. No man - no problem.', u'Mankind is divided into rich and poor, into property owners and exploited; and to abstract oneself from this fundamental division; and from the antagonism between poor and rich means abstracting oneself from fundamental facts.', u'I trust no one, not even myself.', u'I believe in one thing only, the power of human will.', u'When we hang the capitalists they will sell us the rope we use.', u'The death of one man is a tragedy. The death of millions is a statistic.', u'The only real power comes out of a long rifle.', u'A sincere diplomat is like dry water or wooden iron.', u'The Pope? How many divisions has he got?', u'Gratitude is a sickness suffered by dogs.', u'In the Soviet army it takes more courage to retreat than advance.', u'Everyone imposes his own system as far as his army can reach.', u"We don't let them have ideas. Why would we let them have guns?", u'History shows that there are no invincible armies.', u'If any foreign minister begins to defend to the death a "peace conference," you can be sure his government has already placed its orders for new battleships and airplanes.', u'If the opposition disarms, well and good. If it refuses to disarm, we shall disarm it ourselves.', u'Print is the sharpest and the strongest weapon of our party.', u'The writer is the engineer of the human soul.', u'You cannot make a revolution with silk gloves.'], u'Sidonie Gabrielle Colette': [u"Be happy. It's one way of being wise.", u"What a wonderful life I've had! I only wish I'd realized it sooner.", u'A woman who thinks she is intelligent demands the same rights as man. An intelligent woman gives up.', u'I am going away with him to an unknown country where I shall have no past and no name, and where I shall be born again with a new face and an untried heart.', u'There are days when solitude is a heady wine that intoxicates you with freedom, others when it is a bitter tonic, and still others when it is a poison that makes you beat your head against the wall.', u'In its early stages, insomnia is almost an oasis in which those who have to think or suffer darkly take refuge.', u'My true friends have always given me that supreme proof of devotion, a spontaneous aversion for the man I loved.', u'You will do foolish things, but do them with enthusiasm.', u'As for an authentic villain, the real thing, the absolute, the artist, one rarely meets him even once in a lifetime. The ordinary bad hat is always in part a decent fellow.', u'I love my past, I love my present. I am not ashamed of what I have had, and I am not sad because I no longer have it.', u'The woman who thinks she is intelligent demands equal rights with men. A woman who is intelligent does not.', u'Our perfect companions never have fewer than four feet.', u'The lovesick, the betrayed, and the jealous all smell alike.', u'You must not pity me because my sixtieth year finds me still astonished. To be astonished is one of the surest ways of not growing old too quickly.', u'A happy childhood is poor preparation for human contacts.', u'It is not a bad thing that children should occasionally, and politely, put parents in their place.', u'On this narrow planet, we have only the choice between two unknown worlds. One of them tempts us - ah! what a dream, to live in that! - the other stifles us at the first breath.', u'Sincerity is not a spontaneous flower nor is modesty either.', u"Sit down and put down everything that comes into your head and then you're a writer. But an author is one who can judge his own stuff's worth, without pity, and destroy most of it.", u'You do not notice changes in what is always before you.', u'A pretty little collection of weaknesses and a terror of spiders are our indispensable stock-in-trade with the men.', u'I believe there are more urgent and honorable occupations than the incomparable waste of time we call suffering.', u"If I can't have too many truffles, I'll do without truffles.", u'In the matter of furnishing, I find a certain absence of ugliness far worse than ugliness.', u'It is wise to apply the oil of refined politeness to the mechanism of friendship.'], u'Ayrton Senna': [u'And so you touch this limit, something happens and you suddenly can go a little bit further. With your mind power, your determination, your instinct, and the experience as well, you can fly very high.', u'Being second is to be the first of the ones who lose.', u"I don't know driving in another way which isn't risky. Each one has to improve himself. Each driver has its limit. My limit is a little bit further than other's.", u'If you have God on your side, everything becomes clear.', u'I have no idols. I admire work, dedication and competence.', u"Wealthy men can't live in an island that is encircled by poverty. We all breathe the same air. We must give a chance to everyone, at least a basic chance.", u"Racing, competing, it's in my blood. It's part of me, it's part of my life; I have been doing it all my life and it stands out above everything else.", u'These things bring you to reality as to how fragile you are; at the same moment you are doing something that nobody else is able to do. The same moment that you are seen as the best, the fastest and somebody that cannot be touched, you are enormously fragile.', u'You must take the compromise to win, or else nothing. That means: you race or you do not.', u"I continuously go further and further learning about my own limitations, my body limitation, psychological limitations. It's a way of life for me.", u'You will never know the feeling of a driver when winning a race. The helmet hides feelings that cannot be understood.', u'When you are fitted in a racing car and you race to win, second or third place is not enough.', u"Money is a strange business. People who haven't got it aim it strongly. People who have are full of troubles.", u'My biggest error? Something that is to happen yet.', u'Of course there are moments that you wonder how long you should be doing it because there are other aspects which are not nice, of this lifestyle. But I just love winning.', u'Fear is exciting for me.', u'On a given day, a given circumstance, you think you have a limit.', u"Because in a split second, it's gone.", u'I was already on pole, then by half a second and then one second and I just kept going. Suddenly I was nearly two seconds faster than anybody else, including my team mate with the same car.', u'Then suddenly something just kicked me. I kind of woke up and realised that I was in a different atmosphere than you normally are. My immediate reaction was to back off, slow down.', u'And suddenly I realised that I was no longer driving the car consciously. I was driving it by a kind of instinct, only I was in a different dimension.', u"It's going to be a season with lots of accidents, and I'll risk saying that we'll be lucky if something really serious doesn't happen.", u'The danger sensation is exciting. The challenge is to find new dangers.', u'I am not designed to come second or third. I am designed to win.', u'It was like I was in a tunnel. Not only the tunnel under the hotel but the whole circuit was a tunnel. I was just going and going, more and more and more and more. I was way over the limit but still able to find even more.'], u'Ron White': [u'I believe that if life gives you lemons, you should make lemonade... And try to find somebody whose life has given them vodka, and have a party.', u"I had the right to remain silent... but I didn't have the ability.", u'The next time you have a thought... let it go.', u"I didn't get where I am today by worryin' about how I'd feel tomorrow.", u'You wanna get the truth out of me, get me hammered.', u"Other states are trying to abolish the death penalty... mine's putting in an express lane.", u"Diamonds - that'll shut her up... for a minute!", u'There were years when I was a beer and tequila guy, then I got real fat. And then I found that you could actually go on a diet and drink scotch. Then I got hooked on scotch, and if you get hooked on scotch, then everything else just tastes wrong.', u"People are saying that I'm an alcoholic, and that's not true, because I only drink when I work, and I'm a workaholic.", u'Anybody could say anything they want about me, and it literally never penetrates my skin.', u"I do live like a rock star, but it's not as great as it sounds. It's a lot of traveling.", u"There have been times in my life that I've had a ton of vices, and my demons have run amok for years and years and years.", u"I've never been one to look up the ladder. I've always looked down the ladder. As long as there's one guy down there, I'm fine.", u"But I work harder now because I have so much more exposure. And actually the harder you work as a writer, the better you get at it. It's like anything else. It's a muscle you have to exercise. I write more now than ever.", u'Everybody I know is a joke writer.', u'I believe everything creative is somewhat collaborative.', u'I was a huge fan of comedy when I was a child.', u"I was considered by my peers to be a good comedian. So that's all I ever strived to do was get some recognition from my peers.", u"I'd rather do a really good small part than a really bad big part.", u"I've got a great cigar collection - it's actually not a collection, because that would imply I wasn't going to smoke every last one of 'em.", u'My goal is just to become a better comedian.', u"The hardest that I've laughed at a movie was probably Team America. I laughed 'til I thought I was just gonna throw up. I almost had to turn it off.", u'When I was about 12 years old back in Houston, my Dad used to take us to the driving range.', u"You know, my first album, some of those jokes I'd done for twelve years because I couldn't throw 'em out."], u'Woodrow Wilson': [u'The government, which was designed for the people, has got into the hands of the bosses and their employers, the special interests. An invisible empire has been set up above the forms of democracy.', u'If a dog will not come to you after having looked you in the face, you should go home and examine your conscience.', u'If you want to make enemies, try to change something.', u'Liberty has never come from Government. Liberty has always come from the subjects of it. The history of liberty is a history of limitations of governmental power, not the increase of it.', u'You are not here merely to make a living. You are here in order to enable the world to live more amply, with greater vision, with a finer spirit of hope and achievement. You are here to enrich the world, and you impoverish yourself if you forget the errand.', u'The ear of the leader must ring with the voices of the people.', u'A little group of willful men, representing no opinion but their own, have rendered the great government of the United States helpless and contemptible.', u"At every crisis in one's life, it is absolute salvation to have some sympathetic friend to whom you can think aloud without restraint or misgiving.", u"Business underlies everything in our national life, including our spiritual life. Witness the fact that in the Lord's Prayer, the first petition is for daily bread. No one can worship God or love his neighbor on an empty stomach.", u'I not only use all the brains that I have, but all that I can borrow.', u'A conservative is a man who just sits and thinks, mostly sits.', u'I have long enjoyed the friendship and companionship of Republicans because I am by instinct a teacher, and I would like to teach them something.', u'There can be no equality or opportunity if men and women and children be not shielded in their lives from the consequences of great industrial and social processes which they cannot alter, control, or singly cope with.', u"In the Lord's Prayer, the first petition is for daily bread. No one can worship God or love his neighbor on an empty stomach.", u'The method of political science is the interpretation of life; its instrument is insight, a nice understanding of subtle, unformulated conditions.', u'The only use of an obstacle is to be overcome. All that an obstacle does with brave men is, not to frighten them, but to challenge them.', u'I would rather lose in a cause that will some day win, than win in a cause that will some day lose.', u'If you think too much about being re-elected, it is very difficult to be worth re-electing.', u'Tell me what is right and I will fight for it.', u'The history of liberty is a history of resistance.', u'There is no higher religion than human service. To work for the common good is the greatest creed.', u'You cannot, in human experience, rush into the light. You have to go through the twilight into the broadening day before the noon comes and the full sun is upon the landscape.', u'A conservative is someone who makes no changes and consults his grandmother when in doubt.', u'America is not anything if it consists of each of us. It is something only if it consists of all of us.', u'America was established not to create wealth but to realize a vision, to realize an ideal - to discover and maintain liberty among men.'], u'Charles Dickens': [u'A loving heart is the truest wisdom.', u'Electric communication will never be a substitute for the face of someone who with their soul encourages another person to be brave and true.', u"A day wasted on others is not wasted on one's self.", u'Have a heart that never hardens, and a temper that never tires, and a touch that never hurts.', u'There is a wisdom of the head, and a wisdom of the heart.', u'A wonderful fact to reflect upon, that every human creature is constituted to be that profound secret and mystery to every other.', u"I have known a vast quantity of nonsense talked about bad men not looking you in the face. Don't trust that conventional idea. Dishonesty will stare honesty out of countenance any day in the week, if there is anything to be got by it.", u'Reflect upon your present blessings of which every man has many - not on your past misfortunes, of which all men have some.', u'The whole difference between construction and creation is exactly this: that a thing constructed can only be loved after it is constructed; but a thing created is loved before it exists.', u'To conceal anything from those to whom I am attached, is not in my nature. I can never close my lips where I have opened my heart.', u'Whatever I have tried to do in life, I have tried with all my heart to do it well; whatever I have devoted myself to, I have devoted myself completely; in great aims and in small I have always thoroughly been in earnest.', u'Happy, happy Christmas, that can win us back to the delusions of our childhood days, recall to the old man the pleasures of his youth, and transport the traveler back to his own fireside and quiet home!', u'I will honor Christmas in my heart, and try to keep it all the year.', u'Cows are my passion. What I have ever sighed for has been to retreat to a Swiss farm, and live entirely surrounded by cows - and china.', u'The pain of parting is nothing to the joy of meeting again.', u'There are dark shadows on the earth, but its lights are stronger in the contrast.', u'If there were no bad people, there would be no good lawyers.', u'It was one of those March days when the sun shines hot and the wind blows cold: when it is summer in the light, and winter in the shade.', u'I never could have done what I have done without the habits of punctuality, order, and diligence, without the determination to concentrate myself on one subject at a time.', u'Life is made of ever so many partings welded together.', u'An idea, like a ghost, must be spoken to a little before it will explain itself.', u'It is a melancholy truth that even great men have their poor relations.', u'Fan the sinking flame of hilarity with the wing of friendship; and pass the rosy wine.', u'Credit is a system whereby a person who can not pay gets another person who can not pay to guarantee that he can pay.', u"Any man may be in good spirits and good temper when he's well dressed. There ain't much credit in that."], u'George W. Bush': [u'Terrorist attacks can shake the foundations of our biggest buildings, but they cannot touch the foundation of America. These acts shatter steel, but they cannot dent the steel of American resolve.', u'I can hear you, the rest of the world can hear you and the people who knocked these buildings down will hear all of us soon.', u'America must not ignore the threat gathering against us. Facing clear evidence of peril, we cannot wait for the final proof, the smoking gun that could come in the form of a mushroom cloud.', u'America is a Nation with a mission - and that mission comes from our most basic beliefs. We have no desire to dominate, no ambitions of empire. Our aim is a democratic peace - a peace founded upon the dignity and rights of every man and woman.', u'On September 11 2001, America felt its vulnerability even to threats that gather on the other side of the Earth. We resolved then, and we are resolved today, to confront every threat from any source that could bring sudden terror and suffering to America.', u'Freedom itself was attacked this morning by a faceless coward, and freedom will be defended.', u'Government does not create wealth. The major role for the government is to create an environment where people take risks to expand the job rate in the United States.', u'Leadership to me means duty, honor, country. It means character, and it means listening from time to time.', u'I have a different vision of leadership. A leadership is someone who brings people together.', u'To those of you who received honours, awards and distinctions, I say well done. And to the C students, I say you, too, can be president of the United States.', u'I believe the most solemn duty of the American president is to protect the American people. If America shows uncertainty and weakness in this decade, the world will drift toward tragedy. This will not happen on my watch.', u'We will stand up for our friends in the world. And one of the most important friends is the State of Israel. My administration will be steadfast in support Israel against terrorism and violence, and in seeking the peace for which all Israelis pray.', u"I know it's going to be the private sector that leads this country out of the current economic times we're in. You can spend your money better than the government can spend your money.", u'Everywhere that freedom stirs, let tyrants fear.', u"A dictatorship would be a heck of a lot easier, there's no question about it.", u"When I take action, I'm not going to fire a $2 million missile at a $10 empty tent and hit a camel in the butt. It's going to be decisive.", u'America is the land of the second chance - and when the gates of the prison open, the path ahead should lead to a better life.', u"I just want you to know that, when we talk about war, we're really talking about peace.", u'The course of this conflict is not known, yet its outcome is certain. Freedom and fear, justice and cruelty, have always been at war, and we know that God is not neutral between them.', u'We will make no distinction between the terrorists who committed these acts and those who harbour them.', u'Do I think faith will be an important part of being a good president? Yes, I do.', u'We will not waver; we will not tire; we will not falter, and we will not fail. Peace and Freedom will prevail.', u'When you turn your heart and your life over to Christ, when you accept Christ as the savior, it changes your heart.', u'After the chaos and carnage of September 11th, it is not enough to serve our enemies with legal papers.', u'States should have the right to enact laws... particularly to end the inhumane practice of ending a life that otherwise could live.'], u'W. Somerset Maugham': [u"When you choose your friends, don't be short-changed by choosing personality over character.", u'We are not the same persons this year as last; nor are those we love. It is a happy chance if we, changing, continue to love a changed person.', u'Love is only a dirty trick played on us to achieve continuation of the species.', u"A man marries to have a home, but also because he doesn't want to be bothered with sex and all that sort of thing.", u'There are three rules for writing a novel. Unfortunately, no one knows what they are.', u'The common idea that success spoils people by making them vain, egotistic and self-complacent is erroneous; on the contrary it makes them, for the most part, humble, tolerant and kind.', u'If a nation values anything more than freedom, it will lose its freedom, and the irony of it is that if it is comfort or money that it values more, it will lose that too.', u"It's no good trying to keep up old friendships. It's painful for both sides. The fact is, one grows out of people, and the only thing is to face it.", u'Death is a very dull, dreary affair, and my advice to you is to have nothing whatsoever to do with it.', u'The love that lasts longest is the love that is never returned.', u'Excess on occasion is exhilarating. It prevents moderation from acquiring the deadening effect of a habit.', u'An unfortunate thing about this world is that the good habits are much easier to give up than the bad ones.', u'Imagination grows by exercise, and contrary to common belief, is more powerful in the mature than in the young.', u'Every production of an artist should be the expression of an adventure of his soul.', u'It was such a lovely day I thought it a pity to get up.', u"It's a funny thing about life; if you refuse to accept anything but the best, you very often get it.", u'Only a mediocre person is always at his best.', u'There is no explanation for evil. It must be looked upon as a necessary part of the order of the universe. To ignore it is childish, to bewail it senseless.', u'It is not true that suffering ennobles the character; happiness does that sometimes, but suffering for the most part, makes men petty and vindictive.', u"It is not wealth one asks for, but just enough to preserve one's dignity, to work unhampered, to be generous, frank and independent.", u'Any nation that thinks more of its ease and comfort than its freedom will soon lose its freedom; and the ironical thing about it is that it will lose its ease and comfort too.', u'I can imagine no more comfortable frame of mind for the conduct of life than a humorous resignation.', u'It is an illusion that youth is happy, an illusion of those who have lost it.', u'Beauty is an ecstasy; it is as simple as hunger. There is really nothing to be said about it. It is like the perfume of a rose: you can smell it and that is all.', u'Have common sense and stick to the point.'], u'George Orwell': [u'People sleep peaceably in their beds at night only because rough men stand ready to do violence on their behalf.', u'In a time of universal deceit - telling the truth is a revolutionary act.', u'If you want a vision of the future, imagine a boot stamping on a human face - forever.', u'Political language... is designed to make lies sound truthful and murder respectable, and to give an appearance of solidity to pure wind.', u'During times of universal deceit, telling the truth becomes a revolutionary act.', u'Who controls the past controls the future. Who controls the present controls the past.', u'War is peace. Freedom is slavery. Ignorance is strength.', u'We sleep safe in our beds because rough men stand ready in the night to visit violence on those who would do us harm.', u'Political chaos is connected with the decay of language... one can probably bring about some improvement by starting at the verbal end.', u'All political thinking for years past has been vitiated in the same way. People can foresee the future only when it coincides with their own wishes, and the most grossly obvious facts can be ignored when they are unwelcome.', u'Serious sport has nothing to do with fair play. It is bound up with hatred, jealousy, boastfulness, disregard of all rules and sadistic pleasure in witnessing violence. In other words, it is war minus the shooting.', u"Doublethink means the power of holding two contradictory beliefs in one's mind simultaneously, and accepting both of them.", u'All the war-propaganda, all the screaming and lies and hatred, comes invariably from people who are not fighting.', u'In times of universal deceit, telling the truth will be a revolutionary act.', u'Every war when it comes, or before it comes, is represented not as a war but as an act of self-defense against a homicidal maniac.', u'Freedom is the right to tell people what they do not want to hear.', u'We have now sunk to a depth at which restatement of the obvious is the first duty of intelligent men.', u'Man is the only creature that consumes without producing. He does not give milk, he does not lay eggs, he is too weak to pull the plough, he cannot run fast enough to catch rabbits. Yet he is lord of all the animals.', u'Happiness can exist only in acceptance.', u'Big Brother is watching you.', u'One does not establish a dictatorship in order to safeguard a revolution; one makes a revolution in order to establish a dictatorship.', u'The nationalist not only does not disapprove of atrocities committed by his own side, but he has a remarkable capacity for not even hearing about them.', u'If liberty means anything at all, it means the right to tell people what they do not want to hear.', u'Liberal: a power worshipper without power.', u'All animals are equal, but some animals are more equal than others.'], u'Henry Wadsworth Longfellow': [u'Heights by great men reached and kept were not obtained by sudden flight but, while their companions slept, they were toiling upward in the night.', u'It is difficult to know at what moment love begins; it is less difficult to know that it has begun.', u'Ships that pass in the night, and speak each other in passing, only a signal shown, and a distant voice in the darkness; So on the ocean of life, we pass and speak one another, only a look and a voice, then darkness again and a silence.', u'Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad.', u'Lives of great men all remind us, we can make our lives sublime, and, departing, leave behind us, footprints on the sands of time.', u'A single conversation across the table with a wise man is better than ten years mere study of books.', u"The best thing one can do when it's raining is to let it rain.", u'It is foolish to pretend that one is fully recovered from a disappointed passion. Such wounds always leave a scar.', u'Look not mournfully into the past, it comes not back again. Wisely improve the present, it is thine. Go forth to meet the shadowy future without fear and with a manly heart.', u'There are moments in life, when the heart is so full of emotion That if by chance it be shaken, or into its depths like a pebble Drops some careless word, it overflows, and its secret, Spilt on the ground like water, can never be gathered together.', u'Perseverance is a great element of success. If you only knock long enough and loud enough at the gate, you are sure to wake up somebody.', u'It takes less time to do a thing right, than it does to explain why you did it wrong.', u"If we could read the secret history of our enemies we should find in each man's life sorrow and suffering enough to disarm all hostility.", u'Into each life some rain must fall.', u'A torn jacket is soon mended; but hard words bruise the heart of a child.', u'Simplicity in character, in manners, in style; in all things the supreme excellence is simplicity.', u"Each morning sees some task begun, each evening sees it close; Something attempted, something done, has earned a night's repose.", u'In this world a man must either be anvil or hammer.', u'Give what you have to somebody, it may be better than you think.', u'Man is always more than he can know of himself; consequently, his accomplishments, time and again, will come as a surprise to him.', u'They who go Feel not the pain of parting; it is they Who stay behind that suffer.', u'There is no grief like the grief that does not speak.', u'We judge ourselves by what we feel capable of doing, while others judge us by what we have already done.', u'Ambition is so powerful a passion in the human breast, that however high we reach we are never satisfied.', u'For age is opportunity no less Than youth itself, though in another dress, And as the evening twilight fades away The sky is filled with stars, invisible by day.'], u'Thomas A. Edison': [u"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work.", u'Our greatest weakness lies in giving up. The most certain way to succeed is always to try just one more time.', u'Opportunity is missed by most people because it is dressed in overalls and looks like work.', u'Being busy does not always mean real work. The object of all work is production or accomplishment and to either of these ends there must be forethought, system, planning, intelligence, and honest purpose, as well as perspiration. Seeming to do is not doing.', u'I have friends in overalls whose friendship I would not swap for the favor of the kings of the world.', u'Genius is one percent inspiration and ninety-nine percent perspiration.', u"Many of life's failures are people who did not realize how close they were to success when they gave up.", u'If we did all the things we are capable of, we would literally astound ourselves.', u"Hell, there are no rules here - we're trying to accomplish something.", u'To invent, you need a good imagination and a pile of junk.', u"I never did a day's work in my life. It was all fun.", u'The reason a lot of people do not recognize opportunity is because it usually goes around wearing overalls looking like hard work.', u'There is no substitute for hard work.', u'Be courageous. I have seen many depressions in business. Always America has emerged from these stronger and more prosperous. Be brave as your fathers before you. Have faith! Go forward!', u"Just because something doesn't do what you planned it to do doesn't mean it's useless.", u'Non-violence leads to the highest ethics, which is the goal of all evolution. Until we stop harming all other living beings, we are still savages.', u'I never did anything by accident, nor did any of my inventions come by accident; they came by work.', u'I know this world is ruled by infinite intelligence. Everything that surrounds us- everything that exists - proves that there are infinite laws behind it. There can be no denying this fact. It is mathematical in its precision.', u"Anything that won't sell, I don't want to invent. Its sale is proof of utility, and utility is success.", u'The three great essentials to achieve anything worth while are: Hard work, Stick-to-itiveness, and Common sense.', u'Discontent is the first necessity of progress.', u'Maturity is often more absurd than youth and very frequently is most unjust to youth.', u'There will one day spring from the brain of science a machine or force so fearful in its potentialities, so absolutely terrifying, that even man, the fighter, who will dare torture and death in order to inflict torture and death, will be appalled, and so abandon war forever.', u'Everything comes to him who hustles while he waits.', u'Restlessness is discontent and discontent is the first necessity of progress. Show me a thoroughly satisfied man and I will show you a failure.'], u'Anton Chekhov': [u"Any idiot can face a crisis - it's day to day living that wears you out.", u'Medicine is my lawful wife and literature my mistress; when I get tired of one, I spend the night with the other.', u'People who lead a lonely existence always have something on their minds that they are eager to talk about.', u'Doctors are just the same as lawyers; the only difference is that lawyers merely rob you, whereas doctors rob you and kill you too.', u'If you are afraid of loneliness, do not marry.', u'Knowledge is of no value unless you put it into practice.', u"Don't tell me the moon is shining; show me the glint of light on broken glass.", u'I promise to be an excellent husband, but give me a wife who, like the moon, will not appear every day in my sky.', u'Let us learn to appreciate there will be times when the trees will be bare, and look forward to the time when we may pick the fruit.', u'Life does not agree with philosophy: There is no happiness that is not idleness, and only what is useless is pleasurable.', u'There is nothing new in art except talent.', u"A good upbringing means not that you won't spill sauce on the tablecloth, but that you won't notice it when someone else does.", u'Love, friendship and respect do not unite people as much as a common hatred for something.', u'The world perishes not from bandits and fires, but from hatred, hostility, and all these petty squabbles.', u'Advertising is the very essence of democracy.', u'Faith is an aptitude of the spirit. It is, in fact, a talent: you must be born with it.', u"People don't notice whether it's winter or summer when they're happy.", u'We shall find peace. We shall hear angels, we shall see the sky sparkling with diamonds.', u'You must trust and believe in people or life becomes impossible.', u"If you cry 'forward', you must without fail make plain in what direction to go.", u'No matter how corrupt and unjust a convict may be, he loves fairness more than anything else. If the people placed over him are unfair, from year to year he lapses into an embittered state characterized by an extreme lack of faith.', u"When you're thirsty and it seems that you could drink the entire ocean that's faith; when you start to drink and finish only a glass or two that's science.", u'All of life and human relations have become so incomprehensibly complex that, when you think about it, it becomes terrifying and your heart stands still.', u'How unbearable at times are people who are happy, people for whom everything works out.', u'Man is what he believes.'], u'Bill Copeland': [u'Try to be like the turtle - at ease in your own shell.', u"Not only is women's work never done, the definition keeps changing.", u'The man who rows the boat seldom has time to rock it.', u'Before deciding to retire, stay home for a week and watch the daytime TV shows.', u'How strange to use "You only live once" as an excuse to throw it away.', u'After all is said and done, sit down.', u'When you stretch the truth, watch out for the snapback.'], u'Steve Jobs': [u"Your time is limited, so don't waste it living someone else's life. Don't be trapped by dogma - which is living with the results of other people's thinking. Don't let the noise of others' opinions drown out your own inner voice. And most important, have the courage to follow your heart and intuition.", u"Again, you can't connect the dots looking forward; you can only connect them looking backwards. So you have to trust that the dots will somehow connect in your future. You have to trust in something - your gut, destiny, life, karma, whatever. This approach has never let me down, and it has made all the difference in my life.", u"For the past 33 years, I have looked in the mirror every morning and asked myself: 'If today were the last day of my life, would I want to do what I am about to do today?' And whenever the answer has been 'No' for too many days in a row, I know I need to change something.", u"Being the richest man in the cemetery doesn't matter to me. Going to bed at night saying we've done something wonderful, that's what matters to me.", u"Be a yardstick of quality. Some people aren't used to an environment where excellence is expected.", u"If you haven't found it yet, keep looking. Don't settle. As with all matters of the heart, you'll know when you find it. And, like any great relationship, it just gets better and better as the years roll on.", u"You can't connect the dots looking forward; you can only connect them looking backwards. So you have to trust that the dots will somehow connect in your future. You have to trust in something - your gut, destiny, life, karma, whatever. This approach has never let me down, and it has made all the difference in my life.", u"Creativity is just connecting things. When you ask creative people how they did something, they feel a little guilty because they didn't really do it, they just saw something. It seemed obvious to them after a while. That's because they were able to connect experiences they've had and synthesize new things.", u"That's been one of my mantras - focus and simplicity. Simple can be harder than complex: You have to work hard to get your thinking clean to make it simple. But it's worth it in the end because once you get there, you can move mountains.", u"Remembering that I'll be dead soon is the most important tool I've ever encountered to help me make the big choices in life. Because almost everything - all external expectations, all pride, all fear of embarrassment or failure - these things just fall away in the face of death, leaving only what is truly important.", u"Your work is going to fill a large part of your life, and the only way to be truly satisfied is to do what you believe is great work. And the only way to do great work is to love what you do. If you haven't found it yet, keep looking. Don't settle. As with all matters of the heart, you'll know when you find it.", u"No one wants to die. Even people who want to go to heaven don't want to die to get there. And yet death is the destination we all share. No one has ever escaped it. And that is as it should be, because Death is very likely the single best invention of Life. It is Life's change agent. It clears out the old to make way for the new.", u"My favorite things in life don't cost any money. It's really clear that the most precious resource we all have is time.", u'A lot of companies have chosen to downsize, and maybe that was the right thing for them. We chose a different path. Our belief was that if we kept putting great products in front of customers, they would continue to open their wallets.', u'Sometimes when you innovate, you make mistakes. It is best to admit them quickly, and get on with improving your other innovations.', u'Innovation distinguishes between a leader and a follower.', u'Remembering that you are going to die is the best way I know to avoid the trap of thinking you have something to lose. You are already naked. There is no reason not to follow your heart.', u"You can't just ask customers what they want and then try to give that to them. By the time you get it built, they'll want something new.", u'Design is not just what it looks like and feels like. Design is how it works.', u"When you're a carpenter making a beautiful chest of drawers, you're not going to use a piece of plywood on the back, even though it faces the wall and nobody will ever see it. You'll know it's there, so you're going to use a beautiful piece of wood on the back.", u"As individuals, people are inherently good. I have a somewhat more pessimistic view of people in groups. And I remain extremely concerned when I see what's happening in our country, which is in many ways the luckiest place in the world. We don't seem to be excited about making our country a better place for our kids.", u'Stay hungry, stay foolish.', u"Older people sit down and ask, 'What is it?' but the boy asks, 'What can I do with it?'.", u"Things don't have to change the world to be important.", u"A lot of people in our industry haven't had very diverse experiences. So they don't have enough dots to connect, and they end up with very linear solutions without a broad perspective on the problem. The broader one's understanding of the human experience, the better design we will have."], u'Virgil': [u'They succeed, because they think they can.', u'Love conquers all.', u'Come what may, all bad fortune is to be conquered by endurance.', u"It is easy to go down into Hell; night and day, the gates of dark Death stand wide; but to climb back again, to retrace one's steps to the upper air - there's the rub, the task.", u'Trust not too much to appearances.', u'Love begets love, love knows no rules, this is same for all.', u'Every calamity is to be overcome by endurance.', u'Happy the man who has been able to learn the causes of things.', u'They are able because they think they are able.', u'As the twig is bent the tree inclines.', u'Each of us bears his own Hell.', u'Every man makes a god of his own desire.', u'Fate will find a way.', u'Wherever the fates lead us let us follow.', u'Endure the present, and watch for better things.', u'Fear is proof of a degenerate mind.', u'It never troubles the wolf how many the sheep may be.', u'Myself acquainted with misfortune, I learn to help the unfortunate.', u'Passion and strife bow down the mind.', u'They can because they think they can.', u'Better times perhaps await us who are now wretched.', u'Confidence cannot find a place wherein to rest in safety.', u'Fortune favours the bold.', u'Fortune sides with him who dares.', u'He like a rock in the sea unshaken stands his ground.'], u'Robert A. Heinlein': [u'Love is that condition in which the happiness of another person is essential to your own... Jealousy is a disease, love is a healthy condition. The immature mind often mistakes one for the other, or assumes that the greater the love, the greater the jealousy.', u'A competent and self-confident person is incapable of jealousy in anything. Jealousy is invariably a symptom of neurotic insecurity.', u'An armed society is a polite society. Manners are good when one may have to back up his acts with his life.', u'I am free because I know that I alone am morally responsible for everything I do. I am free, no matter what rules surround me. If I find them tolerable, I tolerate them; if I find them too obnoxious, I break them. I am free because I know that I alone am morally responsible for everything I do.', u'Women and cats will do as they please, and men and dogs should relax and get used to the idea.', u'Political tags - such as royalist, communist, democrat, populist, fascist, liberal, conservative, and so forth - are never basic criteria. The human race divides politically into those who want people to be controlled and those who have no such desire.', u'Never underestimate the power of human stupidity.', u"Don't handicap your children by making their lives easy.", u'Sex without love is merely healthy exercise.', u'One of the sanest, surest, and most generous joys of life comes from being happy over the good fortune of others.', u"When a place gets crowded enough to require ID's, social collapse is not far away. It is time to go elsewhere. The best thing about space travel is that it made it possible to go elsewhere.", u"Don't ever become a pessimist... a pessimist is correct oftener than an optimist, but an optimist has more fun, and neither can stop the march of events.", u'When any government, or any church for that matter, undertakes to say to its subjects, This you may not read, this you must not see, this you are forbidden to know, the end result is tyranny and oppression no matter how holy the motives.', u"You can have peace. Or you can have freedom. Don't ever count on having both at once.", u'May you live as long as you wish and love as long as you live.', u"They didn't want it good, they wanted it Wednesday.", u'It is a truism that almost any sect, cult, or religion will legislate its creed into law if it acquires the political power to do so.', u'I never learned from a man who agreed with me.', u"Theology is never any help; it is searching in a dark cellar at midnight for a black cat that isn't there. Theologians can persuade themselves of anything.", u'A society that gets rid of all its troublemakers goes downhill.', u'Be wary of strong drink. It can make you shoot at tax collectors... and miss.', u"One man's theology is another man's belly laugh.", u'Being right too soon is socially unacceptable.', u'Never insult anyone by accident.', u'One man\'s "magic" is another man\'s engineering. "Supernatural" is a null word.'], u'John C. Maxwell': [u'A man must be big enough to admit his mistakes, smart enough to profit from them, and strong enough to correct them.', u"Learn to say 'no' to the good so you can say 'yes' to the best.", u"The greatest day in your life and mine is when we take total responsibility for our attitudes. That's the day we truly grow up.", u'A leader is one who knows the way, goes the way, and shows the way.', u'Leaders must be close enough to relate to others, but far enough ahead to motivate them.', u'Leadership is influence.', u'The greatest mistake we make is living in constant fear that we will make one.', u'People may hear your words, but they feel your attitude.', u'Remember, man does not live on bread alone: sometimes he needs a little buttering up.', u'Policies are many, Principles are few, Policies will change, Principles never do.', u'Good executives never put off until tomorrow what they can get someone else to do today.', u"We choose what attitudes we have right now. And it's a continuing choice.", u'People buy into the leader before they buy into the vision.', u'Educators take something simple and make it complicated. Communicators take something complicated and make it simple.', u"If you're lying, you're lying.", u'In the end, people are persuaded not by what we say, but by what they understand.', u"The first time you say something, it's heard. The second time, it's recognized, and the third time it's learned.", u'To add value to others, one must first value others.'], u'Ronald Reagan': [u"Freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction. We didn't pass it to our children in the bloodstream. It must be fought for, protected, and handed on for them to do the same.", u"No government ever voluntarily reduces itself in size. Government programs, once launched, never disappear. Actually, a government bureau is the nearest thing to eternal life we'll ever see on this earth!", u'If we ever forget that we are One Nation Under God, then we will be a nation gone under.', u'Concentrated power has always been the enemy of liberty.', u"There are no easy answers' but there are simple answers. We must have the courage to do what we know is morally right.", u"We should measure welfare's success by how many people leave welfare, not by how many are added.", u'Freedom prospers when religion is vibrant and the rule of law under God is acknowledged.', u"Government's view of the economy could be summed up in a few short phrases: If it moves, tax it. If it keeps moving, regulate it. And if it stops moving, subsidize it.", u'Man is not free unless government is limited.', u'Government exists to protect us from each other. Where government has gone beyond its limits is in deciding to protect us from ourselves.', u'I have wondered at times what the Ten Commandments would have looked like if Moses had run them through the US Congress.', u"Government's first duty is to protect the people, not run their lives.", u"Some people wonder all their lives if they've made a difference. The Marines don't have that problem.", u'All great change in America begins at the dinner table.', u"We can't help everyone, but everyone can help someone.", u'Entrepreneurs and their small enterprises are responsible for almost all the economic growth in the United States.', u'It has been said that politics is the second oldest profession. I have learned that it bears a striking resemblance to the first.', u'Government does not solve problems; it subsidizes them.', u'The problem is not that people are taxed too little, the problem is that government spends too much.', u'Republicans believe every day is the Fourth of July, but the democrats believe every day is April 15.', u"I've never been able to understand why a Republican contributor is a 'fat cat' and a Democratic contributor of the same amount of money is a 'public-spirited philanthropist'.", u'Recession is when a neighbor loses his job. Depression is when you lose yours.', u"The most terrifying words in the English language are: I'm from the government and I'm here to help.", u"Above all, we must realize that no arsenal, or no weapon in the arsenals of the world, is so formidable as the will and moral courage of free men and women. It is a weapon our adversaries in today's world do not have.", u"We must reject the idea that every time a law's broken, society is guilty rather than the lawbreaker. It is time to restore the American precept that each individual is accountable for his actions."], u'John Barrymore': [u"Happiness often sneaks in through a door you didn't know you left open.", u'A man is not old until regrets take the place of dreams.', u'Sex: the thing that takes up the least amount of time and causes the most amount of trouble.', u'Why is there so much month left at the end of the money?', u'Love is the delightful interval between meeting a beautiful girl and discovering that she looks like a haddock.', u"The good die young, because they see it's no use living if you have got to be good.", u'In Genesis, it says that it is not good for a man to be alone; but sometimes it is a great relief.', u'The trouble with life is that there are so many beautiful women and so little time.', u'You can only be as good as you dare to be bad.', u'My wife was too beautiful for words, but not for arguments.', u'I am thinking of taking a fifth wife. Why not? Solomon had a thousand wives and he is a synonym for wisdom.', u'When archaeologists discover the missing arms of Venus de Milo, they will find she was wearing boxing gloves.', u"You can't drown yourself in drink. I've tried, you float.", u'America is the country where you can buy a lifetime supply of aspirin For one dollar and use it up in two weeks.', u'Die? I should say not, dear fellow. No Barrymore would allow such a conventional thing to happen to him.', u'I would like to find a stew that will give me heartburn immediately, instead of at three o clock in the morning.', u"I've read some of your modern free verse and wonder who set it free.", u"If it isn't the sheriff, it's the finance company; I've got more attachments on me than a vacuum cleaner.", u'My wife is the kind of girl who will not go anywhere without her mother, and her mother will go anywhere.', u'You never realize how short a month is until you pay alimony.'], u'Marilyn Monroe': [u"It's better to be unhappy alone than unhappy with someone - so far.", u'Dogs never bite me. Just humans.', u'Before marriage, a girl has to make love to a man to hold him. After marriage, she has to hold him to make love to him.', u"I don't know who invented high heels, but all women owe him a lot.", u"I don't mind living in a man's world as long as I can be a woman in it.", u"A career is wonderful, but you can't curl up with it on a cold night.", u"It's often just enough to be with someone. I don't need to touch them. Not even talk. A feeling passes between you both. You're not alone.", u'I have feelings too. I am still human. All I want is to be loved, for myself and for my talent.', u"Hollywood is a place where they'll pay you a thousand dollars for a kiss and fifty cents for your soul.", u"No one ever told me I was pretty when I was a little girl. All little girls should be told they're pretty, even if they aren't.", u'Sex is a part of nature. I go along with nature.', u"I restore myself when I'm alone.", u'I knew I belonged to the public and to the world, not because I was talented or even beautiful, but because I had never belonged to anything or anyone else.', u"I don't mind making jokes, but I don't want to look like one.", u'I have too many fantasies to be a housewife. I guess I am a fantasy.', u'A sex symbol becomes a thing. I just hate to be a thing.', u"I am invariably late for appointments - sometimes as much as two hours. I've tried to change my ways but the things that make me late are too strong, and too pleasing.", u'What do I wear in bed? Why, Chanel No. 5, of course.', u'Being a sex symbol is a heavy load to carry, especially when one is tired, hurt and bewildered.', u"I don't want to make money, I just want to be wonderful.", u"I've never dropped anyone I believed in.", u"I guess I have always been deeply terrified to really be someone's wife since I know from life one cannot love another, ever, really.", u'Men are so willing to respect anything that bores them.', u"If I'd observed all the rules, I'd never have got anywhere.", u'Husbands are chiefly good as lovers when they are betraying their wives.'], u'Lord Byron': [u'Absence - that common cure of love.', u'Be thou the rainbow in the storms of life. The evening beam that smiles the clouds away, and tints tomorrow with prophetic ray.', u'There is no instinct like that of the heart.', u'There is something pagan in me that I cannot shake off. In short, I deny nothing, but doubt everything.', u'Always laugh when you can. It is cheap medicine.', u'Friendship is Love without his wings!', u'A mistress never is nor can be a friend. While you agree, you are lovers; and when it is over, anything but friends.', u'Adversity is the first path to truth.', u'Sorrow is knowledge, those that know the most must mourn the deepest, the tree of knowledge is not the tree of life.', u'Love will find a way through paths where wolves fear to prey.', u'Yes, love indeed is light from heaven; A spark of that immortal fire with angels shared, by Allah given to lift from earth our low desire.', u'All who joy would win must share it. Happiness was born a Twin.', u'A woman should never be seen eating or drinking, unless it be lobster salad and Champagne, the only true feminine and becoming viands.', u'Lovers may be - and indeed generally are - enemies, but they never can be friends, because there must always be a spice of jealousy and a something of Self in all their speculations.', u"If I don't write to empty my mind, I go mad.", u'Death, so called, is a thing which makes men weep, And yet a third of life is passed in sleep.', u'Man, being reasonable, must get drunk; the best of life is but intoxication.', u'Roll on, deep and dark blue ocean, roll. Ten thousand fleets sweep over thee in vain. Man marks the earth with ruin, but his control stops with the shore.', u'As long as I retain my feeling and my passion for Nature, I can partly soften or subdue my other passions and resist or endure those of others.', u'I only go out to get me a fresh appetite for being alone.', u'Men think highly of those who rise rapidly in the world; whereas nothing rises quicker than dust, straw, and feathers.', u'When the green woods laugh with the voice of joy, And the dimpling stream runs laughing by; When the air does laugh with our merry wit, And the green hill laughs with the noise of it.', u'I cannot help thinking that the menace of Hell makes as many devils as the severe penal codes of inhuman humanity make villains.', u'I love not man the less, but Nature more.', u"Man's love is of man's life a part; it is a woman's whole existence. In her first passion, a woman loves her lover, in all the others all she loves is love."], u'Martin Luther': [u'Even if I knew that tomorrow the world would go to pieces, I would still plant my apple tree.', u'All who call on God in true faith, earnestly from the heart, will certainly be heard, and will receive what they have asked and desired.', u'Let the wife make the husband glad to come home, and let him make her sorry to see him leave.', u'There is no more lovely, friendly and charming relationship, communion or company than a good marriage.', u'I cannot and will not recant anything, for to go against conscience is neither right nor safe. Here I stand, I can do no other, so help me God. Amen.', u'Beautiful music is the art of the prophets that can calm the agitations of the soul; it is one of the most magnificent and delightful presents God has given us.', u'Every man must do two things alone; he must do his own believing and his own dying.', u'You are not only responsible for what you say, but also for what you do not say.', u"I have held many things in my hands, and I have lost them all; but whatever I have placed in God's hands, that I still possess.", u'Be a sinner and sin strongly, but more strongly have faith and rejoice in Christ.', u'I am afraid that the schools will prove the very gates of hell, unless they diligently labor in explaining the Holy Scriptures and engraving them in the heart of the youth.', u"Faith is a living, daring confidence in God's grace, so sure and certain that a man could stake his life on it a thousand times.", u'Pray, and let God worry.', u'God writes the Gospel not in the Bible alone, but also on trees, and in the flowers and clouds and stars.', u'Anyone who is to find Christ must first find the church. How could anyone know where Christ is and what faith is in him unless he knew where his believers are?', u'Next to the Word of God, the noble art of music is the greatest treasure in the world.', u'Prayer is a strong wall and fortress of the church; it is a goodly Christian weapon.', u'For in the true nature of things, if we rightly consider, every green tree is far more glorious than if it were made of gold and silver.', u'For where God built a church, there the Devil would also build a chapel.', u'I am more afraid of my own heart than of the pope and all his cardinals. I have within me the great pope, Self.', u'Be thou comforted, little dog, Thou too in Resurrection shall have a little golden tail.', u'Grant that I may not pray alone with the mouth; help me that I may pray from the depths of my heart.', u'My heart, which is so full to overflowing, has often been solaced and refreshed by music when sick and weary.', u'Everything that is done in the world is done by hope.', u'Faith must trample under foot all reason, sense, and understanding.'], u'Jean-Paul Sartre': [u'Everything has been figured out, except how to live.', u"When the rich wage war, it's the poor who die.", u'Man is condemned to be free; because once thrown into the world, he is responsible for everything he does.', u"Freedom is what you do with what's been done to you.", u"If you are lonely when you're alone, you are in bad company.", u'Ah! yes, I know: those who see me rarely trust my word: I must look too intelligent to keep it.', u'Hell is other people.', u"If I became a philosopher, if I have so keenly sought this fame for which I'm still waiting, it's all been to seduce women basically.", u'We must act out passion before we can feel it.', u"Only the guy who isn't rowing has time to rock the boat.", u'We do not judge the people we love.', u'Commitment is an act, not a word.', u'There are two types of poor people, those who are poor together and those who are poor alone. The first are the true poor, the others are rich people out of luck.', u'I do not believe in God; his existence has been disproved by Science. But in the concentration camp, I learned to believe in men.', u'As far as men go, it is not what they are that interests me, but what they can become.', u'A lost battle is a battle one thinks one has lost.', u'Fear? If I have gained anything by damning myself, it is that I no longer have anything to fear.', u'Every age has its own poetry; in every age the circumstances of history choose a nation, a race, a class to take up the torch by creating situations that can be expressed or transcended only through poetry.', u'Generosity is nothing else than a craze to possess. All which I abandon, all which I give, I enjoy in a higher manner through the fact that I give it away. To give is to enjoy possessively the object which one gives.', u'I am no longer sure of anything. If I satiate my desires, I sin but I deliver myself from them; if I refuse to satisfy them, they infect the whole soul.', u'I hate victims who respect their executioners.', u'Words are loaded pistols.', u"Three o'clock is always too late or too early for anything you want to do.", u'Life has no meaning the moment you loose the illusion of being eternal.', u'One always dies too soon or too late. And yet, life is there, finished: the line is drawn, and it must all be added up. You are nothing other than your life.'], u'John Wayne': [u"Life is tough, but it's tougher when you're stupid.", u'Courage is being scared to death... and saddling up anyway.', u"Tomorrow is the most important thing in life. Comes into us at midnight very clean. It's perfect when it arrives and it puts itself in our hands. It hopes we've learned something from yesterday.", u"Life is hard; it's harder if you're stupid.", u"If you've got them by the balls their hearts and minds will follow.", u"If everything isn't black and white, I say, 'Why the hell not?'", u"I don't feel we did wrong in taking this great country away from them. There were great numbers of people who needed new land, and the Indians were selfishly trying to keep it for themselves.", u'Tomorrow hopes we have learned something from yesterday.', u"Talk low, talk slow and don't say too much.", u'Get off your butt and join the Marines!', u'Get off your horse and drink your milk.'], u'Ovid': [u'A horse never runs so fast as when he has other horses to catch up and outpace.', u'If you want to be loved, be lovable.', u'Happy is the man who has broken the chains which hurt the mind, and has given up worrying once and for all.', u'Fortune and love favor the brave.', u'Love and dignity cannot share the same abode.', u'No man can purchase his virtue too dear, for it is the only thing whose value must ever increase with the price it has cost us. Our integrity is never worth so much as when we have parted with our all to keep it.', u"A new idea is delicate. It can be killed by a sneer or a yawn; it can be stabbed to death by a quip and worried to death by a frown on the right man's brow.", u'Beauty is a fragile gift.', u'Many women long for what eludes them, and like not what is offered them.', u'Bear and endure: This sorrow will one day prove to be for your good.', u'A man is sorry to be honest for nothing.', u'Daring is not safe against daring men.', u'Either do not attempt at all, or go through with it.', u'Endure and persist; this pain will turn to good by and by.', u'First thing every morning before you arise say out loud, "I believe," three times.', u'The spirited horse, which will try to win the race of its own accord, will run even faster if encouraged.', u'All things can corrupt when minds are prone to evil.', u'Chance is always powerful. Let your hook always be cast; in the pool where you least expect it, there will be fish.', u'Love is a thing that is full of cares and fears.', u'Note too that a faithful study of the liberal arts humanizes character and permits it not to be cruel.', u'We are ever striving after what is forbidden, and coveting what is denied us.', u'Every lover is a soldier.', u'Happy are those who dare courageously to defend what they love.', u'It is annoying to be honest to no purpose.', u'Suppressed grief suffocates, it rages within the breast, and is forced to multiply its strength.'], u'Elisabeth Kubler-Ross': [u'People are like stained - glass windows. They sparkle and shine when the sun is out, but when the darkness sets in, their true beauty is revealed only if there is a light from within.', u'Learn to get in touch with the silence within yourself, and know that everything in life has purpose. There are no mistakes, no coincidences, all events are blessings given to us to learn from.', u'There are no mistakes, no coincidences. All events are blessings given to us to learn from.', u"It's only when we truly know and understand that we have a limited time on earth - and that we have no way of knowing when our time is up, we will then begin to live each day to the fullest, as if it was the only one we had.", u'The ultimate lesson all of us have to learn is unconditional love, which includes not only others but ourselves as well.', u"We need to teach the next generation of children from day one that they are responsible for their lives. Mankind's greatest gift, also its greatest curse, is that we have free choice. We can make our choices built from love or from fear.", u'I believe that we are solely responsible for our choices, and we have to accept the consequences of every deed, word, and thought throughout our lifetime.', u"It is not the end of the physical body that should worry us. Rather, our concern must be to live while we're alive - to release our inner selves from the spiritual death that comes with living behind a facade designed to conform to external definitions of who and what we are.", u"As far as service goes, it can take the form of a million things. To do service, you don't have to be a doctor working in the slums for free, or become a social worker. Your position in life and what you do doesn't matter as much as how you do what you do.", u"Live, so you do not have to look back and say: 'God, how I have wasted my life.'", u"I've told my children that when I die, to release balloons in the sky to celebrate that I graduated. For me, death is a graduation.", u"I say to people who care for people who are dying, if you really love that person and want to help them, be with them when their end comes close. Sit with them - you don't even have to talk. You don't have to do anything but really be there with them.", u"I didn't fully realize it at the time, but the goal of my life was profoundly molded by this experience - to help produce, in the next generation, more Mother Teresas and less Hitlers.", u'Watching a peaceful death of a human being reminds us of a falling star; one of a million lights in a vast sky that flares up for a brief moment only to disappear into the endless night forever.', u'It is difficult to accept death in this society because it is unfamiliar. In spite of the fact that it happens all the time, we never see it.', u'Those who have the strength and the love to sit with a dying patient in the silence that goes beyond words will know that this moment is neither frightening nor painful, but a peaceful cessation of the functioning of the body.', u'Dying is something we human beings do continuously, not just at the end of our physical lives on this earth.', u'Should you shield the canyons from the windstorms you would never see the true beauty of their carvings.', u'For those who seek to understand it, death is a highly creative force. The highest spiritual values of life can originate from the thought and study of death.'], u'William Wordsworth': [u'That though the radiance which was once so bright be now forever taken from my sight. Though nothing can bring back the hour of splendor in the grass, glory in the flower. We will grieve not, rather find strength in what remains behind.', u'Come forth into the light of things, let nature be your teacher.', u'Life is divided into three terms - that which was, which is, and which will be. Let us learn from the past to profit by the present, and from the present to live better in the future.', u'Poetry is the spontaneous overflow of powerful feelings: it takes its origin from emotion recollected in tranquility.', u'A multitude of causes unknown to former times are now acting with a combined force to blunt the discriminating powers of the mind, and unfitting it for all voluntary exertion to reduce it to a state of almost savage torpor.', u'Faith is a passionate intuition.', u'For I have learned to look on nature, not as in the hour of thoughtless youth, but hearing oftentimes the still, sad music of humanity.', u'Nature never did betray the heart that loved her.', u'When from our better selves we have too long been parted by the hurrying world, and droop. Sick of its business, of its pleasures tired, how gracious, how benign is solitude.', u'Suffering is permanent, obscure and dark, And shares the nature of infinity.', u'With an eye made quiet by the power of harmony, and the deep power of joy, we see into the life of things.', u"In modern business it is not the crook who is to be feared most, it is the honest man who doesn't know what he is doing.", u"That best portion of a man's life, his little, nameless, unremembered acts of kindness and love.", u"The best portion of a good man's life is his little, nameless, unremembered acts of kindness and of love.", u'The flower that smells the sweetest is shy and lowly.', u'Fill your paper with the breathings of your heart.', u'The world is too much with us; late and soon, getting and spending, we lay waste our powers: Little we see in Nature that is ours.', u'I listened, motionless and still; And, as I mounted up the hill, The music in my heart I bore, Long after it was heard no more.', u'To me the meanest flower that blows can give thoughts that do often lie too deep for tears.', u'The mind that is wise mourns less for what age takes away; than what it leaves behind.', u'One impulse from a vernal wood May teach you more of man, Of moral evil and of good, Than all the sages can.', u'Our birth is but a sleep and a forgetting. Not in entire forgetfulness, and not in utter nakedness, but trailing clouds of glory do we come.', u'But an old age serene and bright, and lovely as a Lapland night, shall lead thee to thy grave.', u'To begin, begin.', u'The human mind is capable of excitement without the application of gross and violent stimulants; and he must have a very faint perception of its beauty and dignity who does not know this.'], u'Bette Davis': [u"I'd marry again if I found a man who had fifteen million dollars, would sign over half to me, and guarantee that he'd be dead within a year.", u'A sure way to lose happiness, I found, is to want it at the expense of everything else.', u'From the moment I was six I felt sexy. And let me tell you it was hell, sheer hell, waiting to do something about it.', u'I often think that a slightly exposed shoulder emerging from a long satin nightgown packs more sex than two naked bodies in bed.', u"Brought up to respect the conventions, love had to end in marriage. I'm afraid it did.", u"I'd luv to kiss ya, but I just washed my hair.", u'Everybody has a heart. Except some people.', u"Men become much more attractive when they start looking older. But it doesn't do much for women, though we do have an advantage: make-up.", u'Old age is no place for sissies.', u"If you've never been hated by your child, you've never been a parent.", u"Basically, I believe the world is a jungle, and if it's not a bit of a jungle in the home, a child cannot possibly be fit to enter the outside world.", u'I am just too much.', u'The best time I ever had with Joan Crawford was when I pushed her down the stairs in Whatever Happened to Baby Jane?', u'To fulfill a dream, to be allowed to sweat over lonely labor, to be given a chance to create, is the meat and potatoes of life. The money is the gravy.', u"Oh, don't let's ask for the moon. We've already got the stars.", u"Gay Liberation? I ain't against it, it's just that there's nothing in it for me.", u'I sent my flowers across the hall to Mrs Nixon but her husband remembered what a Democrat I am and sent them back.', u"I'm the nicest goddamn dame that ever lived.", u'I survived because I was tougher than anybody else.', u'Attempt the impossible in order to improve your work.', u"Sex is God's joke on human beings.", u'Acting should be bigger than life. Scripts should be bigger than life. It should all be bigger than life.', u'An affair now and then is good for a marriage. It adds spice, stops it from getting boring... I ought to know.', u'There are new words now that excuse everybody. Give me the good old days of heroes and villains, the people you can bravo or hiss. There was a truth to them that all the slick credulity of today cannot touch.', u'Without wonder and insight, acting is just a trade. With it, it becomes creation.'], u'Henry Rollins': [u'I believe that one defines oneself by reinvention. To not be like your parents. To not be like your friends. To be yourself. To cut yourself out of stone.', u"Don't do anything by half. If you love someone, love them with all your soul. When you go to work, work your ass off. When you hate someone, hate them until it hurts.", u"It's sad when someone you know becomes someone you knew.", u'Yes, I guess you could say I am a loner, but I feel more lonely in a crowed room with boring people than I feel on my own.', u"I don't believe in fate or destiny. I believe in various degrees of hatred, paranoia, and abandonment. However much of that gets heaped upon you doesn't matter - it's only a matter of how much you can take and what it does to you.", u'Loneliness adds beauty to life. It puts a special burn on sunsets and makes night air smell better.', u'Scar tissue is stronger than regular tissue. Realize the strength, move on.', u"To hate is to show you still care, who needs that, focus on what's really important.", u'I think about the meaning of pain. Pain is personal. It really belongs to the one feeling it. Probably the only thing that is your own. I like mine.', u"Life will not break your heart. It'll crush it.", u'Being an artist is dragging your innermost feelings out, giving a piece of yourself, no matter in which art form, in which medium.', u"Why do you think the old stories tell of men who set out on great journeys to impress the gods? Because trying to impress people just isn't worth the time and effort.", u'My optimism wears heavy boots and is loud.', u'Sometimes the truth hurts. And sometimes it feels real good.', u'As long as I tell the truth I feel that nobody can touch me.', u'Hope is the last thing a person does before they are defeated.', u'Keep your blood clean, your body lean, and your mind sharp.', u'I am an optimist because I want to change things for the better and I know that blood has to be spilled and disharmony and cruelty are necessary to do that.', u'The only difference between me and others is that they think they can change something with cute little poems, nice cards or embracing trees and being nice to little lapdogs.', u'Nothing brings people together more, then mutual hatred.', u"What I don't want to do is go out there and not be able to mean it, you know?", u'I want to change things for the better, just like everybody else.', u"I've always seen it as the role of an artist to drag his inside out, give the audience all you've got. Writers, actors, singers, all good artists do the same. It isn't supposed to be easy.", u"I've made some great mistakes in my life, but, you know, they were honest mistakes.", u'The blues is losing someone you love and not having enough money to immerse yourself in drink.'], u'Joan Rivers': [u"Don't follow any advice, no matter how good, until you feel as deeply in your spirit as you think in your mind that the counsel is wise.", u"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, today is God's gift, that's why we call it the present.", u'I knew I was an unwanted baby when I saw that my bath toys were a toaster and a radio.', u"I blame my mother for my poor sex life. All she told me was 'the man goes on top and the woman underneath.' For three years my husband and I slept in bunk beds.", u'I hate housework! You make the beds, you do the dishes and six months later you have to start all over again.', u"If God wanted us to bend over he'd put diamonds on the floor.", u'People say that money is not the key to happiness, but I always figured if you have enough money, you can have a key made.', u'Forty for you, sixty for me. And equal partners we will be.', u'Never floss with a stranger.', u"I don't excercise. If God had wanted me to bend over, he would have put diamonds on the floor.", u"I told my mother-in-law that my house was her house, and she said, 'Get the hell off my property.'", u'Before we make love my husband takes a pain killer.', u'I succeeded by saying what everyone else is thinking.', u"It's so long since I've had sex I've forgotten who ties up who.", u'I have no methods; all I do is accept people as they are.', u'My obstetrician was so dumb that when I gave birth he forgot to cut the cord. For a year that kid followed me everywhere. It was like having a dog on a leash.', u"The first time I see a jogger smiling, I'll consider it.", u'I have flabby thighs, but fortunately my stomach covers them.', u'The ideal beauty is a fugitive which is never found.', u"A man can sleep around, no questions asked, but if a woman makes nineteen or twenty mistakes she's a tramp.", u'Diets, like clothes, should be tailored to you.', u"Don't tell your kids you had an easy birth or they won't respect you. For years I used to wake up my daughter and say, 'Melissa you ripped me to shreds. Now go back to sleep.'.", u"I wish I had a twin, so I could know what I'd look like without plastic surgery.", u"It's been so long since I've had sex I've forgotten who ties up whom.", u'My routines come out of total unhappiness. My audiences are my group therapy.'], u'Khalil Gibran': [u'Friendship is always a sweet responsibility, never an opportunity.', u'Wisdom ceases to be wisdom when it becomes too proud to weep, too grave to laugh, and too selfish to seek other than itself.', u'A friend who is far away is sometimes much nearer than one who is at hand. Is not the mountain far more awe-inspiring and more clearly visible to one passing through the valley than to those who inhabit the mountain?', u'Doubt is a pain too lonely to know that faith is his twin brother.', u'I love you when you bow in your mosque, kneel in your temple, pray in your church. For you and I are sons of one religion, and it is the spirit.', u'The teacher who is indeed wise does not bid you to enter the house of his wisdom but rather leads you to the threshold of your mind.', u'I have learned silence from the talkative, toleration from the intolerant, and kindness from the unkind; yet, strange, I am ungrateful to those teachers.', u'In the sweetness of friendship let there be laughter, and sharing of pleasures. For in the dew of little things the heart finds its morning and is refreshed.', u'And ever has it been known that love knows not its own depth until the hour of separation.', u"Your children are not your children. They are the sons and daughters of Life's longing for itself. They came through you but not from you and though they are with you yet they belong not to you.", u'Your living is determined not so much by what life brings to you as by the attitude you bring to life; not so much by what happens to you as by the way your mind looks at what happens.', u'But let there be spaces in your togetherness and let the winds of the heavens dance between you. Love one another but make not a bond of love: let it rather be a moving sea between the shores of your souls.', u'Faith is a knowledge within the heart, beyond the reach of proof.', u"If you love somebody, let them go, for if they return, they were always yours. And if they don't, they never were.", u'Life without love is like a tree without blossoms or fruit.', u"Of life's two chief prizes, beauty and truth, I found the first in a loving heart and the second in a laborer's hand.", u'Keep me away from the wisdom which does not cry, the philosophy which does not laugh and the greatness which does not bow before children.', u'A little knowledge that acts is worth infinitely more than much knowledge that is idle.', u'Out of suffering have emerged the strongest souls; the most massive characters are seared with scars.', u'Work is love made visible. And if you cannot work with love but only with distaste, it is better that you should leave your work and sit at the gate of the temple and take alms of those who work with joy.', u'When you are joyous, look deep into your heart and you shall find it is only that which has given you sorrow that is giving you joy. When you are sorrowful look again in your heart, and you shall see that in truth you are weeping for that which has been your delight.', u'Advance, and never halt, for advancing is perfection. Advance and do not fear the thorns in the path, for they draw only corrupt blood.', u'And forget not that the earth delights to feel your bare feet and the winds long to play with your hair.', u"March on. Do not tarry. To go forward is to move toward perfection. March on, and fear not the thorns, or the sharp stones on life's path.", u'Beauty is eternity gazing at itself in a mirror.'], u'Ayn Rand': [u'A creative man is motivated by the desire to achieve, not by the desire to beat others.', u'Achievement of your happiness is the only moral purpose of your life, and that happiness, not pain or mindless self-indulgence, is the proof of your moral integrity, since it is the proof and the result of your loyalty to the achievement of your values.', u'We are fast approaching the stage of the ultimate inversion: the stage where the government is free to do anything it pleases, while the citizens may act only by permission; which is the stage of the darkest periods of human history, the stage of rule by brute force.', u'The smallest minority on earth is the individual. Those who deny individual rights cannot claim to be defenders of minorities.', u'Government "help" to business is just as disastrous as government persecution... the only way a government can be of service to national prosperity is by keeping its hands off.', u"It only stands to reason that where there's sacrifice, there's someone collecting the sacrificial offerings. Where there's service, there is someone being served. The man who speaks to you of sacrifice is speaking of slaves and masters, and intends to be the master.", u'Individual rights are not subject to a public vote; a majority has no right to vote away the rights of a minority; the political function of rights is precisely to protect minorities from oppression by majorities (and the smallest minority on earth is the individual).', u'Contradictions do not exist. Whenever you think you are facing a contradiction, check your premises. You will find that one of them is wrong.', u'I swear, by my life and my love of it, that I will never live for the sake of another man, nor ask another man to live for mine.', u"Love is the expression of one's values, the greatest reward you can earn for the moral qualities you have achieved in your character and person, the emotional price paid by one man for the joy he receives from the virtues of another.", u"The question isn't who is going to let me; it's who is going to stop me.", u"Potentially, a government is the most dangerous threat to man's rights: it holds a legal monopoly on the use of physical force against legally disarmed victims.", u"The only power any government has is the power to crack down on criminals. Well, when there aren't enough criminals, one makes them. One declares so many things to be a crime that it becomes impossible for men to live without breaking laws.", u'The ladder of success is best climbed by stepping on the rungs of opportunity.', u"Civilization is the progress toward a society of privacy. The savage's whole existence is public, ruled by the laws of his tribe. Civilization is the process of setting man free from men.", u'Ask yourself whether the dream of heaven and greatness should be waiting for us in our graves - or whether it should be ours here and now and on this earth.', u'Reason is not automatic. Those who deny it cannot be conquered by it. Do not count on them. Leave them alone.', u'Every man builds his world in his own image. He has the power to choose, but no power to escape the necessity of choice.', u"Run for your life from any man who tells you that money is evil. That sentence is the leper's bell of an approaching looter.", u'There are two sides to every issue: one side is right and the other is wrong, but the middle is always evil.', u'To say "I love you" one must first be able to say the "I."', u'Do not ever say that the desire to "do good" by force is a good motive. Neither power-lust nor stupidity are good motives.', u'If any civilization is to survive, it is the morality of altruism that men have to reject.', u'There is a level of cowardice lower than that of the conformist: the fashionable non-conformist.', u"Wealth is the product of man's capacity to think."], u'John Steinbeck': [u'It has always seemed strange to me... the things we admire in men, kindness and generosity, openness, honesty, understanding and feeling, are the concomitants of failure in our system. And those traits we detest, sharpness, greed, acquisitiveness, meanness, egotism and self-interest, are the traits of success. And while men admire the quality of the first they love the produce of the second.', u'I have come to believe that a great teacher is a great artist and that there are as few as there are any other great artists. Teaching might even be the greatest of the arts since the medium is the human mind and spirit.', u'A journey is like marriage. The certain way to be wrong is to think you control it.', u'A journey is a person in itself; no two are alike. And all plans, safeguards, policing, and coercion are fruitless. We find that after years of struggle that we do not take a trip; a trip takes us.', u'A sad soul can kill quicker than a germ.', u'It is a common experience that a problem difficult at night is resolved in the morning after the committee of sleep has worked on it.', u'Many a trip continues long after movement in time and space have ceased.', u"If you're in trouble, or hurt or need - go to the poor people. They're the only ones that'll help - the only ones.", u'No man really knows about other human beings. The best he can do is to suppose that they are like himself.', u"I've seen a look in dogs' eyes, a quickly vanishing look of amazed contempt, and I am convinced that basically dogs think humans are nuts.", u'Power does not corrupt. Fear corrupts... perhaps the fear of a loss of power.', u'Ideas are like rabbits. You get a couple and learn how to handle them, and pretty soon you have a dozen.', u"Where does discontent start? You are warm enough, but you shiver. You are fed, yet hunger gnaws you. You have been loved, but your yearning wanders in new fields. And to prod all these there's time, the Bastard Time.", u'In the souls of the people the grapes of wrath are filling and growing heavy, growing heavy for the vintage.', u'It seems to me that if you or I must choose between two courses of thought or action, we should remember our dying and try so to live that our death brings no pleasure on the world.', u'We spend our time searching for security and hate it when we get it.', u'I am impelled, not to squeak like a grateful and apologetic mouse, but to roar like a lion out of pride in my profession.', u'I hate cameras. They are so much more sure than I am about everything.', u'One can find so many pains when the rain is falling.', u'Man is the only kind of varmint sets his own trap, baits it, then steps in it.', u'Unless a reviewer has the courage to give you unqualified praise, I say ignore the bastard.', u"Give a critic an inch, he'll write a play.", u'Man, unlike anything organic or inorganic in the universe, grows beyond his work, walks up the stairs of his concepts, emerges ahead of his accomplishments.', u'No one wants advice - only corroboration.', u'The discipline of the written word punishes both stupidity and dishonesty.'], u'Lady Gaga': [u"I've been actually really very pleased to see how much awareness was raised around bullying, and how deeply it affects everyone. You know, you don't have to be the loser kid in high school to be bullied. Bullying and being picked on comes in so many different forms.", u"Every bit of me is devoted to love and art. And I aspire to try to be a teacher to my young fans who feel just like I felt when I was younger. I just felt like a freak. I guess what I'm trying to say is I'm trying to liberate them, I want to free them of their fears and make them feel that they can make their own space in the world.", u"I don't think I could live without hair, makeup and styling, let alone be the performer I am. I am a glamour girl through and through. I believe in the glamorous life and I live one.", u"'Born this Way' is about being yourself, and loving who you are and being proud.", u"I don't like Los Angeles. The people are awful and terribly shallow, and everybody wants to be famous but nobody wants to play the game. I'm from New York. I will kill to get what I need.", u'I live halfway between reality and theater at all times. And I was born this way.', u"If you are not being bullied all I would say - cause I like to talk about the other side of it as well - is you know, be someone that nurtures, and if there's someone in your class that maybe doesn't have a lot of friends, be the person that sits with them in the cafeteria sometimes; be the bigger person.", u"It's hard knowing who to trust with your personal life. When you cry in your room at night, you don't always know who to call. So I am very close to my family.", u"What I've discovered is that in art, as in music, there's a lot of truth-and then there's a lie. The artist is essentially creating his work to make this lie a truth, but he slides it in amongst all the others. The tiny little lie is the moment I live for, my moment. It's the moment that the audience falls in love.", u"A record deal doesn't make you an artist; you make yourself an artist.", u'I am a walking piece of art every day, with my dreams and my ambitions forward at all times in an effort to inspire my fans to lead their life in that way.', u'I had this dream, and I really wanted to be a star. And I was almost a monster in the way that I was really fearless with my ambitions.', u"Lady Gaga is my name. If you know me, and you call me Stefani, you don't really know me at all.", u'I like pushing boundaries.', u'I do yoga, I do Bikram and I run, and I eat really healthy.', u"I want my fans to love themselves. It's almost like I want to hypnotize them so when they hear my music they love themselves instantly.", u"When the whole world has their eyes on you, if you say something that doesn't truly come from your spirit and your soul, or if you wear something that doesn't come from your spirit and your soul, it's an injustice to your position. And so, I'm really myself every single day and I do it because I know my fans would want me to.", u"I don't like celebrities; I don't hang out with them; I don't relate to that life.", u"I hope that what you take away from my album is not just the music - which I did want to be fun, and I did want it to be about individuality, but please also take away from it that there's no dream that's too big.", u"If you only believe that you're an artist when you have a big advance in your pocket and a single coming out, I would say that's quite soulless. You have to have a sense of your own greatness and your own ability from a very deep place inside you. I am the one with the litmus test in my hands of what people need to hear next.", u'When I say to you, there is nobody like me, and there never was, that is a statement I want every woman to feel and make about themselves.', u"When you're around me and really see that all I do is live and breathe for my work, it's not strange, it's just Gaga.", u"I think what it really is, is that I date creative people. And I think that what intimidates them is not my purse; it's my mind.", u"I think what made it difficult for people to get, and still makes it difficult for people to get, is the theatrical nature of the work and the fact that, my music doesn't exist without the performance-art element.", u"So there's nothing more provocative than taking a genre that everybody who's cool hates - and then making it cool."], u'H. L. Mencken': [u'The whole aim of practical politics is to keep the populace alarmed (and hence clamorous to be led to safety) by menacing it with an endless series of hobgoblins, all of them imaginary.', u'Democracy is the theory that the common people know what they want, and deserve to get it good and hard.', u'Love is like war: easy to begin but very hard to stop.', u'In this world of sin and sorrow there is always something to be thankful for; as for me, I rejoice that I am not a Republican.', u'For every complex problem there is an answer that is clear, simple, and wrong.', u'The most dangerous man to any government is the man who is able to think things out... without regard to the prevailing superstitions and taboos. Almost inevitably he comes to the conclusion that the government he lives under is dishonest, insane, intolerable.', u'Every normal man must be tempted, at times, to spit on his hands, hoist the black flag, and begin slitting throats.', u'No matter how happily a woman may be married, it always pleases her to discover that there is a nice man who wishes that she were not.', u'A national political campaign is better than the best circus ever heard of, with a mass baptism and a couple of hangings thrown in.', u"We must respect the other fellow's religion, but only in the sense and to the extent that we respect his theory that his wife is beautiful and his children smart.", u'Nobody ever went broke underestimating the taste of the American public.', u'If, after I depart this vale, you ever remember me and have thought to please my ghost, forgive some sinner and wink your eye at some homely girl.', u'I believe that it is better to tell the truth than a lie. I believe it is better to be free than to be a slave. And I believe it is better to know than to be ignorant.', u'No one in this world has ever lost money by underestimating the intelligence of the great masses of the plain people. Nor has anyone ever lost public office thereby.', u'A judge is a law student who marks his own examination papers.', u"Temptation is a woman's weapon and man's excuse.", u"Bachelors know more about women than married men; if they didn't they'd be married too.", u'A good politician is quite as unthinkable as an honest burglar.', u'Democracy is the art and science of running the circus from the monkey cage.', u'It is now quite lawful for a Catholic woman to avoid pregnancy by a resort to mathematics, though she is still forbidden to resort to physics or chemistry.', u'Every election is a sort of advance auction sale of stolen goods.', u'The urge to save humanity is almost always a false front for the urge to rule.', u'Democracy is a pathetic belief in the collective wisdom of individual ignorance.', u'Love is the delusion that one woman differs from another.', u'A newspaper is a device for making the ignorant more ignorant and the crazy crazier.'], u'Joseph Joubert': [u'A part of kindness consists in loving people more than they deserve.', u'Kindness is loving people more than they deserve.', u'When you go in search of honey you must expect to be stung by bees.', u'To teach is to learn twice.', u'Never cut what you can untie.', u'The aim of argument, or of discussion, should not be victory, but progress.', u'How many people make themselves abstract to appear profound. The most useful part of abstract terms are the shadows they create to hide a vacuum.', u'Only choose in marriage a man whom you would choose as a friend if he were a woman.', u'The direction of the mind is more important than its progress.', u'We must respect the past, and mistrust the present, if we wish to provide for the safety of the future.', u'Children need models rather than critics.', u'Grace is in garments, in movements, in manners; beauty in the nude, and in forms. This is true of bodies; but when we speak of feelings, beauty is in their spirituality, and grace in their moderation.', u'He who has imagination without learning has wings but no feet.', u'Imagination is the eye of the soul.', u'It is better to debate a question without settling it than to settle a question without debating it.', u'Love and fear. Everything the father of a family says must inspire one or the other.', u'Misery is almost always the result of thinking.', u'Never write anything that does not give you great pleasure. Emotion is easily transferred from the writer to the reader.', u'Politeness is the flower of humanity.', u'The best remedy for a short temper is a long walk.', u'Without the spiritual world the material world is a disheartening enigma.', u'All are born to observe order, but few are born to establish it.', u'Ask the young. They know everything.', u'Be charitable and indulge to everyone, but thyself.', u'Genius begins great works; labor alone finishes them.'], u'Frederick Douglass': [u'It is easier to build strong children than to repair broken men.', u'I am a Republican, a black, dyed in the wool Republican, and I never intend to belong to any other party than the party of freedom and progress.', u'I prefer to be true to myself, even at the hazard of incurring the ridicule of others, rather than to be false, and to incur my own abhorrence.', u'Where justice is denied, where poverty is enforced, where ignorance prevails, and where any one class is made to feel that society is an organized conspiracy to oppress, rob and degrade them, neither persons nor property will be safe.', u'If there is no struggle, there is no progress.', u'Find out just what any people will quietly submit to and you have the exact measure of the injustice and wrong which will be imposed on them.', u'I prayed for twenty years but received no answer until I prayed with my legs.', u"I didn't know I was a slave until I found out I couldn't do the things I wanted.", u'A battle lost or won is easily described, understood, and appreciated, but the moral growth of a great nation requires reflection, as well as observation, to appreciate it.', u'It is not light that we need, but fire; it is not the gentle shower, but thunder. We need the storm, the whirlwind, and the earthquake.', u'One and God make a majority.', u'The limits of tyrants are prescribed by the endurance of those whom they oppose.', u'Power concedes nothing without a demand. It never did and it never will.', u"I recognize the Republican party as the sheet anchor of the colored man's political hopes and the ark of his safety.", u'America is false to the past, false to the present, and solemnly binds herself to be false to the future.', u'Without a struggle, there can be no progress.', u'Those who profess to favor freedom, and yet depreciate agitation, are men who want crops without plowing up the ground.', u'People might not get all they work for in this world, but they must certainly work for all they get.', u'No man can put a chain about the ankle of his fellow man without at last finding the other end fastened about his own neck.', u'To suppress free speech is a double wrong. It violates the rights of the hearer as well as those of the speaker.', u'A gentleman will not insult me, and no man not a gentleman can insult me.', u'The life of the nation is secure only while the nation is honest, truthful, and virtuous.', u'A little learning, indeed, may be a dangerous thing, but the want of learning is a calamity to any people.', u"A man's character always takes its hue, more or less, from the form and color of things about him.", u"Man's greatness consists in his ability to do and the proper application of his powers to things needed to be done."], u'Albert Camus': [u"Don't walk behind me; I may not lead. Don't walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend.", u'You will never be happy if you continue to search for what happiness consists of. You will never live if you are looking for the meaning of life.', u"I would rather live my life as if there is a God and die to find out there isn't, than live my life as if there isn't and die to find out there is.", u'In the depth of winter I finally learned that there was in me an invincible summer.', u'I know of only one duty, and that is to love.', u"A man's work is nothing but this slow trek to rediscover, through the detours of art, those two or three great and simple images in whose presence his heart first opened.", u'Autumn is a second spring when every leaf is a flower.', u'Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal.', u'A guilty conscience needs to confess. A work of art is a confession.', u'At 30 a man should know himself like the palm of his hand, know the exact number of his defects and qualities, know how far he can go, foretell his failures - be what he is. And, above all, accept these things.', u'An intellectual is someone whose mind watches itself.', u'Beauty is unbearable, drives us to despair, offering us for a minute the glimpse of an eternity that we should like to stretch out over the whole of time.', u'The only way to deal with an unfree world is to become so absolutely free that your very existence is an act of rebellion.', u"Don't believe your friends when they ask you to be honest with them. All they really want is to be maintained in the good opinion they have of themselves.", u'Blessed are the hearts that can bend; they shall never be broken.', u'A man without ethics is a wild beast loosed upon this world.', u'But what is happiness except the simple harmony between a man and the life he leads?', u'The gods had condemned Sisyphus to ceaselessly rolling a rock to the top of a mountain, whence the stone would fall back of its own weight. They had thought with some reason that there is no more dreadful punishment than futile and hopeless labor.', u"All great deeds and all great thoughts have a ridiculous beginning. Great works are often born on a street corner or in a restaurant's revolving door.", u'Nothing is more despicable than respect based on fear.', u'A free press can, of course, be good or bad, but, most certainly without freedom, the press will never be anything but bad.', u"Don't wait for the last judgment - it takes place every day.", u"The struggle itself towards the heights is enough to fill a man's heart. One must imagine Sisyphus happy.", u"You know what charm is: a way of getting the answer 'yes' without having asked any clear question.", u'After all manner of professors have done their best for us, the place we are to get knowledge is in books. The true university of these days is a collection of books.'], u'Alexis de Tocqueville': [u"The American Republic will endure until the day Congress discovers that it can bribe the public with the public's money.", u'Democracy and socialism have nothing in common but one word, equality. But notice the difference: while democracy seeks equality in liberty, socialism seeks equality in restraint and servitude.', u'Americans are so enamored of equality that they would rather be equal in slavery than unequal in freedom.', u'A democratic government is the only one in which those who vote for a tax can escape the obligation to pay it.', u'Liberty cannot be established without morality, nor morality without faith.', u'As one digs deeper into the national character of the Americans, one sees that they have sought the value of everything in this world only in the answer to this single question: how much money will it bring in?', u'There are many men of principle in both parties in America, but there is no party of principle.', u'In the United States, the majority undertakes to supply a multitude of ready-made opinions for the use of individuals, who are thus relieved from the necessity of forming opinions of their own.', u'The greatness of America lies not in being more enlightened than any other nation, but rather in her ability to repair her faults.', u'History is a gallery of pictures in which there are few originals and many copies.', u'In other words, a democratic government is the only one in which those who vote for a tax can escape the obligation to pay it.', u'It is the dissimilarities and inequalities among men which give rise to the notion of honor; as such differences become less, it grows feeble; and when they disappear, it will vanish too.', u'When the past no longer illuminates the future, the spirit walks in darkness.', u'I know of no country in which there is so little independence of mind and real freedom of discussion as in America.', u'I cannot help fearing that men may reach a point where they look on every new theory as a danger, every innovation as a toilsome trouble, every social advance as a first step toward revolution, and that they may absolutely refuse to move at all.', u'All those who seek to destroy the liberties of a democratic nation ought to know that war is the surest and shortest means to accomplish it.', u'We succeed in enterprises which demand the positive qualities we possess, but we excel in those which can also make use of our defects.', u'What is most important for democracy is not that great fortunes should not exist, but that great fortunes should not remain in the same hands. In that way there are rich men, but they do not form a class.', u'In no other country in the world is the love of property keener or more alert than in the United States, and nowhere else does the majority display less inclination toward doctrines which in any way threaten the way property is owned.', u'In a revolution, as in a novel, the most difficult part to invent is the end.', u'In politics shared hatreds are almost always the basis of friendships.', u'Those that despise people will never get the best out of others and themselves.', u'The Indian knew how to live without wants, to suffer without complaint, and to die singing.', u'In America the majority raises formidable barriers around the liberty of opinion; within these barriers an author may write what he pleases, but woe to him if he goes beyond them.', u'No protracted war can fail to endanger the freedom of a democratic country.'], u'Frank Lloyd Wright': [u'A free America... means just this: individual freedom for all, rich or poor, or else this system of government we call democracy is only an expedient to enslave man to the machine and make him like it.', u'The truth is more important than the facts.', u'Give me the luxuries of life and I will willingly do without the necessities.', u'Every great architect is - necessarily - a great poet. He must be a great original interpreter of his time, his day, his age.', u'God is the great mysterious motivator of what we call nature, and it has often been said by philosophers, that nature is the will of God. And I prefer to say that nature is the only body of God that we shall ever see.', u'I believe in God, only I spell it Nature.', u'TV is chewing gum for the eyes.', u'Early in life I had to choose between honest arrogance and hypocritical humility. I chose the former and have seen no reason to change.', u'Study nature, love nature, stay close to nature. It will never fail you.', u'Form follows function - that has been misunderstood. Form and function should be one, joined in a spiritual union.', u'A doctor can bury his mistakes but an architect can only advise his clients to plant vines.', u'Less is only more where more is no good.', u"An architect's most useful tools are an eraser at the drafting board, and a wrecking bar at the site.", u'There is nothing more uncommon than common sense.', u"Art for art's sake is a philosophy of the well-fed.", u'Eventually, I think Chicago will be the most beautiful great city left in the world.', u'Harvard takes perfectly good plums as students, and turns them into prunes.', u'I believe totally in a Capitalist System, I only wish that someone would try it.', u'A great architect is not made by way of a brain nearly so much as he is made by way of a cultivated, enriched heart.', u'Simplicity and repose are the qualities that measure the true value of any work of art.', u'An idea is salvation by imagination.', u'The longer I live, the more beautiful life becomes.', u"A man is a fool if he drinks before he reaches the age of 50, and a fool if he doesn't afterward.", u'All fine architectural values are human values, else not valuable.', u'I have been black and blue in some spot, somewhere, almost all my life from too intimate contacts with my own furniture.'], u'George Carlin': [u'Have you ever noticed that anybody driving slower than you is an idiot, and anyone going faster than you is a maniac?', u'Fighting for peace is like screwing for virginity.', u"Some people see things that are and ask, Why? Some people dream of things that never were and ask, Why not? Some people have to go to work and don't have time for all that.", u'The main reason Santa is so jolly is because he knows where all the bad girls live.', u"The very existence of flame-throwers proves that some time, somewhere, someone said to themselves, You know, I want to set those people over there on fire, but I'm just not close enough to get the job done.", u'Inside every cynical person, there is a disappointed idealist.', u"Just cause you got the monkey off your back doesn't mean the circus has left town.", u'Weather forecast for tonight: dark.', u"Don't sweat the petty things and don't pet the sweaty things.", u'I went to a bookstore and asked the saleswoman, "Where\'s the self-help section?" She said if she told me, it would defeat the purpose.', u"I was thinking about how people seem to read the Bible a whole lot more as they get older; then it dawned on me - they're cramming for their final exam.", u'Electricity is really just organized lightning.', u'Frisbeetarianism is the belief that when you die, your soul goes up on the roof and gets stuck.', u"I'm completely in favor of the separation of Church and State. My idea is that these two institutions screw us up enough on their own, so both of them together is certain death.", u'Most people work just hard enough not to get fired and get paid just enough money not to quit.', u"The reason I talk to myself is that I'm the only one whose answers I accept.", u"If it's true that our species is alone in the universe, then I'd have to say the universe aimed rather low and settled for very little.", u"People who say they don't care what people think are usually desperate to have people think they don't care what people think.", u'"I am" is reportedly the shortest sentence in the English language. Could it be that "I do" is the longest sentence?', u"When you're born you get a ticket to the freak show. When you're born in America, you get a front row seat.", u"Always do whatever's next.", u'By and large, language is a tool for concealing the truth.', u"I have as much authority as the Pope, I just don't have as many people who believe it.", u'Atheism is a non-prophet organization.', u'May the forces of evil become confused on the way to your house.'], u'Aeschylus': [u'He who learns must suffer. And even in our sleep pain that cannot forget falls drop by drop upon the heart, and in our own despair, against our will, comes wisdom to us by the awful grace of God.', u"For the poison of hatred seated near the heart doubles the burden for the one who suffers the disease; he is burdened with his own sorrow, and groans on seeing another's happiness.", u"I'm not afraid of storms, for I'm learning to sail my ship.", u'From a small seed a mighty trunk may grow.', u'It is in the character of very few men to honor without envy a friend who has prospered.', u'There is no pain so great as the memory of joy in present grief.', u'Memory is the mother of all wisdom.', u'For there is no defense for a man who, in the excess of his wealth, has kicked the great altar of Justice out of sight.', u'Call no man happy till he is dead.', u'He who goes unenvied shall not be admired.', u'Obedience is the mother of success and is wedded to safety.', u'Whenever a man makes haste, God too hastens with him.', u'Wisdom comes alone through suffering.', u'I have learned to hate all traitors, and there is no disease that I spit on more than treachery.', u'Of prosperity mortals can never have enough.', u'But time growing old teaches all things.', u'The words of truth are simple.', u'Happiness is a choice that requires effort at times.', u'In the lack of judgment great harm arises, but one vote cast can set right a house.', u'Of all the gods only death does not desire gifts.', u"Don't you know this, that words are doctors to a diseased temperment?", u"God's most lordly gift to man is decency of mind.", u'What good is it to live a life that brings pains?', u'Ah, lives of men! When prosperous they glitter - Like a fair picture; when misfortune comes - A wet sponge at one blow has blurred the painting.', u"Everyone's quick to blame the alien."], u'Nathaniel Hawthorne': [u'No man for any considerable period can wear one face to himself and another to the multitude, without finally getting bewildered as to which may be the true.', u'All brave men love; for he only is brave who has affections to fight for, whether in the daily battle of life, or in physical contests.', u'Happiness is a butterfly, which when pursued, is always just beyond your grasp, but which, if you will sit down quietly, may alight upon you.', u'Words - so innocent and powerless as they are, as standing in a dictionary, how potent for good and evil they become in the hands of one who knows how to combine them.', u'Happiness in this world, when it comes, comes incidentally. Make it the object of pursuit, and it leads us a wild-goose chase, and is never attained. Follow some other object, and very possibly we may find that we have caught happiness without dreaming of it.', u'Accuracy is the twin brother of honesty; inaccuracy, of dishonesty.', u'A pure hand needs no glove to cover it.', u'Every individual has a place to fill in the world and is important in some respect whether he chooses to be so or not.', u'Time flies over us, but leaves it shadow behind.', u'Our Creator would never have made such lovely days, and have given us the deep hearts to enjoy them, above and beyond all thought, unless we were meant to be immortal.', u'Religion and art spring from the same root and are close kin. Economics and art are strangers.', u"A stale article, if you dip it in a good, warm, sunny smile, will go off better than a fresh one that you've scowled upon.", u'Easy reading is damn hard writing.', u'Nobody, I think, ought to read poetry, or look at pictures or statues, who cannot find a great deal more in them than the poet or artist has actually expressed. Their highest merit is suggestiveness.', u'Selfishness is one of the qualities apt to inspire love.', u"The greatest obstacle to being heroic is the doubt whether one may not be going to prove one's self a fool; the truest heroism is to resist the doubt; and the profoundest wisdom, to know when it ought to be resisted, and when it be obeyed.", u"What other dungeon is so dark as one's own heart! What jailer so inexorable as one's self!", u"A woman's chastity consists, like an onion, of a series of coats.", u'Caresses, expressions of one sort or another, are necessary to the life of the affections as leaves are to the life of a tree. If they are wholly restrained, love will die at the roots.', u"It contributes greatly towards a man's moral and intellectual health, to be brought into habits of companionship with individuals unlike himself, who care little for his pursuits, and whose sphere and abilities he must go out of himself to appreciate.", u'Life is made up of marble and mud.', u'Love, whether newly born, or aroused from a deathlike slumber, must always create sunshine, filling the heart so full of radiance, this it overflows upon the outward world.', u'The founders of a new colony, whatever Utopia of human virtue and happiness they might originally project, have invariably recognized it among their earliest practical necessities to allot a portion of the virgin soil as a cemetery, and another portion as the site of a prison.', u'The world owes all its onward impulses to men ill at ease. The happy man inevitably confines himself within ancient limits.', u'We sometimes congratulate ourselves at the moment of waking from a troubled dream; it may be so the moment after death.'], u'Gustave Flaubert': [u'Be regular and orderly in your life, so that you may be violent and original in your work.', u'The most glorious moments in your life are not the so-called days of success, but rather those days when out of dejection and despair you feel rise in you a challenge to life, and the promise of future accomplishments.', u"A friend who dies, it's something of you who dies.", u'Artists who seek perfection in everything are those who cannot attain it in anything.', u'Love is a springtime plant that perfumes everything with its hope, even the ruins to which it clings.', u'I believe that if one always looked at the skies, one would end up with wings.', u'To be stupid, selfish, and have good health are three requirements for happiness, though if stupidity is lacking, all is lost.', u"A memory is a beautiful thing, it's almost a desire that you miss.", u'The artist must be in his work as God is in creation, invisible and all-powerful; one must sense him everywhere but never see him.', u'I love good sense above all, perhaps because I have none.', u'There is no truth. There is only perception.', u'Madame Bovary is myself.', u'Anything becomes interesting if you look at it long enough.', u'Human speech is like a cracked kettle on which we tap crude rhythms for bears to dance to, while we long to make music that will melt the stars.', u'I love my work with a frenetic and perverse love, as an ascetic loves the hair shirt which scratches his belly.', u'One arrives at style only with atrocious effort, with fanatical and devoted stubbornness.', u'Do not read, as children do, to amuse yourself, or like the ambitious, for the purpose of instruction. No, read in order to live.', u'Everything one invents is true, you may be perfectly sure of that. Poetry is as precise as geometry.', u'Here is true immorality: ignorance and stupidity; the devil is nothing but this. His name is Legion.', u'Judge the goodness of a book by the energy of the punches it has given you. I believe the greatest characteristic of genius, is, above all, force.', u'Read in order to live.', u'A superhuman will is needed in order to write, and I am only a man.', u'I am a man-pen. I feel through the pen, because of the pen.', u'It seems to me that I have always existed and that I possess memories that date back to the Pharaohs.', u'Nothing is more humiliating than to see idiots succeed in enterprises we have failed in.'], u'Henry Miller': [u'The aim of life is to live, and to live means to be aware, joyously, drunkenly, serenely, divinely aware.', u'The one thing we can never get enough of is love. And the one thing we never give enough is love.', u'An artist is always alone - if he is an artist. No, what the artist needs is loneliness.', u'We have two American flags always: one for the rich and one for the poor. When the rich fly it means that things are under control; when the poor fly it means danger, revolution, anarchy.', u'Back of every creation, supporting it like an arch, is faith. Enthusiasm is nothing: it comes and goes. But if one believes, then miracles occur.', u'Develop an interest in life as you see it; the people, things, literature, music - the world is so rich, simply throbbing with rich treasures, beautiful souls and interesting people. Forget yourself.', u'Develop interest in life as you see it; in people, things, literature, music - the world is so rich, simply throbbing with rich treasures, beautiful souls and interesting people. Forget yourself.', u'All growth is a leap in the dark, a spontaneous unpremeditated act without benefit of experience.', u'I have no money, no resources, no hopes. I am the happiest man alive.', u'Confusion is a word we have invented for an order which is not understood.', u"If we are always arriving and departing, it is also true that we are eternally anchored. One's destination is never a place but rather a new way of looking at things.", u'The moment one gives close attention to any thing, even a blade of grass it becomes a mysterious, awesome, indescribably magnificent world in itself.', u'Every man has his own destiny: the only imperative is to follow it, to accept it, no matter where it leads him.', u'The only thing we never get enough of is love; and the only thing we never give enough of is love.', u'Why are we so full of restraint? Why do we not give in all directions? Is it fear of losing ourselves? Until we do lose ourselves there is no hope of finding ourselves.', u'Art is only a means to life, to the life more abundant. It is not in itself the life more abundant. It merely points the way, something which is overlooked not only by the public, but very often by the artist himself. In becoming an end it defeats itself.', u'We do not talk - we bludgeon one another with facts and theories gleaned from cursory readings of newspapers, magazines and digests.', u'True strength lies in submission which permits one to dedicate his life, through devotion, to something beyond himself.', u'No man is great enough or wise enough for any of us to surrender our destiny to. The only way in which anyone can lead us is to restore to us the belief in our own guidance.', u'The man who looks for security, even in the mind, is like a man who would chop off his limbs in order to have artificial ones which will give him no pain or trouble.', u'If there is to be any peace it will come through being, not having.', u'Any genuine philosophy leads to action and from action back again to wonder, to the enduring fact of mystery.', u'Chaos is the score upon which reality is written.', u'There is no salvation in becoming adapted to a world which is crazy.', u'Honest criticism means nothing: what one wants is unrestrained passion, fire for fire.']}
